mediawiki xmlnshttp:www.mediawiki.orgxmlexport.xmlns:xsihttp:www.orgXMLSchemainstance xsi:schemaLocationhttp:www.mediawiki.orgxmlexport.http:www.mediawiki.orgxmlexpo.xsd version.basehttps:en.wikipedia.generatorMediaWiki .These are often described as stateless societystateless societies,lt;refgt;quot;ANARCHISM,quot; George Woodcock.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLPetrKropotkinAnarchismfromtheEncyclopaediaBritannica.html Peter Kropotkin.quot;Anarchismquot; from the Encyclopdia Britannicalt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Anarchism.quot; The Shorter Routledge Encyclopedia of Philosophy.quot;Anarchism is the view that a society without the state,or government,is both possible and desirable.quot;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Sheehan,Sean.Anarchism,London: Reaktion Books Ltd.lt;refgt;quot;as many anarchists have stressed,it is not government as such that they find objectionable,but the hierarchical forms of government associated with the nation state.quot; Judith Suissa.Anarchism and Education: a Philosophical Perspective.Routledge.New York.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;iafifa.orgquot;gt;lt;refgt;quot;That is why Anarchy,when it works to destroy authority in all its aspects,quot; Peter Kropotkin.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLPetrKropotkinAnarchismitsphilosophyandideal.illegitimate authority,in other words,hierarchy  hierarchy being the institutionalisation of authority within a society.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLTheAnarchistFAQEditorialCollectiveAnAnarchistFAQ.htmltoc quot;B.Why are anarchists against authority and hierarchy?quot; in An Anarchist FAQlt;refgt; Anarchism considers the state politystate to be undesirable,unnecessary,and harmful.cite journal lastMalatestafirstErricotitleTowards AnarchismjournalMAN!publisherInternational Group of San FranciscolocationLos Angelesoclcurlhttp:www.marxists.orgarchivemalatestasxxtoanarchy.htmarchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:marxists.orgarchivemalatestasxxtoanarchy.cite journal urlhttp:www.theglobeandmail.comservletstoryRTGAM.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.theglobeandmail.comservletstoryRTGAM.cite web urlhttp:www.britannica.archive.orgwebhttp:www.britannica.comebarticle archivedate  December lt;!or government,is both possible and desirable.cite book  last  Johnston  first  R.Carl.quot;Anarchism.quot; The Concise Oxford Dictionary of Politics.Iain McLean and Alistair McMillan.Oxford University Press,lt;refgt; While antistatism is central,lt;refgt;quot;Anarchists do reject the state,as we will see.But to claim that this central aspect of anarchism is definitive is to sell anarchism short.quot;http:books.google.ecbooks?AshGate.including,but not limited to,the state system.lt;ref namequot;iafifa.orgquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.iafifa.orgprinciplesenglish.html titleIAF principles publisherInternational of Anarchist Federations archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.iafifa.orgprinciplesenglish.political,social,religious,cultural or sexual.To use the words hierarchy,class,and State interchangeably,as many social theorists do,is insidious and obscurantist.This practice,in the name of a quot;classlessquot; or quot;libertarianquot; society,could easily conceal the existence of hierarchical relationships and a hierarchical sensibility,quot; Murray Bookchin.The Ecology of Freedom: the emergence and dissolution of Hierarchy.Palo Alto.Anarchism is distinguished,philosophically,practically,quot;http:books.google.ecbooks?AshGate.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Anarchism,then,according to individual desires,tastes,and inclinations.quot; Emma Goldman.quot;What it Really Stands for Anarchyquot; in Anarchism and Other Essays.follow either the path of Authority or the path of Liberty.Marx went one way; Warren and Proudhon the other.Thus were born State Socialism and Anarchismamp;nbsp;.Authority,takes many shapes,but,broadly speaking,her enemies divide themselves into three classes: first,those who abhor her both as a means and as an end of progress,opposing her openly,avowedly,sincerely,consistently,universally; second,those who profess to believe in her as a means of progress,but who accept her only so far as they think she will subserve their own selfish interests,denying her and her blessings to the rest of the world; third,those who distrust her as a means of progress,believing in her only as an end to be obtained by first trampling upon,violating,and outraging her.in the atheism of Gambetta and the socialism of Karl Marx.quot; Benjamin Tucker.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLBenjaminTuckerIndividualLiberty.html Individual Liberty.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Ward quot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.panarchy.orgwardorganization.archive.orgwebhttp:www.panarchy.orgwardorganization.html archivedate  March lt;!quot; p.amp;nbsp;.Bakunin did not convert the Leagues central committee to his full program,demanding economic equality and implicitly attacking authority in both Church and State.quot;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book lastBrown firstL.Liberal Feminism and Anarchism publisherBlack Rose Books Ltd.Anarchism draws on many currents of thought and strategy.Anarchism does not offer a fixed body of doctrine from a single particular world view,instead fluxing and flowing as a philosophy.CAisbnpagelt;refgt; Many types and traditions of anarchism exist,not all of which are mutually exclusive.Robert E.and Pettit publisher Philip.Blackwell Publishing year  page lt;refgt; Anarchist schools of thought can differ fundamentally,supporting anything from extreme individualism to complete collectivism.lt;ref namequot;black dictquot;gt;Geoffrey OstergaardOstergaard,Geoffrey.quot;Anarchismquot;.The Blackwell Dictionary of Modern Social Thought.Blackwell Publishing.lt;ref namebrooksgt;cite book quote Usually considered to be an extreme leftwing ideology,anarchism has always included a significant strain of radical individualism,from the hyperrationalism of Godwin,to the egoism of Stirner,to the libertarians and anarchocapitalists of today last Brooks first Frank H.In Spirit,collectivist anarchismcollectivism,anarchosyndicalismsyndicalism,Mutualism economic theorymutualism,or participatory economics.At the time when they made violent and satirical attacks these were not entirely well founded,for those to whom they were addressed were either primitive or quot;vulgarquot; communists,whose thought had not yet been fertilized by Marxist humanism,or else,in the case of Marx and Engels themselves,were not as set on authority and state control as the anarchists made out.quot; Daniel Guerin,http:theanarchistlibrary.lt;refgt;http:www.etymonline.comindex.termanarchismamp;allowedinframe Anarchism,Online etymology dictionary.lt;refgt; themselves derived respectively from the Greek langgrc,anarchylt;refgt;LSJanarxiaref.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.merriamwebster.comdictionaryanarchy Anarchy,MerriamWebster online.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.etymonline.comindex.termanarchyamp;allowedinframe Anarchy,Online etymology dictionary.lt;refgt; from langgrc,anarchos,meaning quot;one without rulersquot;;lt;refgt;LSJanarxosref.lt;refgt; from the privative prefix privative alpha an,quot;withoutquot; and langgrc,archos,quot;leaderquot;,quot;rulerquot;;lt;refgt;LSJarxosreflt;refgt; cf.archon or langgrc,arkh,quot;authorityquot;,quot;sovereigntyquot;,quot;realmquot;,quot;magistracyquot;lt;refgt;LSJarxhref.lt;refgt; and the suffix langgrc or langgrc ismos,isma,from the verbal infinitive suffix ,izein.lt;refgt;http:www.etymonline.comindex.termismamp;allowedinframe ism,Online etymology dictionary.lt;refgt; The first known use of this word was in .Medieval Latin anarchia,from Greek,from anarchos having no ruler,First Known Use: quot; http:www.merriamwebster.google.combooks?such as William Godwin and Wilhelm Weitling,but they did not use the word anarchist or anarchism in describing themselves or their beliefs.The first political philosopher to call himself an anarchist was PierreJoseph Proudhon,marking the formal birth of anarchism in the midnineteenth century.Since the s,and beginning in France,Sebastien Faure took up a word used in  by one Joseph Dejacque to make it the title of a journal,Le Libertaire.Today the terms quot;anarchistquot; and quot;libertarianquot; have become interchangeable.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLDanielGuerinAnarchismFromTheorytoPractice.Dean.http:www.boogieonline.comrevolutionpoliticsname.html Who is a Libertarian?Foundation for Economic Education,quot;Ideas on Liberty,quot; May .lt;refgt; its use as a synonym is still common outside the United States.Ward,Colin.Anarchism: A Very Short Introduction.Oxford University Press  p.Goodway,David.Anarchist Seeds Beneath the Snow.Liverpool Press.MacDonald,Dwight amp; Wreszin,Michael.Interviews with Dwight Macdonald.University Press of Mississippi,Bufe,Charles.The Heretics Handbook of Quotations.See Sharp Press,Gay,Kathlyn.Encyclopedia of Political Anarchy.ABCCLIO  University of Michigan,George WoodcockWoodcock,George.Anarchism: A History of Libertarian Ideas and Movements.Broadview Press,Uses the terms interchangeably,Alexandre SkirdaSkirda,Alexandre.Facing the Enemy: A History of Anarchist Organization from Proudhon to May .AK Press .Fernandez,Frank.Cuban Anarchism.The History of a Movement.See Sharp Press,page .lt;refgt; On the other hand,some use libertarianism to refer to individualistic freemarket philosophy only,referring to freemarket anarchism as libertarian anarchism.lt;refgt;Morris,Christopher.An Essay on the Modern State.Cambridge University Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book lastBurton firstDaniel C.title Libertarian anarchism  url http:www.libertarian.uklapubspolinpolin.Image:Levellers declaration and standard.Anarchocommunist Joseph Djacque,needs to be added here.His work and stances on anarchism are very relevant to this particular section of the article.Additionally,his criticisms of PierreJoseph Proudhons mutualism are very relevant here.The earliestlt;ref namequot;LVMquot;gt;cite weburlhttps:mises.orgdaily.titleMises DailyworkMises Institutelt;refgt; anarchist themes can be found in the th century BC,among the works of TaoismTaoist philosopher Laozi,lt;ref namequot;EBquot;gt;Peter Kropotkin,http:dwardmac.pitzer.eduAnarchistArchiveskropotkinbritanniaanarchy.html quot;Anarchismquot;,Encyclopdia Britannica Eleventh EditionEncyclopdia Britannica .lt;refgt; and in later centuries by Zhuang ZhouZhuangzi and Bao Jingyan.lt;ref namequot;wordpressquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:robertgraham.wordpress.quot; http:plato.stanford.action in accord with Dao,action in which we freely follow our own way and allow other beings to do likewise.Zhuangzi,the great anarchic Daoist sage,compared it to quot;riding on the wind.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLMaxCafardZenAnarchy.html Max Cafard.He describes a state in which quot;you are open to everything you see and hear,and allow this to act through you.quot; Part of wuwei,doing without doing,is quot;knowing without knowing,quot; knowing as being open to the things known,rather than conquering and possessing the objects of knowledge.This means not imposing our prejudices whether our own personal ones,our cultures,or those built into the human mind on the Ten Thousand Things.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLMaxCafardTheSurregionalistManifestoandOtherWritings.htmltoc Max Cafard.They are the school of anarchistically inclined philosophers,that Graham identifies as a quot;Primitivistquot; and a school of quot;Yangists,quot; chapters  to ,and  to .These thinkers appear to have been profoundly influenced by the Laozi,and also by the thought of the first and last of the Inner Chapters: quot;Wandering Beyond,quot; and quot;Responding to Emperors and Kings.quot; There are also possible signs of influence from Yang Zhu,whose concern was to protect and cultivate ones inner lifesource.quot; http:www.eduzhuangzi quot;Zhuangzi ChuangTzu,BCEquot; at the Internet Encyclopedia of Philosophylt;refgt; Zhuangzi wrote,quot;A petty thief is put in jail.A great wikt:brigandbrigand becomes a ruler of a Nation.quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttps:www.mises.orgjournalsjls.archive.orgwebhttps:www.mises.orgjournalsjls.pdf archivedate  December lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; Diogenes of Sinope and the Cynicism philosophyCynics,their contemporary Zeno of Citium,the founder of Stoicism,also introduced similar topics.lt;ref namequot;EBquot; gt;lt;refgt;IEPccynics.Georges Lechartier wrote that quot;The true founder of anarchy was Jesus Christ andamp;nbsp;.the first anarchist society was that of the Apostle Christianapostles.quot;lt;refgt;Cited in George Woodcock,Anarchism: A History of Libertarian Ideas and Movements Cleveland: Meridian Books,lt;refgt; In early History of IslamIslamic history,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:theanarchistlibrary.orglibrarymohamedjeanveneuseanarcaislamfnbacktitleAnarcaIslamworktheanarchistlibrary.orglt;refgt; Later,some Muslim scholars,such as Amer alBasrilt;refgt; ,,lt;refgt; and Abu Hanifa,lt;refgt; ,,lt;refgt; led movements of boycotting the rulers,paving the way to the waqf endowments tradition,which served as an alternative to and asylum from the centralized authorities of the emirs.This is exemplified when the glorification of the state is viewed as a form of sinful idolatry.lt;ref nameCritiqueofViolencegt;cite web firstAlexandre lastChristoyannopoulos urlhttp:www.ukjournalspdf.But while La Botie cannot be considered an anarchist,http:books.google.ecbooks?Ludwig Von Mises Institute.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Quite rightly,La Botie recognizes the potential for domination in any democracy: the democratic leader,elected by the people,becomes intoxicated with his own power and teeters increasingly towards tyranny.Indeed,we can see modern democracy itself as an instance of voluntary servitude on a mass scale.quot;http:theanarchistlibrary.lt;refgt;quot;Anarchists have regarded the secular revolt of the Diggers,or True Levellers,in seventeenthcentury England led by Gerrard Winstanley as a source of pride.Winstanley,deeming that property is corrupting,opposed clericalism,political power and privilege.It is economic inequality,he believed,that produces crime and misery.quot; http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLKennethC.WenzerGodwinsPlaceintheAnarchistTraditionaBicentennialTribute.html Kenneth C.Wenzer.among a whole cluster of radical groups such as the Fifth Monarchy Men,the Levellers and the Ranters,there emerged perhaps the first real protoanarchists,the Diggers,rather than political revolution was necessary for the establishment of justice.Gerrard Winstanley,the Diggers leader,made an identification with the word of God and the principle of reason,an equivalent philosophy to that found in Tolstoys The Kingdom of God is Within You.quot; Marlow.at least two predecessors outlined systems that contain all the basic elements of anarchism.The first was Gerrard Winstanley   c.a linen draper who led the small movement of the Diggers during the Commonwealth.during the English Civil War,as a Pejorativeterm of abuse,used by CavalierRoyalists against their Roundhead opponents.lt;ref namebbcgt;http:www.ukradiohistoryinourtimeinourtime.shtml quot;Anarchismquot;,BBC Radio  program,In Our Time BBC Radio In Our Time,Thursday  December .Hosted by Melvyn Bragg of the BBC,with John Keane,Professor of Politics at University of Westminster,Ruth Kinna,Senior Lecturer in Politics at Loughborough University,and Peter Marshall authorPeter Marshall,philosopher and historian.lt;refgt; By the time of the French Revolution some,such as the Enrags,began to use the term positively,lt;refgt;Sheehan,Sean.Anarchism,London: Reaktion Books Ltd.lt;refgt; in opposition to Jacobin politicsJacobin centralisation of power,seeing quot;revolutionary governmentquot; as oxymoronic.lt;ref namebbcgt; By the turn of the th century,the English word quot;anarchismquot; had lost its initial negative connotation.particularly JeanJacques Rousseaus arguments for the moral centrality of freedom.lt;ref nameEncartagt;quot;Anarchismquot;,Encarta Online Encyclopedia  UK version.As part of the political turmoil of the s in the wake of the French Revolution,lt;ref namequot;Everhart,Robert B .quot;gt;Everhart,Robert B.The Public School Monopoly: A Critical Analysis of Education and the State in American Society.Pacific Institute for Public Policy Research,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;godwinsepquot; gt; Godwin was,according to Peter Kropotkin,quot;the first to formulate the political and economical conceptions of anarchism,even though he did not give that name to the ideas developed in his workquot;,lt;ref namequot;EBquot; gt; while Godwin attached his anarchist ideas to an early Edmund Burke.quot;  footnote,Political Justice by William Godwin.File:WilliamGodwin.jpgleftthumbuprightWilliam Godwin,quot;the first to formulate the political and economical conceptions of anarchism,even though he did not give that name to the ideas developed in his workquot;.He argued in Political Justice lt;ref namequot;godwinsepquot; gt;lt;ref namequot;Adams,Ian .quot;gt;Adams,Ian.Political Ideology Today.Manchester University Press,lt;refgt; that government has an inherently malevolent influence on society,and that it perpetuates dependency and ignorance.Although he did not accord the state with moral legitimacy,he was against the use of revolutionary tactics for removing the government from power.Rather,he advocated for its replacement through a process of peaceful evolution.and J.His aversion to the imposition of a rulesbased society led him to denounce,as a manifestation of the peoples mental enslavement,the foundations of law,property rights and even the institution of marriage.In each case,The French PierreJoseph Proudhon is regarded as the first selfproclaimed anarchist,a label he adopted in his groundbreaking work,What is Property?published in .It is for this reason that some claim Proudhon as the founder of modern anarchist theory.lt;refgt;Daniel Guerin,Anarchism: From Theory to Practice New York: Monthly Review Press,lt;refgt; He developed the theory of spontaneous order in society,quot;Liberty is the mother,not the daughter,of order.quot; In What is Property?Proudhon answers with the famous accusation quot;Property is theft.quot; In this work,he opposed the institution of decreed quot;propertyquot; proprit,where owners have complete rights to quot;use and abusequot; their property as they wish.lt;ref namequot;proudhonpropquot;gt;PierreJoseph ProudhonProudhon,PierreJoseph.quot;http:www.marxists.orgreferencesubjecteconomicsproudhonpropertych.htm Chapter .Labour as the efficient cause of the domain of propertyquot; from quot;What is Property?quot;,lt;refgt; He contrasted this with what he called quot;possession,quot; or limited ownership of resources and goods only while in more or less continuous use.Later,however,Proudhon added that quot;Property is Liberty,quot; and argued that it was a bulwark against state power.lt;refgt;Edwards,Stewart.Introduction to Selected Writings of PierreJoseph Proudhon,Anchor Books,Doubleday amp; Company,Inc.lt;refgt; His opposition to the state,organised religion,and certain capitalist practices inspired subsequent anarchists,and made him one of the leading social thinkers of his time.lt;ref namequot;Dejacquequot;gt;Joseph Djacque,http:joseph.dejacque.free.frecritslettreapjp.htm De ltrehumain mle et femelle  Lettre  P.Proudhon par Joseph Djacque in Frenchlt;refgt; Unlike PierreJoseph Proudhon,he argued that,quot;it is not the product of his or her labour that the worker has a right to,but to the satisfaction of his or her needs,whatever may be their nature.quot;lt;refgt;quot;lEchangequot;,article in Le Libertaire no ,September ,New York.http:joseph.dejacque.free.frlibertairenlib.htmlt;refgt; In  in Germany the posthegelian philosopher Max Stirner published the book,The Ego and Its Own,which would later be considered an influential early text of individualist anarchism.Ernest Coeurderoy,Joseph Djacquelt;ref namequot;Dejacquequot;gt;Joseph Djacque,http:joseph.dejacque.free.frecritslettreapjp.htm De ltrehumain mle et femelle  Lettre  P.Proudhon par Joseph Djacque in Frenchlt;refgt; and Pierre Joseph Proudhon.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:theanarchistlibrary.orglt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:books.google.ecbooksaboutLacitivitCAdunsocialistede.html?idwbrfSAAACAAJamp;redirescytitleLacitivit dun socialiste de workgoogle.File:Bakunin.In Europe,harsh reaction followed the revolutions of ,After most of these attempts at systematic change ended in failure,conservative elements took advantage of the divided groups of socialists,anarchists,liberals,and nationalists,to prevent further revolt.lt;refgt;cite book lastBreunig firstCharles titleThe Age of Revolution and Reaction,year publisherW.Norton amp; Company locationNew York,lt;ref namequot;britannica.comquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.britannica.Anarchism: a history of libertarian movements.but before that time Proudhonian ideas,as interpreted by Pi,quot;lt;refgt;George Woodcock.Anarchism: a history of libertarian movements.lt;refgt; According to the Encyclopedia Britannica quot;During the Spanish revolution of ,Pi y Margall Cantonal Revolutionattempted to establish a decentralized,or quot;cantonalist,quot; political system on Proudhonian lines.quot;lt;ref namequot;britannica.Philadelphes,English trade unionists,socialists and social democrats.Due to its links to active workers movements,the International became a significant organisation.Karl Marx became a leading figure in the International and a member of its General Council.Proudhons followers,the Mutualism economic theorymutualists,opposed Marxs state socialism,advocating political abstentionism and small property holdings.Greene had been members of the First International.lt;ref namequot;Woodcockquot;gt;cite booklastWoodcockfirstG.following their unsuccessful participation in the League of Peace and Freedom LPF,At first,Subsequently,the International became polarised into two camps,with Marx and Bakunin as their respective figureheads.if a Marxist party came to power,its leaders would simply take the place of the ruling class they had fought against.and in  the General Council called only a special conference in London.One delegate was able to attend from Spain and none from Italy,Thus only a tiny minority of anarchists was present,and the General Councils resolutions passed almost unanimously.Most of them were clearly directed against Bakunin and his followers.quot;lt;ref namequot;Anarchism quot;gt;George Woodcock.Anarchism: A History of Libertarian Ideas and Movements lt;refgt; In ,In response,the federalist sections formed their own International at the Anarchist St.Imier InternationalSt.Imier Congress,adopting a revolutionary anarchist program.lt;ref nameGrahamgt;Graham,Robert http:www.blackrosebooks.netanarism.htm Anarchism Montreal: Black Rose Books  ISBN .The Paris Commune was a government that briefly ruled Paris from  March more formally,from  March to  May .Anarchists participated actively in the establishment of the Paris Commune.They included quoteLouise Michel,the Reclus brothers,and Eugene Varlin the latter murdered in the repression afterwards.As for the reforms initiated by the Commune,such as the reopening of workplaces as cooperatives,anarchists can see their ideas of associated labour beginning to be realisedamp;nbsp;.Moreover,Indeed,like Bakunin,had argued in favour of the quot;implementation of the binding mandatequot; in amp;nbsp;.and for federation of communes.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:flag.blackened.netrevoltanarchismwritersanarchocommune.htmltitleThe Paris Communeworkblackened.including the mutualists Courbet,Longuet,and Vermorel,the Collectivist anarchismlibertarian collectivists Varlin,Malon,and Lefrangais,and the bakuninists Elie and Elise Reclus and Louise Michel.quot;lt;refgt;Resolutions from the St.Imier Congress,in Anarchism: A Documentary History of Libertarian Ideas,Vol.http:www.blackrosebooks.netanarism.htmlt;refgt; In ,as the date by which the Eighthour dayeighthour work day would become standard.File:ChicagoAnarchists.In response,unions across the United States prepared a general strike in support of the event.lt;ref namefonergt; On  May,in Chicago,a fight broke out when strikebreakers attempted to cross the picket line,and two workers died when police opened fire upon the crowd.May,anarchists staged a rally at Chicagos Haymarket Square.killing an officer.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.odmp.orgofficerpatrolmanmathiasj.degan titlePatrolman Mathias J.Degan accessdate January  publisherThe Officer Down Memorial Page,Inc  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.odmp.orgofficerpatrolmanmathiasj.degan archivedate  January lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; In the ensuing panic,police opened fire on the crowd and each other.lt;refgt;Chicago Tribune,June ,lt;ref namethe bombgt;cite web urlhttp:www.chicagohistory.orgdramasactact.archive.orgwebhttp:www.chicagohistory.orgdramasactact.htm archivedate  January lt;!The men became international political celebrities among the labour movement.Four of the men were executed and a fifth committed suicide prior to his own execution.The incident became known as the Haymarket affair,and was a setback for the labour movement and the struggle for the eighthour day.In  a second attempt,this time international in scope,to organise for the eighthour day was made.the International Anarchist Congress of Amsterdam gathered delegates from  different countries,among which important figures of the anarchist movement,including Errico Malatesta,Pierre Monatte,Luigi Fabbri,Benot Broutchoux,Emma Goldman,Rudolf Rocker,and Christiaan Cornelissen.Various themes were treated during the Congress,in particular concerning the organisation of the anarchist movement,popular education issues,the general strike or antimilitarism.A central debate concerned the relation between anarchism and syndicalism or trade unionism.Malatesta and Monatte were in particular disagreement themselves on this issue,while Malatesta did not consider syndicalism by itself sufficient.lt;refgt;http:www.fondationbesnard.orgarticle.citing as essentially bourgeois and antiworker the phenomenon of professional union officials.Malatesta warned that the syndicalists aims were in perpetuating syndicalism itself,founded in .Before the s,the CNT was the major force in Spanish working class politics,attracting .amp;nbsp;million members at one point and playing a major role in the Spanish Civil War.lt;refgt; The CNT was affiliated with the International Workers Association,a federation of anarchosyndicalist trade unions founded in ,with delegates representing two million workers from  countries in Europe and Latin America.and until the early s most of the trade unions in Anarchism in MexicoMexico,Anarchism in BrazilBrazil,Peru,Chile,and Argentina were anarchosyndicalist in general outlook; the prestige of the Spanish C.as a revolutionary organization was undoubtedly to a great extent responsible for this situation.it grew quickly to a membership of nearly a quarter of a million,which dwarfed the rival socialdemocratic unions.File:Lugi Gallean.jpgrightthumbuprightItalianAmerican anarchist Luigi Galleani.His followers,known as Galleanists,Some anarchists,such as Johann Most,but also action as propaganda.quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:dwardmac.pitzer.eduAnarchistArchivesbrightmostactionprop.html titlequot;Action as Propagandaquot; by Johann Most,July  publisherDwardmac.pitzer.edu date April  accessdate September lt;refgt; By the s,people inside and outside the anarchist movement began to use the slogan,quot;propaganda of the deedquot; to refer to individual bombings,regicides,and tyrannicides.From  onwards,quot;lt;refgt;Wayback date urlhttp:www.zabalaza.nettheorytxtanokcommap.violent rejection of an intolerable society.Moreover,they were clearly meant to be exemplary invitations to revolt.quot;.lt;ref namequot;illegalismquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:recollectionbooks.comsimllibraryillegalistsDougImrie.htmtitleThe Illegalists  By Doug Imrieworkrecollectionbooks.comlt;refgt; Frances Bonnot Gang was the most famous group to embrace illegalism.However,as soon as ,important figures in the anarchist movement distanced themselves from such individual acts.lt;refgt;quoted in Billington,James H.Fire in the minds of men: origins of the revolutionary faith New Jersey: Transaction Books,for example through the trade union movement.The anarchosyndicalismanarchosyndicalist,Fernand Pelloutier,quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:blackrosebooks.netanarism.htm titleTable Of Contents publisherBlackrosebooks.although reciprocally state repression,in the first place,may have played a role in these isolated acts.The dismemberment of the French socialist movement,into many groups and,following the suppression of the  Paris Commune,the execution and exile of many communards to penal colonies,favoured individualist political expression and acts.Then Adolphe ThiersVersailles seized the moment to attack and,in one horrifying week,executed roughly ,Communards or suspected sympathizers,More than ,were jailed or deported to places like New Caledonia.Thousands of others fled to Belgium,England,Italy,Spain and the United States.In ,stringent laws were passed that ruled out all possibilities of organising on the left.Not till  was there a general amnesty for exiled and imprisoned Communards.Meanwhile,Africa,and Oceania.Arthur RimbaudRimbaud and Pissarro were active propagandists or were sympathetic to it.The ferocious repression of  and thereafter,orgIIbenedictandersonintheworldshadowofbismarckandnobel  ref  harv  postscript  .lt;blockquotegt; According to some analysts,in History of Germany since postwar Germany,in the same manner,have played a role in the creation of the Red Army Faction.Numerous heads of state were assassinated between  and  by members of the anarchist movement,including Tsar Alexander II of Russia,President Marie Franois Sadi CarnotSadi Carnot of France,Empress Elisabeth of Austria,King Umberto I of Italy,President William McKinley of the United States,King Carlos I of Portugal and King George I of Greece.lt;refgt;Cite webtitle  American Experience !Emma Goldman !Transcript !PBSurl  http:www.orgwgbhamexgoldmanfilmmorept.htmlwebsite  www.File:Makhno group.and were initially enthusiastic about the Bolshevik revolution.the conflict culminated in the  Kronstadt rebellion,which the new government repressed.Anarchists in central Russia were either imprisoned,in the Free Territory UkraineFree Territory,who established an anarchist society in the region for a number of months.before they left Russia.Both wrote accounts of their experiences in Russia,criticising the amount of control the Bolsheviks exercised.For them,lt;ref namequot;bakuninmarxquot;gt;quot;http:www.marxists.orgreferencearchivebakuninworkskarlmarx.htm On the International Workingmens Association and Karl Marxquot; in Bakunin on Anarchy,translated and edited by Sam Dolgoff,I plead guilty to the charge.In truth,I not only believe so; I am certain of it.In France and the United States,for example,lt;refgt;cite book  editorlast  Drachkovitch  editorfirst  Milorad M.even though  like most revolutions  its stated goals were not exactly quot;temporary.and Ret Marut the novelist B.Traven,gave the Soviet a distinct anarchist flavor.quot; Hakim Bey.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLHakimBeyT.TheTemporaryAutonomousZoneOntologicalAnarchyPoeticTerrorism.html quot;T.: The Temporary Autonomous Zone,Ontological Anarchy,Poetic Terrorismquot;lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;br.dequot;gt;cite web url http:www.dethemenbayerninhaltgeschichtebayernrevolutionersteraeterepublik.de locationMunich,Bavaria,Composizione di classe,rivendicazioni e professionalit nelle lotte del quot;biennio rossoquot; a Bologna,in: AA.Bologna ; le origini del fascismo,a cura di Luciano Casali,Cappelli,Bologna ,pag.lt;refgt; the anarchosyndicalist trade union Unione Sindacale Italiana quot;grew to ,members and the influence of the Italian Anarchist Union ,members plus Umanita Nova,its daily paper grew accordinglyamp;nbsp;.Anarchists were the first to suggest occupying workplaces.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:libcom.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.sandiegohistory.orgjournalwintermagonista.htmtitleThe Magonista Revolt in Baja Californiaworksandiegohistory.In Paris,the Dielo Truda group of Russian anarchist exiles,which included Nestor Makhno,Their  manifesto,called the PlatformismOrganisational Platform of the General Union of Anarchists Draft,anarkismo.netnewswire.storyid accessdate October  year publisherFdCA locationItaly archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.anarkismo.netnewswire.storyid archivedate  March lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; was supported.lt;refgt;cite web authorStarhawk urlhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ titlequot;J.What are quot;synthesisquot; federations?quot;workAn Anarchist FAQpublisherInfoshop.org date accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ archivedate  October lt;!lt;refgt;cite web authorStarhawk urlhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ titlequot;J.What are quot;synthesisquot; federations?quot;workAn Anarchist FAQpublisherInfoshop.org date accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ archivedate  October lt;!lt;refgt;cite web authorStarhawk urlhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ titlequot;J.What are quot;synthesisquot; federations?quot;workAn Anarchist FAQpublisherInfoshop.org date accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ archivedate  October lt;!In the s and s,the rise of fascism in Europe transformed anarchisms conflict with the state.Italy saw the first struggles between anarchists and fascists.which was strongest in areas with anarchist traditions,and achieved some success in their activism,such as repelling Blackshirts in the anarchist stronghold of Parma in August .lt;refgt;Holbrow,Marnie,http:www.socialistreview.ukarticle.articlenumber quot;Daring but Dividedquot; Socialist Review November .lt;refgt; The veteran Italian anarchist,Luigi Fabbri,was one of the first critical theorists of fascism,describing it as quot;the preventive counterrevolution.quot; lt;ref namequot;wordpressquot;gt; In France,where the far right leagues came close to insurrection in the  February  crisisFebruary  riots,anarchists divided over a united front policy.lt;refgt;Berry,David.quot;Fascism or Revolution.quot; Le Libertaire.August .Anarchists in Anarchism in FranceFrancelt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:flag.blackened.netrevoltanarchismtextswaranarFranceWW.htmltitleAnarchist Activity in France during World War Twoworkblackened.netlt;refgt; and Anarchism in ItalyItalylt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:libcom.orglt;refgt; were active in the Resistance during World War II.within a few hours after the Reichstag fire in Berlin.Joseph Goebbels,the Nazi Propagandaministeriumpropaganda minister,labelled him as one of quot;those Jewish subversives.quot; Over the next seventeen months,he would be imprisoned in the concentration camps at Sonnenburg,Brandenburg and finally,Oranienburg.On  February ,Mhsam was tortured and murdered by the guards,his battered corpse found hanging in a latrine the next morning.lt;ref namequot; Shepherdquot;gt;cite book lastMhsamfirstEricheditorDavid A.ShepherdtitleThunderation!Alle Wetter!: Folk Play With Song and DanceVolksstuck Mit Gesang Und Tanzurlhttps:books.google.In Spain,and abstention by CNT supporters led to a right wing election victory.But in ,the CNT changed its policy and anarchist votes helped bring the popular front back to power.Months later,the former ruling class responded with an attempted coup causing the Spanish Civil War .lt;refgt; In response to the army rebellion,an Anarchism in Spainanarchistinspired movement of peasants and workers,supported by armed militias,lt;ref nameBolloten ,the anarchists were losing ground in a bitter struggle with the StalinismStalinists,primarily Catalonia,Anarchist AragonAragon,Andalusia,and parts of Levante,Spainthe Levante.Much of Spains economy was put under worker control; in anarchist strongholds like Catalonia,the figure was as high as ,but lower in areas with heavy Communist Party of Spain mainCommunist Party of Spain influence,as the Soviet UnionSovietallied party actively resisted attempts at collectivization enactment.Factories were run through worker committees,title  The Anarchist Collectives: Workers SelfManagement in the Spanish Revolution.In The Spanish Revolution,author  Dolgoff,postscript  lt;!Bot inserted parameter.Either remove it; or change its value to quot;.quot; for the cite to end in a quot;.quot;,as necessary.quot;lt;refgt;Dolgoff ,lt;refgt;quot;When clashes with the Communist Party broke out,his house,where he lived with other anarchists,was attacked on  May .They were all labelled quot;counterrevolutionariesquot;,disarmed,deprived of their papers and forbidden to go out into the street.There was still shooting in the streets when,on  May ,news arrived from Italy of Antonio Gramscis death in a fascist prison.Leaving Radio Barcelona,Berneri set off for the Plaa de la Generalitat,where some Stalinists shouted after him.Before he could turn and look,they opened fire with machine guns,and left his dead body there on the street.quot;http:libcom.orghistoryberneriluigicamillo quot;Berneri,Luigi Camillo,quot; at libcom.comlt;refgt;lt;refgt;Paul Avrich.Anarchist Voices: An Oral History of Anarchism in America.AK Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Spain: Return to quot;normalizationquot; in Barcelona.The Republican government had sent troops to take over the telephone exchange on  May,in pitched street battles,resulting in  anarchists killed.Squads of Communist Party members took to the streets on  May to assassinate leading anarchists.Today,among those found murdered,was the Italian anarchist Camillo Berneriquot;http:recollectionbooks.combleedEncyclopediaBerneriCamillo.htm quot;Camillo Berneriquot; at The Anarchist Encyclopedia: A Gallery of Saints amp; Sinners .the anarchist Melchor Rodrguez Garca.lt;refgt;quot;S se ha aprobado por unanimidad,tambin a propuesta de Ciudadanos,dedicar una calle al anarquista Melchor Rodrguez Garca,el ltimo alcalde de Madrid republicano,El Pas.http:ccaa.elpais.comccaamadrid.html?Commented out: File:Paul Goodman.jpgthumbPaul Goodman writerPaul Goodman,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.portaloaca.comhistoriahistorialibertariaregeneracionylafederacionanarquistamexicanatesis.comlt;refgt; In the early s,lt;refgt;quot;The surviving sectors of the revolutionary anarchist movement of the  period,now working in the SIA and the FGAC,reinforced by those Cuban militants and Spanish anarchists fleeing nowfascist Spain,The guarantees of the  Constitution permitted them to legally create an organization of this type,and it was thus that they agreed to dissolve the two principal Cuban anarchist organizations,the SIA and FGAC,and create a new,unified group,the Asociacin Libertaria de Cuba ALC,a sizable organization with a membership in the thousands.quot;http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLFrankFernandezCubanAnarchismTheHistoryofAMovement.htmltoc Cuban Anarchism: The History of A Movement by Frank Fernandezlt;refgt; From  to ,but was repressed by the new Communist regime.lt;ref namequot;robertgraham.wordpress.comquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:robertgraham.wordpress.wordpress.comquot;gt; and in  the Japanese Anarchist Federation was founded.lt;refgt;http:flag.blackened.netafacejapchap.html THE ANARCHIST MOVEMENT IN JAPAN Anarchist Communist Editions  ACE Pamphlet No.lt;ref namequot;robertgraham.wordpress.comquot;gt; After World War II,By February ,the sending of aid parcels to anarchists in Germany was a largescale operation.Die Freie Gesellschaft,which survived until .doi  .lt;refgt; In  the Uruguayan Anarchist Federation was founded.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.anarkismo.netnewswire.storyidtitle aos de la Federacin Anarquista Uruguayaworkanarkismo.The Syndicalist Workers Federation was a syndicalist group in active in postwar Britain,amazon.It was formed in  by members of the dissolved Anarchist Federation of Britain.lt;ref namequot;Political Encyclopediaquot; gt; Unlike the AFB,which was influenced by anarchosyndicalist ideas but ultimately not syndicalist itself,the SWF decided to pursue a more definitely syndicalismsyndicalist,workercentred strategy from the outset.Anarchism continued to influence important literary and intellectual personalities of the time,such as Albert Camus,Herbert Read,Paul Goodman writerPaul Goodman,Dwight Macdonald,Allen Ginsberg,George Woodcock,Leopold Kohr,lt;ref namequot;NYTObitquot;gt;http:www.nytimes.comobituariesdrleopoldkohrbackedsmallerstates.html Dr.Leopold Kohr,; Backed Smaller States,New York Times obituary,February .lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Saleforewordquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.ditext.comkohrforeword.htmltitleThe Breakdown of Nationsworkditext.comlt;refgt; Julian Beck,I dont know whether the adjective is pure and simple,or philosophical,or what,but I dont like government!And I dont like institutions!And I dont have any confidence in even good institutions.quot; http:www.compaperscagemontagueinterview.html John Cage at Seventy: An Interview by Stephen Montague.American Music,Summer .Ubu.Accessed  May .lt;refgt; and the French SurrealismSurrealist group led by Andr Breton,which now openly embraced anarchism and collaborated in the Fdration Anarchiste.lt;refgt;quot;It was in the black mirror of anarchism that surrealism first recognised itself,quot; wrote Andr Breton in quot;The Black Mirror of Anarchism,quot; Selection  in Robert Graham,Anarchism: A Documentary History of Libertarian Ideas,Volume Two: The Emergence of the New Anarchism http:robertgraham.wordpress.comanarchismadocumentaryhistoryoflibertarianideasvolumetwotheemergenceofthenewanarchism.orghistorythepoliticsofsurrealism quot;: The politics of Surrealismquot; by Nick Heath on libcom.anarchism,in fact if not in name,began to reappear,often in alliance with pacifism,as the basis for a critique of militarism on both sides of the Cold War.http:robertgraham.wordpress.but made an important contribution to the movement as a whole.the anarchistpacifist wing rejected these on principle.quot;http:www.monthlyreview.orgepstein.toughminded anarchists adding to the mixture their critique of the state,and tenderminded pacifists their critique of violence.Its first practical manifestation was at the level of method: nonviolent direct action,principled and pragmatic,quot;http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLGeoffreyOstergaardResistingtheNationState.Thepacifistandanarchisttradition.htmltoc Geoffrey Ostergaard.Resisting the Nation State.Anarchopacifism became a quot;basis for a critique of militarism on both sides of the Cold War.quot;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.monthlyreview.orgepstein.Volume Two: The Emergence of the New Anarchism .lt;ref namequot;robertgraham.wordpress.File:ParcGuellOkupas.jpgthumbleftThe famous okupas squattingsquat near Park GellParc Gell,overlooking Barcelona.katesharpleylibrary.netdnckhstitleIslands of Anarchy: Simian,Cienfuegos,Refract and their support networkworkkatesharpleylibrary.He explains that their pacifism,anarchism,and commitment to the downtrodden were one of the important models and inspirations for the s.As Farrell puts it,quot;Catholic Workers identified the issues of the sixties before the Sixties began,and they offered models of protest long before the protest decade.quot;http:library.nothingness.Farrelllt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;While not always formally recognized,much of the protest of the sixties was anarchist.Within the nascent womens movement,quot; Several groups have called themselves quot;Amazon Anarchists.quot; After the Stonewall Rebellion,quot; http:www.williamapercy.comwikiimagesAnarchism.pdf quot;Anarchismquot; by Charley Shively in Encyclopedia of Homosexuality.with hostility to authority in general and state power in particularamp;nbsp;.By the late sixties,Anarchism circulated within the movement along with other radical ideologies.The influence of anarchism was strongest among radical feminists,in the commune movement,quot; http:www.monthlyreview.orgepstein.lt;refgt;http:www.iisg.nlarchivesenfilesl.php London Federation of Anarchists involvement in Carrara conference,International Institute of Social History.Retrieved  January lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:flag.blackened.netlibertyifahistshort.html Short history of the IAFIFA Ainfos news project.In the United Kingdom in the s this was associated with the punk rock movement,as exemplified by bands such as Crass and the Sex Pistols.Spain.In Denmark,squatters occupied a disused military base and declared the Freetown Christiania,an autonomous haven in central Copenhagen.Since the revival of anarchism in the midth century,lt;refgt; a number of new movements and schools of thought emerged.they returned with vigour during the second wave of feminism in the s.among other elements,by Traditional knowledgeindigenous,feminismfeminist,ecological and countercultureculturalcritical ideasquot;,and who by the turn of the st century formed quot;by far the majorityquot; of anarchists.lt;ref namequot;graeberquot;gt;David Graeber and Andrej Grubacic,quot;http:www.zmag.orgcontentshowarticle.SectionIDamp;ItemID Anarchism,Or The Revolutionary Movement Of The Twentyfirst Centuryquot;,ZNet.Retrieved .or http:www.punksinscience.orgkleanthescoursesUKSWVGraeberGrubacic.pdf Graeber,David and Grubacic,AndrejAnarchism,Around the turn of the st century,anarchism grew in popularity and influence as part of the antiwar,anticapitalist,and antiglobalisation movements.GGroup of Eight,and the World Economic Forum.Some anarchist factions at these protests engaged in rioting,property destruction,and violent confrontations with police.These actions were precipitated by ad hoc,leaderless,affinity groups and the use of decentralised technologies such as the internet.lt;ref namerupertgt; According to anarchist scholar Simon Critchley,One might say that contemporary anarchism is about responsibility,whether sexual,impoverishment and disenfranchisment that is so palpable locally and globally.quot;lt;refgt;Simon CritchleyInfinitely DemandingInfinitely Demanding by Simon Critchley.Verso BooksVerso.the International Workers Association,and International Libertarian Solidarity.The largest organised anarchist movement today is in Spain,CGT membership was estimated at around ,for .lt;refgt;Carley,Mark quot;Trade union membership quot; International:SPIRE Associates .The revolutionary industrial unionist Industrial Workers of the World,claiming ,paying members,and the International Workers Association,an anarchosyndicalist successor to the First International,also remain active.File:Portrait of Pierre Joseph Proudhon .jpgthumbuprightPortrait of philosopher PierreJoseph Proudhon  by Gustave Courbet.Proudhon was the primary proponent of anarchist Mutualism economic theorymutualism,and influenced many later individualist anarchist and social anarchist thinkers.Anarchist schools of thought had been generally grouped in two main historical traditions,individualist anarchism and social anarchism,which have some different origins,values and evolution.lt;ref nameslevingt;lt;ref namequot;black dictquot; gt;lt;refgt;http:libertarianlabyrinth.orgarchiveAnarchism Anarchism,http:www.amazon.ukdp The New Encyclopedia of Social Reform .lt;refgt; The individualist wing of anarchism emphasises negative liberty,opposition to state or social control over the individual,quot;recognizing equality of entitlementquot;.lt;refgt;Harrison,Kevin and Boyd,Tony.Understanding Political Ideas and Movements.Manchester University Press ,lt;refgt; In a chronological and theoretical sense,Beyond the specific factions of anarchist thought is philosophical anarchism,A component especially of individualist anarchismlt;refgt;Outhwaite,William amp; Tourain,Alain Eds.Anarchism.The Blackwell Dictionary of Modern Social Thought nd Edition,Blackwell Publishing.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Wayne Gabardi,http:links.jstor.orgsici?siciACAAE.COB review of Anarchism by David Miller,published in American Political Science Review Vol.Mar.and usually temporary,lt;refgt;Klosko,George.Political Obligations.Oxford University Press .lt;refgt;Avrich,Paul.Anarchist Voices: An Oral History of Anarchism in America.Princeton University Press,lt;refgt; In abandoning the hyphenated anarchisms i.collectivist,communist,mutualist and individualistanarchism,it sought to emphasise the antiauthoritarian beliefs common to all anarchist schools of thought.lt;refgt;Esenwein,George Richard quot;Anarchist Ideology and the Working Class Movement in Spain,quot; p.lt;refgt;quot;A member of a community,quot; The Mutualist; this  series criticised Robert Owens proposals,and has been attributed to a dissident Owenite,possibly from the Friendly Association for Mutual Interests of Valley Forge; Shawn Wilburn,quot;More from the  quot;Mutualistquot;?quot;.lt;refgt; Proudhon proposed spontaneous order,whereby organisation emerges without central authority,Solution to the Social Problem,Cohen New York: Vanguard Press,lt;refgt; and where quot;business transactions alone produce the social order.It means that once industrial functions have taken over from political functions,then business transactions alone produce the social order.For this reason,in addition to advocating stateprotected charters for workerowned cooperatives,promoted certain nationalization schemes during his life of public service.Mutualist anarchism is concerned with Reciprocity cultural anthropologyreciprocity,free association,voluntary contract,federation,and credit and currency reform.According to the American mutualist William Batchelder Greene,without profit or discount.quot;lt;refgt;quot;Communism versus Mutualismquot;,Socialistic,Communistic,Mutualistic and Financial Fragments.Boston: Lee amp; Shepard,William Batchelder Greene: quot;Under the mutual system,lt;refgt;Avrich,Paul.Anarchist Voices: An Oral History of Anarchism in America,Princeton University Press  ISBN ,lt;br gt;Blackwell Encyclopaedia of Political Thought,Blackwell Publishing  ISBN ,lt;refgt; Proudhon first characterised his goal as a quot;third form of society,the synthesis of communism and property.quot;lt;refgt;PierreJoseph Proudhon.What Is Property?Princeton,MA: Benjamin R.Tucker,society,traditions,and ideological systems.lt;ref namequot;rynerquot;gt;quot;What do I mean by individualism?I mean by individualism the moral doctrine which,relying on no dogma,no tradition,no external determination,appeals only to the individual conscience.quot;http:www.marx.orgarchiverynerminimanual.as a condition of his sovereignty.William Godwin,who has oftenlt;ref namequot;Everhart,Robert B .quot;gt; been cited as the first anarchist,wrote Political Justice,which some consider the first expression of anarchism.lt;ref namequot;godwinsepquot; gt;lt;ref namequot;Adams,Ian .quot;gt; Godwin,a philosophical anarchist,and J.Robinson oclc origyearlt;refgt; Godwin advocated individualism,lt;refgt;Britannica Concise Encyclopedia.Retrieved  December ,from http:www.britannica.comebcarticle Encyclopdia Britannica Online.lt;refgt;lt;ref namepmclgt;Paul McLaughlin.Anarchism and Authority: A Philosophical Introduction to Classical Anarchism.Ashgate Publishing,Ltd.File:Max stirner.jpgleftthumbth century philosophythcentury philosopher Max Stirner,usually considered a prominent early individualist anarchist sketch by Friedrich Engels.An influential form of individualist anarchism,called quot;egoism,quot;lt;ref namequot;Goodway,David ,quot;gt;Goodway,David.Anarchist Seeds Beneath the Snow.Liverpool University Press,lt;refgt; or egoist anarchism,was expounded by one of the earliest and bestknown proponents of individualist anarchism,the German Max Stirner.published in ,is a founding text of the philosophy.lt;ref name  quot;SEPStirnerquot; gt; According to Stirner,the only limitation on the rights of individuals is their power to obtain what they desire,lt;refgt;The Encyclopedia Americana: A Library of Universal Knowledge.Encyclopedia Corporation.lt;refgt; without regard for God,state,or morality.lt;refgt;Miller,David.quot;Anarchism.quot; .The Blackwell Encyclopaedia of Political Thought.Blackwell Publishing.lt;refgt; To Stirner,rights were Reification fallacyspooks in the mind,and he held that society does not exist but quot;the individuals are its realityquot;.and let me extend my actual property as fas as I entitle,that is,empower myself to takeamp;nbsp;.quot; In Ossar,Michael.Anarchism in the Dramas of Ernst Toller.SUNY Press.lt;refgt; Stirner advocated selfassertion and foresaw union of egoistsunions of egoists,nonsystematic associations continually renewed by all parties support through an act of will,lt;ref namenonserviamgt;Cite journal urlhttp:istudies.comjournalnpdfnsi.Norway publisherSvein Olav Nyberg oclc accessdate September  refharv postscriptlt;!Bot inserted parameter.Either remove it; or change its value to quot;.quot; for the cite to end in a quot;.quot;,as necessary.floonet.netarticlescarlson.Josiah Warren is widely regarded as the first American anarchist,lt;ref nameSlategt;Palmer,Brian  December  http:www.slate.comid What do anarchists want from us?Slate.comlt;refgt; and the fourpage weekly paper he edited during ,The Peaceful Revolutionist,was the first anarchist periodical published.lt;ref namequot;bailiequot;gt;William Bailie,http:libertarianlabyrinth.orgwarrenstAmAnarch.pdf Josiah Warren: The First American Anarchist  A Sociological Study,Boston: Small,Maynard amp; Co.lt;refgt; For American anarchist historian Eunice Minette Schuster quot;It is apparentamp;nbsp;.William B.Greene presented this Proudhonian Mutualism in its purest and most systematic form.quot;.lt;ref namequot;againstallauthority.orgquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.againstallauthority.orgNativeAmericanAnarchism.htmltitleworkagainstallauthority.Thoreau was an American author,poet,naturalist,tax resister,Development criticismdevelopment critic,surveyor,historian,philosopher,and leading transcendentalist.He is best known for his books Walden,a reflection upon simple living in natural surroundings,and his essay,Civil Disobedience ThoreauCivil Disobedience,an argument for individual resistance to civil government in moral opposition to an unjust state.lt;ref namequot;bohemian individualismquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:libcom.orglibrarysocanlifeantitle.Individualist Anarchism and Reactionworklibcom.lt;ref namequot;freelovequot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.orgtlele.htmltitleThe Free Love Movement and Radical Individualism,By Wendy McElroyworkncc.orglt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.acracia.orgalainsumision.lt;refgt;quot;Los anarcoindividualistas,Aamp;nbsp;.Una escisin de la FAI producida en el IX Congreso Carrara,y crean los GIA Gruppi di Iniziativa Anarchica.Esta pequea federacin de grupos,hoy nutrida sobre todo de veteranos anarcoindividualistas de orientacin pacifista,naturista,como sera por ejemplo el sindicalismo.Su portavoz es LInternazionale con sede en Ancona.La escisin de los GIA prefiguraba,en sentido contrario,el gran debate que pronto haba de comenzar en el seno del movimientoquot;http:almeralia.enlucha.infobicicletabicicletaciclo.htm quot;El movimiento libertario en Italiaquot; by Bicicleta.REVISTA DE COMUNICACIONES LIBERTARIAS Year  No.Noviembre,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;acracia.orgquot;gt;quot;Proliferarn as diversos grupos que practicarn el excursionismo,el naturismo,el nudismo,la emancipacin sexual o el esperantismo,alrededor de asociaciones informales vinculadas de una manera o de otra al anarquismo.Uno de los grupos ms destacados,que ser el impulsor de la revista individualista tica ser el Ateneo Naturista Eclctico,con sede en Barcelona,con sus diferentes secciones la ms destacada de las cuales ser el grupo excursionista Sol y Vida.quot;http:www.acracia.orgalainsumision.et intgraient le naturisme dans leurs proccupations.Il est vraiment dommage que ce discours se soit peu  peu effac,dantan plus que nous assistons,en ce moment,un retour en force du puritanisme conservateur par essence.quot;http:ytak.club.frnatytak.html quot;Anarchisme et naturisme,aujourdhui.orgquot;gt;cite weburlhttps:mises.orgjournalsjls.pdftitleThe Journal of Libertarian StudiesworkMises Institutelt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.viruseditorial.netpdfanarquismo individualista.pdf Xavier Diez.El anarquismo individualista en Espaa   Virus Editorial.comsimllibraryillegalistsDougImrie.htm The quot;Illegalistsquot;,by Doug Imrie published by Anarchy: A Journal of Desire Armedlt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Parry,Richard .quot;gt;Parry,Richard.The Bonnot Gang.Rebel Press,lt;refgt; see European individualist anarchism and individualist anarchism in France.These authors and activists included Oscar Wilde,Emile Armand,Han Ryner,Henri Zisly,Renzo Novatore,Miguel Gimenez Igualada,Adolf Brand and Lev Chernyi among others.without any government authority or coercion.It is the largest school of thought in anarchism.Far from it!and its defence of the rights of the individual very powerful,quot; like Spencer it quot;opensamp;nbsp;.the way for reconstituting under the heading of defence all the functions of the State.quot; http:anarchism.pageabode.comafaqsecGint.html Section G  Is individualist anarchism capitalistic?An Anarchist FAQlt;refgt; Social anarchism rejects private property,seeing it as a source of social inequality while retaining respect for personal property,lt;ref namequot;theanarchistlibrary.and with it goes capitalistic business.Personal possession remains only in the things you use.Thus,your watch is your own,but the watch factory belongs to the people.quot;http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLAlexanderBerkmanWhatIsCommunistAnarchism.html Alexander Berkman.quot;Now and AfterWhat Is Communist Anarchism?quot;lt;refgt; and emphasises cooperation and mutual aid organizationmutual aid.lt;refgt;Geoffrey OstergaardOstergaard,Geoffrey.quot;Anarchismquot;.A Dictionary of Marxist Thought.Blackwell Publishing,Collectivist anarchism,also referred to as quot;revolutionary socialismquot; or a form of such,lt;refgt;Morris,Brian.Bakunin: The Philosophy of Freedom.Black Rose Books Ltd.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Rae,John.Contemporary Socialism.Scribners sons,Original from Harvard University.lt;refgt; is a revolutionary form of anarchism,commonly associated with Mikhail Bakunin and Johann Most.lt;ref name  quot;Patsouraspquot;gt;Patsouras,Louis.Marx in Context.iUniverse.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Avrich,Paul.Anarchist Voices: An Oral History of Anarchism in America.AK Press.lt;refgt; Collectivist anarchists oppose all private ownership of the means of production,instead advocating that ownership be collectivised.This was to be achieved through violent revolution,first starting with a small cohesive group through acts of violence,or propaganda by the deed,However,collectivization was not to be extended to the distribution of income,as workers would be paid according to time worked,rather than receiving goods being distributed quot;according to needquot; as in anarchocommunism.despite the stated Marxist goal of a collectivist stateless society.of courseamp;nbsp; can create the will of the people,while our answer to this is: No dictatorship can have any other aim but that of selfperpetuation,and it can beget only slavery in the people tolerating it; freedom can be created only by freedom,that is,lt;refgt; Anarchist,lt;refgt;cite web authorlinkJames GuillaumelastGuillaume firstJames urlhttp:www.marxists.orgreferencearchiveguillaumeworksideas.Anarchist communism also known as anarchocommunism,libertarian communismlt;refgt;quot;Anarchist communism is also known as anarchocommunism,communist anarchism,sometimes,libertarian communism.quot;http:libcom.quot;http:www.fdca.itfdcaenhistoricalvaultancomlibcom.from quot;Linformatore di partequot;,October ,quarterly journal of the Gruppo Comunista Anarchico di Firenze,on libcom.It is one of the key texts of the anarchistcommunist current.quot; http:libcom.orglt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;In  a group of exiled Russian anarchists in France,the Delo Truda Workers Cause group,published this pamphlet.It arose not from some academic study but from their experiences in the  Russian revolution.quot; http:www.nestormakhno.infoenglishplatformorgplat.market economicsmarkets,money,private property while retaining respect for personal property,lt;ref namequot;theanarchistlibrary.orgquot;gt; and capitalism in favour of common ownership of the means of production,lt;ref nameMaynegt;cite book urlhttps:books.google.google.com date accessdate September isbnyearlt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book urlhttps:books.google.idjeiudzsBVCamp;pgPAamp;dqCommunistanarchismbelievesincommonownershipPPA,M titleAnarchism for KnowItAlls By KnowItAlls For KnowItAlls,For KnowItAlls Published by Filiquarian Publishing,LLC.ISBN ,pages publisherBooks.google.to each according to his needquot;.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:dwardmac.pitzer.eduanarchistarchivesworldwidemovementsfabbrianarandcom.html titleLuggi Fabbri publisherDwardmac.pitzer.edu date accessdatelt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.nestormakhno.infoenglishplatformconstructive.htm titlePlatform: Constructive Section publisherNestormakhno.File:Kropotkin.jpgthumbrightuprightRussian theorist Peter Kropotkin ,believing anarchocommunism is the best social system for the realization of individual freedom.Subjectivity is also objective: the individual really is subjective.It is nonsense to speak of quot;emphatically prioritizing the social over the individual,quot;.amp;nbsp;You may as well speak of prioritizing the chicken over the egg.Anarchy is a quot;method of individualization.quot; It aims to combine the greatest individual development with the greatest communal unity.quot;http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLBobBlackNightmaresofReason.htmltoc Bob Black.Nightmares of Reason.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;dwardmac.pitzer.eduquot;gt;quot;Modern Communists are more individualistic than Stirner.To them,not merely religion,morality,family and State are spooks,but property also is no more than a spook,in whose name the individual is enslaved  and how enslaved!amp;nbsp;.Communism thus creates a basis for the liberty and Eigenheit of the individual.I am a Communist because I am an Individualist.to expropriation.Individualism and Communism go hand in hand.quot;http:dwardmac.pitzer.eduanarchistarchivesgoldmanMEmevn.html Max Baginski.quot;Stirner: The Ego and His Ownquot; on Mother Earth magazineMother Earth.Vol.May lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Christopher Gray,Leaving the Twentieth Century,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;creativenothingquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLRenzoNovatoreTowardtheCreativeNothing.htmltitleToward the Creative Nothingworktheanarchistlibrary.Anarchyamp;nbsp;.Communism guarantees economic freedom better than any other form of association,because it can guarantee wellbeing,even luxury,in return for a few hours of work instead of a days work.quot;urlhttp:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLPetrKropotkinCommunismandAnarchy.in which social solidarity and free individuality find their full expression,and in which these two ideas develop in perfect harmony.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLDieloTrudaWorkersCauseOrganisationalPlatformoftheLibertarianCommunists.individual revolt and class struggle,quot;http:www.reocities.comkkabacusvbwdpersp.html quot;MY PERSPECTIVESquot; by Willful Disobedience Vol.Black Rose Books,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLPetrKropotkinTheGreatFrenchRevolution.htmltoctitleThe Great French Revolution worktheanarchistlibrary.orglt;refgt; but was first formulated as such in the Italian section of the First International.lt;ref namequot;Nunzio Pernicone pp.quot;gt;Nunzio Pernicone,quot;Italian Anarchism quot;,AK Press .lt;ref namequot; Alain Pengamquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLAlainPengamAnarchistCommunism.htmltitleAnarchistCommunismworktheanarchistlibrary.orglt;refgt; To date,the best known examples of an anarchist communist society i.are the anarchist territories during the Spanish Revolutionlt;refgt;Murray BookchinBookchin,Murray.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLMurrayBookchinToRememberSpainTheAnarchistandSyndicalistRevolutionof.html To Remember Spain: The Anarchist and Syndicalist Revolution of .quot;This process of education and class organization,more than any single factor in Spain,produced the collectives.the collectives proved to be generally more durable,communist and resistant to Stalinist counterrevolution than other republicanheld areas of Spain.quot;lt;refgt; and the Free Territory during the Russian Revolution Russian Revolution.starting in  anarchist communism existed in most of Anarchist AragonAragon,parts of the Levante and Andalusia,Adolf HitlerHitler,Mussolini,lt;refgt;Bookchin,Murray.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLMurrayBookchinToRememberSpainTheAnarchistandSyndicalistRevolutionof.html To Remember Spain: The Anarchist and Syndicalist Revolution of .lt;refgt;  During the Russian Revolution,File:Manifestacin CNT Bilbao.lt;refgt;Sorel,Georges.Political Theorists in Context Routledge  p.The basic principles of anarchosyndicalism are: Workers wikt:Solidaritysolidarity,Anarchosyndicalists believe that only direct action  that is,action concentrated on directly attaining a goal,as opposed to indirect action,lt;refgt;Rocker,Rudolf.AnarchoSyndicalism: Theory and Practice AK Press  p.lt;refgt; Moreover,which,in anarchosyndicalist theory,will eventually form the basis of a new society should be selfmanaging.They should not have bosses or quot;business agentsquot;; rather,the workers should be able to make all the decisions that affect them themselves.Rudolf Rocker was one of the most popular voices in the anarchosyndicalist movement.He outlined a view of the origins of the movement,what it sought,and why it was important to the future of labour in his  pamphlet AnarchoSyndicalism.It was also an important force in the Spanish Civil War.File:Jarach and Zerzan.JPGthumbleftLawrence Jarach left and John Zerzan right,two prominent contemporary anarchist authors.Zerzan is known as prominent voice within anarchoprimitivism,while Jarach is a noted advocate of postleft anarchy.Anarchism continues to generate many philosophies and movements,at times eclectic,drawing upon various sources,and Syncretic politicssyncretic,combining disparate concepts to create new philosophical approaches.lt;refgt;Perlin,Terry M.http:books.google.ecbooks?Transaction Books,New Brunswick,Green anarchism or ecoanarchismlt;refgt;David Pepper .http:books.google.ecbooks?idPQOvkBUoWgCamp;pgPAamp;dq Modern Environmentalism p.Routledge.lt;refgt; is a school of thought within anarchism that emphasizes environmental issues,lt;refgt;Ian Adams .http:books.google.ecbooks?idapstKqIvvMCamp;pgPAamp;dq Political Ideology Today p.Manchester University Press.lt;refgt; with an important precedent in anarchonaturism,lt;ref namequot;acracia.orgquot;gt;lt;refgt;quot;Anarchism and the different Naturist views have always been related.quot;http:www.naturismo.orgadnedicionesinviernoe.html quot;Anarchism  Nudism,Published on Revista ADN.Winter lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;naturismolibertarioquot;gt;http:www.soliobrera.orgpdefscuaderno.and the anarchist struggle against the State politystate.In essence,it is inherently feministquot;.lt;refgt;Brown,lt;ref namequot;Anarchism quot;gt;lt;ref namequot;ppu.ukquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.ukepublicationsddtrad.htmlanarchandviolence titlequot;Resisting the Nation State,the pacifist and anarchist traditionquot; by Geoffrey Ostergaard publisherPpu.uk date August  accessdate September lt;refgt; It developed quot;mostly in the Netherlands,Britain,and the United States,before and during the Second World Warquot;.In political theologylt;refgt; Its main proponents included Leo Tolstoy,Dorothy Day,Ammon Hennacy,and Jacques Ellul.anarkismo.netnewswire.storyid accessdate October  year publisherFdCA locationItaly archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.anarkismo.netnewswire.storyid archivedate  March lt;!which led eventually to the victory of the Bolsheviks over the anarchists and other groups.lt;ref nameinfoshop.orggt;cite webtitleAn Anarchist FAQurlhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJwebsiteinfoshop.orgaccessdate July archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJarchivedate February date February deadurlyeslt;refgt; In the s,this form found as its main proponents the anarchocommunists Voline and Sbastien Faure.lt;refgt;cite web authorStarhawk urlhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ titlequot;J.What are quot;synthesisquot; federations?quot;workAn Anarchist FAQpublisherInfoshop.org date accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoshop.orgpageAnarchistFAQSectionJ archivedate  October lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Faure,Sbastien.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLSebastienFaureLibertarianCommunism.html Libertarian Communismquot;.quot;The remedy has been found: libertarian communism.lt;ref nameinfoshop.lt;ref namequot;ideologyquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.insurgentdesire.ukpostleft.htmtitleinsurgentdesire.ukworkinsurgentdesire.Insurrectionary anarchism is a revolutionary theory,practice,lt;ref namequot;sashaquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.insurgentdesire.uknotes.htmtitleinsurgentdesire.ukworkinsurgentdesire.uklt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;joeblackquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.ainfos.cajulainfos.html titlequot;Anarchism,insurrections and insurrectionalismquot; by Joe Black publisherAinfos.ca date July  accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.ainfos.cajulainfos.html archivedate  December lt;!lt;ref namequot;sashaquot;gt; Instead,permanent class conflict,and a refusal to negotiate or compromise with class enemies.drawing from diverse ideas including postmodernism,autonomist marxism,postleft anarchy,Situationist International,and postcolonialism.while maintaining that,taken to their logical conclusions,these ideas support strongly anticorporatist,antihierarchical,prolabor positions and anticapitalism in economics and antiimperialism in foreign policy.lt;refgt;Writing before the rise of the CarsonLong school of leftlibertarianism,David .The American as Anarchist: Reflections on Indigenous Radicalism.Baltimore,MD:Johns Hopkins University Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Gary Chartier and Charles W.Johnson eds.Markets Not Capitalism: Individualist Anarchism Against Bosses,Inequality,Corporate Power,and Structural Poverty.Minor Compositions; st edition November ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Gary Chartier has joined Kevin Carson,Charles W.Johnson philosopherCharles Johnson,and others echoing the language of Benjamin Tucker and Thomas Hodgskin in maintaining that,because of its heritage and its emancipatory goals and potential,and that market anarchists can and should call themselves quot;socialists.quot; See Gary Chartier,quot;Advocates of Freed Markets Should Oppose Capitalism,quot; quot;FreeMarket AntiCapitalism?quot; session,annual conference,Association of Private Enterprise Education Csars Palace,Las Vegas,April ,; Gary Chartier,http:css.orgcontent quot;Advocates of Freed Markets Should Embrace AntiCapitalismquot;; Gary Chartier,http:invisiblemolotov.wordpress.comsocialistendsmarketmeans Socialist Ends,Market Means: Five Essays.Tucker,quot;Socialism.And markets,properly understood,have always been about cooperation.As a commenter at Reason magazines Hitamp;Run blog,remarking on Jesse Walkers link to the Kelly article,put it: quot;every trade is a cooperative act.quot; In fact,quot;.http:css.lt;refgt;Ronald HamowyHamowy,Ronald editor.The Encyclopedia of Libertarianism,SAGE,https:books.google.combooks?https:books.google.combooks?ISBN ,ISBN lt;refgt;lt;ref nameStringhamgt;Edward Stringham,Anarchy and the law: the political economy of choice,https:books.google.combooks?lt;ref nameTormeygt;Tormey,Simon.AntiCapitalism,One World,lt;refgt;lt;ref namePerlingt;Perlin,Terry M.Contemporary Anarchism,Transaction Books,NJ .lt;refgt;lt;ref nameRaicogt;Raico,Ralph.Authentic German Liberalism of the th Century,Ecole Polytechnique,Centre de Recherce en Epistemologie Appliquee,Unit associe au CNRS,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameHeidergt;Heider,Ulrike.Anarchism:Left,Right,and Green,City Lights,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameOuthwaitegt;Outhwaite,William.The Blackwell Dictionary of Modern Social Thought,Anarchism entry,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameBottomoregt;Bottomore,Tom.Dictionary of Marxist Thought,Anarchism entry,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameOstergaardgt;Ostergaard,Geofrey.Resisting the Nation State  the anarchist and pacifist tradition,Anarchism As A Tradition of Political Thought.Peace Pledge Union Publications http:www.ukepublicationsddtrad.htmllt;refgt; drawing from Austrian School economics,study of law and economics,and public choice theory.lt;refgt;Edward Stringham,http:www.independent.orgpublicationstirarticle.issueIDamp;articleID Anarchy,State,and Public Choice,Cheltenham,UK: Edward Elgar,has nothing to do with Anarchism as known by the Anarchist movement proper.quot;Albert MeltzerMeltzer,Albert.https:books.google.combooks?amp;nbsp;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;In fact,Their selfinterested,calculating market men would be incapable of practising voluntary cooperation and mutual aid.Anarchocapitalists,even if they do reject the State,might therefore best be called Rightlibertarianismrightwing libertarians rather than anarchists.quot; Peter Marshall.Demanding the Impossible: A History of Anarchism.Harper Perennial.London.Murray Rothbards anarchocapitalism.quot;Saul Newman,https:books.google.combooks?Edinburgh University Press,ISBN lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:anarchism.pageabode.comafaqsecFcon.html Section F  Is quot;anarchoquot;capitalism a type of anarchism?OaklandEdinburgh ;  pages,The situation has been vastly complicated in recent decades with the rise of anarchocapitalism,Liverpool University Press.Liverpool.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Within Libertarianism,In its place he allows countless private states,with each person supplying their own police force,army,and law,or else purchasing these services from capitalist venders.In sum,the anarchy of Libertarianism reduces to a liberal fraud.http:theanarchistlibrary.If you are looking to extend this section,please add the content to the proper subarticle anarchist schools of thought instead.File:Gadewar.In the interest of restricting article length,Thank you.Anarchism is a philosophy that embodies many diverse attitudes,tendencies and schools of thought; as such,disagreement over questions of values,ideology and tactics is common.The compatibility of anarchism and capitalismcapitalism,lt;ref nameoxcomgt;quot;Anarchism.quot; The Oxford Companion to Philosophy,Oxford University Press,lt;refgt; anarchism and nationalismnationalism,and anarchism and religionreligion with anarchism is widely disputed.Similarly,anarchism enjoys complex relationships with ideologies such as Anarchism and MarxismMarxism,Issues in anarchismCommunismcommunism and Anarchism and capitalismcapitalism.Anarchists may be motivated by humanism,Christian anarchismdivine authority,enlightened selfinterest,veganarchismveganism or any number of alternative ethical doctrines.Phenomena such as civilization,technology e.within anarchoprimitivism,On a tactical level,while propaganda of the deed was a tactic used by anarchists in the th century e.the Nihilist movement,some contemporary anarchists espouse alternative direct action methods such as nonviolence,countereconomics and Cryptoanarchismantistate cryptography to bring about an anarchist society.About the scope of an anarchist society,some anarchists advocate a global one,while others do so by local ones.lt;refgt;Ted Honderich,Carmen Garca Trevijano,https:books.google.combooks?idsiwZGvpsCamp;pgPAamp;dqEnciclopediateorCADapolCADticaamp;lramp;asbrrPPA,M Oxford Encyclopaedia of Philosophy.which has led to many definitional concerns in anarchist theory.Intersecting and overlapping between various schools of thought,certain topics of interest and internal disputes have proven perennial within anarchist theory.File:Emilearmand.jpgthumbuprightFrench individualist anarchist Emile Armand ,An important current within anarchism is free love.lt;ref namequot;nccquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.orgtlele.html titleThe Free Love Movement and Radical Individualism By Wendy McElroy publisherNcc.org date December  accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:ncc.orgtlele.html archivedate  December lt;!viewed sexual freedom as a clear,direct expression of an individuals sovereignty.marriage laws and antibirth control measures.lt;refgt;Joanne E.Passet,quot;Power through Print: Lois Waisbrooker and Grassroots Feminism,James Philip Danky and Wayne A.Wiegand,eds.Madison,University of Wisconsin Press,; pp.lt;refgt; but also there existed Ezra Heywood and Angela Heywoods The Word free loveThe Word ,quot; Emma Goldman: Making Speech Free,lt;refgt; The publication advocated free love and womens rights,and critiqued quot;Comstockeryquot;  censorship of sexual information.Also M.Lazarus was an important American individualist anarchist who promoted free love.In New York Citys Greenwich Village,They encouraged playing with sexual roles and sexuality,lt;refgt;Sochen,June.The New Woman: Feminism in Greenwich Village .New York: Quadrangle.lt;refgt; and the openly bisexual radical Edna St.Vincent Millay and the lesbian anarchist Margaret Anderson were prominent among them.Discussion groups organised by the Villagers were frequented by Emma Goldman,among others.and especially for those deprived of their rights.Thus it came about that she was the first and only woman,indeed the first and only American,to take up the defense of homosexual love before the general public.quot;lt;refgt;Katz,Jonathan Ned.Gay American History: Lesbians and Gay Men in the U.New York: Thomas Y.Crowell,lt;refgt; In fact,before Goldman,which was published nine times in Rosario between  January  and  January ,and was revived,briefly,in .google.combooks?In Europe the main propagandist of free love within individualist anarchism was Emile Armand.lt;ref namequot;armandfreelovequot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.iisg.nlwomhistmanfreuk.pdf titleE.He was also a consistent proponent of polyamory.It was founded in  by Luca Snchez Saornil,Mercedes Comaposada and Amparo Poch y Gascn and had approximately ,members.In order to gain mutual support,they created networks of women anarchists.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:flag.blackened.netrevoltwswsmujereslibres.html titleMujeres Libres  Women anarchists in the Spanish Revolution publisherFlag.blackened.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:wzar.unizar.essiemarticulosPremiosMujeresLibres.pdfformatPDFtitle Basta pensar en el lesbianismo de Luca Snchez SaornilpublisherWzar.unizar.she was able to explore lesbian themeslt;refgt;quot;R.Fue una poca transgresora,emergi el feminismo y la libertad sexual estuvo en el candelero.Hay rastreos de muchas lesbianas escritoras: Carmen Condeprimera acadmica de nmero,Victorina Durn,Margarita Xirgu,Ana Mara Sagi,la periodista Irene Polo,Luca Snchez Saornil,fundadora de Mujeres Libresseccin feminista de CNT.Incluso exista un crculo sfico en Madrid como lugar de encuentro y tertulia.Se declaraban lesbianas?Haba quien no se esconda mucho,como Polo o Durn,pero lesbiana era un insulto,algo innombrable.Excepto los poemas homosexuales de Snchez Saornil,sus textos no eran explcitos para poder publicarlos,as que hay que reinterpretarlos.quot;http:elpais.comdiariopaisvasco.More recently,File:Francisco Ferrer Guardia.jpgleftthumbuprightFrancesc Ferrer i Gurdia,quot;lt;ref namequot;GroupedRefquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.infed.orgthinkersetgood.htmtitleinfed.org  William Godwin on educationworkinfed.orglt;refgt; Godwin saw that the main goal of education should be the promotion of happiness.lt;ref namequot;Enquiry Concerning Political Justicequot;gt;Cite book chapterurlhttp:socserv.mcmaster.caeconugcmllgodwinpj.and J.Robinson locationLondon,England year refharv postscriptlt;!Bot inserted parameter.Either remove it; or change its value to quot;.quot; for the cite to end in a quot;.quot;,as necessary.Warren wanted to dissolve such identities in a solution of individual selfsovereignty.His educational experiments,for example,not the inculcation of preconceived values.http:www.crispinsartwell.comwarrenintrocurrent.In it Stirner names his educational principle quot;personalist,quot; explaining that selfunderstanding consists in hourly selfcreation.Education for him is to create quot;free men,sovereign characters,quot; by which he means quot;eternal charactersamp;nbsp;.who are therefore eternal because they form themselves each momentquot;.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:tmh.floonet.netarticlesfalseprinciple.html titleThe False Principle of our EducationlastStirner  firstMaxpublisherTmh.floonet.In the United States quot;freethought was a basically AntiChristianityantichristian,anticlerical movement,The individualist anarchist George MacDonald was a coeditor of Freethought and,for a time,The Truth Seeker.Walker was coeditor of the excellent freethought  free love journal Lucifer,the LightBearerquot;.lt;ref namequot;mises.the LightBearer,Freethought and The Truth Seeker appeared in Liberty Liberty.lt;ref namequot;mises.lt;ref namequot;Fidlerquot;gt;cite journal authorGeoffrey C.secular and noncoercive settingquot;.Fiercely anticlerical,Ferrer believed in quot;freedom in educationquot;,education free from the authority of church and state.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:flag.blackened.netrevoltspainferrer.html titleFrancisco Ferrers Modern School publisherFlag.blackened.net date accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:flag.blackened.netrevoltspainferrer.html archivedate  August lt;!Perhaps the bestknown effort in this field was Francisco Ferrers Modern School Escuela Moderna,quot;lt;refgt;Chapter ,anarchosyndicalismAnarchosyndicalism,The New Ferment.In Murray Bookchin,The Spanish anarchists: the heroic years,AK Press,ISBN Xlt;refgt; La Escuela Moderna,and Ferrers ideas generally,lt;ref namequot;Fidlerquot;gt; Cuba,South America and London.The first of these was started in New York City in .It also inspired the Italian newspaper Universit popolare Italian newspaperUniversit popolare,founded in .Russian christian anarchist Leo Tolstoy established a school for peasant children on his estate.lt;ref namequot;GroupedRefquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLMattHernTheEmergenceofCompulsorySchoolingandAnarchistResistance.lt;refgt;cite book  last  Wilson  first  A.title  Tolstoy  publisher  Norton,amp; Company,Inc.year    page  xxi  url  https:books.google.combooks?Education is culture under restraint,culture is free.Education is when the teaching is forced upon the pupil,and when then instruction is exclusive,that is when only those subjects are taught which the educator regards as necessaryquot;.lt;ref namequot;GroupedRefquot; gt; For him quot;without compulsion,education was transformed into culturequot;.Experiments in Germany led to A.Neill founding what became Summerhill School in .lt;refgt;British anarchists Stuart Christie and Albert Meltzer manifested that quot;A.Though he has denied being an anarchist,it would be hard to know how else to describe his philosophy,though he is correct in recognising the difference between revolution in philosophy and pedagogy,and the revolutionary change of society.They are associated but not the same thing.quot; Stuart Christie and Albert Meltzer.http:theanarchistlibrary.rd edition,Oxford,WileyBlackwell p.lt;refgt; However,although Summerhill and other free schools are radically libertarian,lt;refgt;cite journal firstJudith lastSuissa urlhttp:newhumanist.In addition to organising schools according to libertarian principles,anarchists have also questioned the concept of schooling per se.The term deschooling was popularised by Ivan Illich,Criticisms of anarchism include moralitymoral criticisms and pragmatic criticisms.Anarchism is often evaluated as unfeasible or utopian by its critics.European history professor Carl Landauer,quot;lt;refgt;Landauer,Carl.Harold BarclayBarclay,Harold,People Without Government: An Anthropology of Anarchy nd ed.Left Bank Books,Blumenfeld,Jacob; Bottici,Chiara; Simon CritchleyCritchley,Simon,eds.The Anarchist Turn,Pluto Press.March .April CarterCarter,April,The Political Theory of Anarchism,Harper amp; Row.Gordon,Uri,Anarchy Alive!London: Pluto Press,David GraeberGraeber,David.Fragments of an Anarchist Anthropology,Chicago: Prickly Paradigm Press,Graham,Robert,Anarchism: A Documentary History of Libertarian Ideas.Volume One: From Anarchy to Anarchism CE to ,Black Rose Books,Montral and London .ISBN .Volume Two: The Anarchist Current ,Black Rose Books,Montral .ISBN .Daniel GuerinGuerin,Daniel,http:www.theanarchistlibrary.orgHTMLDanielGuerinAnarchismFromTheorytoPractice.html Anarchism: From Theory to Practice,Monthly Review Press.Clifford HarperHarper,Clifford,Anarchy: A Graphic Guide,Camden Press,: An overview,updating Woodcocks classic,and illustrated throughout by Harpers woodcutstyle artwork.McKay,Iain,An Anarchist FAQ.Volume I,AK Press,OaklandEdinburgh ;   pages,ISBN .Volume II,AK Press,OaklandEdinburgh ;  Pages,McLaughlin,Paul,Anarchism and Authority: A Philosophical Introduction to Classical Anarchism,AshGate.Marshall,Peter,Demanding the Impossible: A History of Anarchism,PM Press.Max NettlauNettlau,Max,Anarchy through the times,Gordon Press.cite book authorSartwell,google.combooks?Razsa,Maple.Bastards of Utopia: Living Radical Politics After Socialism.Bloomington: Indiana University Press,James C.ScottScott,James C.Two Cheers for Anarchism: Six Easy Pieces on Autonomy,Dignity,and Meaningful Work and Play,Princeton,NJ: Princeton University Press,ISBN .George WoodcockWoodcock,George,Anarchism: A History of Libertarian Ideas and Movements Penguin Books,ISBN .oclc.Woodcock,George,Peter KropotkinKropotkin,Mikhail BakuninBakunin,Errico MalatestaMalatesta,Murray BookchinBookchin,Emma GoldmanGoldman,and many others.David Van Deusen,http:news.infoshop.http:anarchism.pageabode.comafaqindex.http:www.ditext.http:www.edudepartmentseconomicsbcaplananarfaq.http:dwardmac.pitzer.http:recollectionbooks.combleedgallerygalleryindex.htm Daily Bleeds Anarchist Encyclopediaamp;nbsp; entries,with short biographies,http:www.katesharpleylibrary.net KateSharpleyLibrary.netamp;nbsp;website of the Kate Sharpley Library,http:www.infoshop.org Infoshop.orgamp;nbsp; an online collection of news and information about anarchism.http:www.theanarchistlibrary.http:www.theyliewedie.orgressourcesbiblioindexen.php They Lie We Dieamp;nbsp;anarchist virtual library containing  books,Attention!The external link portion of this article regularly grows far beyond manageable size.PLEASE only list an outside link if it applies to anarchism in general,is somewhat noteworthy,and has consensus on the talkpage.Zlt;!Please be cautious adding more external links.Wikipedia is not a collection of links and should not be used for advertising.Excessive or inappropriate links will be removed.See Wikipedia:External links and Wikipedia:Spam for details.If there are already suitable links,the articles talk page,DMOZ dmoz.org and link there using Dmoz.comment revision from :nost:AfghanistanGeography: import old edit,botsdenyMonkbot lt;!Please follow the Wikipedia style guidelines for editing medical articles WP:MEDMOS,and medical referencing standards at WP:MEDRS.Use lt;refgt; for explicitly cited references.Reference anything you put here with notable references,as this subject tends to attract a lot of controversy.Image            Autismstackingcans nd edit.Caption          Repetitively stacking or lining up objects is associated with autism.ICD             ICD.language acquisitionverbal and nonverbal communication,and restricted and repetitive behavior.Parents usually notice signs in the first two years of their childs life.lt;ref nameCCDgt; These signs often develop gradually,typically before age three.lt;ref nameDSMgt;vcite book  title  Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders,Fifth Edition  chapter  Autism Spectrum Disorder,While autism is highly heritable,researchers suspect both environmental and genetic factors as causes.lt;refgt;cite journal vauthorsChaste P,Leboyer M titleAutism risk factors: genes,environment,autism is strongly associated with Teratologyagents that cause birth defects.the MMR vaccine controversyvaccine hypotheses have been disproven.the other two being Asperger syndrome,which lacks delays in cognitive development and language,and PDDNOSpervasive developmental disorder,not otherwise specified commonly abbreviated as PDDNOS,which is diagnosed when the full set of criteria for autism or Asperger syndrome are not met.social,and communication skills.lt;ref nameCCDgt; Although there is no known cure,lt;ref nameCCDgt; there have been reported cases of children who recovered.lt;ref nameHeltgt; Not many children with autism live independently after reaching adulthood,though some become successful.lt;ref namequot;Howlinquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Howlin P,Goode S,Hutton J,x  pmid  lt;refgt; An Sociological and cultural aspects of autismautistic culture has developed,Globally,autism is estimated to affect .million people as of .regional,and national incidence,prevalence,and years lived with disability for  acute and chronic diseases and injuries in  countries,: a systematic analysis for the Global Burden of Disease Study .journalLancetyear  pmid doi.Slt;refgt; As of ,the number of people affected is estimated at about  per ,worldwide.It occurs four to five times more often in boys than girls.About .of children in the United States one in  are diagnosed with ASD as oflcy,a  increase from one in  in .lt;ref namequot;ASD Data and Statisticsquot;gt;cite web url  http:www.govncbdddautismdata.html title  ASD Data and Statistics website  CDC.gov accessdate  April  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.govncbdddautismdata.sites,United States,journal  MMWR Surveill Summ  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    url  http:www.govmmwrpreviewmmwrhtmlssa.htm  archivedate   March   archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.govmmwrpreviewmmwrhtmlssa.htm lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;NHSRquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Blumberg SJ,Bramlett MD,Kogan MD,Schieve LA,Jones JR,Lu MC  title  Changes in prevalence of parentreported autism spectrum disorder in schoolaged U.govnchsdatanhsrnhsr.pdf  archiveurl  http:www.webcitation.File:Autism spectrum disorder video.and generally follows a steady course without Remission medicineremission.lt;ref nameICDF.gt; People with autism may be severely impaired in some respects but normal,or even superior,in others.Massachusettspage  lt;refgt; Overt symptoms gradually begin after the age of six months,become established by age two or three years,journal  Autism Res  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    pmc    doi  .lt;refgt; and tend to continue through adulthood,although often in more muted form.lt;ref nameRapingt; It is distinguished not by a single symptom,Other aspects,such as atypical eating,are also common but are not essential for diagnosis.without a sharp line separating pathologically severe from common traits.or people with normal neural development,as leaving her feeling quot;like an anthropologist on Marsquot;.Unusual social development becomes apparent early in childhood.ref nameVolkmar gt; Autistic infants show less attention to social stimuli,smile and look at others less often,and respond less to their own name.Autistic toddlers differ more strikingly from social norms; for example,they have less eye contact and turntaking,and do not have the ability to use simple movements to express themselves,such as pointing at things.approach others spontaneously,imitate and respond to emotions,communicate nonverbally,and take turns with others.However,they do form Attachment psychologyattachments to their primary caregivers.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Sigman M,Dijamco A,Gratier M,mrdd.although this difference disappears in children with higher mental development or less severe ASD.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Rutgers AH,BakermansKranenburg MJ,van Ijzendoorn MH,Spence SJ,annurev.clinpsy.lt;refgt; although this may be partly due to a lower ability to define a persons own emotions.nature.comtpjournalvnfulltpa.htmljournal  Translational Psychiatrydate  pmc  pmid  pages  evolume  issue  doi  .first  G.last  Birdfirst  R.despite the common belief that children with autism prefer to be alone.Making and maintaining friendships often proves to be difficult for those with autism.For them,the quality of friendships,not the number of friends,predicts how lonely they feel.Functional friendships,such as those resulting in invitations to parties,may affect the quality of life more deeply.There are many anecdotal reports,but few systematic studies,of aggression and violence in individuals with ASD.The limited data suggest that,in children with intellectual disability,autism is associated with aggression,destruction of property,and tantrums.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Matson JL,ridd.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Noens I,van BerckelaerOnnes I,Verpoorten R,x lt;refgt; Differences in communication may be present from the first year of life,and may include delayed onset of babbling,unusual gestures,diminished responsiveness,and vocal patterns that are not synchronized with the caregiver.In the second and third years,children with autism have less frequent and less diverse babbling,consonants,words,and word combinations; their gestures are less often integrated with words.Children with autism are less likely to make requests or share experiences,lt;ref nameKannergt; Joint attention seems to be necessary for functional speech,peds.url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfull  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.org:cgicontentfull  archivedate   February  lt;refgt; for example,they may look at a pointing hand instead of the pointedat object,mrdd.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;TagerFlusbergquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  TagerFlusberg H,In a pair of studies,highfunctioning children with autism aged  performed equally well as,and adults better than,individually matched controls at basic language tasks involving vocabulary and spelling.comprehension and inference.As people are often sized up initially from their basic language skills,Autistic individuals display many forms of repetitive or restricted behavior,which the Repetitive Behavior ScaleRevised RBSRlt;ref nameLamAmangt; categorizes as follows.File:Autisticsweetiepieboywithducksinarow.Stereotypy is repetitive movement,such as hand flapping,head rolling,or body rocking.Compulsive behavior is intended and appears to follow rules,such as arranging objects in stacks or lines.Sameness is resistance to change; for example,insisting that the furniture not be moved or refusing to be interrupted.RitualPsychologyRitualistic behavior involves an unvarying pattern of daily activities,such as an unchanging menu or a dressing ritual.lt;ref namequot;LamAmanquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Lam KS,Restricted behavior is limited in focus,interest,or activity,such as preoccupation with a single television program,toy or game.Selfinjury includes movements that injure or can injure the person,such as eyepoking,Dermatillomaniaskinpicking,handbiting and headbanging.No single repetitive or selfinjurious behavior seems to be specific to autism,but autism appears to have an elevated pattern of occurrence and severity of these behaviors.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Bodfish JW,Symons FJ,Parker DE,Autistic individuals may have symptoms that are independent of the diagnosis,but that can affect the individual or the family.lt;ref namequot;Filipekquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Filipek PA,Accardo PJ,Baranek GT,Cook EH,Dawson G,Gordon B,Gravel JS,Johnson CP,Kallen RJ,Levy SE,Minshew NJ,Ozonoff S,Prizant BM,Rapin I,Rogers SJ,Stone WL,Teplin S,Tuchman RF,A:  author.An estimated .to  of individuals with ASD show unusual abilities,A synopsis: past,present,rstb.url  http:rstb.royalsocietypublishing.orgcontent.full  laysummary  https:www.wisconsinmedicalsociety.relative to the general population.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Plaisted Grant K,rstb.url  http:rstb.royalsocietypublishing.orgcontent.full lt;refgt; Sensory systemSensory abnormalities are found in over  of those with autism,and are considered core features by some,annurev.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Rogers SJ,Ozonoff S  title  Annotation: what do we know about sensory dysfunction in autism?x lt;refgt; Differences are greater for underresponsivity for example,walking into things than for overresponsivity for example,distress from loud noises or for sensation seeking for example,rhythmic movements.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  BenSasson A,Hen L,Fluss R,Cermak SA,EngelYeger B,Apraxiapoor motor planning,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Fournier KA,Hass CJ,Naik SK,Lodha N,Unusual eating behavior occurs in about threequarters of children with ASD,to the extent that it was formerly a diagnostic indicator.Selectivity is the most common problem,Davis NO,Lainhart J,TagerFlusberg H,ridd.lt;refgt; this does not appear to result in malnutrition.Although some children with autism also have gastrointestinal symptoms,Stigler KA,Corkins MR,Posey DJ,Fitzgerald JF,s lt;refgt; studies report conflicting results,and the relationship between gastrointestinal problems and ASD is unclear.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Buie T,Campbell DB,Fuchs GJ,Furuta GT,Levy J,Vandewater J,Whitaker AH,Atkins D,Bauman ML,Beaudet AL,Carr EG,Gershon MD,Hyman SL,Jirapinyo P,Jyonouchi H,Kooros K,Kushak R,Levitt P,Levy SE,Lewis JD,Murray KF,Natowicz MR,Sabra A,Wershil BK,Weston SC,Zeltzer L,Winter H  title  Evaluation,diagnosis,peds.C  url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfullSupplementS  author.archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.Parents of children with ASD have higher levels of stress psychologicalstress.lt;ref namequot;Volkmarquot;gt;vcite bookauthorsVolkmar FR,Paul R,Rogers SJ,Pelphrey KAtitleHandbook of Autism and Pervasive Developmental Disorders,Assessment,Interventions,and PolicypublisherJohn Wiley amp; Sonsisbnyearpageaccessdate December urlhttps:books.google.combooks?However,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Orsmond GI,mrdd.url  http:www.waisman.wisc.edufamilypubsAutismsiblingsautismlifecourse.pdf  format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.waisman.wisc.edufamilypubsAutismsiblingsautismlifecourse.It has long been presumed that there is a common cause at the genetic,cognitive,and neural levels for autisms characteristic triad of symptoms.lt;ref namequot;Fractionablequot; gt; However,lt;ref namequot;Fractionablequot;gt;cite journal vauthorsHapp F,Ronald A titleThe fractionable autism triad: a review of evidence from behavioural,genetic,cognitive and neural research journalNeuropsychol Rev volume issue pages year pmid doi.File:Single Chromosome Mutations.svgthumbaltThree diagrams of chromosome pairs A,B that are nearly identical.: B is missing a segment of A.: B has two adjacent copies of a segment of A.: Bs copy of As segment is in reverse order.Deletion ,duplication  and inversion  are all chromosome abnormalities that have been implicated in autism.Autism has a strong genetic basis,or by rare multigene interactions of common genetic variants.lt;ref namequot;Abrahamsquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsAbrahams BS,the environment,lt;ref namequot;Rapinquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsRapin I,Tuchman RF titleAutism: definition,neurobiology,screening,diagnosis journalPediatr Clin North Am volume issue pages year pmid doi.lt;ref namequot;SandersHequot;gt;cite journal lastSanders firstStephan J.lastHe firstXin lastWillsey firstA.Jeremy lastErcanSencicek firstA.Gulhan lastSamocha firstKaitlin E.lastCicek firstA.Ercument lastMurtha firstMichael T.lastBal firstVanessa H.lastBishop firstSomer L.lastDong firstShan lastGoldberg firstArthur P.lastJinlu firstCai lastKeaney firstJohn F.lastKlei firstLambertus lastMandell firstJeffrey D.lastMorenoDeLuca firstDaniel lastPoultney firstChristopher S.lastRobinson firstElise B.lastSmith firstLouw lastSolliNowlan firstTor lastSu firstMack Y.lastTeran firstNicole A.lastWalker firstMichael F.lastWerling firstDonna M.lastBeaudet firstArthur L.lastCantor firstRita M.lastFombonne firstEric lastGeschwind firstDaniel H.lastGrice firstDorothy E.lastLord firstCatherine lastLowe firstJennifer K.lastMane firstShrikant M.lastMartin firstDonna M.lastMorrow firstEric M.lastTalkowski firstMichael E.lastSutcliffe firstJames S.lastWalsh firstChristopher A.lastYu firstTimothy W.lastLedbetter firstDavid H.lastMartin firstChrista Lese lastCook firstEdwin H.lastBuxbaum firstJoseph D.lastDaly firstMark J.lastDevlin firstBernie lastRoeder firstKathryn lastState firstMatthew W.neuron.Studies of twins suggest that heritability is .for autism and as high as .for ASD,lt;ref namequot;Geschwindquot; gt; However,most of the mutations that increase autism risk have not been identified.Typically,autism cannot be traced to a Mendelian singlegene mutation or to a single chromosome abnormality,and none of the genetic syndromes associated with ASDs have been shown to selectively cause ASD.lt;ref namequot;Abrahamsquot; gt;  Numerous candidate genes have been located,with only small effects attributable to any particular gene.lt;ref nameAbrahamsgt; Most loci individually explain less than  of cases of autism.lt;refgt;cite journal lastPersico firstAntonio M.lt;refgt;cite journal vauthorsCook EH,naturelt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite journal lastBrandler firstWilliam M.lastBarrera firstDaniel J.lastLin firstGuan Ning lastMalhotra firstDheeraj lastWatts firstAmanda C.lastWong firstLawrence C.lastEstabillo firstJasper A.lastGadomski firstTherese E.lastHong firstOanh lastFajardo firstKarin V.lastMaile firstMichelle S.lastSanders firstStephan J.lastReiner firstGail E.lastVaux firstKeith K.lastStrom firstCharles M.lastZhang firstKang lastMuotri firstAlysson R.lastAkshoomoff firstNatacha lastLeal firstSuzanne M.lastPierce firstKaren lastCourchesne firstEric lastIakoucheva firstLilia M.ajhg.lt;refgt; Hence,the mutation that causes the autism is not present in the parental genome.Several lines of evidence point to Synapsesynaptic dysfunction as a cause of autism.such as those involved with cell adhesion.lt;ref namequot;Betancurquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsBetancur C,Sakurai T,tins.lt;ref namequot;Walshquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsWalsh CA,Morrow EM,cell.and though this does not exclude the possibility that autism can be initiated or affected later,there is strong evidence that autism arises very early in development.lt;ref namequot;Arndtquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsArndt TL,Stodgell CJ,ijdevneu.Exposure to air pollution during pregnancy,especially heavy metal chemistryheavy metals and particulates,may increase the risk of autism.lt;refgt;cite journal vauthorsLyall K,Schmidt RJ,ijedytlt;refgt; Although no links have been found,qualify evidence and somewhichdateFebruary  have been completely disproven,environmental factors that have been claimed to contribute to or exacerbate autism,include certain foods,infectious diseases,solvents,diesel exhaust,PCBs,phthalates and phenols used in plastic products,pesticides,brominated flame retardants,Ethanolalcohol,smoking,illicit drugs,vaccines,lt;ref namequot;Newschafferquot; gt; and prenatal stress.lt;refgt;cite journal vauthorsKinney DK,Munir KM,Crowley DJ,neubiorev.a Thiomersal controversyvaccine preservative,or the MMR vaccine controversyMMR vaccine for causing autism.lt;ref namequot;GerberOffitquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsGerber JS,urlhttp:cid.oxfordjournals.orgcontent.full archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:cid.oxfordjournals.org:content.lt;ref namequot;WakefieldarticleBMJquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsGodlee F,Smith J,c urlhttp:www.comcontentbmj.full archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.comcontentbmj.and the preventable deaths of several children.cite journal vauthorsDoja A,cite journal vauthorsGerber JS,urlhttp:cid.oxfordjournals.orgcontent.full archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:cid.oxfordjournals.org:content.journal.pbio.cite journal vauthorsPaul R titleParents ask: am I risking autism if I vaccinate my children?journalJ Autism Dev Disord volume issue pages year pmid doi.cite journal vauthorsPoland GA,NEJMp urlhttp:www.nejm.orgdoifull.NEJMp archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nejm.orgdoifull.NEJMp archivedate April lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;dublinquot;gt;cite journal vauthorsMcBrien J,Murphy J,Gill D,Cronin M,ODonovan C,Cafferkey MT titleMeasles outbreak in Dublin,journalPediatr.Infect.Dis.volume issue pages year pmid doi.Autisms symptoms result from maturationrelated changes in various systems of the brain.ref namePenn gt; How autism occurs is not well understood.and the neuropsychological linkages between brain structures and behaviors.lt;refgt; The behaviors appear to have multiple pathophysiologies.File:Autismbrain.jpgthumbaltTwo diagrams of major brain structures implicated in autism.The upper diagram shows the cerebral cortex near the top and the basal ganglia in the center,just above the amygdala and hippocampus.The lower diagram shows the corpus callosum near the center,the cerebellum in the lower rear,and the brain stem in the lower center.Autism affects the amygdala,cerebellum,and many other parts of the brain.Unlike many other brain disorders,such as Parkinsons,autism does not have a clear unifying mechanism at either the molecular,cellular,or is like intellectual disability a large set of disorders with diverse mechanisms.lt;ref namequot;Geschwindquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Geschwind DH  title  Autism: many genes,common pathways?journal  Cell  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    pmc    doi  .cell.title.mrdd.lt;refgt; and to disturb the timing of brain development more than the final product.lt;ref namequot;Amaralquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Amaral DG,Schumann CM,tins.x lt;refgt; Just after birth,the brains of children with autism tend to grow faster than usual,followed by normal or relatively slower growth in childhood.It is not known whether early overgrowth occurs in all children with autism.An excess of neurons that causes local overconnectivity in key brain regions.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Courchesne E,Pierce K,Schumann CM,Redcay E,Buckwalter JA,Kennedy DP,neuron.author.Disturbed neuronal migration during early gestation.lt;ref namequot;Schmitzquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Schmitz C,Rezaie P  title  The neuropathology of autism: where do we stand?journal  Neuropathol Appl Neurobiol  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .x  title.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Persicoquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Persico AM,Bourgeron T  title  Searching for ways out of the autism maze: genetic,tins.Unbalanced excitatoryinhibitory networks.Abnormal formation of synapses and dendritic spines,lt;ref namePersicogt; for example,by modulation of the neurexinneuroligin Cell adhesioncelladhesion system,nature lt;refgt; or by poorly regulated Protein synthesissynthesis of synaptic proteins.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Kelleher RJ,Bear MF  title  The autistic neuron: troubled translation?journal  Cell  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .cell.title.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Bear MF,Dlen G,Osterweil E,Nagarajan N  title  Fragile X: translation in action.journal  Neuropsychopharmacology  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .title.lt;refgt; Disrupted synaptic development may also contribute to epilepsy,which may explain why the two conditions are associated.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Tuchman R,Mosh SL,braindev.The immune system is thought to play an important role in autism.journal  International Review of Neurobiology  volume    pages    year    pmid    doi  .lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Onore C,Careaga M,Ashwood P  title  The role of immune dysfunction in the pathophysiology of autism  journal  Brain,Behavior and Immunity  volume    issue    pages    date  August   pmid    doi  .lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Rossignol DA,Frye RE  title  Evidence linking oxidative stress,mitochondrial dysfunction,and inflammation in the brain of individuals with autism.journal  Frontiers in Physiology  volume    page    year    pmid    doi  .fphys.and successful neurodevelopment depends on a balanced immune response.journal  Trends in Molecular Medicine  volume    issue    pages    date  July   pmid    doi  .molmed.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Chastequot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Chaste P,Leboyer M  title  Autism risk factors: genes,environment,Wills S,url  http:www.jleukbio.lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Lee BK,Magnusson C,Gardner RM,Blomstrm S,Newschaffer CJ,Burstyn I,Karlsson H,journal  Brain,Behavior and Immunity  date  September   pmid    doi  .volume  pageslt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Atladttir HO,Thorsen P,stergaard L,Schendel DE,Lemcke S,Abdallah M,journal  Journal of Autism and Developmental Disorders  volume    issue    pages  .date  December   pmid    doi  .with the most evidence for the role of serotonin and of genetic differences in its transport.lt;ref namequot;Levyquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Levy SE,Mandell DS,the most common identified genetic cause of autism,has led to interest in the possible implications for future autism research into this pathway.lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Dlen G,Osterweil E,Rao BS,Smith GB,Auerbach BD,Chattarji S,neuron.yebeh.lt;refgt; or to impaired regulation of growth factor receptors.Also,some inborn errors of metabolism are associated with autism,but probably account for less than  of cases.intentions,and emotions.cite journal  vauthors  Dinstein I,Thomas C,Behrmann M,delay in the activation in the core circuit for imitation in individuals with Asperger syndrome,and a correlation between reduced MNS activity and severity of the syndrome in children with ASD.lt;ref namequot;Iacoboniquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Iacoboni M,nrn lt;refgt; However,rstb.url  http:rstb.royalsocietypublishing.orgcontent.full.File:PowellFigA.jpegthumbuprightaltA human brain viewed from above.About  is highlighted in yellow and  in blue.There is only a tiny perhaps .green region where they overlap.journal.pbio.urlhttp:www.plosbiology.orgarticleinfo:doi.journal.pbio.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.plosbiology.orgarticleinfo:doi.journal.pbio.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Di Martino A,Ross K,Uddin LQ,Sklar AB,Castellanos FX,biopsych.In autism there is evidence for reduced functional connectivity of the default network,a largescale brain network involved in social and emotional processing,with intact connectivity of the taskpositive network,Sentences with multiple subclauses like this should be split up to avoid confusions.dateJanuary .In people with autism the two networks are not negatively correlated in time,suggesting an imbalance in toggling between the two networks,possibly reflecting a disturbance of selfreferential thought.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Broyd SJ,Demanuele C,Debener S,Helps SK,James CJ,neubiorev.along with an excess of lowlevel processes.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Just MA,Cherkassky VL,Keller TA,Kana RK,cercorbhl  url  http:cercor.oxfordjournals.orgcgicontentfull  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:cercor.oxfordjournals.Goldstein G,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Murias M,Webb SJ,Greenson J,biopsych.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Minshew NJ,Williams DL  title  The new neurobiology of autism: cortex,connectivity,archneur.From studies based on eventrelated potentials,transient changes to the brains electrical activity in response to stimuli,there is considerable evidence for differences in autistic individuals with respect to attention,orientation to auditory and visual stimuli,novelty detection,language and face processing,and information storage; several studies have found a preference for nonsocial stimuli.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Jeste SS,s lt;refgt; For example,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Roberts TP,Schmidt GL,Egeth M,Blaskey L,Rey MM,Edgar JC,ijpsycho.author.In the genetic area,deletion syndrome.Research on autismschizophrenia relations for chromosome  q.chromosome  p.and chromosome  p are inconclusive.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Crespi B,Stead P,pnas.Hypoconnectivity seems to dominate,especially for interhemispheric and corticocortical functional connectivity.lt;ref nameHaSohngt;cite journalvauthorsHa S,Sohn IJ,Kim N,Sim HJ,Cheon KAtitleCharacteristics of Brains in Autism Spectrum Disorder: Structure,The first category focuses on deficits in social cognition.An extension,the extreme male brain theory,hypothesizes that autism is an extreme case of the male brain,defined psychometrically as individuals in whom systemizing is better than empathizing.x  url  http:docs.autismresearchcentre.compapersBCnyas.pdf  format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:docs.autismresearchcentre.compapersBCnyas.lt;ref nameIacobonigt; However,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Hamilton AF  title  Goals,planning,Inhibition Theoryinhibition.In his review,however,but performance never reaches typical adult levels.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  OHearn K,Asato M,Ordaz S,Yerys BE,Anthony LG,s lt;refgt; and that executive function deficits have not been found in young children with autism.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Happ F,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Mottron L,Dawson M,Soulires I,Hubert B,Burack J  title  Enhanced perceptual functioning in autism: an update,s lt;refgt; These theories map well from the underconnectivity theory of autism.lt;ref namequot;HappeTimequot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Happ F,Ronald A,nn lt;refgt; A combined theory based on multiple deficits may prove to be more useful.Mitchell P  doi  .Medical diagnosisDiagnosis is based on behavior,not cause or mechanism.x lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Baird G,Cass H,url  http:www.comcgicontentfull  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.com:cgicontentfull  archivedate   March  lt;refgt; Under the DSM,as well as restricted,repetitive patterns of behavior,interests,or activities.These deficits are present in early childhood,typically before age three,and lead to clinically significant functional impairment.Sample symptoms include lack of social or emotional reciprocity,and persistent preoccupation with unusual objects.The disturbance must not be better accounted for by Rett syndrome,intellectual disability or global developmental delay.lt;ref nameDSMgt; ICD uses essentially the same definition.lt;ref namequot;ICDF.quot;gt;cite weburlhttp:apps.intclassificationsappsicdicdonline?Pervasive developmental disorders archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:apps.int:classificationsappsicdicdonline?Several diagnostic instruments are available.and the Autism Diagnostic Observation Schedule ADOSlt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Gotham K,Risi S,Dawson G,TagerFlusberg H,Joseph R,Carter A,Hepburn S,McMahon W,Rodier P,Hyman SL,Sigman M,Rogers S,Landa R,Spence MA,Osann K,Flodman P,Volkmar F,Hollander E,Buxbaum J,Pickles A,bebffb lt;refgt; uses observation and interaction with the child.If warranted,diagnosis and evaluations are conducted with help from ASD specialists,observing and assessing cognitive,communication,family,and other factors using standardized tools,and taking into account any associated medical conditions.both to aid diagnosis and to help recommend educational interventions.lt;ref namequot;Kannequot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Kanne SM,Randolph JK,hearing impairment,and a specific language impairmentlt;ref nameDovergt; such as LandauKleffner syndrome.journal  Dev Med Child Neurol  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .S  title.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Matson JL,psychiatrictimes.comdisplayarticle  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.psychiatrictimes.Clinical genetics evaluations are often done once ASD is diagnosed,particularly when other symptoms already suggest a genetic cause.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Schaefer GB,beefdd  laysummary  http:www.medicalnewstoday.comarticles.php  laydate   February   laysource  Medical News Today  Waybackdfyesurlhttp:www.medicalnewstoday.comarticles.lt;ref nameCaronnagt; A Genotypefirst approachgenotypefirst model of diagnosis has been proposed,which would routinely assess the genomes copy number variations.NEJMe lt;refgt; As new genetic tests are developed several ethical,legal,and social issues will emerge.Commercial availability of tests may precede adequate understanding of how to use test results,given the complexity of autisms genetics.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  McMahon WM,Baty BJ,ajmg.lt;refgt; Metabolic and neuroimaging tests are sometimes helpful,but are not routine.ASD can sometimes be diagnosed by age  months,although diagnosis becomes increasingly stable over the first three years of life: for example,though few cases are handled that quickly in practice.lt;ref namequot;Doverquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Dover CJ,pmclt;refgt; Although the symptoms of autism and ASD begin early in childhood,they are sometimes missed; years later,adults may seek diagnoses to help them or their friends and family understand themselves,to help their employers make adjustments,or in some locations to claim disability living allowances or other benefits.Underdiagnosis and overdiagnosis are problems in marginal cases,resulting in some overdiagnosis of children with uncertain symptoms.Conversely,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Shattuck PT,mrdd.lt;refgt; It is particularly hard to diagnose autism among the visually impaired,partly because some of its diagnostic criteria depend on vision,Autism is one of the five pervasive developmental disorders PDD,which are characterized by widespread abnormalities of social interactions and communication,and severely restricted interests and highly repetitive behavior.lt;ref nameICDF.gt; These symptoms do not imply sickness,fragility,or emotional disturbance.Of the five PDD forms,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Volkmar FR,State M,x lt;refgt; Unlike with autism,people with Asperger syndrome have no substantial delay in language development.lt;ref namequot;DSMIVTR.Autistic Disorder publisherAmerican Psychiatric Association edition locationWashington,DCyear pages isbn oclc urlhttp:cdc.govncbdddautismhcpdsm.html accessdatearchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.gov:ncbdddautismhcpdsm.html archivedate October  lt;refgt; The terminology of autism can be bewildering,with autism,lt;refgt; whereas autism itself is often called autistic disorder,childhood autism,or infantile autism.In this article,autism refers to the classic autistic disorder; in clinical practice,though,autism,ASD,and PDD are often used interchangeably.lt;ref namequot;Caronnaquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Caronna EB,Milunsky JM,lt;refgt; ASD,in turn,is a subset of the broader autism phenotype,which describes individuals who may not have ASD but do have autisticlike Trait biologytraits,such as avoiding eye contact.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Piven J,Palmer P,Jacobi D,Childress D,The manifestations of autism cover a wide Spectrum disorderspectrum,ranging from individuals with severe impairmentswho may be silent,developmentally disabled,narrowly focused interests,and verbose,pedantic communication.thepsychologist.ukarchivearchivehome.cfmvolumeIDeditionIDArticleIDgetfilegetPDFthepsychologistpsyphappe.pdf  format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.thepsychologist.ukarchivearchivehome.cfmvolumeIDeditionIDArticleIDgetfilegetPDFthepsychologistpsyphappe.pdf archivedate May  lt;refgt; Because the behavior spectrum is continuous,boundaries between diagnostic categories are necessarily somewhat arbitrary.lt;ref nameGeschwindgt; Sometimes the syndrome is divided into low,medium or highfunctioning autism LFA,MFA,and HFA,based on IQ thresholds,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  BaronCohen S  title  The hypersystemizing,pnpbp.url  http:autismresearchcentre.comdocspapersBCNeuropsychophamacology.pdf  format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:autismresearchcentre.comdocspapersBCNeuropsychophamacology.such as tuberous sclerosis.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Cohen D,Pichard N,Tordjman S,Baumann C,Burglen L,Excoffier E,Lazar G,Mazet P,Pinquier C,Verloes A,s  author.HFA,and nonsyndromal autism is unclear.S  url  http:www.scielo.brscielo.scriptsciarttextamp;pidSamp;lngenamp;nrmisoamp;tlngen  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.scielo.brscielo.cite journal  vauthors  Witwer AN,as opposed to a failure to make progress,typically from  to  months of age.sy lt;refgt;lt;ref nameLandagt;lt;ref nameLandagt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Volkmar F,Chawarska K,annurev.psych.A partial update is in: cite journal  vauthors  Volkmar FR,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Ozonoff S,Heung K,Byrd R,Hansen R,Hanson SL,peds.url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfull  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.psychology,neurology and pediatrics.neurology,to help further neurogenetic studies of autism;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Piggot J,Shirinyan D,Shemmassian S,Vazirian S,neuroscience.lt;refgt; one example is lowered activity in the fusiform face area of the brain,which is associated with impaired perception of people versus objects.lt;ref nameLevygt; It has been proposed to classify autism using genetics as well as behavior.ajhg.About half of parents of children with ASD notice their childs unusual behaviors by age  months,and about fourfifths notice by age  months.No babbling by  months.No Gesturegesturing pointing,waving,etc.by  months.No single words by  months.No twoword spontaneous,not just echolaliaecholalic phrases by  months.Any loss of any language or social skills,at any age.journalJAMAdate February volumeissuepagespmiddoi.jama.using autismspecific formal screening tests.In contrast,in the UK,children whose families or doctors recognize possible signs of autism are screened.It is not known which approach is more effective.lt;ref nameLevygt; Screening tools include the Modified Checklist for Autism in Toddlers MCHAT,the Early Screening of Autistic Traits Questionnaire,the Checklist for Autism in Toddlers CHAT,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Wetherby AM,BrosnanMaddox S,Peace V,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Wallis KE,x lt;refgt; Although genetic screening for autism is generally still impractical,it can be considered in some cases,such as children with neurological symptoms and dysmorphic features.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Lintas C,url  http:jmg.comcontent.long  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:jmg.comcontent.lt;ref nameLancetgt;cite journalvauthorsLambert N,Strebel P,Orenstein W,Icenogle J,Poland GA titleRubellajournalLancetdate January doi.File:Opening a window to the autistic brain.jpgthumbaltA young child points,in front of a woman who smiles and points in the same direction.A threeyearold with autism points to fish in an aquarium,and to increase quality of life and functional independence.In general,first  Sigmundlast  Eldevikfirst  Richard P.last  Hastingsfirst  J.lt;ref nameCCDgt; Families and the educational system are the main resources for treatment.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Ospina MB,Krebs Seida J,Clark B,Karkhaneh M,Hartling L,Tjosvold L,Vandermeer B,journal.pone.url  http:www.plosone.orgarticleinfo:doi.journal.pone.author.archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.plosone.orgarticleinfo:doi.journal.pone.tandfonline.comdoiabs.suggesting that some form of treatment is preferable to no treatment,the methodological quality of systematic reviews of these studies has generally been poor,their clinical results are mostly tentative,and there is little evidence for the relative effectiveness of treatment options.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Seida JK,Ospina MB,Karkhaneh M,Hartling L,Smith V,x lt;refgt; Intensive,social,and job skills,lt;ref namequot;CCDquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Myers SM,peds.lt;refgt; claims that intervention by around age three years is crucial are not substantiated.lt;ref namequot;HowlinCharmanquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Howlin P,Magiati I,: lt;refgt; Available approaches include applied behavior analysis ABA,developmental models,TEACCHstructured teaching,speech and language therapy,social skills therapy,and occupational therapy.lt;ref nameCCDgt; Among these approaches,interventions either treat autistic features comprehensively,or focalize treatment on a specific area of deficit.an early intervention model based on ABA for  to amp;nbsp;hours a week for multiple years,is an effective treatment for some children with ASD.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Reichow B,Barton EE,Boyd BA,lt;ref namequot;:quot; gt; One interventional strategy utilizes a parent training model,which teaches parents how to implement various ABA and DSP techniques,allowing for parents to disseminate interventions themselves.Despite the recent development of parent training models,these interventions have demonstrated effectiveness in numerous studies,being evaluated as a probable efficacious mode of treatment.ridd.lt;refgt; and is wellestablished for improving intellectual performance of young children.lt;ref nameRogersgt;  Similarly,although there is less evidence in its treatment of global symptoms.lt;ref namequot;:quot; gt; Neuropsychological reports are often poorly communicated to educators,resulting in a gap between what a report recommends and what education is provided.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Van Bourgondien ME,Reichle NC,de BoerOtt SR,SmithMyles Burlhttp:www.nursingcenter.compdf.AID archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nursingcenter.compdf.AID archivedate doi.lt;ref nameRapingt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Leskovec TJ,Rowles BM,with the most common drug classes being antidepressants,stimulants,and antipsychotics.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Oswald DP,lt;refgt; Antipsychotics,such as risperidone and aripiprazole,have been found to be useful for treating irritability,repetitive behavior,and sleeplessness that often occurs with autism,however their side effects must be weighed against their potential benefits,and people with autism may respond atypically.lt;refgt;cite journal vauthorsJi N,cite journal  vauthors  Angley M,Young R,Ellis D,Chan W,racgp.auafpangley.pdf  format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.racgp.auafpangley.cite journal  vauthors  Broadstock M,Doughty C,journal  Novartis Found Symp  volume    pages  ; discussion ,year    pmid    doi  .ch  title.lt;ref nameBetancurgt;lt;ref namequot;pmidquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Dlen G,Carpenter RL,Ocain TD,pharmthera.few are supported by scientific studies.S  url  http:journals.cambridge.orgproductionactioncjoGetFulltext?cite journal  vauthors  Levy SE,ix  year    pmid    pmc    doi  .cite journal  vauthors  Rao PA,Beidel DC,and many programs focus on success measures that lack predictive validity and realworld relevance.training availability,and parent requests.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Stahmer AC,Collings NM,lt;refgt; Some alternative treatments may place the child at risk.A  study found that compared to their peers,England LJ,Molloy CA,Yu KF,ManningCourtney P,s  laysummary  http:www.govnewshealthjannichd.htm  laydate   January   laysource  NIH News  Waybackdfyesurlhttp:www.govnewshealthjannichd.htmdate lt;refgt; in ,botched chelation therapy killed a fiveyearold child with autism.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Brown MJ,Willis T,Omalu B,peds.url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfulle  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.in which oxygen is administered in special chambers that maintain a higher air pressure,vauthorsWarren Z,VeenstraVanderWeele J,Stone W,et al.there is no good evidence that a glutenfree diet is of benefit.clinthera.typeReview quoteAt this time,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameMariBausetZazpegt;cite journal  vauthors  MarBauset S,Zazpe I,MariSanchis A,LlopisGonzlez A,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Millwardquot;gt;cite journal authorMillward C,Ferriter M,Calver S,lt;ref nameBuie gt;lt;ref nameVoltaCaiogt;cite journal  vauthors  Volta U,Caio G,De Giorgio R,Henriksen C,Skodje G,quote autism spectrum disorders ASD have been hypothesized to be associated with NCGS ,Notably,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameSanMauroGaricanogt;cite journal  vauthors San Mauro I,Garicano E,Collado L,Ciudad MJ  title  Is gluten the great etiopathogenic agent of disease in the XXI century?Article in Spanish journal  Nutr Hosp  volume   issue   pages   date  Dec   pmid   doi  .lt;refgt;lt;ref nameCatassiBaigt;cite journal  vauthors  Catassi C,Bai JC,Bonaz B,Bouma G,Calabr A,Carroccio A,Castillejo G,Ciacci C,Cristofori F,Dolinsek J,Francavilla R,Elli L,Green P,Holtmeier W,Koehler P,Koletzko S,Meinhold C,Sanders D,Schumann M,Schuppan D,Ullrich R,Vcsei A,Volta U,Zevallos V,Sapone A,indicating that autism may be part of the spectrum of NCGS,at least in some cases.However,a word of caution is necessary to stress the fact that only a small,selected subgroup of children affected by ASD may benefit from an elimination diet.Treatment is expensive; indirect costs are more so.For someone born in ,inflationadjusted from  estimate,inflationfnUS with about  medical care,extra education and other care,and  lost economic productivity.archpedi.url  http:archpedi.amaassn.orgcgicontentfull  laysummary  http:www.hsph.harvard.edunewspressreleasesreleasespress.html  laydate   April   laysource  Harvard School of Public Health  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:archpedi.amaassn.s titleFinancial issues associated with having a child with autism  vauthors  Sharpe DL,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Montes G,peds.url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfulle  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Montes G,peds.url  http:pediatrics.aappublications.orgcgicontentfulle  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:pediatrics.aappublications.shifting costs from publicly funded education programs to privately funded health insurance.year    pmid    url  http:managedcaremag.comarchives.autism.html  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:managedcaremag.comarchives.autism.html  archivedate   March  lt;refgt; After childhood,key treatment issues include residential care,job training and placement,sexuality,social skills,and estate planning.File:Autism spectrum infinity awareness symbol.newscientist.comarticlemgautisticandproudofitlt;refgt; Through this movement,people hope to cause others to think of autism as a difference instead of a disease.Proponents of this movement wish to seek acceptance,not cures.lt;refgt;cite web last  Shapiro first  Joseph title  Autism Movement Seeks Acceptance,Not Cures work  NPR.org accessdate   date   url  http:www.orgtemplatesstorystory.Light It Up Blue,Autism Sunday,Autistic Pride Day,Autreat,and others.lt;refgt;cite web title  World Autism Awareness Day,April work  United Nations accessdate   url  http:www.autismspeaks.autismsunday.uklt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web title  About Autreat work  Autreat.com accessdate   date   url  http:www.autreat.comautreat.These organizations include Autism Speaks,Autism National Committee,Autism Society of America,and many others.autismspeaks.transcultural comparisons and research on social movements.Slt;refgt; Media has had an influence on how the public perceives those with autism.Rain Man,a film that won  Oscars including Best Picture,depicts a character with autism who has incredible talents and abilities.lt;refgt;cite web title  Rain Man   IMDb work  IMDb accessdate   url  http:www.imdb.comtitlett?refnvsrlt;refgt; While many autistics dont have these special abilities,there are some autistic individuals who have been successful in their fields.lt;refgt;cite web title  American RadioWorks: Fast Food and Animal Rights  Kill Them With Kindness,Page  work  American Public Media accessdate   url  http:americanradioworks.publicradio.orgfeaturesmcdonaldsgrandin.newyorker.There is no known cure.lt;ref nameCCDgt;lt;ref nameLevygt; Children recover occasionally,lt;ref namequot;Heltquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Helt M,Kelley E,Kinsbourne M,Pandey J,Boorstein H,Herbert M,Fein D  title  Can children with autism recover?if so,how?journal  Neuropsychol Rev  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .s  author.title.lt;refgt; Most children with autism acquire language by age five or younger,though a few have developed communication skills in later years.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Pickett E,Pullara O,OGrady J,methods,and prognosis  journal  Cogn Behav Neurol  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .bed lt;refgt; Most children with autism lack social support,meaningful relationships,future employment opportunities or Selfdetermination theoryselfdetermination.lt;ref namequot;Burgessquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Burgess AF,x urlhttp:kingwoodpsychology.comrecentpublicationscamh.pdfformatPDFarchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgMhUAhUa archivedate December  lt;refgt; Although core difficulties tend to persist,symptoms often become less severe with age.Few highquality studies address longterm prognosis.Some adults show modest improvement in communication skills,but a few decline; no study has focused on autism after midlife.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Seltzer MM,Shattuck P,Abbeduto L,mrdd.lt;refgt; Acquiring language before age six,having an IQ above ,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Tidmarsh L,cpaapc.orgPublicationsArchivesCJPseptembertidmarsh.asplt;refgt; Most people with autism face significant obstacles in transitioning to adulthood.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Hendricks DR,File:USautism.pngthumbleftaltBar chart versus time.The graph rises steadily from  to ,from about .to about .The trend curves slightly upward.Reports of autism cases per ,children grew dramatically in the US from  to .It is unknown how much,if any,growth came from changes in rates of autism.Most recent reviews tend to estimate a prevalence of  per ,for autism and close to  per ,for ASD,lt;ref namequot;Newschafferquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Newschaffer CJ,Croen LA,Daniels J,Giarelli E,Grether JK,Levy SE,Mandell DS,Miller LA,PintoMartin J,Reaven J,Reynolds AM,Rice CE,Schendel D,annurev.publhealth.url  http:idea.library.drexel.edubitstream.pdf  author.format  PDF  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:idea.library.drexel.edu:bitstream.pdf  archivedate   September  lt;refgt; and  per ,Patel DR  title  Epidemiology of autism spectrum disorders  journal  Pediatr.Clin.North Am.volume    issue    pages  ,ixx  year    pmid    doi  .lt;refgt; because of inadequate data,these numbers may underestimate ASDs true rate.lt;ref nameCaronnagt; Globally,autism affects an estimated .million people as of ,while Asperger syndrome affects a further .million.lt;ref namequot;Collabquot; gt; In ,UK urlhttp:www.hscic.ukcataloguePUBestiprevautiextpsycmorbsurvrep.pdf vauthorsBrugha T,Cooper SA,per ,Asperger syndrome at roughly .per ,and childhood disintegrative disorder at .per ,bee lt;refgt; CDCs most recent estimate is that  out of every  children,or .per ,has an ASD as of .lt;refgt;http:www.govncbdddautismindex.html CDC  Home  Autism Spectrum Disorder ASD  NCBDDDlt;!The number of reported cases of autism increased dramatically in the s and early s.This increase is largely attributable to changes in diagnostic practices,referral patterns,availability of services,age at diagnosis,and public awareness,lt;ref nameFombonnegt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Wing L,Potter D  title  The epidemiology of autistic spectrum disorders: is the prevalence rising?journal  Ment Retard Dev Disabil Res Rev  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .mrdd.title.lt;refgt; though unidentified environmental risk factors cannot be ruled out.Boys are at higher risk for ASD than girls.The sex ratio averages .: without.lt;refgt;cite journalvauthorsSchaafsma SM,yfrne.the risk of autism is associated with advanced age in either parent,and with diabetes,bleeding,and use of psychiatric drugs in the mother during pregnancy.lt;ref nameChastegt;lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Gardener H,Spiegelman D,lt;ref nameGeschwindgt; Most professionals believe that race,ethnicity,and socioeconomic background do not affect the occurrence of autism.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Bertoglio K,Several other conditions are common in children with autism.Genetic disorders.About  of autism cases have an identifiable Mendelian singlegene condition,chromosome abnormality,or other genetic syndrome,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Folstein SE,lt;refgt; and ASD is associated with several genetic disorders.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Zafeiriou DI,Ververi A,braindev.Intellectual disability.a wide variation illustrating the difficulty of assessing autistic intelligence.lt;refgt;vcite book chapter Learning in autism author Dawson M,Mottron L,inchief,Roediger HL III vol.publisher Academic Press year doi.isbn chapterurlhttp:psych.wisc.edulangpdfDawsonAutisticLearning.pdf accessdate July  archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:psych.wisc.edulangpdfDawsonAutisticLearning.pdf archivedate  March lt;refgt; In comparison,for PDDNOS the association with intellectual disability is much weaker,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Chakrabarti S,jama.url  http:jama.amaassn.orgcgicontentfull  archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:jama.amaassn.org:cgicontentfull  archivedate   August  lt;refgt;  and by definition,the diagnosis of Aspergers excludes intellectual disability.Anxiety disorders are common among children with ASD; there are no firm data,but studies have reported prevalences ranging from  to .Many anxiety disorders have symptoms that are better explained by ASD itself,or are hard to distinguish from ASDs symptoms.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  White SW,Oswald D,Ollendick T,Epilepsy,with variations in risk of epilepsy due to age,cognitive level,and type of language disorder.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Spence SJ,Several metabolic defects,such as phenylketonuria,are associated with autistic symptoms.lt;ref namequot;Manziquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Manzi B,Loizzo AL,Giana G,Minor physical anomalies are significantly increased in the autistic population.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Ozgen HM,Hop JW,Hox JJ,Beemer FA,Preempted diagnoses.Although the DSMIV rules out concurrent diagnosis of many other conditions along with autism,Tourette syndrome,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Steyaert JG,De la Marche W  title  Whats new in autism?journal  Eur J Pediatr  volume    issue    pages    year    pmid    doi  .s  title.Sleep problems affect about twothirds of individuals with ASD at some point in childhood.These most commonly include symptoms of insomnia such as difficulty in falling asleep,frequent middleofthenight insomnianocturnal awakenings,and early morning awakenings.Sleep problems are associated with difficult behaviors and family stress,and are often a focus of clinical attention over and above the primary ASD diagnosis.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Richdale AL,Schreck KA  title  Sleep problems in autism spectrum disorders: prevalence,nature,smrv.File:LeoKanner.jpegthumbuprightaltBalding man in his early s in coat and tie,A few examples of autistic symptoms and treatments were described long before autism was named.The Table Talk LutherTable Talk of Martin Luther,compiled by his notetaker,Mathesius,contains the story of a yearold boy who may have been severely autistic.lt;refgt;cite journal journalAutism volume issue pages year doi.titleThe history of ideas on autism: legends,and suggested that he be suffocated,although a later critic has cast doubt on the veracity of this report.what did he say?title.publisherIndependent Living Institute urlhttp:www.independentliving.orgdocsmilesb.html accessdate December  archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.independentliving.orgdocsmilesb.lt;refgt;vcite book authorHouston R,a feral child caught in ,He derived it from the Greek word auts ,meaning quot;selfquot;,and used it to mean morbid selfadmiration,referring to quot;autistic withdrawal of the patient to his fantasies,against which any influence from outside becomes an intolerable disturbancequot;.X  The quote is a translation of Bleulers  original.though for various reasons it was not widely recognized as a separate diagnosis until .notably quot;autistic alonenessquot; and quot;insistence on samenessquot;,are still regarded as typical of the autistic spectrum of disorders.lt;ref nameHappeTimegt; It is not known whether Kanner derived the term independently of Asperger.lt;ref namequot;Lyonsquot;gt;cite journal  vauthors  Lyons V,Fitzgerald M  title  Asperger  and Kanner ,Kanners reuse of autism led to decades of confused terminology like infantile schizophrenia,and demonstrating the benefits of involving parents in active programs of therapy.cpaapc.orgPublicationsArchivesCJPseptemberguesteditorial.lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Chambres P,Auxiette C,Vansingle C,lt;refgt;cite journal  vauthors  Heidgerken AD,Geffken G,Modi A,and has given them a way to form online communities and work remotely.newscientist.comarticlemg.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.newscientist.comarticlemg.while others believe that Neurodiversityautism is simply another way of being.S lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news authorHarmon A titleHow about not curing us,some autistics are pleading date December  workThe New York Times urlhttp:www.nytimes.comhealthautism.html archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nytimes.comhealthautism.vcite bookauthorSicileKira,vcite bookauthorWaltz,vcite bookauthorSteve SilbermanSilberman,File:Albedoe hg.Albedo IPAcenlbido or reflection coefficient,is the diffuse reflectiondiffuse reflectivity or reflecting power of a surface.It is the ratio of reflected radiation from the surface to incident radiation upon it.Because albedo is the ratio of all reflected radiation to incident radiation,it will include both the diffuse and specular radiation reflected from an object.It is,however,as this can simplify calculations.Albedo depends on the frequency of the radiation.When quoted unqualified,it usually refers to some appropriate average across the spectrum of visible light.In general,the albedo depends on the directional distribution of incident radiation,except for Lambertian reflectanceLambertian surfaces,In practice,but albedo is very useful as a first approximation.The albedo is an important concept in climatology,astronomy,The average overall albedo of Earth,its planetary albedo,is  to  because of cloud cover,lt;refgt;Environmental Encyclopedia,rd ed.Thompson Gale,The term was introduced into optics by Johann Heinrich Lambert in his  work Photometria.Fresh asphalt  .urlhttp:eetd.archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:eetd.govHeatIslandPavementsAlbedo archivedate  August lt;!Worn asphalt  .Conifer forestlt;brgt;Summer  .authorAlan K.authorJohn H.pages,urlhttp:www.orgpubscrossrefJD.doi.bibcode  JGR.B  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.orgpubscrossrefJD.shtml archivedate  September lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; .to .Deciduous trees  .to .Bare soil  .Green grass  .Desert sand  .firstG.New concrete  .Ocean ice .Fresh snow  .Albedos of typical materials in visible light range from up to .for fresh snow to about .for charcoal,one of the darkest substances.Deeply shadowed cavities can achieve an effective albedo approaching the zero of a black body.When seen from a distance,the ocean surface has a low albedo,as do most forests,whereas desert areas have some of the highest albedos among landforms.Most land areas are in an albedo range of .to .lt;ref namequot;PhysicsWorldquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:scienceworld.wolfram.comphysicsAlbedo.html titleAlbedo  from Eric Weissteins World of Physics publisherScienceworld.wolfram.com accessdate August lt;refgt; The average albedo of Earth is about .File:Ceres   clear sky total sky albedo.As the total amount of reflected radiation cannot be directly measured by satellite,lt;ref namequot;NASAquot;gt;.lt;ref namequot;washingtonquot; gt; If only the continental land masses became covered by glaciers,the mean temperature of the planet would drop to about amp;nbsp;C.lt;ref namequot;climpastquot;gt; In contrast,It has been shown that for many applications involving terrestrial albedo,lt;mathgt;bar alphathetailt;mathgt;,and the bihemispherical reflectance,:lt;mathgt;alpha D bar alphathetai  D bar bar alpha.The albedos of planets,Natural satellitesatellites and asteroids can be used to infer much about their properties.The study of albedos,their dependence on wavelength,lighting angle quot;phase anglequot;,For small and far objects that cannot be resolved by telescopes,much of what we know comes from the study of their albedos.For example,the absolute albedo can indicate the surface ice content of outer Solar System objects,the variation of albedo with phase angle gives information about regolith properties,whereas unusually high radar albedo is indicative of high metal content in asteroids.Enceladus,a moon of Saturn,has one of the highest known albedos of any body in the Solar System,with  of EM radiation reflected.Another notable highalbedo body is Eris dwarf planetEris,with an albedo of .title  Size,density,url  http:meetingorganizer.copernicus.orgEPSCDPSEPSCDPS.bibcode  epsc.conf.first  B.first  J.first  M.first  E.first  A.first  E.first  R.first  F.first  F.authorWm.urlhttp:www.johnstonsarchive.netastrotnodiam.accessdate October  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.johnstonsarchive.netastrotnodiam.html archivedate  October lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; and asteroid belt have low albedos down to about .authorWm.urlhttp:www.johnstonsarchive.netastroastalbedo.accessdate June  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.johnstonsarchive.netastroastalbedo.html archivedate  May lt;!Added by DASHBotgt;lt;refgt; A typical comet nucleus has an albedo of .publisherSpace.urlhttp:www.space.comscienceastronomysolarsystemborrellydark.accessdate September  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.space.comscienceastronomysolarsystemborrellydark.The overall albedo of the Moon is measured to be around .bibcode  .first  G.doi  .lt;refgt; but it is strongly directional and nonLambertian,displaying also a strong opposition effect.they are typical of the regolith surfaces of airless Solar System bodies.Their values can differ significantly,which is a common source of confusion.In detailed studies,including a characterization of the opposition effect of regolith surfaces.The correlation between astronomical geometric albedo,publisherDepartment of Physics amp; Astronomy Stephen F.urlhttp:www.physics.sfasu.eduastroasteroidssizemagnitude.accessdate October  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.physics.sfasu.eduastroasteroidssizemagnitude.html archivedate  December lt;!lt;mathgt;A left  fractimesHD right  lt;mathgt;,where lt;mathgt;Alt;mathgt; is the astronomical albedo,lt;mathgt;Dlt;mathgt; is the diameter in kilometers,and lt;mathgt;Hlt;mathgt; is the absolute magnitude.Although the albedotemperature effect is best known in colder,whiter regions on Earth,the maximum albedo is actually found in the tropics where yearround illumination is greater.The maximum is additionally in the northern hemisphere,varying between three and twelve degrees north.W date doi.lt;:TACOZMgt;.beyond which albedo increases without respect to illumination.where areas such as the Sahara Desert,which also have a relatively high albedo,will be hotter due to high insolation.Tropical and subtropical rain forest areas have low albedo,and are much hotter than their temperate forest counterparts,which have lower insolation.Because insolation plays such a big role in the heating and cooling effects of albedo,Albedo affects climate and drives weather.Essentially,for the driving of weather,there are two types of albedo regions on Earth: Land and ocean.Land and ocean regions produce the four basic different types of air masses,depending on latitude and therefore insolation: Warm and dry,which form over tropical and subtropical land masses; warm and wet,which form over tropical and subtropical oceans; cold and dry which form over temperate,polar and subpolar land masses; and cold and wet,which form over temperate,polar and subpolar oceans.Different temperatures between the air masses result in different air pressures,and the masses develop into pressure systems.Highpressure systems flow toward lower pressure,driving weather from north to south in the northern hemisphere,and south to north in the southern.However,due to Earths rotation,When an areas albedo changes due to snowfall,a snowtemperature feedback results.A layer of snowfall increases local albedo,reflecting away sunlight,leading to local cooling.In principle,if no outside temperature change affects this area e.a warm air mass,deepening the snowtemperature feedback.However,because local weather is dynamic due to the change of seasons,eventually warm air masses and a more direct angle of sunlight higher insolation cause melting.When the melted area reveals surfaces with lower albedo,such as grass or soil,the effect is reversed: the darkening surface lowers albedo,increasing local temperatures,which induces more melting and thus reducing the albedo further,resulting in still more heating.Snow albedo is highly variable,ranging from as high as .for freshly fallen snow,to about .for melting snow,and as low as .for dirty snow.lt;refgt;Hall,and Martinec,Remote sensing of ice and snow.Chapman and Hall,New York,pp.lt;refgt; Over Antarctica they average a little more than .If a marginally snowcovered area warms,snow tends to melt,lowering the albedo,Cryoconite,powdery windblown dust containing soot,sometimes reduces albedo on glaciers and ice sheets.lt;ref name  quot;Nat.Geoquot;gt;http:ngm.nationalgeographic.commeltzonejenkinstext quot;Changing Greenland  Melt Zonequot; page ,of ,article by Mark Jenkins in National Geographic magazineNational Geographic June ,Hence,small errors in albedo can lead to large errors in energy estimates,Albedo works on a smaller scale,too.In sunlight,dark clothes absorb more heat and lightcoloured clothes reflect it better,lt;ref namequot;ranknfileuequot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.ranknfileue.orghamp;s.html titleHealth and Safety: Be Cool!August  publisherRanknfileue.Albedo can affect the electrical energy output of solar photovoltaic systemphotovoltaic devices.For example,Research showed impacts of over .lt;refgt;cite journal  last  Andrews  first  Rob W.last  Pearce  first  Joshua M.solener.bibcode  SoEn.A lt;refgt; More recently,commercial flat rooftops and residential pitchedroof applications.lt;refgt;cite journal  last  Brennan  first  M.authorlink  J.Pearce  last  Abramase  first  A.last  Andrews  first  R.last  Pearce  first  J.solmat.Because forests generally have a low albedo,the majority of the ultraviolet and visible spectrum is absorbed through photosynthesis,pmidbibcode  Natur.B lt;refgt; Trees also impact climate in extremely complicated ways through evapotranspiration.The water vapor causes cooling on the land surface,causes heating where it condenses,acts a strong greenhouse gas,sdisplayauthorsetalbibcode  ClDy.B lt;refgt; Scientists generally treat evapotranspiration as a net cooling impact,Feedbacks,and the Climate Benefits of Forests  journal  Science  volume    issue   pages    doi  .science.pmidbibcode  Sci.In seasonally snowcovered zones,Deciduous trees have an albedo value of about .to .whereas coniferous trees have a value of about .to .Siberia were neutral or perhaps warming.Water reflects light very differently from typical terrestrial materials.The reflectivity of a water surface is calculated using the Fresnel equations see graph.File:water reflectivity.jpgthumbrightpxReflectivity of smooth water at amp;nbsp;C refractive index.The glint of light off water is a commonplace effect of this.At small angle of incidence opticsangles of incident light,waviness results in reduced reflectivity because of the steepness of the reflectivityvs.incidentangle curve and a locally increased average incident angle.Although the reflectivity of water is very low at low and medium angles of incident light,late afternoon,and near the poles.However,as mentioned above,waviness causes an appreciable reduction.Because light specularly reflected from water does not usually reach the viewer,Note that white caps on waves look white and have high albedo because the water is foamed up,so there are many superimposed bubble surfaces which reflect,adding up their reflectivities.Fresh black ice exhibits Fresnel reflection.Cloud albedo has substantial influence over atmospheric temperatures.Different types of clouds exhibit different reflectivity,theoretically ranging in albedo from a minimum of near  to a maximum approaching .quot;On any given day,about half of Earth is covered by clouds,which reflect more sunlight than land and water.Clouds keep Earth cool by reflecting sunlight,but they can also serve as blankets to trap warmth.quot;lt;ref namequot;livesciencequot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.livescience.comenvironmentearthalbedo.Albedo and climate in some areas are affected by artificial clouds,such as those created by the contrails of heavy commercial airliner traffic.lt;refgt;cite journaltitleContrails reduce daily temperature rangeurlhttp:facstaff.edutravisdpdfjetcontrailsrecentresearch.pdfjournalNature accessdate July archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:facstaff.edutravisdpdfjetcontrailsrecentresearch.pdfarchivedate May pagevolumeformatPDFdate August deadurlyesdoi.abibcode  Natur.harvard.edu date May bibcodeJGR.C authorCahalan firstRobert F.volume page journalJournal of Geophysical Research doi.lt;ref namequot;girdaquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.grida.noclimateipcctarwg.htm titleClimate Change : The Scientific Basis publisherGrida.no accessdate August  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.grida.noclimateipcctarwg.htm archivedate  June lt;!Aerosol radiative forcing.Aerosol direct effect.Aerosols directly scatter and absorb radiation.The scattering of radiation causes atmospheric cooling,whereas absorption can cause atmospheric warming.Aerosol indirect effect.Increased nuclei concentrations lead to increased cloud droplet number concentrations,which in turn leads to increased cloud albedo,increased light scattering and radiative cooling first indirect effect,Another albedorelated effect on the climate is from black carbon particles.W mlt;supgt;lt;supgt;,with a range .to .W mlt;supgt;lt;supgt;.lt;ref namequot;girda quot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.grida.noclimateipcctarwg.htm titleClimate Change : The Scientific Basis publisherGrida.no accessdate August  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.grida.noclimateipcctarwg.htm archivedate  June lt;!lt;refgt;James Hansen amp; Larissa Nazarenko,Soot Climate Forcing Via Snow and Ice Albedos,Proc.of the Natl.Acad.of Sci.January  quot;The efficacy of this forcing is  i.supra note ,at  figure ; See J.Hansen amp; L.Nazarenko,supra note ,at .quot;The efficacy for changes of Arctic sea ice albedo is gt;.In additional runs not shown here,we found that the efficacy of albedo changes in Antarctica is also gt;.quot;; See also Flanner,Zender,Randerson,and P.Rasch,Presentday climate forcing and response from black carbon in snow,GEOPHYS.RES.D  quot;The forcing is maximum coincidentally with snowmelt onset,triggering strong snowalbedo feedback in local springtime.Consequently,quot;.Human activities e.deforestation,farming,and urbanization change the albedo of various areas around the globe.However,quantification of this effect on the global scale is difficult.Singlescattering albedo is used to define scattering of electromagnetic waves on small particles.lt;ref namequot;Goodequot;gt;Cite journal lastGoode firstP.orgjournalsABSGL.shtml doi.GL bibcode  GeoRL.lt;ref namequot;NASAquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:modis.gsfc.nasa.govdataatbdatbdmod.pdftitleMODIS BRDFAlbedo Product: Algorithm Theoretical Basis Document,Version .accessdate June  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:modis.gsfc.nasa.govdataatbdatbdmod.pdf archivedate  June lt;!lt;ref namequot;washingtonquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.atmos.washington.edusgwPAPERSSnowball.lt;ref namequot;climpastquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.climpast.netcp.pdftitleEffect of land albedo,orography,lt;ref namequot;Smith Robinquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.mpimet.defileadminstaffsmithrobinICJClimfinal.archive.orgwebhttp:www.mpimet.defileadminstaffsmithrobinICJClimfinal.pdf archivedate  September lt;!url          http:jeff.medkeff.comastrolunarobstechalbedo.authorlink   Jeffrey S.archiveurl   https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:jeff.medkeff.comastrolunarobstechalbedo.lt;ref namequot;Dickinsonquot;gt;cite journal  last  Dickinson  first  R.last  Kennedy  first  P.date    title  Impacts on regional climate of Amazon deforestation  url   journal  Geophys.Res.Lett.volume    issue   pages    doi.gl  bibcodeGeoRL.lt;ref namequot;mitquot;gt;http:web.wwwmfinalcharacterizationabioticwater.html http:web.wwwmfinalcharacterizationabioticwater.lt;ref namequot;mmutreesquot;gt;cite web  urlhttp:www.ukResourcesgcc.archive.orgwebhttp:www.ukresourcesgcc.html archivedate  November lt;!lt;ref namequot;Bettsquot;gt;cite journal  doi  .date    last  Betts  first  Richard A.lt;ref namequot;Fresnelquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:vih.freeshell.orgppONWSt.PetersburgFresnel.freeshell.lt;ref namequot;DOMINICKquot;gt;cite journal  doi  .rsta.title  Boreal forests,aerosols and the impacts on clouds and climate  date    last  Spracklen  first  D.V  last  Bonn  first  B.last  Carslaw  first  K.leeds.ukeardvspapersspracklenc.pdf  format  PDFbibcode  RSPTA.lt;ref namequot;BlueskyAlbedoquot;gt;Cite journal lastRoman firstM.authorC.SchaafauthorP.LewisauthorF.GaoauthorG.AndersonauthorJ.PrivetteauthorA.StrahlerauthorC.WoodcockauthorM.http:www.albedoproject.http:wwwc.ucsd.edugap Global Albedo Project Center for Clouds,Chemistry,http:www.eoearth.http:wwwmodis.edubrdfproduct.http:www.eumetsat.intHomeMainAccesstoDataMeteosatMeteorologicalProductsProductListSP?http:jeff.medkeff.comastrolunarobstechalbedo.http:www.commetalreflectivityLR.Category:Scattering,comment revision imported from :nost:AbalonE: import old edit,commentReverted  edit by Special:Contributions.identified as WP:VANDvandalism to last revision by User:RoryRory.redirect titleAberdeen,text xml:spacepreserveREDIRECT Aberdeen,redirect titleAnchorage,text xml:spacepreserveREDIRECT Anchorage,commentChanged quot;R from other capitalisationquot; tag to quot;R from CamelCasequot;.commentAdded quot;R from subpagequot; tag and consolidated rcat tags.usernameTim Q.comment revision from :nost:AmericanFootball: import old edit,commentFix reference.File:A cursiva.A English alphabetLetter namesnamed IPAcene,plural As,as or aesrefngroupnbAes is the plural of the name of the letter.The plural of the letter itself is rendered As,or as.lt;ref nameoedgt; It is similar to the Ancient Greek letter alpha,from which it derives.crossed in the middle by a horizontal bar.The lowercase version can be written in two forms: the doublestorey a and singlestorey .The latter is commonly used in handwriting and fonts based on it,especially fonts intended to be read by children.It is also found in italic type.File:EgyptianA.File:Cretan.File:PhoenicianA.File:SemiticA.jpgpxSemitic letter quot;Aquot;,File:Alpha uc lc.svgpxGreek alpha,File:EtruscanA.svgpxEtruscan A,File:RomanA.File:Beoetian.File:Greekuncial.jpgpxGreek Classical uncial,File:Latinuncial.jpgpxLatin  AD uncial,File:Cretan.File:Phoeniciana.File:Semitic.jpgpxSemitic quot;Aquot;,File:Greek.jpgpxGreek alpha,File:Etr.jpgpxEtruscan A,File:Latin th cent BC.File:Beoetian.File:Greekuncial.jpgpxGreek Classical uncial,File:Latinuncial.jpgpxLatin  AD uncial,The earliest certain ancestor of quot;Aquot; is aleph also written aleph,it is also called an abjad to distinguish it from a true alphabet.In turn,styled as a triangular head with two horns extended.In  B.the Phoenician alphabet letter had a linear form that served as the base for some later forms.Its name must have corresponded closely to the Hebrew alphabetHebrew or Arabic scriptArabic aleph.File:BlackletterA.File:UncialA.File:Acap.File:ModernRomanA.File:Modern Italic A.File:Modern Script A.When the Ancient Greeceancient Greeks adopted the alphabet,and called it by the similar name of alpha.In the earliest Greek inscriptions after the Greek Dark Ages,dating to the th century BC,the letter rests upon its side,but in the Greek alphabet of later times it generally resembles the modern capital letter,although many local varieties can be distinguished by the shortening of one leg,or by the angle at which the cross line is set.The Romans later adopted the Old Italic scriptEtruscan alphabet to write the LatinLatin language,including English.File:Asmall glyphs.svgthumbpxDifferent glyphs of the lowercase letter A.During Roman times,there were many variant forms of the letter quot;Aquot;.First was the monumental or lapidary style,which was used when inscribing on stone or other quot;permanentquot; mediums.There was also a cursive style used for everyday or utilitarian writing,which was done on more perishable surfaces.Due to the quot;perishablequot; nature of these surfaces,there as not as many examples of this style as there are of the monumental,but there are still many surviving examples of different types of cursive,such as letter casemajuscule cursive,letter caseminuscule cursive,and semicursive minuscule.Variants also existed that were intermediate between the monumental and cursive styles.The known variants include the early Uncial scriptHalfuncialsemiuncial,the uncial,and the later semiuncial.File:LowercaseA.svgleftthumbpxTypographic variants include a doublestorey a and singlestorey .At the end of the Roman Empire th century AD,several variants of the cursive minuscule developed through Western Europe.Among these were the semicursive minuscule of Italy,the Merovingian script in France,the Visigothic script in Spain,and the Insular scriptInsular or AngloIrish semiuncial or AngloSaxon majuscule,of Great Britain.By the th century,the Carolingian minusculeCaroline script,which was very similar to the presentday form,was the principal form used in bookmaking,before the advent of the printing press.This form was derived through a combining of prior forms.thcentury Italy saw the formation of the two main variants that are known today.These variants,the Italic and Roman forms,were derived from the Caroline Script version.The Italic form,also called script a,is used in most current handwriting and consists of a circle and vertical stroke.lt;ref nameAmericanagt; Both derive from the majuscule capital form.In Greek handwriting,it was common to join the left leg and horizontal stroke into a single loop,as demonstrated by the uncial version shown.Many fonts then made the right leg vertical.In some of these,the serif that began the right leg stroke developed into an arc,resulting in the printed form,while in others it was dropped,resulting in the modern handwritten form.However,there are also some other cases aside from this where script a quot;quot;,also called Latin alpha,is used in contrast with Latin quot;aquot; such as in the International Phonetic Alphabet.In modern English orthography,the open back unrounded vowel IPA as in father,the diphthong IPAe as in ace and major usually when vra is followed by one,or occasionally two,a schwa,in many unstressed syllables,as in about,comma,solar.The double angbraa sequence does not occur in native English words,but is found in some words derived from foreign languages such as Aaron and aardvark.lt;refgt;harvnbGelbWhitingplt;refgt; However,vra occurs in List of Latinscript digraphsmany common digraphs,all with their own sound or sounds,particularly vrai,vrau,vraw,vray,vrea and vroa.angbra is the thirdmostcommonly used letter in English after angbre and angbrt,lt;refgt;harvnbAnonlt;refgt; and the second most common in Spanish and French.In one study,on average,about .of letters used in English texts tend to be angbra,while the number is .in Spanish and .in French.In most languages that use the Latin alphabet,angbra denotes an open unrounded vowel,such as IPAOpen front unrounded vowela,IPAOpen central unrounded vowel,or IPAOpen back unrounded vowel.An exception is Saanich dialectSaanich,in which angbra and the glyph  stands for a closemid front unrounded vowel IPAe.in the International Phonetic Alphabet,angbrIPAa is used for the open front unrounded vowel,in XSAMPA,In algebra,whereas the letters at the end of the alphabet x,z are used to denote unknown quantities.In geometry,capital A,C etc.are used to denote Line segmentsegments,line geometrylines,Line geometryRayrays,etc.the lowercase a representing the side opposite angle A.A or A,etc.Such associations can have a motivationmotivating effect,as exposure to the letter A has been found to improve performance,when compared with other letters.Finally,the letter A is used to denote size,wheredateOctober  as in a narrow size shoe,lt;ref nameCollgt; or a small cup size in a brassiere.Please only list characters symbols in a writing system,Characters that merely look subjectively similar need not apply.See https:en.wikipedia.orgwikiWikipedia:Verifiability and https:en.wikipedia.orgwikiWikipedia:Identifyingreliablesources before adding more.: Latin alphaLatin letter alpha  script A,: Turned A,: turned V also called a wedge,a caret,or a hat,: Turned script A,: Small capital A,Derived signs,: a turned capital letter A,: Phoenician alphabetSemitic letter Aleph,: Greek alphabetGreek letter Alpha,: Old Italic scriptOld Italic A,ScriptRunr : RunesRunic letter Ansuz runeansuz,: lt;supgt;lt;supgt; midsizeAlso for encodings based on ASCII,including the DOS,Windows,ISO and Macintosh families of encodings.NATOAlphalt;!dont change to official quot;alfaquot; until Commons images are moved to this spelling,or redirects are set up,cite web  author  Anon  year    url  http:www.math.cornell.edumeccryptographysubsfrequencies.html  title  English Letter Frequency  accessdate   May   archiveurl  http:www.webcitation.cite web  author  Anon  year   archiveurlhttp:web.archive.orgwebhttp:starbase.trincoll.educryptoresourcesLetFreq.html  urlhttp:starbase.trincoll.educryptoresourcesLetFreq.html archivedateJanuary ,cite web  author  British Psychological Society url  http:www.sciencealert.aunews.webcitation.cite encyclopedia  last  Gelb  first  I.last  Whiting  first  R.editorlast  Ranson  editorfirst  K.Collier  volume  I: A to Ameland  location  New York,cite encyclopedia  editorlast  Hoiberg  editorfirst  Dale H.Inc.location  Chicago,cite journal  first  P.cite encyclopedia  editorlast  Simpson  editorfirst  J.editorlast  Weiner  editorfirst  E.http:members.peak.orgjeremydictionaryclassicchapterspixalphabet.Chisholm,Hugh,s: Encyclopdia BritannicaAquot;Aquot; entry.Encyclopdia Britannica Eleventh ed.Cambridge University Press.quot;s:The New Students Reference WorkAAquot;.The New Students Reference Work.Chicago: F.Compton and Co.quot;s:Colliers New Encyclopedia AAquot;.Colliers EncyclopediaColliers New Encyclopedia.commentunsourced sentence,text xml:spacepreserveaboutthe U.Infobox U.Flag  Flag of Alabama.Seal  Seal of Alabama.Coat of arms  AlabamaCOA.Map  Alabama in United States.Nickname  The Northern flickerYellowhammer State,Heart of Dixie,Demonym  Adjectivals and demonyms for U.statesAlabaman or Alabamianlt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.gettysburg.stonesentinels.comConfederateAL.phptitleState of AlabamaworkThe Battle of GettysburgaccessdateJuly ,Capital  Montgomery,English .Spanish .LargestMetro  Birmingham,Alabama,LargestCity  Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham lt;br gt;,Governor  Robert J.Upperhouse  Alabama SenateSenate R,Lowerhouse  Alabama House of RepresentativesHouse of Representatives R,Representative   Republicans,TradAbbreviation  Ala.TotalArea  ,TotalAreaUS  ,LandArea  ,LandAreaUS  ,WaterArea  ,WaterAreaUS  ,PCWater  .Pop  ,est.Density  .est.DensityUS  .est.MedianHouseholdIncome  ,AdmittanceDate  December ,TZWhere  Phenix City,LargestCounty  Baldwin County,HighestPoint  Mount Cheahalt;refgt;cite ngsidDGdesignation CheehahawaccessdateOctober ,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameUSGSgt;cite weburlhttp:egsc.usgs.govisbpubsbookletselvadistelvadist.lt;refgt;lt;ref nameNAVDgt;Elevation adjusted to North American Vertical Datum of .HighestElev  .HighestElevUS  ,Website  Alabama.Infobox U.Flag  Flag of Alabama.Seal  Seal of Alabama.Bird Northern flickerYellowhammer,wild turkeylt;!Fish Largemouth bass,Flower Camellia,Colors Red,Food Pecan,blackberry,Slogan Share The Wonder,lt;br gt;Alabama the beautiful,lt;br gt;Where America finds its voice,lt;br gt;Sweet Home Alabama,Other Racking horselt;!Route Marker Alabama .Quarter  AL Proof.Alabama IPAcenaudioenusAlabama.ogglbm is a U.statestate located in the Southern United Statessoutheastern region of the United States.It is bordered by Tennessee to the north,Georgia U.stateGeorgia to the east,Florida and the Gulf of Mexico to the south,and Mississippi to the west.Alabama is the List of U.states and territories by areathmost extensive and the List of U.states and territories by populationthmost populous of the List of U.states United States.At convertmikm,Alabama has one of the longest navigable inland waterways in the nation.lt;ref namequot;navwaterquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:commerce.alabama.govcontentmediapublicationsTransportationTransportationInAlabama.pdf titleTransportation in Alabama publisherAlabama Development Office accessdateOctober ,From the American Civil War until World War II,Alabama,like many states in the Southern United StatesSouth,suffered economic hardship,in part because of continued dependence on agriculture.Despite the growth of major industries and urban centers,White Americanwhite rural interests dominated the state legislature from  to the s,lt;ref namequot;pjhwpaquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:elections.eduRedistrictingAL.htm archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:elections.eduRedistrictingAL.htm archivedateOctober ,titleGeorge Mason University,United States Election Project: Alabama Redistricting Summary.Retrieved March ,publisherWeb.archive.org accessdateOctober ,a status that continued into the mids before being alleviated by federal legislation.Following World War II,The state economy in the st century is based on management,automotive,finance,manufacturing,aerospace,mineral extraction,healthcare,education,retail,and technology.lt;ref namequot;alaindustrialquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.alabama.govprojectionsOccupationalProjStatewidealabama.Alabama is nicknamed the northern flickerYellowhammer State,after the List of U.state birdsstate bird.Alabama is also known as the quot;Heart of Dixiequot; and the Cotton State.The List of U.state treesstate tree is the longleaf pine,and the List of U.state flowersstate flower is the camellia.The capital of Alabama is Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery.The largest city by population is Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham,lt;ref namequot;quickcensusquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:quickfacts.census.govqfdstates.html titleAlabama workQuickFacts publisherUnited States Census Bureau accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; which has long been the most industrialized city,and largest city by total land area is Huntsville,AlabamaHuntsville.The oldest city is Mobile,AlabamaMobile,founded by French colonists in  as the capital of French Louisiana.File:Russell Cave Entrance RUCA.jpgthumbleftOne of the entrances to Russell Cave National MonumentRussell Cave in Jackson County.Charcoal from indigenous camp fires in the cave has been dated as early as  to  BC.The EuropeanAmerican naming of the Alabama River and state originates from the Alabama people,lt;ref namequot;Readquot;gt;Cite booklastRead firstWilliam A.lt;refgt;Cite bookauthorSylestine,Cora; Hardy; Heather; and Timothy MontlerMontler,ling.lt;refgt;quot;Alabama,and adj.quot;.OED Online.March .Oxford University Press.http:www.comviewEntry?redirectedFromalabamaamp; accessed April ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;ADAHquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.archives.alabama.govstatenam.html titleAlabama: The State Name accessdateAugust ,workAll About Alabama publisherAlabama Department of Archives and History archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.archives.alabama.govstatenam.html archivedate June ,deadurl nolt;refgt; The spelling of the word varies significantly among historical sources.while the Knight of Elvas and Rodrigo Ranjel wrote Alibamu and Limamu,respectively,in efforts to Transliterationtransliterate the term.lt;ref namequot;ADAHquot;gt;  As early as ,the French called the tribe the Alibamon,with French maps identifying the river as Rivire des Alibamons.lt;ref namequot;Readquot;gt;  Other spellings of the appellation have included Alibamu,Alabamo,Albama,Alebamon,Alibama,Alibamou,Alabamu,Allibamou.lt;ref namequot;ADAHquot;gt;lt;ref namequot;Willsquot;gt;Cite booklastWills firstCharles A.citation neededdateDecember lt;!Sources disagree on the meaning of the word.quot;to trimquot;,or quot;to gatherquot;.lt;ref namequot;Rogersquot;gt;Cite booklastRogers firstWilliam W.authorRobert D.WardauthorLeah R.authorlinkJohn R.hiddenhistory.comPAGEswstsalabam.htm accessdateAugust ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.hiddenhistory.comPAGEswstsalabam.htm archivedate August ,lt;ref namequot;Swantonquot;gt;lt;ref namequot;Swantonquot;gt;Cite journallastSwanton firstJohn R.authorlinkJohn R.Swanton year titleReview of Read,Indian Place Names of AlabamajournalAmerican Speechpagesissue doi.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.archives.alabama.govtoursPrevisitIndian.Read publisherAlabama Department of Archives and History accessdateOctober ,google.combooks?idXfxzCmqaCamp;pglt;refgt; However,there are no correspondingly similar words in the Alabama language.An  article in the Jacksonville Republican proposed that it meant quot;Here We Rest.lt;ref namequot;Readquot;gt;lt;ref namequot;ADAHquot;gt; And,thus,this is probably erroneous.Please insert new material in main article before summarizing here.Also,look for opportunities to delete material here if you are inserting new material.This is long enough.lt;ref namequot;NewYorkTimesAlmanacquot;gt;cite news url http:travel.nytimes.comtravelNYTALMANACUSALABAMA.html title Alabama date August ,work The New York Times Almanac  accessdate September ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:travel.nytimes.comtravelNYTALMANACUSALABAMA.html archivedate September ,File:Moundville Archaeological Site Alabama.jpgthumbleftThe Moundville Archaeological Site in Hale County.It was occupied by Native Americans of the Mississippian culture from  to  AD.The agrarian Mississippian culture covered most of the state from  to  AD,Alabama.lt;refgt;Cite booklast Welch first Paul D.after Cahokia in presentday Illinois,which was the center of the culture.lt;refgt;Cite booklast Townsend first Richard F.title Hero,Hawk,the SECC appears to have no direct links to Mesoamerican culture,but developed independently.lt;refgt;Cite bookeditors F.Kent Reilly III and James F.Garber ; foreword by Vincas P.Steponaitis.an Iroquoian language people; and the Muskogeanspeaking Alabama peopleAlabama Alibamu,Chickasaw,Choctaw,Creek peopleCreek,and Koasati.lt;refgt;cite weburl http:www.accessgenealogy.comnativealabama title Alabama Indian Tribes accessdate September ,year  work Indian Tribal Records publisher AccessGenealogy.com archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.accessgenealogy.comnativealabama archivedate October ,deadurl nolt;refgt; While part of the same large language family,the Muskogee tribes developed distinct cultures and languages.With exploration in the th century,the Spanish were the first Europeans to reach Alabama.The expedition of Hernando de Soto passed through Mabila and other parts of the state in .More than  years later,the French founded the first European settlement in the region at Old Mobile SiteOld Mobile in .lt;ref namequot;USquot;gt;cite weburl http:www.theus.comalabama title Alabama State History accessdateSeptember ,publisher theUS.com archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.theus.comalabama archivedate August ,deadurl nolt;refgt; The city was moved to the current site of Mobile,AlabamaMobile in .This area was claimed by the French from  to  as part of La Louisiane.After the French lost to the British in the Seven Years War,it became part of British West Florida from  to .After the United States victory in the American Revolutionary War,the territory was divided between the United States and Spain.forces on April ,lt;ref namealahisttmlngt;cite webtitleAlabama History Timelineurlhttp:www.archives.alabama.govtimelineal.htmlpublisherAlabama Department of Archives and HistoryaccessdateJuly ,Thomas Bassett,a Loyalist American Revolutionloyalist to the British monarchy during the Revolutionary era,was one of the earliest White settlers in the state outside Mobile.He settled in the Tombigbee District during the early s.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.archives.state.usahamarkerswashington.html titleAlabama Historical Association Marker Program: Washington County publisherArchives.state.us accessdateJune ,AlabamaClarke County,northernmost Mobile County,AlabamaMobile County,and most of Washington County,AlabamaWashington County.authorJohn D.Guice year publisherUniversity of New Mexico Press locationAlbuquerque isbn pages,What is now the counties of Baldwin County,AlabamaBaldwin and Mobile County,AlabamaMobile became part of Spanish West Florida in ,part of the independent Republic of West Florida in ,and was finally added to the Mississippi Territory in .It was claimed by the Province of Georgia from  onwards.Following the American RevolutionRevolutionary War,it remained a part of Georgia U.stateGeorgia,although heavily disputed.File:Mississippiterritory.PNGthumbrightupright.With the exception of the area around Mobile and the Yazoo lands,The Yazoo lands were added to the territory in ,following the Yazoo land scandal.aboutnorthgeorgia.comangThePineBarrensSpeculationandYazooLandFraudpublisherAbout North GeorgiaaccessdateJuly ,Before the admission of Mississippi as a state on December ,The Alabama Territory was created by the United States Congress on March ,Stephens,AlabamaSt.Stephens,now abandoned,served as the territorial capital from  to .lt;ref namequot;eoaststephensquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh titleOld St.Stephens workEncyclopedia of Alabama publisherAuburn University accessdateJune ,The U.From July  to August ,delegates met to prepare the new state constitution.Huntsville served as the temporary capital of Alabama from  to ,when the seat of state government was moved to Cahaba,AlabamaCahaba in Dallas County,AlabamaDallas County.lt;refgt;cite webtitleHuntsville urlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh workThe Encyclopedia of Alabama publisher Alabama Humanities Foundation accessdateJanuary ,File:Thornhill .jpgthumbThe main house,built in ,at Thornhill Forkland,AlabamaThornhill in Greene County.It is a former Black Belt region of AlabamaBlack Belt plantation.Cahaba,now a ghost town,was the first permanent state capital from  to .lt;ref namequot;Cahawquot;gt;cite webtitleOld Cahawba,Alabamas first state capital,to workOld Cahawba: A Cahawba Advisory Committee Projecturlhttp:www.cahawba.comaccessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;  Alabama Fever was already underway when the state was admitted to the Union,lt;ref namequot;feverquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh titleAlabama Fever authorLeeAnna Keith dateOctober ,workEncyclopedia of Alabama publisherAuburn University accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;adahtalafvrquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.alabamaheritage.comvaultkingcotton.lt;refgt; Part of the frontier in the s and s,its constitution provided for universal suffrage for white men.The economy of the central Black Belt region of AlabamaBlack Belt named for its dark,lt;ref namequot;SSpacesquot;gt; The area also drew many poor,disfranchised people who became subsistence farmers.Alabama had a population estimated at under ,people in ,but it had increased to more than ,people by .lt;ref namequot;alaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh titleAlabama authorWayne Flynt dateJuly ,workEncyclopedia of Alabama publisherAuburn University accessdateSeptember ,File:Oldalabamastatecapruinsintuscaloosa.pngthumbleftRuins of the former capitol building in Tuscaloosa.Designed by William Nichols architectWilliam Nichols,it was built from  and was destroyed by fire in .From  to ,Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa served as the capital of Alabama.On January ,AlabamaMontgomery.The first legislative session in the new capital met in December .lt;ref namequot;capitolsquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.archives.state.uscapitalcapitals.html titleCapitals of Alabama workAlabama Department of Archives and History accessdateJuly ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.archives.state.uscapitalcapitals.html archivedate July ,The first structure burned down in ,but was rebuilt on the same site in .This second capitol building in Montgomery remains to the present day.It was designed by Barachias Holt of Exeter,Maine.publisher University of Alabama Presslocation  University,the population had increased to a total of ,people,of which nearly half,were enslaved African Americans,and ,were free people of color.lt;ref namequot;adahtmlnquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.archives.alabama.govtimelineal.lt;refgt; On January ,After remaining an independent republic for a few days,it joined the Confederate States of America.The Confederacys capital was initially located at Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery.Alabama was heavily Alabama in the American Civil Warinvolved in the American Civil War.Although comparatively few battles were fought in the state,Alabama contributed about ,soldiers to the war effort.File:Huntsville Courthouse Square .jpgthumbUnion Army troops occupying Courthouse Square in Huntsville,following its capture and occupation by federal forces in .A company of cavalry soldiers from Huntsville,Alabama joined Nathan Bedford Forrests battalion in Hopkinsville,Kentucky.The company wore new uniforms with yellow trim on the sleeves,collar and coat tails.This led to them being greeted with quot;Yellowhammerquot;,and the name later was applied to all Alabama troops in the Confederate Army.lt;refgt;http:www.archives.state.usemblemsstbird.html Official Symbols and Emblems of Alabama,State Bird of Alabama,Yellowhammer.Alabamas slaves were freed by the th Amendment in .lt;ref namequot;HistDocsquot;gt;cite weburl http:www.historicaldocuments.comthAmendment.htm title th Amendment to the U.Constitution: Abolition of Slavery  accessdate September ,year  work Historical Documents publisher HistoricalDocuments.From  to ,with most White citizens barred temporarily from voting and freedmen enfranchised,many African Americans emerged as political leaders in the state.Benjamin S.Turner,and James T.Rapier.lt;ref namequot;alrecnstrctnquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.alabamamoments.alabama.govsec.Following the war,the state remained chiefly agricultural,with an economy tied to cotton.During Reconstruction era of the United StatesReconstruction,Legislators funded numerous public road and railroad projects,although these were plagued with allegations of fraud and misappropriation.lt;ref namequot;alrecnstrctnquot;gt; Organized insurgent,resistance groups tried to suppress the freedmen and Republicans.Besides the shortlived original Ku Klux Klan,these included the Pale Faces,Knights of the White Camellia,Red Shirts Southern United StatesRed Shirts,and the White League.Reconstruction in Alabama ended in ,They wrote another constitution in ,lt;ref namequot;alrecnstrctnquot;gt; and the legislature passed the Blaine Amendment,prohibiting public money from being used to finance religiousaffiliated schools.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.schoolreport.comschoolreportarticlesblaine.htm titleA Blaine Amendment Update July  publisherSchoolreport.com accessdateJune ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.schoolreport.comschoolreportarticlesblaine.htm archivedate July ,deadurl nolt;refgt; The same year,legislation was approved that called for racial segregationracially segregated schools.lt;ref namequot;jimcrowalaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.classroomhelp.comtilljimcrowlawsjimcrowalabama.html titleJim Crow Laws in Alabama workEmmett Till,It All Began with a Whistle publisherClassroomhelp accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Railroad passenger cars were segregated in .File:Birmingham Alabama skyline .including nearly all African Americans and Native Americans,and tens of thousands of poor whites,through making voter registration difficult,requiring a Poll tax United Statespoll taxes and literacy test.lt;refgt;J.Morgan Kousser.New Haven: Yale University Press,lt;refgt; By ,only ,African Americans were registered in Alabama,although at least ,were literate.This compared to more than ,African Americans eligible to vote in .The numbers dropped even more in later decades.the new restrictions resulted in their disenfranchisement as well,due mostly to the imposition of a cumulative poll tax.lt;ref namequot;epzzsdquot;gt;  By ,whites constituted a slight majority of those disenfranchised by these laws: ,Whites vs.AfricanAmericans.lt;ref namequot;epzzsdquot;gt;Glenn Feldman.The Disfranchisement Myth: Poor Whites and Suffrage Restriction in Alabama.Athens: University of Georgia Press,lt;refgt; Nearly all African Americans had lost the ability to vote.Despite numerous legal challenges that succeeded in overturning certain provisions,the state legislature would create new ones to maintain disenfranchisement.The  constitution required racial segregation of public schools.It also restated that interracial marriage was illegal,as it had been prohibited in .Into the s,hotels,and restaurants in ; and bus stop waiting rooms in .but it did not relieve them of paying taxes.lt;ref namequot;SSpacesquot;gt;cite weburl http:southernspaces.orgblackbelt title The Black Belt accessdate September ,date April ,the Rosenwald Fund began funding the construction of what came to be known as Rosenwald Schools.which paid onethird of the construction costs.The fund required the local community and state to raise matching funds to pay the rest.Black residents effectively taxed themselves twice,by raising additional monies to supply matching funds for such schools,which were built in many rural areas.They often donated land and labor as well.File:Mount Sinai School Autauga County July  .jpgthumbThe former Mount Sinai School in rural Autauga County,completed in .It was one of the  Rosenwald Schools built in the state.Beginning in ,the first  Rosenwald Schools were built in Alabama for AfricanAmerican children.A total of  schools,seven teachers houses,and several vocational buildings were completed by  in the state.Continued racial discrimination and lynchings,agricultural depression,Reflecting this emigration,At the same time,many rural people,both White and African American,migrated to the city of Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham to work in new industrial jobs.Birmingham experienced such rapid growth that it was called the quot;Magic Cityquot;.By the s,Heavy industry and mining were the basis of its economy.Its residents were underrepresented for decades in the state legislature,which refused to redistrict after each decennial census according to population changes,as it was required by the state constitution.This did not change until the late s following a lawsuit and court order.lt;blockquotegt;Beginning in the s,when the courts started taking the first steps to recognize the voting rights of black voters,the Alabama legislature took several counter steps designed to disfranchise black voters.The legislature passed,and the voters ratified as these were mostly white voters,Black citizens in Mobile,The legislature also changed the boundaries of Tuskegee,AlabamaTuskegee to a sided figure designed to fence out blacks from the city limits.In ,lt;ref namequot;vraquot;gt;James Blacksher,Edward Still,Nick Quinton,Cullen Brown and Royal Dumas.http:www.protectcivilrights.orgpdfvotingAlabamaVRA.pdf Voting Rights in Alabama ,Renew the VRA.July ,from discussion in Peyton McCrary,Jerome A.Gray,Edward Still,and Huey L.Perry,quot;Alabamaquot; in Quiet Revolution in the South,Chandler Davidson and Bernard Grofman,eds.One example of this massive influx of workers occurred in Mobile.Between  and ,more than ,people moved into the city to work for warrelated industries.lt;ref namequot;thomasonquot;gt;Thomason,Michael.Mobile : The New History of Alabamas First City,pages .Tuscaloosa: University of Alabama Press,ISBN .Despite massive population changes in the state from  to ,the ruraldominated legislature refused to reapportion House and Senate seats based on population,as required by the state constitution to follow the results of decennial censuses.They held on to old representation to maintain political and economic power in agricultural areas.In addition,One result was that Jefferson County,AlabamaJefferson County,containing Birminghams industrial and economic powerhouse,contributed more than onethird of all tax revenue to the state,but did not receive a proportional amount in services.Urban interests were consistently underrepresented in the legislature.A  study noted that because of rural domination,A class action suit initiated on behalf of plaintiffs in Lowndes County,Alabama challenged the state legislatures lack of redistricting for congressional seats.In  White v.Crook,Judge Frank M.Johnson ordered the state to redistrict.United States Supreme Court cases of Baker v.Carr  and Reynolds v.Sims  ruled that the principle of quot;one man,one votequot; needed to be the basis of both houses of state legislatures as well,and that their districts had to be based on population,rather than geographic counties,as Alabama had used for its senate.for the first time since ,the legislature completed the first congressional redistricting based on the decennial census.This benefited the urban areas that had developed,as well as all in the population who had been underrepresented for more than  years.including legal challenges.In ,the US Supreme Court ruled in Brown v.Board of Education that public schools had to be desegregated,but Alabama was slow to comply.During the s,under Governor George Wallace,Alabama resisted compliance with federal demands for desegregation.The civil rights movement had notable events in Alabama,including the Montgomery Bus Boycott ,Freedom Rides in ,and  Selma to Montgomery marches.com accessdateOctober ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:finduslaw.comcivilrightsactofcratitleviiequalemploymentopportunitiesuscodechapter archivedate October ,deadurl nolt;refgt; and Voting Rights Act of  by the U.Congress.Legal segregation ended in the states in ,but Jim Crow customs often continued until specifically challenged in court.lt;ref namequot;USDOJquot;gt;cite weburl http:www.usdoj.govkidspagecrtvoting.htm archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.usdoj.govkidspagecrtvoting.htm archivedate February ,title Voting Rights accessdate September ,date January ,work Civil Rights: Law and History publisher U.Despite recommendations of a  Alabama Constitutional Commission,the state legislature did not approve an amendment to establish home rule for counties.There is very limited home rule,In the s,an omnibus redistricting case,Dillard v.Crenshaw County,challenged the atlarge voting for representative seats of  Alabama jurisdictions,including counties and school boards.Atlarge voting had diluted the votes of any minority in a county,as the majority tended to take all seats.Despite African Americans making up a significant minority in the state,they had been unable to elect any representatives in most of the atlarge jurisdictions.As part of settlement of this case,five Alabama cites and counties,including Chilton County,AlabamaChilton County,This has resulted in more proportional representation for voters.In another form of proportional representation,jurisdictions use limited voting,as in Conecuh County,AlabamaConecuh County.In ,limited voting was first tested in Conecuh County,AlabamaConecuh County.resulting in governments that are more representative of their citizens.lt;ref namequot;cumquot;gt;http:archive.fairvote.page quot;Cumulative Elections in Alabama quot;quot;Proportional Voting in Alabamaquot;,FairVote Archives,accessed January ,File:Map of Alabama terrain NA.of the area is water,making Alabama rd in the amount of surface water,also giving it the secondlargest inland waterway system in the U.lt;refgt;cite web url http:factfinder.census.govservletGCTTable?Population,Housing Units,Area,and Density areas ranked by population:  year accessdate September ,workGeographic Comparison Table publisher U.The North Alabama region is mostly mountainous,with the Tennessee River cutting a large valley and creating numerous creeks,streams,rivers,mountains,and lakes.lt;ref namequot;NetStatequot;gt;cite web url http:www.netstate.comstatesgeographyalgeography.htm title The Geography of Alabama workGeography of the States publisherNetState.com date August ,accessdateSeptember ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.netstate.comstatesgeographyalgeography.htm archivedate September ,Alabama is bordered by the states of Tennessee to the north,Georgia U.stateGeorgia to the east,Florida to the south,and Mississippi to the west.Alabama has coastline at the Gulf of Mexico,in the extreme southern edge of the state.urlhttp:erg.usgs.govisbpubsbookletselvadistelvadist.htmlHighest titleElevations and Distances in the United States publisherU.S Geological Survey accessdateNovember ,archiveurlhttp:pubs.usgs.govpublicationelvadist.html archivedate November ,deadurl nolt;refgt; at Mobile Bay to over ,amp;nbsp;feet amp;nbsp;m in the Appalachian Mountains in the northeast.The highest point is Mount Cheaha,lt;ref namequot;NetStatequot;gt; at a height of convertftabbron.lt;ref namengsgt;cite web urlhttp:www.noaa.govcgibindsmark.PidBoxDG titleNGS Data Sheet for Cheaha Mountain publisherU.National Geodetic Survey accessdateJune ,lt;refgt;  Alabamas land consists of converteacrekm of forest or  of total land area.lt;refgt;http:www.alabamaforests.orgIntroductionindex.html Alabama Forest Owners Guide to Information Resources,Introduction,Alabamaforests.org waybackurlhttp:www.alabamaforests.orgIntroductionindex.html date lt;refgt; Suburban Baldwin County,AlabamaBaldwin County,along the Gulf Coast,is the largest county in the state in both land area and water area.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:factfinder.census.govservletGCTTable?Census Bureau accessdateMay ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:factfinder.census.govservletGCTTable?AlabamaAlexander City; Little River Canyon National Preserve near Fort Payne,AlabamaFort Payne; Russell Cave National Monument in Bridgeport,AlabamaBridgeport; Tuskegee Airmen National Historic Site in Tuskegee,AlabamaTuskegee; and Tuskegee Institute National Historic Site near Tuskegee.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:home.govapplicationsparksearchstate.stal titleNational Park Guide accessdateSeptember ,workGeographic Search publisherNational Park Service  U.Department of the Interior locationWashington,C archiveurl http:home.govstatealindex.programparks archivedate September ,Additionally,Alabama has four United States National ForestNational Forests: Conecuh National ForestConecuh,Talladega National ForestTalladega,Tuskegee National ForestTuskegee,and William B.Bankhead National ForestWilliam B.Bankhead.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.usralabamaforests titleNational Forests in Alabama accessdateOctober ,workUSDA Forest Service publisherUnited States Department of Agriculture archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.usralabamaforests archivedate October ,deadurl nolt;refgt;  Alabama also contains the Natchez Trace Parkway,the Selma To Montgomery National Historic Trail,and the Trail of TearsTrail Of Tears National Historic Trail.A notable natural wonder in Alabama is Natural Bridge,Alabamaquot;Natural Bridgequot; rock,the longest natural bridge east of the Rocky MountainsRockies,located just south of Haleyville,AlabamaHaleyville.A convertmikmadjonwide meteorite impact crater is located in Elmore County,AlabamaElmore County,just north of Montgomery.This is the Wetumpka crater,the site of quot;Alabamas greatest natural disaster.quot;  A convertftmsingonwide meteorite hit the area about amp;nbsp;million years ago.lt;ref namequot;mlvguhquot;gt;cite Earth Impact DB name Wetumpka accessdate August ,lt;refgt;quot;The Wetumpka Astroblemequot; by John C.Hall,Alabama Heritage,Fall ,Number .lt;refgt; In ,lt;refgt;cite web lastKing firstDavid T.titleWetumpka Crater urlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh workEncyclopedia of Alabama accessdateDecember ,dateApril ,File:AutumntreeinBirminghamNov.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh titleEncyclopedia of Alabama: Climate dateAugust ,publisherUniversity of Alabamalt;refgt; The average annual temperature is amp;nbsp;F amp;nbsp;C.while the northern parts of the state,especially in the Appalachian Mountains in the northeast,tend to be slightly cooler.lt;ref namequot;cprgswquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.britannica.comebarticleAlabama titleAlabama Climate workEncyclopdia Britannica accessdateOctober ,lt;refgt;  Generally,Alabama has very hot summers and mild winters with copious precipitation throughout the year.Summers in Alabama are among the hottest in the U.with high temperatures averaging over convertF throughout the summer in some parts of the state.Alabama is also prone to tropical storms and even hurricanes.Areas of the state far away from the Gulf are not immune to the effects of the storms,which often dump tremendous amounts of rain as they move inland and weaken.South Alabama reports many thunderstorms.The Gulf Coast,around Mobile Bay,averages between  and  days per year with thunder reported.This activity decreases somewhat further north in the state,but even the far north of the state reports thunder on about amp;nbsp;days per year.Occasionally,lt;refgt;http:www.lightningsafety.noaa.govstatsstatefatalityrates.pdf Lightning Fatalities,Injuries and Damages in the United States,NLSI.Retrieved April ,File:Phil Campbell tornado damage.jpgthumbleftTornado damage in Phil Campbell,AlabamaPhil Campbell following the statewide  Super OutbreakApril ,tornado outbreak.Alabama,along with Oklahoma,has the most reported Enhanced Fujita scaleEF tornadoes of any state,according to statistics from the National Climatic Data Center for the period January ,to June .lt;refgt;http:www.newsnet.Retrieved April ,The  Super Outbreak produced a record amount of tornadoes in the state.The tally reached .comspotnewsaprilsrecordtallytorn.html work publisheral.com accessdateNovember ,File:Birmingham city hall alabama .The peak season for tornadoes varies from the northern to southern parts of the state.along with the spring severe weather season.The northern part of the statealong the Tennessee Valleyis one of the areas in the U.most vulnerable to violent tornadoes.as distinct from the Tornado Alley of the Southern Plains.Winters are generally mild in Alabama,as they are throughout most of the southeastern U.with average January low temperatures around convertF in Mobile and around convertF in Birmingham.Although snow is a rare event in much of Alabama,areas of the state north of Montgomery may receive a dusting of snow a few times every winter,with an occasional moderately heavy snowfall every few years.Historic snowfall events include New Years Eve  snowstorm and the  Storm of the Century.The annual average snowfall for the Birmingham area is convertinmm per year.In the southern Gulf coast,snowfall is less frequent,sometimes going several years without any snowfall.Alabamas highest temperature of convertF was recorded on September ,in the unincorporated community of Centerville,AlabamaCenterville.The record low of convertF occurred on January ,in New Market,AlabamaNew Market.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.accuracyproject.orgrecordtemps.org accessdateNovember ,File:CahabaRiverNWR.jpgthumbA stand of Hymenocallis coronariaCahaba lilies Hymenocallis coronaria in the Cahaba River,within the Cahaba River National Wildlife Refuge.Alabama is home to a diverse array of flora and fauna,due largely to a variety of habitats that range from the Tennessee Valley,Appalachian Plateau,and RidgeandValley Appalachians of the north to the Piedmont United StatesPiedmont,The state is usually ranked among the top in nation for its range of overall biodiversity.year publisherUniversity of Alabama Press locationTuscaloosa,Alabama isbn pages,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;outalawildlifequot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.which still form the largest proportion of forests in the state.It is home to nearly ,pteridophyte and spermatophyte plant species.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.floraofalabama.Indigenous ecologyIndigenous animal species in the state include  mammal species,lt;ref namequot;outalamamquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.lt;refgt;  reptile species,lt;ref namequot;outalarepquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.lt;refgt;  amphibian species,lt;ref namequot;outalaamphiquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.lt;refgt; roughly  native freshwater fish species,lt;ref namequot;outalabirdquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.lt;refgt;  Invertebrates include  crayfish species and  mollusk species.of these mollusk species have never been collected outside the state.lt;ref namequot;outalamolluskquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;outalacrayquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.outdooralabama.File:Alabama population map.footnoteSources: lt;refgt;cite webauthorResident Population Data urlhttp:.census.govcensusdataapportionmentpoptext.php titleResident Population Data   Census publisher.census.gov accessdateJune ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:.census.govcensusdataapportionmentpoptext.php archivedate May ,The United States Census Bureau estimates that the population of Alabama was ,on July ,lt;ref namePopEstUSgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govpopestdatastatetotalstablesNSTEST.csvformatCSVtitleTable .Annual Estimates of the Resident Population for the United States,Regions,States,and Puerto Rico: April ,to July ,dateDecember ,publisherU.Census BureauaccessdateDecember ,lt;refgt; which represents an increase of ,or .since the  United States Census Census.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govcensuspopmapipmtext.fl title Census Interactive Population Search publisher.census.gov accessdateDecember ,lt;refgt; This includes a natural increase since the last census of ,people that is ,births minus ,deaths and an increase due to net migration of ,people into the state.lt;ref namecensuscumgt;cite web titleAnnual Estimates of the Population for the United States,Regions,States,and Puerto Rico: April ,to July ,urlhttp:www.census.govpopestdatanationaltotalsindex.html publisherU.Census Bureau formatcommaseparated valuesCSV accessdateDecember ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.census.govpopeststatestablesNSTEST.csv archivedate February ,Immigration to the United StatesImmigration from outside the U.resulted in a net increase of ,people,and migration within the country produced a net gain of ,people.lt;ref namecensuscumgt;  The state had ,foreignborn .of the state population,of which an estimated .were illegal immigrants ,The center of population of Alabama is located in Chilton County,AlabamaChilton County,outside the town of Jemison,AlabamaJemison.url http:www.census.govgeowwwcenpopstatecenters.txt archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.census.govgeowwwcenpopstatecenters.txt archivedate December ,According to the  United States Census Census,Alabama had a population of ,The racial composition of the state was .White AmericanWhite .NonHispanic White and .Hispanic White,African AmericanBlack or African American,Hispanic and Latino AmericansHispanic or Latino of any race,Asian,Native Americans in the United StatesAmerican Indian and Alaska Native,Native HawaiiansNative Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander,from Some Other Race,and .from Two or More Races.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:factfinder.census.govfacestableservicesjsfpagesproductview.xhtml?pidDECPLQTPLamp;prodTypetable titleAmerican FactFinder publisherFactfinder.census.gov dateOctober ,accessdateJune ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:factfinder.census.govfacestableservicesjsfpagesproductview.xhtml?pidDECPLQTPLamp;prodTypetable archivedate May ,deadurl nolt;refgt; In ,of Alabamas population younger than age  were minorities.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.cleveland.comdatacentralindex.ssfamericasunderagepopulatio.html titleAmericans under age  now mostly minorities,but not in Ohio: Statistical Snapshot lastExner firstRich workThe Plain Dealer dateJune ,The largest reported ancestry groups in Alabama are: African American .English AmericanEnglish .Irish AmericanIrish .German AmericanGerman .and ScotsIrish AmericanScotsIrish .lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:docs.google.comviewer?avamp;qcache:WJGwzRkkYJ:www.orgLessonplandownloadFile.cgiFfileDAFCensusData.pdffilenameDAFCensusData.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govpopulationcensusdatapcstab.pdf title United States Census formatPDF accessdateJune ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.census.govpopulationcensusdatapcstab.pdf archivedate June ,deadurl nolt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;factfinder.census.govquot;gt;cite web publisher Factfinder.census.gov url http:factfinder.census.govservletADPTable?in some cases since the s.In the  census,of the people in Alabama identified as being of English ancestry,making them the largest ethnic group at the time.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govpopulationwwwcensusdatafilespcstab.pdf titleAncestry of the Population by State:   Table  formatPDF accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;https:books.google.combooks?Pulera,Sharing the Dream: White Males in a Multicultural America.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Reynolds Farley,quot;The New Census Question about Ancestry: What Did It Tell Us?quot;,Demography,Vol.August ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Stanley Lieberson and Lawrence Santi,quot;The Use of Nativity Data to Estimate Ethnic Characteristics and Patternsquot;,Social Science Research,Vol.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Stanley Lieberson and Mary C.Waters,quot;Ethnic Groups in Flux: The Changing Ethnic Responses of American Whitesquot;,Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science,Vol.September ,Racial composition  !lt;refgt;http:www.census.govpopulationwwwdocumentationtwpstwps.html Historical Census Statistics on Population Totals By Race,to ,and By Hispanic Origin,to ,For The United States,Regions,Divisions,and Stateslt;refgt; !lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:censusviewer.comstateALtitlePopulation of Alabama  Census  and  Interactive Map,Demographics,Statistics,Quick Facts  CensusViewerworkcensusviewer.comaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt;!lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govcensusdatatitle Census DataauthorCenter for New Media and PromotionsCPOworkcensus.govaccessdateJuly ,White AmericanWhite  .African AmericanBlack  .Asian AmericanAsian  .Native Americans in the United StatesNative  .Native Hawaiian and lt;br gt;Pacific Islanderother Pacific Islander      .Race and ethnicity in the United States CensusOther race  .Multiracial AmericanTwo or more races    .Based on historic migration and settlement patterns in the southern colonies and states,demographers estimated there are more people in Alabama of ScotsIrish origins than selfreported.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:factfinder.census.govservletADPTable?census.gov accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt;  Many people in Alabama claim Irish ancestry because of the term ScotsIrish but,based on historic immigration and settlement,their ancestors were more likely Protestant ScotsIrish coming from northern Ireland,where they had been for a few generations as part of the English colonization.lt;ref namequot;censusancestriesquot;gt;Media:CensusDataTopUSAncestriesbyCounty.jpgCensus  Map  Top U.and many settled in the South,later moving into the Deep South as it was developed.lt;refgt;David Hackett Fischer,Albions Seed: Four British Folkways in America,New York: Oxford University Press,under the DavisStrong Act,the state legislature established the Alabama Indian Affairs Commission.lt;ref namequot;aiacquot;gt;http:www.aiac.state.ustribes.aspx quot;Alabama Indian Affairs Commissionquot;,State of Alabama,accessed September ,Given the long history of slavery and associated racial segregation,the Native American peoples,who have sometimes been of mixed race,have insisted on having their cultural identification respected.In the past,descended mostly from the Five Civilized Tribes of the American Southeast.These are:lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:aiac.alabama.govByLaws.Poarch Band of Creek Indians who also have federal recognition,MOWA Band of Choctaw Indians,Star Clan of Muscogee Creek peopleMuscogee Creeks,Echota Cherokee Tribe of Alabama,Cherokee Tribe of Northeast Alabama,CherOCreek Intra Tribal Indians,MaChis Lower Creek Indian Tribe,Piqua Shawnee Tribe,AniYunWiya Nation.The state government has promoted recognition of Native American contributions to the state,lt;refgt;http:www.aiac.state.usProcIndianHeritageDay.aspx quot;American Indian Heritage Dayquot;,Alabama Indian Affairs Commission,File:Birmingham,Alabama Skyline.jpgthumbBirmingham,AlabamaBirmingham,File:Downtown Huntsville,Alabama cropped.jpgthumbHuntsville,AlabamaHuntsville,File:Downtown Mobile  .jpgthumbMobile,AlabamaMobile,File:Montgomery Alabama panorama.jpgthumbMontgomery,AlabamaMontgomery,Birmingham,Alabama,aligncenter ,Bibb County,AlabamaBibb,Blount County,AlabamaBlount,Chilton County,AlabamaChilton,Jefferson County,AlabamaJefferson,Clair County,AlabamaSt.Clair,Shelby County,AlabamaShelby,Walker County,aligncenter ,Limestone County,AlabamaLimestone,Madison County,aligncenter ,Mobile County,aligncenter ,Autauga County,AlabamaAutauga,Elmore County,AlabamaElmore,Lowndes County,AlabamaLowndes,Montgomery County,aligncenter ,Hale County,AlabamaHale,Pickens County,AlabamaPickens,Tuscaloosa County,aligncenter ,Baldwin County,aligncenter ,Lee County,Decatur,aligncenter ,Lawrence County,AlabamaLawrence,Morgan County,aligncenter ,Geneva County,AlabamaGeneva,Henry County,AlabamaHenry,Houston County,aligncenter ,Colbert County,AlabamaColbert,Lauderdale County,aligncenter ,Calhoun County,aligncenter ,Etowah County,aligncenter ,Sources: Census.govlt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:factfinder.census.govfacestableservicesjsfpagesproductview.xhtml?Rank !City !Population lt;br gt; census estimates !Birmingham,stylequot;textalign:center;quot;,Jefferson County,Montgomery,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Montgomery County,Mobile,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Mobile County,Huntsville,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Madison County,AlabamaMadison lt;br gt;Limestone County,Tuscaloosa,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Tuscaloosa County,Hoover,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Jefferson lt;br gt;Shelby County,Dothan,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Houston County,Auburn,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Lee County,Decatur,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Morgan County,Madison,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Florence,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Lauderdale County,Phenix City,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Russell County,Gadsden,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Etowah County,Prattville,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Autauga County,Vestavia Hills,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,Sources: Census.govlt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.census.govpopestdatacitiestotalsfilesSUBEST.csvworkcensus.govaccessdateMay ,of all Alabama residents five years old or older spoke only English at home in ,a minor decrease from  .in .Alabama English is predominantly Southern American EnglishSouthern,lt;ref namequot;citydata.comquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.citydata.comstatesAlabamaLanguages.htmltitleAlabama  Languagesworkcitydata.comaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt; and is related to South Midland speech which was taken across the border from Tennessee.In the major Southern speech region,there is the decreasing loss of the final r,for example the boyd pronunciation of bird.In the northern third of the state,there is a South Midland arm and barb rhyming with form and orb.Unique words in Alabama English include: redworm earthworm,peckerwood woodpecker,snake doctor and snake feeder dragonfly,tow sack burlap bag,plum peach clingstone,French harp harmonica,and dog irons andirons.lt;ref namequot;citydata.Language !Percentage of populationlt;br gt;lt;smallgt;as oflcylt;smallgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.citydata.comstatesAlabamaLanguages.htmlquot;titleAlabama  Languagesworkcitydata.comaccessdateJuly ,Spanish .German  .French incl.Patois,Cajun  .Chinese,Vietnamese languageVietnamese,Korean languageKorean,Arabic languageArabic,African languages,Japanese,and Italian tied .File:Highlands UMC Birmingham Dec  .jpgthumbHighlands United Methodist Church in Birmingham,File:Briarwood Presbyterian Church in Birmingham,File:Temple BNai Shalom Dec .jpgthumbTemple Bnai Sholom Huntsville,AlabamaTemple BNai Sholom in Huntsville,established in .It is the oldest synagogue building in continuous use in the state.File:Islamic Center of Tuscaloosa.jpgthumbThe Islamic Center of Tuscaloosa,In the  American Religious Identification Survey,of Alabama respondents reported their religion as Christian,including  Catholic,and  as having no religion.lt;ref nameARISgt;cite web urlhttp:b.trincoll.eduweblogsAmericanReligionSurveyARISreportsARISReport.pdf formatPDF titleAMERICAN RELIGIOUS IDENTIFICATION SURVEY ARIS  authorBarry A.Kosmin authorAriela Keysar year publisherTrinity College locationHartford,Connecticut,USA page accessdateMay ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:b.trincoll.eduweblogsAmericanReligionSurveyARISreportsARISReport.pdf archivedate April ,deadurl nolt;refgt; The composition of other traditions is .Mormon,Jewish,Muslim,Buddhist,and .Hindu.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:religions.pewforum.orgmapstitleReligion in America: U.Religious Data,Demographics and Statistics  Pew Research CenterdateMay ,workPew Research Centers Religion amp; Public Life ProjectaccessdateJuly ,stylequot;fontsize:quot;  Religious affiliation in Alabama lt;refgt;http:www.pewforum.colspanquot;quot; of U.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.alignright bartable.DetailsHistory of Baptists in Alabama,List of Baptist churches in AlabamaBaptist churches in Alabama,Episcopal Diocese of Alabama,Episcopal Diocese of the Central Gulf Coast,Roman Catholic Archdiocese of Mobile,Roman Catholic Diocese of Birmingham in AlabamaRoman Catholic Diocese of Birmingham,Alabama is located in the middle of the Bible Belt,a region of numerous Protestant Christians.Alabama has been identified as one of the most religious states in the United States,with about  of the population attending church regularly.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.signonsandiego.comuniontribnewslznthelist.htmltitleChurch or synagogue attendance by state  The San Diego UnionTribuneworksignonsandiego.comaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt; A majority of people in the state identify as Evangelical Protestant.as of,the three largest denominational groups in Alabama are the Southern Baptist Convention,The United Methodist Church,and Nondenominational Christianitynondenominational Evangelical Protestant.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.thearda.comrcmsrsrcmsstatename.asp titleThe Association of Religion Data Archives amp;; State membership Report publisherwww.thearda.com accessdateNovember ,In Alabama,the Southern Baptist Convention has the highest number of adherents with ,; this is followed by the United Methodist Church with ,adherents,nondenominational Evangelical Protestant with ,adherents,and the Catholic Church with ,adherents.when preachers proselytized across the South.The Assemblies of God had almost ,members,the Churches of Christ had nearly ,members.The Presbyterian churches,strongly associated with ScotsIrish immigrants of the th century and their descendants,had a combined membership around ,Presbyterian Church in AmericaPCA,members in  congregations,PCUSA,members in  congregations,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.thearda.comrcmsrsrcmsstatename.asptitleThe Association of Religion Data Archives  Maps amp; Reportsworkthearda.comaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt; the Cumberland Presbyterian Church,members in  congregations,the Cumberland Presbyterian Church in America,lt;ref namequot;theardaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.thearda.commapsReportsreportsstate.asp titleState Membership Reports year  accessdateJune ,publisher thearda.In a  survey,nearly  of respondents could name all four of the Christian Canonical GospelsGospels.Of those who indicated a religious preference,said they possessed a quot;full understandingquot; of their faith and needed no further learning.pageA publisherAdvance Publications,Inclt;refgt;  In a  poll,of Alabamians reported having at least some confidence in churches in the state.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.myaea.orgPDFfileConfidenceinStateInstitutions.pdf archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.myaea.orgPDFfileConfidenceinStateInstitutions.pdf archivedateAugust ,unlike some institutions,hasnt fallen dateApril ,Although in much smaller numbers,many other religious faiths are represented in the state as well,including Judaism,Islam,Hinduism,Buddhism,Sikhism,the Bah Faith,and Unitarian Universalism.Jews have been present in what is now Alabama since ,during the colonial era of Mobile,when Sephardic Jews immigrated from London.lt;ref namequot;shomayimquot;gt;cite book titleThe Gates of Heaven : Congregation Shaarai Shomayim,the first  years,Mobile,Alabama,lastZietz firstRobert year publisherCongregation Shaarai ShomayimlocationMobile,AlabamaCongregation Shaarai Shomayim in Mobile.It was formally recognized by the state legislature on January ,Jewish denominations in the state include two Orthodox JudaismOrthodox,four Conservative JudaismConservative,ten Reform JudaismReform,and one Humanistic JudaismHumanistic synagogue.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.kosherdelight.comUSAAlabamaAlabamaSynagogues.shtml titleSynagogues in Alabama publisherKosher Delight accessdateSeptember ,Muslims have been increasing in Alabama,with  mosques built by ,many by AfricanAmerican converts.lt;ref namequot;muslimquot;gt;cite news titleSurvey: U.Muslims grow by  percent since  author Kay Campbell urlhttp:www.comlivingindex.ssfsurveyusmuslimsgrowbyp.html newspaperThe Huntsville Times dateFebruary ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Islam was a traditional religion in West Africa,the most wellknown being the Shri Swaminarayan Mandir in Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham,the Hindu Temple and Cultural Center of Birmingham in Pelham,AlabamaPelham,the Hindu Cultural Center of North Alabama in Capshaw,AlabamaCapshaw,and the Hindu Mandir and Cultural Center in Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.garamchai.comtemplesSE.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:hindumandir.ccindex.There are six Dharma centreDharma centers and organizations for Theravada Buddhists.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.manjushri.comCentersalabama.lt;refgt; Most monastic Buddhist temples are concentrated in southern Mobile County,near Bayou La Batre,AlabamaBayou La Batre.This area has attracted an Indochina refugee crisisinflux of refugees from Cambodia,Laos,and Vietnam during the s and thereafter.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.journalofamericanhistory.orgprojectskatrinaGaillard.lt;refgt; The four temples within a tenmile radius of Bayou La Batre,include Chua Chanh Giac,Wat Buddharaksa,and Wat Lao Phoutthavihan.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:blog.comlivingpressregisterforvietnamesebuddhistsinso.html titleFor Vietnamese Buddhists In South Alabama,A Goddess Of Mercy Is A Powerful Figure authorRoy Hoffman newspaperPressRegister dateOctober ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:blog.comlivingpressregisterawelcomegatewaytothefare.html titleA Welcome Gateway to the Far East authorDebbie M.Lord newspaperPressRegister dateAugust ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:blog.comlivebuddhistmonkkilledtemplele.html titleBuddhist Monk Killed Temple Leader During Argument Over Food,Prosecutor Says author Katherine Sayre newspaperPressRegister dateMay ,accessdateSeptember ,The first community of adherents of the Bahai Faith in Alabama was founded in  by Paul K.Today there is an exhibit honoring Dealy in Haifa,Israel at the world center of the Bahai Faith.Bahai Centers in Alabama exist in Birmingham,Alabama,Huntsville,Alabama,and Florence,Alabama.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.shoalsbahais.comAboutUs.htmltitleBahais of the Shoalsworkshoalsbahais.comaccessdateJuly ,with most counties having over  of adults obese,except for ten which had a rate between  and .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.govdiabetespubsfactsheetscountylvlestimates.along with those in five other states,were least likely in the nation to be physically active during leisure time.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.govmediareleasespphysicalinactivity.and the southeastern U.in general,has one of the highest incidences of adult onset diabetes type IIdiabetes in the country,exceeding  of adults.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:apps.nccd.govDDTSTRSIndex.aspx?yearpublisherCenters for Disease Control and Prevention lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:apps.nccd.govDDTSTRSNationalDiabetesPrevalenceEstimates.aspx?modeDBT titleCDC national chart on diabetes publisherApps.nccd.gov accessdateJune ,The state has invested in aerospace,education,health care,banking,and various heavy industries,including automobile manufacturing,mineral extraction,steel production and fabrication metalfabrication.By ,crop and animal production in Alabama was valued at .billion.In contrast to the primarily agricultural economy of the previous century,this was only about  of the states gross domestic product.The number of private farms has declined at a steady rate since the s,as land has been sold to developers,timber companies,and large farming conglomerates.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh titleFood Production in Alabama lastIjaz firstAhmad lastAddy firstSamuel N.dateJuly ,workThe Encyclopedia of Alabama publisherAuburn University accessdateSeptember ,Nonagricultural employment in  was ,in management occupations; ,in business and financial operations; ,in computerrelated and mathematical occupation; ,in architecture and engineering; ,in life,physical,and social sciences; ,in community and social services; ,in legal occupations; ,in education,training,and library services; ,in art,design and media occupations; ,in healthcare; ,in fire fighting,law enforcement,and security; ,in food preparation and serving; ,in building and grounds cleaning and maintenance; ,in personal care and services; ,in sales; ,in office and administration support; ,in farming,fishing,and forestry; ,in construction and mining,gas,and oil extraction; ,in installation,maintenance,and repair; ,in production; and ,in transportation and material moving.According to the U.Bureau of Economic Analysis,the  total gross state product was amp;nbsp;billion,or ,per capita.Alabamas  GDP increased .from the previous year.The single largest increase came in the area of information.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.govnewsreleasesregionalgdpstategspnewsrelease.htm titleGDP by State  dateJune ,workBureau of Economic Analysis,Regional Economic Accounts accessdateOctober ,http:www.govnewsreleasesregionalgdpstatepdfgsp.pdf full release with tableslt;refgt;failed verificationdateApril   In ,per capita income for the state was ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:quickfacts.census.govqfdstates.html titleUnited States Census Bureau accessdateFebruary ,The states seasonally adjusted unemployment rate was .in April .govcgibinsurveymost?laaccessdateJune ,lt;refgt;  This compared to a nationwide seasonally adjusted rate of .lt;refgt;cite webtitleBureau of Labor Statistics Dataurlhttp:data.govcgibinsurveymost?Alabama has no state minimum wage and uses the federal minimum wage of .In February ,The legislation voids a Birmingham city ordinance that was to raise the citys minimum wage to .lt;refgt;http:www.theguardian.File:Enterprise lifted.File:Hyundai Motor Manufacturing Alabama Highsmith .File:Shelbyhallcomputing.JPGthumbShelby Hall,School of Computing,quot;http:www.bizjournals.combirminghamblogtopofthelistalabamaslargest.html Top of the List: Alabamas largest employersquot; April ,Birmingham Business Journal.The next twenty largest employers,as oflcy,included:lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.americanregistry.Anniston,ATamp;T Inc.Auburn,Montgomery,Birmingham,Birmingham,Huntsville,Mobile,MercedesBenz U.Vance,Tuscaloosa,Alabamas agricultural outputs include poultry and eggs,cattle,fish,plant nursery items,peanuts,cotton,grains such as Corn production in the United Statescorn and sorghum,vegetables,milk,soybeans,and peaches.Although known as quot;List of U.state nicknamesThe Cotton Statequot;,according to various reports,lt;refgt;cite weburl http:cber.edupdfabq.pdf title Alabama and CBER:  Years of Change accessdate September ,year   work Alabama Business publisher Center for Business and Economic Research,Culverhouse College of Commerce,The University of AlabamaformatPDF archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:cber.edupdfabq.pdf archivedate September ,deadurl nolt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburl http:www.aces.edudeptnassbulletinpg.pdf title State Highlights for  accessdate September ,year  work Alabama Cooperative Extension System publisher USDA,NASS,Alabama Statistical OfficeformatPDF archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aces.edudeptnassbulletinpg.pdf archivedate September ,deadurl nolt;refgt; with Texas,Georgia U.stateGeorgia and Mississippi comprising the top three.lumber,and wood products; mining mostly coal; plastic products; cars and trucks; and apparel.In addition,Alabama produces aerospace and electronicselectronic products,mostly in the Huntsville,AlabamaHuntsville area,the location of NASAs George C.Marshall Space Flight Center and the United States Army Materiel CommandU.Army Materiel Command,headquartered at Redstone Arsenal.File:Mercedes Benz US International .jpgthumbMercedesBenz U.International in Tuscaloosa County was the first automotive facility to locate within the state.Located in the state are Honda Manufacturing of Alabama,Hyundai Motor Manufacturing Alabama,MercedesBenz U.International,and Toyota Motor Manufacturing Alabama,as well as their various suppliers.Since ,the automobile industry has generated more than ,new jobs in the state.Alabama currently ranks th in the nation for vehicle exports.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.eere.energy.govvehiclesandfuelsfactsfotw.html titleVehicle Technologies Program: Fact : October ,Light Vehicle Production by State publisher.eere.energy.gov dateOctober ,accessdateOctober ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.eere.energy.govvehiclesandfuelsfactsfotw.htmlarchivedateOctober ,Automakers accounted for approximately a third of the industrial expansion in the state in .annistonstar.comviewfullstoryarticleAutomakersaccountforaboutathirdofthestatesindustrialexpansion?instancehomenewsixzzDioLusx newspaperThe Anniston Star dateOctober ,accessdateJune ,lt;refgt;  The eight models produced at the states auto factories totaled combined sales of ,vehicles for .The strongest model sales during this period were the Hyundai Elantra compact car,the MercedesBenz GLClass sport utility vehicle and the Honda Ridgeline sport utility truck.lt;refgt;cite news lastKentfirstDawntitleU.auto sales see gains in March,as Alabamamade models rise  percent urlhttp:www.combusinessindex.ssfusautosalesseegainsinmar.htmlincartriver accessdateJune ,work publisherAL.com dateApril ,File:Airbus Mobile Engineering Center.Steel producers Outokumpu,Nucor,SSAB,ThyssenKrupp,and U.Steel have facilities in Alabama and employ over ,people.In May ,German steelmaker ThyssenKrupp selected Calvert,AlabamaCalvert in Mobile County,AlabamaMobile County for a .billion combined stainless steelstainless and carbon steel processing facility.lt;refgt;Cite news urlhttp:blog.comlivemobilecountywinsthyssenkrup.accessdateJuly ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:blog.comlivemobilecountywinsthyssenkrup.html archivedate July ,deadurl nolt;refgt;  ThyssenKrupps stainless steel division,Inoxum,including the stainless portion of the Calvert plant,was sold to Finnish stainless steel company Outokumpu in .urlhttp:blog.compressregisterbusinessnewownersofthyssenkruppsta.html accessdateJune ,billion in March .Companhia Siderrgica Nacional submitted a combined bid for the mill at Calvert,plus a majority stake in the ThyssenKrupp mill in Brazil,for .billion.com dateMarch ,urlhttp:www.combusinessindex.ssfreportthyssenkruppgetsfinal.html accessdateJune ,lt;refgt; In July ,the plant was sold to ArcelorMittal and Nippon Steel.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.stahlonline.deindex.phpalabamaendebeivollerkapazitaettitleAlabama: Ende  bei voller Kapazitt  stahlonline.deworkstahlonline.deaccessdateJuly ,The Hunt Refining Company,a subsidiary of Hunt Consolidated,Inc.is based in Tuscaloosa and operates a refinery there.The company also operates terminals in Mobile,Melvin,and Moundville,AlabamaMoundville.lt;refgt;quot;http:www.linkedin.comcompanyhuntrefiningcompany Hunt Refining Company.quot; Linkedin.lt;refgt; JVCJVC America,Inc.operates an optical disc replication and packaging plant in Tuscaloosa.lt;refgt;quot;http:www.jvcamerica.comaboutplantlocations.aspx Company Overview.quot; JVC America,Inc.The Goodyear Tire and Rubber Company operates a large plant in Gadsden,AlabamaGadsden that employs about ,people.It has been in operation since .The plans include a  million factory at the Brookley Aeroplex for the assembly of the A,A and A aircraft.Construction began in ,with plans for it to become operable by  and produce up to  aircraft per year by .urlhttp:abcnews.comUSwireStoryofficialsalaairbusplantemploy.THRzJHhcqN accessdateJuly ,urlhttp:www.uknewsbusiness accessdateJuly ,lt;refgt; The assembly plant is the companys first factory to be built within the United States.lt;refgt;cite newstitleEADS to Build United States Assembly Line for Airbus Aurlhttp:www.nytimes.combusinessglobaleadstobuildairbusassemblylineinmobileala.htmlworkThe New York TimesaccessdateJuly ,authorNicola Clarklt;refgt; It was announced on February ,that Airbus had hired Alabamabased Hoar Construction to oversee construction of the facility.airbus.File:GulfShoresAlBeachJulyB.jpgthumbrightAlabamas beaches are one of the states major tourist destinations.An estimated  million tourists visit the state each year.Over ,of these are from other countries,including from Canada,the United Kingdom,Germany and Japan.In ,million tourists spent .billion providing an estimated ,jobs in the state.lt;refgt;http:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgfaceArticle.idh Encyclopedia of Alabama.Alabama Tourism Department ATDlt;refgt;lt;refgt;Cite news url firstDavid A.DC page A dateMay ,UAB Hospital is the only trauma centerLevel I trauma center in Alabama.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.facs.orgtraumaverified.html titleVerified Trauma Centers dateDecember ,workAmerican College of Surgeons,Verified Trauma Centers accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttps:webspace.utexas.edujasResearchData.htm titleCollege Research Data workUniversity of Texas accessdateApril ,deadurlnolt;refgt;  UAB is the largest state government employer in Alabama,with a workforce of about ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.eduhumanresourceshometitleUAB  Human Resources  Homeworkuab.eduaccessdateJuly ,File:Birmingham skyscrapers Nov .jpgthumbRegionsHarbert Plaza,Regions Center BirminghamRegions Center,and Wells Fargo Tower BirminghamWells Fargo Tower in Birminghams financial district.Alabama has the headquarters of Regions Financial Corporation,BBVA Compass,Superior Bancorp and the former Colonial Bancgroup.Birminghambased Compass Banchshares was acquired by Spanishbased BBVA in September ,although the headquarters of BBVA Compass remains in Birmingham.In November ,Regions Financial completed its merger with AmSouth Bancorporation,which was also headquartered in Birmingham.SouthTrust Corporation,another large bank headquartered in Birmingham,was acquired by Wachovia in  for .billion.The city still has major operations for Wachovia and its now postoperating bank Wells Fargo,which includes a regional headquarters,an operations center campus and a  million data center.Nearly a dozen smaller banks are also headquartered in the Birmingham,such as Superior Bancorp,ServisFirst and New South Federal Savings Bank.Birmingham also serves as the headquarters for several large investment management companies,including Harbert Management Corporation.Telecommunications provider ATamp;T Inc.ATamp;T,formerly BellSouth,has a major presence in Alabama with several large offices in Birmingham.The company has over ,employees and more than ,contract employees.Many commercial technology companies are headquartered in Huntsville,such as the network access company ADTRAN,computer graphics company Intergraph,design and manufacturer of IT infrastructure Avocent,and telecommunications provider Deltacom.Rust International has grown to include Brasfield amp; Gorrie,BEamp;K,Hoar Construction and B.Harbert International,which all routinely are included in the Engineering NewsRecord lists of top design,international construction,and engineering firms.Rust International was acquired in  by Washington Group International,which was in turn acquired by SanFrancisco based URS Corporation in .File:Alabama Capitol Building.jpgthumbThe Alabama State CapitolState Capitol Building in Montgomery,The foundational document for Alabamas government is the Alabama Constitution,which was ratified in .At almost  amendments and ,words,lt;refgt;Tim Lockette,http:www.annistonstar.comarticlecbdfbfacbfbeb.html?modejqm Is the Alabama Constitution the longest constitution in the world?Truth Rating:  out of ,Anniston Star.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Campbell Robertson,http:www.nytimes.comusalabamasimmersbeforevoteonitsconstitutionsracistlanguage.html?pagewantedall Alabama Simmers Before Vote on Its Constitutions Racist Language,New York Times,October ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Washington Postquot;gt;Cite newsurlhttp:www.washingtonpost.comacwpdynANov?accessdateSeptember ,deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.washingtonpost.comacwpdynANov?legislature.state.usCodeOfAlabamaConstitutionConstitutiontoc.archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.legislature.state.usCodeOfAlabamaConstitutionConstitutiontoc.htm archivedate September ,There has been a significant movement to rewrite and modernize Alabamas constitution.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.constitutionalreform.org titleAlabama Citizens for Constitutional Reform publisherConstitutionalreform.org accessdateOctober ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.constitutionalreform.org archivedate September ,Most counties do not have home rule.frequently,by state referendum.File:Ala Supreme Court Building Feb  .jpgthumbThe Alabama Judicial Building in Montgomery.It houses the Alabama Supreme Court,Alabama Court of Civil Appeals,and Alabama Court of Criminal Appeals.Alabamas government is divided into three coequal branches.The legislative branch is the Alabama Legislature,a bicameral assembly composed of the Alabama House of Representatives,with  members,and the Alabama Senate,with  members.The Legislature is responsible for writing,debating,passing,or defeating state legislation.Until ,the state elected state senators by county,with one per county.urbanized areas were grossly underrepresented.It had not changed legislative districts to reflect the decennial censuses,either.In Reynolds v.Sims ,the US Supreme Court implemented the principle of quot;one man,one votequot;,Further,it ruled that both houses of bicameral state legislatures had to be apportioned by population,as there was no constitutional basis for states to have geographically based systems.At that time,Alabama and many other states had to change their legislative districting,as many across the country had systems that underrepresented urban areas and districts.This had caused decades of underinvestment in such areas.For instance,Birmingham and Jefferson County taxes had supplied onethird of the state budget,but Jefferson County received only th of state services in funding.Through the legislative delegations,the Alabama legislature kept control of county governments.The executive branch is responsible for the execution and oversight of laws.It is headed by the Governor of Alabama.Other members of executive branch include the cabinet,the Attorney General of Alabama,the Alabama Secretary of State,the Alabama State Treasurer,and the State Auditor of Alabama.BentleyRobert Bentley.The List of Lieutenant Governors of Alabamalieutenant governor is Republican Kay Ivey.The State supreme courtstates highest court is the Supreme Court of Alabama.Alabama uses partisan elections to choose judges,and since the s judicial campaigns have become increasingly politicized.lt;ref namequot;AJSquot;gt;http:www.judicialselection.usjudicialselectionindex.stateAL Judicial Selection in the States: Alabama,American Judicature Society.lt;refgt; The current chief justice of the Alabama Supreme Court is Republican Roy Moore.All sitting justices on the Alabama Supreme Court are members of the Republican Party.There are two intermediate appellate courts,the Court of Civil Appeals and the Court of Criminal Appeals,and four trial courts: the circuit court trial court of general jurisdiction,and the district,probate,and municipal courts.The members of the Legislature take office immediately after the November elections.Statewide officials such as the governor,lieutenant governor,attorney general,and other constitutional officers take office the following January.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.legislature.state.usmisclegislativeprocesslegislativeprocessml.Alabama levies a ,or  percent State income taxpersonal income tax,depending upon the amount earned and filing status.and can do so even if taking the standard deduction.The states general sales tax rate is .lt;refgt;Waybackdate urlhttp:www.taxadmin.orgftarateslsales.html titleComparison of State and Local Retail Sales Taxes.taxadmin.July ,Retrieved December ,lt;refgt;  Sales tax rates for cities and counties are also added to purchases.lt;refgt;http:revenue.alabama.govpublicationsbusinesstaxessalesSalesTaxSalesTaxBrochure.pdf Sales Tax Brochure.State of Alabama.Retrieved December ,lt;refgt; For example,the total sales tax rate in Mobile is  and there is an additional restaurant tax of ,which means that a diner in Mobile would pay an  tax on a meal.As of,sales and excise taxes in Alabama account for  of all state and local revenue,compared with an average of about  nationwide.lt;ref namequot;cbpp.orgquot;gt; Alabama is one of seven states that levy a tax on food at the same rate as other goods,Most states exempt groceries from sales tax or apply a lower tax rate.lt;refgt;http:www.cbpp.orgfilessfp.pdf Which States Tax the Sale of Food for Home Consumption in ?Center on Budget and Policy Priorities,November ,Alabamas income tax on poor working families is among the highest in the United States.lt;ref namequot;cbpp.which is barely onequarter of the federal poverty line.lt;ref namequot;cbpp.lt;ref namequot;cbpp.orgquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.cbpp.orgcmsindex.faviewamp;id titleReducing Alabamas Income Tax on WorkingPoor Families: Two Options date April ,publisherCbpp.org accessdateOctober ,The corporate income tax rate is currently .The overall federal,state,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.taxfoundation.orgfilesslburdenalabama.pdf titleAlabama State Local Tax Burden Compared to U.Average  accessdateMay ,formatPDF workTax Foundationarchiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.taxfoundation.orgfilesslburdenalabama.pdf archivedate June ,deadurl nolt;refgt;  Property taxes are the lowest in the U.The current state constitution requires a voter referendum to raise property taxes.Since Alabamas tax structure largely depends on consumer spending,it is subject to high variable budget structure.For example,in  Alabama had an annual budget deficit as high as amp;nbsp;million.Alabama has  county United Statescounties.Each county has its own elected legislative branch,usually called the county commission.It also has limited executive authority in the county.Because of the constraints of the Alabama Constitution,only seven counties Jefferson,Lee,Mobile,Madison,Montgomery,Shelby,and Tuscaloosa in the state have limited home rule.Instead,ranging from waste disposal to land use zoning.The cumbersome process results in local jurisdictions being unable to manage their problems,and the state legislators are buried in local county issues.as recommended by the  Alabama Constitutional Commission.lt;ref namequot;homequot;gt; Legislative delegations retain certain powers over each county.United States Supreme Court decisions in Baker v.Carr  required that both houses have districts established on the basis of population,and redistricted after each census,in order to implement the principle of quot;one man,one votequot;.Before that,each county was represented by one state senator,leading to underrepresentation in the state senate for more urbanized,populous counties.Alabamas constitution has been amended more than  times,and almost onethird of the amendments are local in nature,applying to only one county or city.A significant part of each legislative session is spent on local legislation,taking away time and attention of legislators from issues of statewide importance.quot;lt;ref namequot;homequot;gt;http:www.encyclopediaofalabama.orgarticlehsthash.CMEMRNbK.dpuf Albert P.Brewer,quot;Home Rulequot;,Encyclopedia of Alabama,On November ,Jefferson County,which was  billion in debt at the time,declared bankruptcy.This is the secondlargest Chapter ,Title ,United States CodeChapter  municipal bankruptcy in the United States,after the Detroit bankruptcy.lt;refgt;http:www.comjeffco Jefferson County bankruptcy articles from the Huntsville Times.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Associated Press,http:www.tuscaloosanews.comarticleNEWS Jefferson County emerges from bankruptcy,December ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Shelly Sigo,http:www.bondbuyer.comissuesbankruptcyoverbutjeffersoncountyalawillremaininthenews.html quot;Bankruptcy Over,But Jefferson County,Ala.Will Remain in the Newsquot;,Bond Buyer,December ,Alabama is an alcoholic beverage control state,meaning that the state government holds a monopoly on the sale of alcohol.Twentyfive of the  counties are quot;Dry countydry countiesquot; which ban the sale of alcohol,and there are many dry municipalities even in counties which permit alcohol sales.lt;refgt;http:abcboard.alabama.govSsjzjlnddpfshvrhppmpsbwetdrymap.aspx WetDry Map,Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.Rank !County !Population lt;br gt; Census !Seat !Jefferson County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Birmingham,Mobile County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Mobile,Madison County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Huntsville,Montgomery County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Montgomery,Shelby County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Columbiana,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Hoover,AlabamaHoover part lt;br gt; Alabaster,Tuscaloosa County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Tuscaloosa,Baldwin County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Bay Minette,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Daphne,Lee County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Opelika,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Auburn,Morgan County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Decatur,Calhoun County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Anniston,Etowah County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Gadsden,Houston County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Dothan,Marshall County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Guntersville,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Albertville,Lauderdale County,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Florence,Clair County,AlabamaSt.stylequot;textalign:center;quot; ,stylequot;textalign:center;quot; Ashville,AlabamaAshville amp; lt;br gt; Pell City,File:Robert Bentley.jpgthumbupright.Robert J.Bentley,governor since January ,File:Kay Ivey.jpgthumbupright.Kay Ivey,During Reconstruction era of the United StatesReconstruction following the American Civil War,In ,in part by suppressing the AfricanAmerican vote through violence,fraud and intimidation.After ,a process completed in provisions of the  constitution.Provisions which disenfranchised African Americans resulted in excluding many poor Whites.By  more Whites than African Americans had been disenfranchised: ,to ,The total effects were greater on the AfricanAmerican community,From  through the s,As counties were the basis of election districts,until a series of federal court cases required redistricting in  to meet equal representation.when Whites bureaucratically,and at times,violently resisted protests for electoral and social reform.Democrat George Wallace,the states only fourterm governor,was a controversial figure who vowed to maintain segregation.among other civil rights.In many jurisdictions,they continued to be excluded from representation by atlarge electoral systems,which allowed the majority of the population to dominate elections.the Alabama Legislature passed,In a symbolic ceremony,the bill was signed in the Alabama State Capitol,which housed Congress of the Confederate States of America.Republicans won control of both houses of the legislature for the first time in  years,after a nearly complete realignment of political parties,who represent different visions in the st century.With the Disfranchisement after Reconstruction eradisfranchisement of African Americans in ,the state became part of the quot;Solid Southquot;,For nearly amp;nbsp;years,local and state elections in Alabama were decided in the Democratic Party primary electionprimary,Since the mid to lateth century,however,there has been a realignment among the two major political parties,and white conservatives started shifting to the Republican Party.In Alabama,majoritywhite districts are now expected to regularly elect Republican candidates to federal,state and local office.Members of the nine seats on the Alabama Supreme Courtlt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:blog.comspotnewssuebellcobbconsideringrunn.html titleSue Bell Cobb considering running for governor workThe Birmingham News dateMay ,accessdateAugust ,lt;refgt; and all ten seats on the state appellate courts are elected to office.Until ,no Republicans held any of the court seats.In that general election,the thenincumbent Chief Justice of Alabama,Ernest C.Hornsby,refused to leave office after losing the election by approximately ,votes to Republican Perry O.Hooper,In the early st century,Republicans hold six of the eight elected seats on the Alabama State Board of Education.In ,Republicans took large majorities of both chambers of the state legislature,giving them control of that body for the first time in  years.The last remaining statewide Democrat,who served on the Alabama Public Service Commission was defeated in .lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.state.uscommissioners.htm titleCommissioners publisherPsc.state.us accessdateAugust ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite webauthorSpecial urlhttp:blog.comspotnewslucybaxleywinsalabamapubli.html title Lucy Baxley wins Alabama Public Service Commission presidency,but recount possible publisherBirmingham News via al.com dateNovember ,accessdateAugust ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:blog.comspotnewslucybaxleywinsalabamapubli.html archivedate August ,deadurl nolt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite webauthorJeff Amy,PressRegister urlhttp:blog.comlivepublicservicecommission.html titlePublic Service Commission: Twinkle Cavanaugh,Terry Dunn join GOP sweep publisher al.com accessdateJune ,archiveurl web.archive.orgwebhttp:blog.comlivepublicservicecommission.html archivedate May ,Only two Republican Lieutenant Governors have been elected since the end of Reconstruction,when Republicans generally represented Reconstruction government,including the newly emancipated freedmen who had gained the franchise.The two GOP Lt.Governors were Steve Windom  and the current Lt.Governor,Kay Ivey,who was elected in  and reelected in .Many local offices County Commissioners,Boards of Education,Tax Assessors,Tax Collectors,etc.in the state are still held by Democrats.Many rural counties have voters who are majority Democrats,resulting in local elections being decided in the Democratic primary.although there are exceptions.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:uselectionatlas.orgRESULTSstate.org accessdateAugust ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:uselectionatlas.orgRESULTSstate.org dateFebruary ,accessdateAugust ,Alabamas  County Sheriffs are elected in partisan,atlarge races,and Democrats still retain the narrow majority of those posts.The current split is  Alabama Democratic PartyDemocrats,Alabama Republican PartyRepublicans,and one Independent Fayette.lt;ref namequot;ASAquot;gt;http:www.alabamasheriffs.compages?id Alabama Sheriffs Associationlt;refgt; However,most of the Democratic sheriffs preside over rural and less populated counties.citation neededdateNovember  as of,the state of Alabama has one female sheriff,in Morgan County,Alabama,and ten AfricanAmerican sheriffs.The states two United States SenateU.senators are Jeff SessionsJefferson B.Sessions III and Richard ShelbyRichard C.Shelby,both Republicans.Shelby was originally elected to the Senate as a Democrat in  and reelected in ,but switched parties immediately following the November  general election.In the U.House of Representatives,the state is represented by seven members,six of whom are Republicans: Bradley Byrne,Mike D.Rogers,Robert Aderholt,Morris J.Brooks,Martha Roby,and Gary Palmer politicianGary Palmer and one Democrat: Terri Sewell.furtherUnited States presidential election in Alabama,File:Vestavia Hills High School.Together,individual schools provide education for ,elementary and secondary students.lt;ref namequot;qfactsquot;gt;cite weburl http:www.alsde.eduseccommPagesquickfactsitem.aspx?FilterFieldIDamp;FilterValue title Alabama Education Quick Facts  accessdate April ,In FY ,Alabama appropriated ,for primary and secondary education.That represented an increase of ,over the previous fiscal year.In ,using measures determined by the state of Alabama.While Alabamas public education system has improved in recent decades,it lags behind in achievement compared to other states.According to U.Census data,Alabamas high school graduation rateis the fourth lowest in the U.after Kentucky,Louisiana and Mississippi.lt;refgt;http:www.census.govprodpubsckbr.lt;refgt;http:www.censusscope.orgusscharteducation.html Education Statistics.CensusScope.File:Harrisonplaza.jpgthumbleftHarrison Plaza at the University of North Alabama in Florence.The school was chartered as LaGrange College by the Alabama Legislature in .Alabamas programs of higher education include  fouryear public universities,twoyear community colleges,and  private,undergraduate and graduate universities.In the state are four medical schools as of fall  University of Alabama School of Medicine,two veterinary colleges Auburn University and Tuskegee University,a dental school University of Alabama School of Dentistry,an optometry college University of Alabama at Birmingham,two pharmacy schools Auburn University and Samford University,and five law schools University of Alabama School of Law,Birmingham School of Law,Cumberland School of Law,Miles Law School,and the Thomas Goode Jones School of Law.Public,ache.alabama.govCollegesamp;UniversitiesDirectory.htm accessdateJuly ,File:William J.Samford Hall.jpgthumbrightWilliam J.The largest single campus is the University of Alabama,located in Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa,with ,enrolled for fall .lt;refgt;http:www.tuscaloosanews.comarticleNEWS?TuscaloosaNews.com September ,Retrieved on July ,lt;refgt; Troy University was the largest institution in the state in ,with an enrollment of ,students across four Alabama campuses Troy,AlabamaTroy,Dothan,AlabamaDothan,Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery,and Phenix City,AlabamaPhenix City,as well as sixty learning sites in seventeen other states and eleven other countries.The oldest institutions are the public University of North Alabama in Florence,AlabamaFlorence and the Catholic Churchaffiliated Spring Hill College in Mobile,AlabamaMobile,both founded in .lt;ref namequot;unaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.edumakinghistory titleHistory in the making publisherUniversity of North Alabama accessdateJuly ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgeLs archivedateAugust ,deadurlnolt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;shcquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgiAFs archivedateAugust ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:directory.abhe.orgdefault.aspx?statusMember titleMembers publisherAssociation for Biblical Higher Education accessdateJune ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgAJ archivedateAugust ,deadurlnolt;refgt; the Council on Occupational Education COE,lt;refgt;cite webtitleMembership Directoryurlhttp:www.council.orgformsaccmembership.pdfformatPDFpublisherCouncil on Operational EducationaccessdateAugust ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgiiYeIyBarchivedateAugust ,lt;refgt;cite webtitleACICS Website Directoryurlhttp:www.acics.orguploadedFilesPublications.pdfformatPDFpublisherAccrediting Council for Independent Colleges and SchoolsaccessdateAugust ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgiiMuVRGarchivedateAugust ,dateJuly ,According to the  U.News amp; World Report,Auburn University at ,and University of Alabama at Birmingham at .lt;refgt;cite webtitleTop Public Schoolsurlhttp:colleges.usnews.rankingsandreviews.combestcollegesrankingsnationaluniversitiestoppublicsppBpublisherU.News amp; World ReportaccessdateSeptember ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgmTinjiNarchivedateSeptember ,According to the  U.News amp; World Report,Alabama had four tier  universities University of Alabama,Auburn University,University of Alabama at Birmingham and University of Alabama in Huntsville.lt;refgt;http:colleges.usnews.rankingsandreviews.Colleges.usnews.rankingsandreviews.Retrieved on July ,File:BryantDenny Stadium by Highsmith .College football is popular in Alabama,rivals in the Southeastern Conference.In the  season,Alabama averaged over ,fans per game and Auburn averaged over ,fans,both numbers among the top  in the nation in average attendance.lt;refgt;http:fs.ncaa.orgDocsstatsfootballrecordsAttendance.pdf  NATIONAL COLLEGE FOOTBALL ATTENDANCE,NCAA.Retrieved August ,lt;refgt; BryantDenny Stadium is the home of the Alabama football team,and has a seating capacity of ,lt;refgt;cite webtitleBryantDenny Stadiumurlhttp:www.rolltide.comfacilitiesbryantdenny.htmlworkRollTide.compublisherUniversity of AlabamaaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt; and is the fifth largest stadium in America.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.worldstadiums.comstadiummenustadiumlist.shtml titleStadium List:   Stadiums publisherWorld Stadiums accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt;  JordanHare Stadium is the home field of the Auburn football team and seats up to ,lt;refgt;cite webtitleJordanHare Stadiumurlhttp:www.auburntigers.comfacilitiesjordanharestadium.htmlworkAuburn AthleticspublisherAuburn UniversityaccessdateJuly ,Legion Field is home for the UAB Blazers football program and the Papajohns.com Bowl.It seats ,lt;refgt;cite webtitleLegion Fieldurlhttp:www.uabsports.comticketsalbrticketslegion.htmlInfoworkUABSports.compublisherUniversity of Alabama at BirminghamaccessdateJuly ,lt;refgt;  LaddPeebles Stadium in Mobile,AlabamaMobile is the home of the University of South Alabama football team,and serves as the home of the Senior BowlNCAA Senior Bowl,GoDaddy.com Bowl,and AlabamaMississippi All Star Classic; the stadium seats ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.laddpeeblesstadium.com titleWelcome to Ladd Peebles Stadium publisherLaddpeeblesstadium.com dateJanuary ,accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt;  In ,after previously being held at Legion Field in Birmingham.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:blog.comsentellsuperbyebyebirmingham.html titleSuper  leaving Birmingham for BryantDenny,JordanHare stadiums amp;; al.com publisherBlog.com accessdateFebruary ,File:Hoover Met CIMG.File:Hank Aaron Stadium.Alabama has several professional and semiprofessional sports teams,including four minor league baseball teams.Huntsville,Davidson High School Mobile,The Talladega Superspeedway motorsports complex hosts a series of NASCAR events.It has a seating capacity of ,and is the thirteenth largest stadium in the world and sixth largest stadium in America.Also,the Barber Motorsports Park has hosted IndyCar Series and Rolex Sports Car Series races.The ATP Birmingham was a World Championship Tennis tournament held from  to .Alabama has hosted several professional golf tournaments,such as the  and  PGA Championship at Shoal Creek Golf and Country ClubShoal Creek PGA Tour,the Mobile LPGA Tournament of Champions,Airbus LPGA Classic and Yokohama Tire LPGA Classic LPGA Tour,and The Tradition Champions Tour.File:Montgomery Regional Airport New Terminal.JPGthumbTerminal at the Montgomery Regional Airport in Montgomery.File:IIBirmingham.JPGthumbInterstate  cosigned with Interstate  approaching Interstate  in downtown Birmingham.File:Mobile Alabama harbor aerial view.jpgthumbAerial view of the port of Mobile.Huntsville International Airport HSV,Dothan Regional Airport DHN,Mobile Regional Airport MOB,Montgomery Regional Airport MGM,and Northwest Alabama Regional AirportMuscle Shoals  Northwest Alabama Regional Airport MSL.For rail transport,Amtrak schedules the Crescent trainCrescent,a daily passenger train,running from New York to New Orleans with stops at Anniston,Birmingham,and Tuscaloosa.traveling from west to east through Mobile.Another interstate,Interstate  in AlabamaI,is currently under construction.When completed,it will connect Birmingham with Memphis,Tennessee.In addition,there are currently five auxiliary interstate routes in the state: Interstate I in Mobile,Interstate I in Tuscaloosa,Interstate I around Birmingham,Interstate I in Decatur and Huntsville,and Interstate I in Gadsden.A sixth route,Interstate I,will be formed when I is rerouted along a new southern bypass of Montgomery.A proposed northern bypass of Birmingham will be designated as Interstate I.Since a direct connection from I to I will not be possible,Interstate I has been proposed,as well.Several U.Highways also pass through the state,such as U.Route  in AlabamaU.Routeamp;nbsp; US,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,Route  in AlabamaUS,and U.Route  in AlabamaUS.There are four toll roads in the state: Montgomery Expressway in Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery; Tuscaloosa Bypass in Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa; Emerald Mountain Expressway in Wetumpka,AlabamaWetumpka; and Beach Express in Orange Beach,AlabamaOrange Beach.The Port of Mobile,Alabamas only saltwater port,The Port of Mobile was ranked th by tons of traffic in the United States during .lt;ref namequot;tonstrafficquot;gt;cite webtitleTable .Top U.Ports by Tons of Traffic:  workU.Army Corps of Engineers  urlhttp:www.census.govcompendiastatabtabless.pdf  accessdateJuly ,lt;ref namequot;containersquot;gt;cite webtitleU.Waterborne Container Traffic by PortWaterway in  Loaded and Empty TEUS workU.Army Corps of Engineers urlhttp:www.navigationdatacenter.uswcscbyporttons.html accessdateJuly ,lt;refgt;  The states other ports are on rivers with access to the Gulf of Mexico.Water ports of Alabama,Port of Florence,AlabamaFlorence Florence,AlabamaFlorenceMuscle Shoals,AlabamaMuscle Shoals,Port of Decatur  Decatur,AlabamaDecatur,Port of Guntersville,AlabamaGuntersville Guntersville,AlabamaGuntersville,Port of Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham  Birmingham,AlabamaBirmingham,Port of Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa Tuscaloosa,AlabamaTuscaloosa,Port of Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery  Montgomery,AlabamaMontgomery,on R.Port of Mobile  Mobile,AlabamaMobile,:For a detailed bibliography,see the History of Alabama.Atkins,Leah Rawls,Wayne Flynt,William Warren Rogers,and David Ward.Flynt,Wayne.Owen Thomas M.History of Alabama and Dictionary of Alabama Biography  vols.Jackson,Harvey H.Mohl,Raymond A.Peirce,Neal R.The Deep South States of America: People,Politics,and Power in the Seven Deep South States .Information on politics and economics .Williams,Benjamin Buford.A Literary History of Alabama: The Nineteenth Century .WPA.PLEASE BE CAUTIOUS IN ADDING MORE LINKS TO THIS ARTICLE.is not a collection of links nor should it be used for advertising.Excessive or inappropriate links WILL BE DELETED.See Wikipedia:External links amp; Wikipedia:Spam for details.If there are already plentiful links,replacements on this articles discussion page,to the relevant category at the Open Directory Project dmoz.and link back to that category using the dmoz template.http:www.alabama.gov Alabama.http:www.govrrprogrambibstatesalabamaindex.html Alabama State Guide,http:www.archives.state.usaaa.html All About Alabama,http:www.alarc.http:tonto.govstatestateenergyprofiles.sidAL Energy Data amp; Statistics for Alabama from the U.http:www.touralabama.org TourAlabama.http:www.alabamamosaic.org AlabamaMosaic,a digital repository of materials on Alabamas history,culture,places,http:www.legislature.state.usCodeofAlabamacoatoc.http:www.usgs.govstatestate.StateAL USGS realtime,geographic,http:quickfacts.census.govqfdstates.html Alabama QuickFacts from the U.http:www.usda.govdataproductsstatefactsheetsstatedata.aspx?StateFIPSamp;StateNameAlabama.UeFfvgs Alabama State Fact Sheet from the U.East flagGeorgia U.sttltitleList of U.states by date of admission to the UnionyearsAdmitted on December ,Alabama cities and mayors of ,Coord.type:admnddim:source:USGSdisplaytitlelt;!Category:U.commentReverted  edit by Special:Contributions.commentTentatively adding template langgrc and translgrc in a few places.File:Achilles departure Eretria Painter CdM Paris .Bibliothque nationale,File:Achilles.jpgthumbHead of Achilles depicted on a thcentury BC coin from Pelasgia,PhthiotisKremaste,Phthia.Reverse: Thetis,wearing Chiton costumechiton and holding shield of Achilles with his AX monogram.In Greek mythology,Achilles IPAcenkliz; langgrc,Akhilleus,His mother was the nymph Thetis,and his father,Peleus,was the king of the Myrmidons.Although the death of Achilles is not presented in the Iliad,other sources concur that he was killed near the end of the Trojan War by Paris mythologyParis,who shot him in the heel with an arrow.Because of his death from a small wound in the heel,the term Achilles heel has come to mean a persons point of weakness.tribe,nation.quot; In other words,Achilles is an embodiment of the grief of the people,grief being a theme raised numerous times in the Iliad frequently by Achilles.usually glory in war.Laos has been construed by Gregory Nagy,lt;refgt;cite weblastNagyfirstGregorytitleThe best of the Achaeansurlhttp:chs.harvard.eduCHSarticledisplaywebsitehttp:chs.harvard.edupublisherThe Center for Hellenic Studiesaccessdate March lt;refgt; following Leonard Palmer,to mean quot;a corps of soldiersquot;,a muster militarymuster.With this derivation,the name would have a double meaning in the poem: when the hero is functioning rightly,his men bring grief to the enemy,but when wrongly,his men get the grief of war.The poem is in part about the misdirection of anger on the part of leadership.Robert S.BeekesR.Beekes has suggested a PreGreek origin of the name.lt;refgt;Robert S.BeekesR.Beekes,Etymological Dictionary of Greek,Brill,The name Achilleus was a common and attested name among the Greeks soon after the th century BC.lt;refgt;http:epigraphy.packhum.orginscriptionssearch?pattAXILamp;first Epigraphical database gives  matches for .The earliest ones: http:epigraphy.packhum.orginscriptionsoi?ikeyamp;bookidamp;regionamp;subregion Corinth th c.http:epigraphy.packhum.orginscriptionsoi?ikeyamp;bookidamp;regionamp;subregion Delphi  BC,Attica and Elis th c.in the form Achillia,File:Peter Paul Rubens .jpgthumbThetis Dipping the Infant Achilles into the River Styx ca.Achilles was the son of the Nereid Thetis and Peleus,the king of the Myrmidons.Zeus and Poseidon had been rivals for the hand of Thetis until Prometheus,the forethinker,warned Zeus of a prophecy that Thetis would bear a son greater than his father.For this reason,the two gods withdrew their pursuit,and had her wed Peleus.lt;refgt;Aeschylus,Prometheus Bound ; Pindar,Nemean .Isthmian .; Poeticon astronomicon ii.There is a tale which offers an alternative version of these events: in Argonautica iv.Zeus sister and wife Hera alludes to Thetis chaste resistance to the advances of Zeus,that Thetis was so loyal to Heras marriage bond that she coolly rejected him.Thetis,although a daughter of the seagod Nereus,was also brought up by Hera,further explaining her resistance to the advances of Zeus.So Hera recommended that she marry Peleus,as he was as near to a mortal as she was ever going to get.File:The Education of Achilles,by James Barry.jpgthumbleftThe Education of Achilles ca.According to the Achilleid,written by Statius in the st century AD,and to no surviving previous sources,when Achilles was born Thetis tried to make him immortal,by dipping him in the river Styx.However,he was left vulnerable at the part of the body by which she held him,his heellt;refgt;cite book last  Burgess first  Jonathan S.title  The Death and Afterlife of Achilles url  https:books.google.Achilles tendon.It is not clear if this version of events was known earlier.In another version of this story,Thetis anointed the boy in ambrosia and put him on top of a fire,to burn away the mortal parts of his body.She was interrupted by Peleus and abandoned both father and son in a rage.lt;refgt;Apollonius of Rhodes,Argonautica .However,none of the sources before Statius makes any reference to this general invulnerability.To the contrary,in the Iliad Homer mentions Achilles being wounded: in Book  the Paeonian hero Asteropaeus,son of Pelagon,challenged Achilles by the river Scamander.He cast two spears at once,one grazed Achilles elbow,quot;drawing a spurt of bloodquot;.Also,in the fragmentary poems of the Epic Cycle in which we can find description of the heros death,Cypria unknown author,Aithiopis by Arctinus of Miletus,Little Iliad by Lesche of Mytilene,Iliou persis by Arctinus of Miletus,the arrow or in many cases,arrows hit his body.Peleus entrusted Achilles to Chiron the Centaur,on Mt.Pelion,to be reared.lt;refgt;Hesiod,Catalogue of Women,MW; Iliad .File:The Rage of Achilles by Giovanni Battista Tiepolo.jpegthumbThe Rage of Achilles,:langgrc,,:Sing,Goddess,of the rage of Peleus son Achilles,:the accursed rage that brought great suffering to the Achaeans HomerAchaeans.Achilles consuming rage is at times wavering,but at other times he cannot be cooled.Thetis foretold that her sons fate was either to gain glory and die young,or to live a long but uneventful life in obscurity.Achilles chose the former,and decided to take part in the Trojan war.lt;refgt;Illiad .amp;c.lt;refgt; According to the Iliad,Achilles arrived at Troy with  ships,each carrying  Myrmidons Book .He appointed five leaders each leader commanding  Myrmidons: Menesthius,Eudorus,Peisander,Phoenix and Alcimedon Book .When the Greeks left for the Trojan War,they accidentally stopped in Mysia,ruled by King Telephus.In the resulting battle,Achilles gave Telephus a wound that would not heal; Telephus consulted an oracle,who stated that quot;he that wounded shall healquot;.Guided by the oracle,he arrived at Argos,where Achilles healed him in order that he might become their guide for the voyage to Troy.lt;ref namequot;Library of Mythology Epitome .quot;gt;cite weblastApollodorustitleLibrary of Mythology Epitome .urlhttp:www.theoi.comTextApollodorusE.htmlwebsitetheoi.According to other reports in Euripides lost play about Telephus,Achilles refused,claiming to have no medical knowledge.Alternatively,Telephus held Orestes mythologyOrestes for ransom,the ransom being Achilles aid in healing the wound.Odysseus reasoned that the spear had inflicted the wound; therefore,the spear must be able to heal it.Pieces of the spear were scraped off onto the wound and Telephus was healed.lt;ref namequot;Library of Mythology Epitome .when the Achaeans HomerAchaeans desired to return home,they were restrained by Achilles,who afterwards attacked the cattle of Aeneas,sacked neighboring cities and killed Troilus.lt;ref namequot;stoa.orgquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.stoa.orghoppertext.docStoa:text:.titleProclus Summary of the Cypria publisherStoa.In Dares Phrygius Account of the Destruction of Troy,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:homepage.comcparadaGMLDaresTW.html titleDares account of the destruction of Troy,Greek Mythology Link publisherHomepage.com date accessdate March  archiveurl http:web.archive.orgwebhttp:homepage.comcparadaGMLDaresTW.html archivedate  December lt;!Troilus was a young Trojan prince,the youngest of King Priams or sometimes Apollo and Hecubas five legitimate sons.Despite his youth,he was one of the main Trojan war leaders.Yet Achilles,struck by the beauty of both Troilus and his sister Polyxena,and overcome with lust,directed his sexual attentions on the youthamp;nbsp; who,refusing to yield,instead found himself decapitated upon an altaromphalos of Apollo.In this version of the myth,Achilles death therefore came in retribution for this sacrilege.lt;refgt;James Davidson,http:www.ukvndavi.html quot;Zeus Be Nice Nowquot; in London Review of Books;  July ,Had Troilus lived to adulthood,the First Vatican Mythographer claimed,Troy would have been invincible.File:AmbrosianIliadPictAchilles.jpgthumbAchilles sacrificing to Zeus,from the Ambrosian Iliad,Homers Iliad is the most famous narrative of Achilles deeds in the Trojan War.Achilles wrath is the central theme of the poem.The Homeric epic only covers a few weeks of the war,and does not narrate Achilles death.It begins with Achilles withdrawal from battle after he is dishonored by Agamemnon,the commander of the Achaeans HomerAchaean forces.Agamemnon had taken a woman named Chryseis as his slave.Her father Chryses,a priest of Apollo,begs Agamemnon to return her to him.Agamemnon refuses and Apollo sends a plague amongst the Greeks.Achilles does so and Calchas declares Chryseis must be returned to her father.Agamemnon consents,but then commands that Achilles battle prize Briseis be brought to him to replace Chryseis.Angry at the dishonor of having his plunder and glory taken away and as he says later,because he loved Briseis,lt;refgt;Iliad .lt;refgt; with the urging of his mother Thetis,Achilles refuses to fight or lead his troops alongside the other Greek forces.At this same time,burning with rage over Agamemnons theft,Achilles prays to Thetis to convince Zeus to help the Trojans gain ground in the war,so that he may regain his honor.As the battle turns against the Greeks,thanks to the influence of Zeus,and urges the king to appease the warrior.Agamemnon agrees and sends Odysseus and two other chieftains,Ajax mythologyAjax and Phoenix son of AmyntorPhoenix,to Achilles with the offer of the return of Briseis and other gifts.Achilles rejects all Agamemnon offers him,and simply urges the Greeks to sail home as he was planning to do.The Trojans,led by Hector,subsequently push the Greek army back toward the beaches and assault the Greek ships.With the Greek forces on the verge of absolute destruction,Patroclus leads the Myrmidons into battle wearing Achilles armor,though Achilles remains at his camp.Patroclus succeeds in pushing the Trojans back from the beaches,but is killed by Hector before he can lead a proper assault on the city of Troy.File:Triumph of Achilles in Corfu Achilleion.After receiving the news of the death of Patroclus from Antilochus,the son of Nestor,Achilles grieves over his beloved companions death.His mother Thetis comes to comfort the distraught Achilles.She persuades Hephaestus to make new armor for him,in place of the armor that Patroclus had been wearing which was taken by Hector.The new armor includes the Shield of Achilles,described in great detail in the poem.Enraged over the death of Patroclus,The god tries to drown Achilles but is stopped by Hera and Hephaestus.seeming to show that the unhindered rage of Achilles can defy fate itself.Finally,Achilles finds his prey.Achilles chases Hector around the wall of Troy three times before Athena,in the form of Hectors favorite and dearest brother,Deiphobus,persuades Hector to stop running and fight Achilles face to face.After Hector realizes the trick,he knows the battle is inevitable.Wanting to go down fighting,he charges at Achilles with his only weapon,his sword,but misses.Accepting his fate,Hector begs Achilles,not to spare his life,but to treat his body with respect after killing him.Achilles tells Hector it is hopeless to expect that of him,declaring that quot;my rage,lt;refgt;quot;The Iliadquot;,Fagles translation.Penguin Books,lt;refgt; Achilles then kills Hector and drags his corpse by its heels behind his chariot.After having a dream where Patroclus begs Achilles hold his funeral,Achilles hosts a series of funeral games in his honor.With the assistance of the god Hermes,Hectors father,Priam,Achilles relents and promises a truce for the duration of the funeral.The poem ends with a description of Hectors funeral,with the doom of Troy and Achilles himself still to come.Achilles,after his temporary truce with Priam,fought and killed the AmazonsAmazonian warrior queen Penthesilea,but later grieved over her death.At first,he was so distracted by her beauty,he did not fight as intensely as usual.Once he realized that his distraction was endangering his life,he refocused and killed her.Memnon,File:Achilles thniskon in Corfu.Following the death of Patroclus,Achilles closest companion was Nestors son Antilochus.When Memnon mythologyMemnon,king of Ethiopia mythologyEthiopia slew Antilochus,Achilles once more obtained revenge on the battlefield,killing Memnon.except that Memnon unlike Hector was also the son of a goddess.The episode then formed the basis of the Epic Cyclecyclic epic Aethiopis,which was composed after the Iliad,possibly in the th century B.The Aethiopis is now lost,except for scattered fragments quoted by later authors.The death of Achilles,as predicted by Hector with his dying breath,was brought about by Paris mythologyParis with an arrow to the heel according to Statius.In some versions,the god Apollo guided Paris arrow.File:Aias body Akhilleus Staatliche Antikensammlungen .jpgthumbAjax carries off the body of Achilles: AtticaAttic blackfigure lekythos,BC,from Sicily Staatliche Antikensammlungen,All of these versions deny Paris any sort of valor,owing to the common conception that Paris was a coward and not the man his brother Hector was,and Achilles remained undefeated on the battlefield.His bones were mingled with those of Patroclus,and funeral games were held.Another version of Achilles death is that he fell deeply in love with one of the Trojan princesses,Polyxena.Achilles asks Priam for Polyxenas hand in marriage.But while Priam is overseeing the private marriage of Polyxena and Achilles,Paris,who would have to give up Helen if Achilles married his sister,hides in the bushes and shoots Achilles with a divine arrow,killing him.In the Odyssey,Agamemnon informs Achilles of his burial mound while they are receiving the dead suitors in Hades.lt;refgt; Achilles was cremated and his ashes buried in the same urn as those of Patroclus.lt;refgt;Hamilton E.Mythology,Paris was later killed by Philoctetes using the enormous bow of Heracles.who after considering both men came to a consensus in favor of Odysseus.Furious,Ajax cursed Odysseus,which earned the ire of Athena.Athena temporarily made Ajax so mad with grief and anguish that he began killing sheep,thinking them his comrades.After a while,when Athena lifted his madness and Ajax realized that he had actually been killing sheep,Ajax was left so ashamed that he committed suicide.Odysseus eventually gave the armor to Neoptolemus,the son of Achilles.Lycia,a port on the Pamphylian Gulf.The city was visited in  BC by Alexander the Great,who envisioned himself as the new Achilles and carried the Iliad with him,but his court biographers do not mention the spear.lt;refgt;quot;Alexander came to rest at Phaselis,a coastal city which was later renowned for the possession of Achilles original spear.quot; Robin Lane Fox,Alexander the Great .lt;refgt; However,it was shown in the time of Pausanias geographerPausanias in the nd century AD.lt;refgt;Pausanias,iii.; see Christian Jacob and Anne MullenHohl,Yale French Studies : Rethinking History: Time,Myth,and Writing : esp.File:Achilles Ajax dice Louvre MNB.jpgthumbleftupright.Achilles and Ajax playing the board game Petteia.Blackfigure Attic lekythos,Achilles,Numerous paintings on pottery have suggested a tale not mentioned in the literary traditions.At some point in the war,Achilles and Ajax mythologyAjax were playing a board game petteia.lt;refgt;http:www.personal.eduwxkromapetteia.html quot;Petteiaquot;.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.gamesmuseum.uwaterloo.caArchivesAustinindex.html quot;Greek Board Gamesquot;.lt;refgt; They were absorbed in the game and oblivious to the surrounding battle.lt;refgt;http:www.personal.eduuserswxwxkromalatruncu.html quot;Latrunculiquot;.lt;refgt; The Trojans attacked and reached the heroes,who were saved only by an intervention of Athena.lt;refgt;Ioannis KakridisKakridis,Greek mythology.Athens: Ekdotiki Athinon.Vol.In the Iliad,it appears to be the model of a deep and loyal friendship.Homer does not suggest that Achilles and his close friend Patroclus were lovers.however,Achilles and his equally close friend Patroclus provided the legendary model for this friendship,but Homer in the Iliad never suggested that they had sex with each other.That came from later authors.If Alexander and Hephaestion did have a sexual relationship,it would have been transgressive by majority Greek standards.this theory was expressed by some later authors.In thcentury BC Athens,In Platos Symposium,lt;refgt;Plato,Symposium PlatoSymposium,http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPlat.a a; the beauty of Achilles was a topic already broached at Iliad .lt;refgt; But ancient Greek had no words to distinguish heterosexual and homosexual,lt;refgt;Kenneth Dover,Greek Homosexuality Harvard University Press,et passim.File:Wenceslas Hollar  Briseis and Achilles.File:Achilles killing the Amazon Queen Penthesilea.Here,Achilles looms above her as she sinks to the ground.There was an archaic heroic cult of Achilles on the Snake Island Black SeaWhite Island,Leuce,in the Black Sea off the modern coasts of Romania and Ukraine,with a temple and an oracle which survived into the Roman period.lt;refgt;Guy Hedreen,quot;The Cult of Achilles in the Euxinequot; Hesperia .July ,In the lost epic  Aithiopis,a continuation of the Iliad attributed to ArctinusArktinus of Miletos,There the Achaeans raised a tumulus for him and celebrated funeral games.Pliny the ElderPlinys Natural History PlinyNatural Historylt;refgt;IV.lt;refgt; mentions a tumulus that is no longer evident Insula Akchillis tumulo eius viri clara,on the island consecrated to him,located at a distance of fifty Roman miles from Peuce by the Danube Delta,and the temple there.some wild,some tame.In this island there is also Achilles temple and his statuequot;.lt;refgt;III.lt;refgt; Ruins of a square temple  meters to a side,possibly that dedicated to Achilles,were discovered by Captain Kritzikly in ,but there has been no modern archeological work done on the island.Pomponius Mela tells that Achilles is buried in the island named Achillea,between Boristhene and Ister.lt;refgt;De situ orbis,lt;refgt; The Greek geographer Dionysius Periegetus of Bithynia,who lived at the time of Domitian,writes that the island was called Leuce quot;because the wild animals which live there are white.It is said that there,in Leuce island,reside the souls of Achilles and other heroes,because through virtue they had acquired everlasting honorquot;.lt;refgt;Orbis descriptio,for her son Achilles,who dwells there.Here is his temple and his statue,an archaic work.This island is not inhabited,and goats graze on it,not many,which the people who happen to arrive here with their ships,sacrifice to Achilles.In this temple are also deposited a great many holy gifts,craters,rings and precious stones,offered to Achilles in gratitude.One can still read inscriptions in Greek and Latin,in which Achilles is praised and celebrated.Some of these are worded in Patroclus honor,because those who wish to be favored by Achilles,honor Patroclus at the same time.There are also in this island countless numbers of sea birds,which look after Achilles temple.Every morning they fly out to sea,wet their wings with water,and return quickly to the temple and sprinkle it.And after they finish the sprinkling,they clean the hearth of the temple with their wings.Other people say still more,that some of the men who reach this island,come here intentionally.They bring animals in their ships,destined to be sacrificed.Some of these animals they slaughter,others they set free on the island,in Achilles honor.But there are others,who are forced to come to this island by sea storms.As they have no sacrificial animals,but wish to get them from the god of the island himself,they consult Achilles oracle.and to deposit in exchange the price which they consider fair.But in case the oracle denies them permission,because there is an oracle here,they add something to the price offered,and if the oracle refuses again,they add something more,until at last,the oracle agrees that the price is sufficient.And then the victim doesnt run away any more,but waits willingly to be caught.there is a great quantity of silver there,consecrated to the hero,as price for the sacrificial victims.To some of the people who come to this island,Achilles appears in dreams,to others he would appear even during their navigation,if they were not too far away,and would instruct them as to which part of the island they would better anchor their shipsquot;.The heroic cult of Achilles on Leuce island was widespread in antiquity,Achilles from Leuce island was venerated as Pontarches the lord and master of the Pontic Sea,the protector of sailors and navigation.Sailors went out of their way to offer sacrifice.Achilleios in Laconia Pausanias geographerPausanias,III.the arm of Chilia quot;Achileiiquot;,though his conclusion,that Leuce had sovereign rights over Pontos,evokes modern rather than archaic sealaw.Leuce had also a reputation as a place of healing.Pausanias III.reports that the DelphiDelphic Pythia sent a lord of Croton to be cured of a chest wound.Ammianus Marcellinus XXII.attributes the healing to waters aquae on the island.In the region of Gastouri  to the south of the city of Corfu Greece,The palace,naturally,was named after Achilles: Achilleion CorfuAchilleion .File:Achilles in Corfu.He gazes northward toward the city.The inscription in Greek reads:  i.Some postHomeric sources claim that in order to keep Achilles safe from the war,Thetis or,in some versions,Peleus hides the young man at the court of Lycomedes,king of Skyros.There,Achilles is disguised as a girl and lives among Lycomedes daughters,perhaps under the name quot;Pyrrhaquot; the redhaired girl.With Lycomedes daughter Deidamia mythologyDeidamia,whom in the account of Statius he rapes,Achilles there fathers a son,Neoptolemus also called Pyrrhus,after his fathers possible alias.According to this story,When Achilles instantly takes up the spear,Odysseus sees through his disguise and convinces him to join the Greek campaign.In another version of the story,Achilles prepares to defend the court,thus giving his identity away.lt;refgt;Philostratus IIIPhilostratus Junior,Imagines i; Scholiast on Homers Iliad,xix.; Ovid,Metamorphoses .PseudoApollodorus,Bibliotheca PseudoApollodorusBibliotheca iii.Statius,Achilleid,In book  of Homers Odyssey,Odysseus sails to the underworld and converses with the shades.One of these is Achilles,who when greeted as quot;blessed in life,blessed in deathquot;,responds that he would rather be a slave to the worst of masters than be king of all the dead.But Achilles then asks Odysseus of his sons exploits in the Trojan war,and when Odysseus tells of Neoptolemus heroic actions,Achilles is filled with satisfaction.This leaves the reader with an ambiguous understanding of how Achilles felt about the heroic life.Achilles was worshipped as a seagod in many of the Greek colonies on the Black Sea,the location of the mythical quot;White Islandquot; which he was said to inhabit after his death,together with many other heroes.The kings of the Despotate of EpirusEpirus claimed to be descended from Achilles through his son,Neoptolemus.Alexander the Great,son of the Epirote princess Olympias,could therefore also claim this descent,and in many ways strove to be like his great ancestor.lt;refgt;Arrian,Anabasis Alexandri .Cicero,Pro Archia Poeta .lt;refgt; In AD  the Roman Emperor Caracalla,while on his way to war against Parthia,emulated Alexander by holding games around Achilles tumulus.lt;refgt;Dio Cassius .Achilles fought and killed the AmazonsAmazon Helene AmazonHelene.Some also said he married Medea,In some versions of the myth,Achilles has a relationship with his captive Briseis.The tragedyGreek tragedian Aeschylus wrote a trilogy of plays about Achilles,given the title Achilleis by modern scholars.The tragedies relate the deeds of Achilles during the Trojan War,The first part of the Achilleis trilogy,The Myrmidons,focused on the relationship between Achilles and chorus,lt;refgt;Pantelis Michelakis,Achilles in Greek Tragedy,lt;refgt; In Platos Symposium,being the younger and more beautiful of the two,was the beloved,who loved his lover so much that he chose to die to revenge him.lt;refgt;Plato,Symposium,translated Benjamin Jowett,Dover Thrift Editions,The tragedian Sophocles also wrote The Lovers of Achilles,a play with Achilles as the main character.Only a few fragments survive.lt;refgt;S.Radt.Tragicorum Graecorum fragmenta,vol.Gttingen: Vandenhoeck amp; Ruprecht,frr.Towards the end of the th century BC,Electra EuripidesElectra,and Iphigenia in Aulis.by which he attempted to show that Achilles could not catch up to a tortoise with a head start,and therefore that motion and change were impossible.As a student of the monist Parmenides and a member of the Eleatic school,Zeno believed time and motion to be illusions.The Romans,who traditionally traced their lineage to Troy,took a highly negative view of Achilles.lt;refgt;Aeneid,lt;refgt; while Horace portrays Achilles ruthlessly slaying women and children.lt;refgt;Odes,lt;refgt; Other writers,such as Catullus,Propertius,and Ovid,represent a second strand of disparagement,with an emphasis on Achilles erotic career.Achilles was described by the Byzantine chronicler Leo the Deacon,not as HellenesHellene,but as ScythiansScythian,while according to the Byzantine author John Malalas,his army was made up of a tribe previously known as Myrmidons and later as Bulgars.google.combooks?Department of Modern Greek,University of Sydney,pageurlhttps:books.google.combooks?File:Leon Benouville The Wrath of Achilles.jpgthumbThe Wrath of Achilles,by FranoisLon Benouville  Muse Fabre.Achilles is portrayed as a former hero who has become lazy and devoted to the love of Patroclus,in William Shakespeares Troilus and Cressida.Achilles appears in Dantes Inferno DanteInferno.He is seen in Hells Circle of Lust.Achilles is the subject of the poem Achilles,a fragment by Johann Wolfgang von Goethe.Achilles is a major character in Madeline Millers debut novel,The Song of Achilles ,which won the  Orange Prize for Fiction.Achilles is a central and playable character in Tecmo KoeiKOEIs Warriors: Legends of Troy.He is later a special guest character in Warriors Orochi .Achilles is mentioned in Tennysons quot;Ulysses poemUlyssesquot;: quot;.we shall touch the happy isles and meet there the great Achilles whom we knew.In Disneys Hercules  filmHercules,Later in the film,some people of Thebes mock Philoctetes for his training of Achilles.Achilles appears in Hercules  TV seriesHercules episode quot;Achilles and the Living Legend,quot; voiced by Dom Irrera.He is shown as a washedout hasbeen ever since he was defeated.Achilles appears in the light novel FateApocrypha as the Rider of Red.Achilles is one of various narrators in Colleen McCulloughs novel The Song of Troy .Achilles is the main character in David Maloufs novel Ransom Malouf novelRansom .The ghost of Achilles appears in Rick Riordans The Last Olympian .He warns Percy Jackson about the Curse of Achilles and its side effects.Achilles armor appears as downloadable content in the  video game,God of War: Ascension.In the web series,RWBY,the character Pyrrha Nikos voiced by Jen Brown alludes to Achilles.Like him,she is a very skilled warrior,wielding a javelin called Mil,which can also turn into a rifle and a xiphos,and a shield called Akoo.In the finale of Volume ,before she is killed by the villain Cinder Fall,Pyrrha is crippled with an arrow at the right heel,alluding to Achilles death.In the video game,Halo : GuardiansHalo : Guardians,The Achilles Armor and Helmet are the most challenging cosmetic items to obtain.The description for the armor  quot;Only Spartans who have mastered themselves,bound their wrath and passion within a shell of hyperdense steel fueled by starfire,are granted access to the Achilles.Lesser warriors will lose themselves in a storm of blood.Steve Davislim in La Belle Hlne TV movieLa Belle Hlne TV,Richard Trewett in the miniseries The Odyssey TV miniseriesThe Odyssey TV,Joe Montana in Helen of Troy TV miniseriesHelen of Troy TV,Achilles bandAchilles is a hardcore punkhardcore band.quot;Achillesquot; is an oratorio by German composer Max Bruch .quot;Achilles,Agony amp; Ecstasy In Eight Partsquot;,by Manowar bandManowar The Triumph of Steel,quot;Achilles Last Standquot; is a song by Led Zeppelin Presence albumPresence,quot;Achilles Revengequot; is a song by Warlord bandWarlord.quot;Achilles Wrathquot; is a concert piece by Sean OLoughlin.Achilles is referred to in Bob Dylans song quot;Temporary Like Achillesquot;.quot;Cry of Achillesquot; is the lead track off of Alter Bridges fourth album,Fortress.Other battle honours include Walcheren .An armored cruiser of that name served in the Royal Navy during the First World War.It became famous for its part in the Battle of the River Plate,alongside HMSAjax and HMSExeter.In addition to earning the battle honour River Plate,HMNZS Achilles also served at Guadalcanal  and Okinawa in .After returning to the Royal Navy,Franois CapoisCapois La Mort,a slave who fought in the Haitian Revolution,Prince AchileasAndreas of Greece and Denmark was the grandson of the deposed GreeceGreek king,Constantine II of the HellenesConstantine II.The character Achilles in Enders Shadow,by Orson Scott Card,shares his namesakes cunning mind and ruthless attitude.In the Star Trek universe,though not seen in any of the canonical Star Trek TV series.Achilles armor and valor are included in the video games Titan Quest and TQ Immortal Throne.Homer,Homer,OdysseyOdyssey XI,PseudoApollodorus,Bibliotheca PseudoApollodorusBibliotheca III,xiii,Apollodorus,Epitome IIIEpitome III,Ovid,Metamorphoses XI,; XII,XIII,Ovid,Apollonius Rhodius,ArgonauticaArgonautica IV,Dante Alighieri,The Divine Comedy,Inferno,Ileana Chirassi Colombo,quot;Heroes AchilleusTheos Apollon.quot; In Il Mito Greco,Bruno Gentili amp; Giuseppe Paione,Rome,quot;Achilles in the Underworld: Iliad,Odyssey,and thiopisquot;,Greek,Roman,and Byzantine Studies,: pp.quot;Achilles in the Odyssey: Ideologies of Heroism in the Homeric Epicquot;,Beitrge zur klassischen Philologie,Meisenheim,quot;Kleos Aphthiton and Oral Theory,quot; Classical Quarterly,: pp.PWREI,cite journal  authorHedreen,Guy  title The Cult of Achilles in the Euxine  journalHesperia  year  volume  issue  pages   doi .Hlne Monsacr,Les larmes dAchille.Le hros,la femme et la souffrance dans la posie dHomre,Paris,Albin Michel,The Best of The Acheans: Concepts of the Hero in Archaic Greek Poetry,Johns Hopkins University,rev.The Name of Achilles: Questions of Etymology and Folk Etymology,Illinois Classical Studies,Dale S.Sinos,The Entry of Achilles into Greek Epic,thesis,Jonathan S.Burgess,The Death and Afterlife of Achilles Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press,http:www.historyguide.organcienttroy.http:ancientrome.ruartartworkenresult.image          Abraham Lincoln O matte collodion print.alt            An iconic photograph of a bearded Abraham Lincoln showing his head and shoulders.termstart     March ,termend       April ,termstart    March ,termend      March ,successor     Thomas L.birthplace    Hodgenville,Kentucky,deathplace    Petersen House Washington,Petersen House,lt;br gt;Washington,restingplace   Lincoln Tomb,Oak Ridge Cemeterylt;br gt;Springfield,Illinois,spouse         marriageMary Todd LincolnMary ToddNovember ,children       Robert Todd LincolnRobert,Edward Baker LincolnEdward,William Wallace LincolnWillie,signature      Abraham Lincoln  signature.serviceyears    monthslt;br gt;smallApril ,July ,Captain US ArmyCaptainlt;br gt;smallApril ,May ,Private United StatesPrivatelt;br gt;smallMay ,July ,smallOBS:.Discharged from his command and reenlisted as a Private.Abraham Lincoln IPAcenaudioGeoTrinityAbrahamLincoln.oggebrhmlIkn; February ,April ,was the List of Presidents of the United Statesth President of the United States,serving from March  until Assassination of Abraham Lincolnhis assassination in April .constitutional,and political crisis.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorWilliam A.PencaktitleEncyclopedia of the Veteran in Americaurlhttps:books.google.GottliebtitleToward a Usable Past: Liberty Under State Constitutionsurlhttps:books.google.combooks?idxJuXTsVhFcCamp;pgPAyearpublisherU of Georgia Presspageisbnlt;refgt; In doing so,he preserved the Union American Civil WarUnion,abolished slavery,strengthened the federal government,and modernized the economy.Born in Hodgenville,Kentucky,Lincoln grew up on the American frontierwestern frontier in Kentucky and Indiana.Largely selfeducated,he became a lawyer in Illinois,a Whig Party United StatesWhig Party leader,and a member of the Illinois House of Representatives,in which he served for twelve years.Elected to the United States House of Representatives in ,Lincoln promoted rapid modernization of the economy through banks,tariffs,and railroads.Because he had originally agreed not to run for a second term in Congress,and because his opposition to the MexicanAmerican War was unpopular among Illinois voters,Lincoln returned to Springfield,IllinoisSpringfield and resumed his successful law practice.Reentering politics in ,which had a statewide majority in Illinois.In ,Democrat Stephen A.Douglas,Lincoln spoke out against the expansion of slavery,but lost the U.Senate race to Douglas.Lincoln secured the Republican Party presidential nomination as a moderate from a swing state.Though he gained very little support in the slaveholding states of the South,he swept the North and was United States presidential election,elected president in .Subsequently,on April ,As the leader of the moderate faction of the Republican Party,Lincoln confronted Radical Republicans,who demanded harsher treatment of the South,War Democrats,who called for more compromise,antiwar Democrats called Copperhead politicsCopperheads,who despised him,and irreconcilable secessionists,who plotted his assassination.Politically,Lincoln fought back by pitting his opponents against each other,by carefully planned political patronage,and by appealing to the American people with his powers of oratory.lt;refgt;Randall ,lt;refgt; His Gettysburg Address became an iconic endorsement of the principles of nationalism,republicanism,equal rights,liberty,and democracy.Lincoln initially concentrated on the military and political dimensions of the war.His primary goal was to reunite the nation.He suspended habeas corpus,leading to the controversial ex parte Merryman decision,and he averted potential British intervention in the war by defusing the Trent Affair in late .Lincoln closely supervised the war effort,especially the selection of top generals,including his most successful general,Ulysses S.Grant.He also made major decisions on Union war strategy,including a naval blockade that shut down the Souths normal trade,moves to take control of Kentucky and Tennessee,and using gunboats to gain control of the southern river system.Lincoln tried repeatedly to capture the Confederate capital at Richmond,VirginiaRichmond; each time a general failed,Lincoln substituted another,until finally Grant succeeded.As the war progressed,Army to protect escaped slaves,encouraged the Border States American Civil Warborder states to outlaw slavery,and pushed through Congress the Thirteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution,which permanently outlawed slavery.An exceptionally astute politician deeply involved with power issues in each state,presidential election.Anticipating the wars conclusion,Lincoln pushed a moderate view of Reconstruction Era of the United StatesReconstruction,On April ,five days after the April th surrender of Confederate commanding general Robert E.Lee,Lincoln was assassinated by John Wilkes Booth,a Confederate sympathizer.orgpres.pdf quot;Ranking Our Presidentsquot;.James Lindgren.November ,International World History Project.lt;refgt; and the publiclt;ref namegallupgt;http:www.gallup.compollAmericansSayReaganGreatestPresident.aspx quot;Americans Say Reagan Is the Greatest Presidentquot;.Gallup Inc.February ,lt;refgt; as one of the three greatest U.presidents.Abraham Lincoln was born February ,the second child of Thomas LincolnThomas and Nancy LincolnNancy Hanks Lincoln,in a oneroom log cabin on the Sinking Spring Farm in Hardin County,KentuckyHardin County,Kentuckylt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; now LaRue County,KentuckyLaRue County.He was a descendant of Samuel Lincoln,who migrated from Norfolk,England to Hingham,MassachusettsHingham,Massachusetts,in .Samuels grandson and greatgrandson began the familys western migration,which passed through New Jersey,Pennsylvania,and Virginia.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorLouis A.WarrentitleLincolns Youth: Indiana Years,Seven to TwentyOne,lt;refgt; Lincolns paternal grandfather and namesake,Abraham Lincoln captainCaptain Abraham Lincoln,moved the family from Virginia to Jefferson County,Kentucky in the s.lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt; Captain Lincoln was killed in an Northwest Indian WarIndian raid in .His children,including sixyearold Thomas,the future presidents father,witnessed the attack.MD  pages url   isbn lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;whitequot;gt;White,lt;refgt; After his fathers murder,Thomas was left to make his own way on the frontier,working at odd jobs in Kentucky and in Tennessee,before settling with members of his family in Hardin County,Kentucky,in the early s.lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Donald ,Lincolns mother,Nancy,is widely assumed to have been the daughter of Lucy Hanks,although no record of Nancy Hanks birth has ever been found.lt;ref nameBarteltgt;cite bookauthorWilliam E.locationBostonpagelt;refgt; however,the debate continues over whether she was born out of wedlock.Still another researcher,Adin Baber,claims that Nancy Hanks was the daughter of Abraham Hanks and Sarah Harper of Virginia.including charts of families in Arkansas,the Carolina,Georgia,Illinois,Indiana,Iowa,Kentucky,Missouri,Oklahoma,Ohio,Pennsylvania,Texas,and west to the Pacific Ocean and beyondpublisherNancy Baber McNeil locationCarpenterina,Thomas Lincoln and Nancy Hanks were married on June ,in Washington County,and moved to Elizabethtown,Kentucky,following their marriage.lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt; They became the parents of three children: Sarah,born on February ,; Abraham,on February ,; and another son,Thomas,who died in infancy.lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt; Thomas Lincoln bought or leased several farms in Kentucky,including the Sinking Spring farm,where Abraham was born; however,a land title dispute soon forced the Lincolns to move.lt;refgt;Bartelt,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameWarrengt;Warren,lt;refgt; In  the family moved eight miles north,to Knob Creek Farm,where Thomas acquired title to convert acreha of land.In  a claimant in another land dispute sought to eject the family from the farm.lt;ref nameWarrengt; Of the .acres that Thomas held in Kentucky,he lost all but convertacreha of his land in court disputes over property titles.lt;ref namequot;sandbergquot;gt; Frustrated over the lack of security provided by Kentucky courts,Thomas sold the remaining land he held in Kentucky in ,and began planning a move to Indiana,lt;ref nameWarrengt;Warren,In  the family moved north across the Ohio River to Indiana,a free,nonslaveholding territory,where they settled in an quot;unbroken forestquot;lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt; in Hurricane Township,Perry County,IndianaHistoryPerry County.Their land in southern Indiana became part of Spencer County,Indiana,when the county was established in .lt;refgt;Warren,and .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; The farm is preserved as part of the Lincoln Boyhood National Memorial.lt;ref namequot;sandbergquot;gt;Sandburg ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; During the familys years in Kentucky and Indiana,Thomas Lincoln worked as a farmer,cabinetmaker,and carpenter.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; He owned farms,several town lots and livestock,paid taxes,sat on juries,appraised estates,served on country slave patrols,and guarded prisoners.Thomas and Nancy Lincoln were also members of a Separate Baptists church,which had restrictive moral standards and opposed alcohol,dancing,and slavery.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Within a year of the familys arrival in Indiana,Thomas claimed title to convertacreha of Indiana land.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; Prior to the familys move to Illinois in ,Thomas had acquired an additional twenty acres of land adjacent to his property.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .File:Young Lincoln By Charles Keck.JPGthumbpxThe young Lincoln in sculpture at Senn Park,Chicago.altA statue of young Lincoln sitting on a stump,Several significant family events took place during Lincolns youth in Indiana.On October ,Nancy Lincoln died of milk sickness,nineyearold Abraham,and Dennis Hanks,Nancys nineteenyearold orphaned cousin.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; On December ,Lincolns father married Sarah Bush LincolnSarah quot;Sallyquot; Bush Johnston,a widow from Elizabethtown,Kentucky,with three children of her own.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; Abraham became very close to his stepmother,whom he referred to as quot;Motherquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Bartelt,while giving birth to a stillborn son.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Bartelt,As a youth,Lincoln disliked the hard labor associated with frontier life.scribbling,writing,ciphering,writing Poetry,etc.quot;,and .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; and must have done it to avoid manual labor.His stepmother also acknowledged he did not enjoy quot;physical laborquot;,but loved to read.lt;refgt;Bartelt,lt;refgt; Lincoln was largely selfeducated.His formal schooling from several itinerant teachers was intermittent,the aggregate of which may have amounted to less than a year; however,he was an avid reader and retained a lifelong interest in learning.lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book  authorJames H.neighbors,and schoolmates of Lincolns youth recalled that he read and reread the King James Bible,Aesops Fables,John BunyanBunyans The Pilgrims Progress,Daniel DefoeDefoes Robinson Crusoe,Weemss The Life of Washington,and Benjamin FranklinFranklins Autobiography,among others.lt;refgt;Donald ,amp;nbsp;,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite bookauthorMerrill D.PetersontitleLincoln in American Memoryurlhttps:books.google.idEADkZIMJXECamp;pgPAyearpublisherOxford U.pageisbnlt;refgt;lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Warren,xix,and .As he grew into his teens,Lincoln took responsibility for the chores expected of him as one of the boys in the household.lt;ref namequot;donaldpquot;gt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Abraham became adept at using an axe.Tall for his age,Lincoln was also strong and athletic.lt;refgt;Warren,lt;refgt;Donald ,In early March ,fearing a milk sickness outbreak along the Ohio River,the Lincoln family moved west to Illinois,a nonslaveholding state.They settled on a site in Macon County,Illinois,convertmikm west of Decatur,IllinoisDecatur.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Bartelt,and .lt;refgt; Historians disagree on who initiated the move.lt;refgt;Bartelt,lt;refgt; After the family relocated to Illinois,Abraham became increasingly distant from his father,lt;ref nameBarteltgt;Bartelt,lt;refgt; in part because of his fathers lack of education,and occasionally lent him money.lt;refgt;Donald ,and .lt;refgt; In ,Illinois,Abraham was old enough to make his own decisions and struck out on his own.lt;ref nameOatesgt;cite book  authorStephen B.he ended up in the village of Lincolns New SalemNew Salem in Sangamon County,IllinoisSangamon County.lt;refgt;Thomas ,lt;refgt; Later that spring,Denton Offutt,a New Salem merchant,Illinois,and Mississippi rivers.After arriving in New Orleansand witnessing slavery firsthandLincoln returned to New Salem,where he remained for the next six years.lt;refgt;Sandburg ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Donald ,imageAamp;TLincoln.caption photo of President Lincoln with youngest son,imageMary Todd Lincoln  restored cropped.captionMary Todd Lincoln,wife of Abraham Lincoln,Lincolns first romantic interest was Ann Rutledge,whom he met when he first moved to New Salem; by ,they were in a relationship but not formally engaged.She died at the age of  on August ,most likely of typhoid fever.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In the early s,he met Mary Owens from Kentucky when she was visiting her sister.lt;ref namequot;Donald  pp.quot;gt;Donald ,; Thomas ,Late in ,Lincoln agreed to a match with Mary if she returned to New Salem.Mary did return in November ,and Lincoln courted her for a time; however,they both had second thoughts about their relationship.On August ,Lincoln wrote Mary a letter suggesting he would not blame her if she ended the relationship.She never replied and the courtship ended.lt;ref namequot;Donald  pp.Lincoln became engaged to Mary Todd LincolnMary Todd,who was from a wealthy slaveholding family in Lexington,KentuckyLexington,Kentucky.lt;refgt;Lamb,lt;refgt; They met in Springfield,IllinoisSpringfield,Illinois,in December lt;ref namequot;Sandburgquot;gt;Sandburg ,lt;refgt; and were engaged the following December.lt;refgt;Donald ,A wedding set for January ,was canceled when the two broke off their engagement at Lincolns initiative.lt;ref namequot;Sandburgquot;gt;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; They later met again at a party and married on November ,in the Springfield mansion of Marys married sister.lt;refgt;Sandburg ,lt;refgt; While preparing for the nuptials and feeling anxiety again,Lincoln,when asked where he was going,replied,quot;To hell,I suppose.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In ,Mary Todd Lincoln kept house,often with the help of a relative or hired servant girl.lt;refgt;Baker,He was an affectionate,though often absent,husband and father of four children.Robert Todd Lincoln was born in  and Edward Baker Lincoln Eddie in .Edward died on February ,in Springfield,probably of tuberculosis.William Wallace Lincolnquot;Williequot; Lincoln was born on December ,and died of a fever on February ,The Lincolns fourth son,Tad LincolnThomas quot;Tadquot; Lincoln,was born on April ,and died of heart failure at the age of  on July ,lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt; Robert was the only child to live to adulthood and have children.His last descendant,greatgrandson Robert Todd Lincoln Beckwith,died in .lt;refgt;cite bookauthorJason EmersontitleGiant in the Shadows: The Life of Robert T.Lincolnurlhttps:books.google.lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt; and the Lincolns were not considered to be strict with their own.lt;refgt;Baker,The deaths of their sons had profound effects on both parents.Later in life,Mary struggled with the stresses of losing her husband and sons,and Robert Lincoln committed her temporarily to a mental health asylum in .lt;refgt;Steers,lt;refgt; Abraham Lincoln suffered from quot;History of depressionmelancholyquot;,a condition which now is referred to as Major depressive disorderclinical depression.lt;ref namequot;Atlanticoctquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.theatlantic.webcitation.orgafProj archivedateOctober ,Lincolns fatherinlaw and others of the Todd family were either slave owners or slave traders.Lincoln was close to the Todds,and he and his family occasionally visited the Todd estate in Lexington.lt;refgt;Foner ,During his term as President of the United States of America,Mary was known to cook for Lincoln often.Since she was raised by a wealthy family,her cooking abilities were simple,but satisfied Lincolns tastes,which included,particularly,imported oysters.lt;refgt;Cite webtitle  The Food TimelinePresidents food favoritesurl  http:www.foodtimeline.orgpresidents.htmllincolnwebsite  www.foodtimeline.File:Lincoln protecting Potawatomi.at age ,Lincoln and a partner bought a small general store on credit in Lincolns New SalemNew Salem,Illinois.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorKenneth J.WinkletitleThe Young Eagle: The Rise of Abraham Lincolnurlhttps:books.google.the business struggled and Lincoln eventually sold his share.He had attained local popularity and could draw crowds as a natural raconteur in New Salem,though he lacked an education,powerful friends,and money,which may be why he lost.He advocated navigational improvements on the Sangamon River.lt;refgt;DonaldDonald ,https:books.google.idfuTYmxsawCamp;pgPAamp;dqNewSalemdebatingclub pp.Before the election,Lincoln served as a captain in the Illinois Militia during the Black Hawk War.lt;refgt;Winkle,lt;refgt; Following his return,Lincoln continued his campaign for the August  election for the Illinois General Assembly.At convertftincm,lt;refgt;Sandburg ,lt;refgt; he was tall and quot;strong enough to intimidate any rivalquot;.At his first speech,when he saw a supporter in the crowd being attacked,Lincoln grabbed the assailant by his quot;neck and the seat of his trousersquot; and threw him.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincoln finished eighth out of  candidates the top four were elected,though he received  of the  votes cast in the New Salem precinct.lt;refgt;Winkle,Lincoln served as New Salems postmaster and later as county surveyor,all the while reading voraciously.Of his learning method,Lincoln stated: quot;I studied with nobodyquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; His second campaign in  was successful.He won election to the state legislature; though he ran as a Whig Party United StatesWhig,many Democrats favored him over a more powerful Whig opponent.lt;refgt;White,Admission to the bar in the United StatesAdmitted to the bar in ,lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; he moved to Springfield,Illinois,and began to practice law under John T.Stuart,Mary Todds cousin.lt;refgt;White,He partnered with Stephen T.Logan from  until .whom Lincoln thought quot;a studious young manquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,Successful on his second run for office,lt;refgt;Simon,lt;refgt; He supported the construction of the Illinois and Michigan Canal,which he remained involved with later as a Canal Commissioner.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:abrahamlincolnsclassroom.The Real Lincoln; A PortraitworkAbraham Lincolns Classroomlt;refgt; In the  legislative session,he voted to expand suffrage to white males,whether landowners or not.lt;refgt;Simon,He first articulated this in ,saying,quot;The Institution of slavery is founded on both injustice and bad policy,but the promulgation of abolition doctrines tends rather to increase than abate its evils.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;Foner ,House of Representatives,File:Abraham Lincoln by Nicholas Shepherd,crop.jpgthumbpxaltMiddle aged clean shaven Lincoln from the hips up.Lincoln in his late s as a member of the U.House of Representatives.Photo taken by one of Lincolns law students around .From the early s,Lincoln was a steadfast Whig and professed to friends in  to be,quot;an old line Whig,a disciple of Henry Clayquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The party,including Lincoln,favored economic modernization in banking,protective tariffs to fund internal improvements including railroads,and espoused urbanization as well.lt;refgt;Boritt ,Lincoln was elected to the United States House of RepresentativesU.House of Representatives,where he served one twoyear term.He was the only Whig in the Illinois delegation,lt;refgt;Oates,lt;refgt; Lincoln,in collaboration with abolitionist Congressman Joshua R.Giddings,wrote a bill to abolish slavery in the Washington,District of ColumbiaDistrict of Columbia with compensation for the owners,enforcement to capture fugitive slaves,and a popular vote on the matter.He abandoned the bill when it failed to garner sufficient Whig supporters.lt;refgt;Harris,; Foner ,On foreign and military policy,Lincoln spoke out against the MexicanAmerican War,which he attributed to James K.PolkPresident Polks desire for quot;military glorythat attractive rainbow,that rises in showers of bloodquot;.lt;refgt;Heidler ,lt;refgt; Lincoln also supported the Wilmot Proviso,which,if it had been adopted,would have banned slavery in any U.territory won from Mexico.lt;refgt;Holzer,Lincoln emphasized his opposition to Polk by drafting and introducing his Spot Resolutions.lt;refgt;Oates,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Baslerppquot;gt;Basler ,Congress never enacted the resolution or even debated it,the national papers ignored it,and it resulted in a loss of political support for Lincoln in his district.One Illinois newspaper derisively nicknamed him quot;spotty Lincolnquot;.lt;ref namequot;McGovern,quot;gt;McGovern,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Basler ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;MuellerSchamelquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.archives.webcitation.orgagtEParchivedateOctober ,deadurllt;refgt; Lincoln later regretted some of his statements,especially his attack on the presidential warmaking powers.lt;refgt;Donald ,Realizing Clay was unlikely to win the presidency,Lincoln,who had pledged in  to serve only one term in the House,presidential election.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Taylor won and Lincoln hoped to be appointed Commissioner of the General Land Office,but that lucrative patronage job went to an Illinois rival,Justin Butterfield,considered by the administration to be a highly skilled lawyer,but in Lincolns view,an quot;old fossilquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,This distant territory was a Democratic stronghold,so he declined and resumed his law practice.lt;refgt;Harris,File:Abraham Lincoln by Hesler,jpgthumbleftLincoln in .Lincoln returned to practicing law in Springfield,handling quot;every kind of business that could come before a prairie lawyerquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Twice a year for  years,weeks at a time,he appeared in county seats in the midstate region when the county courts were in session.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincoln handled many transportation cases in the midst of the nations western expansion,As a riverboat man,Lincoln initially favored those interests,but ultimately represented whoever hired him.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In fact,he later represented a bridge company against a riverboat company in a Hurd v.Rock Island Bridge Companylandmark case involving a canal boat that sank after hitting a bridge.lt;refgt;http:www.archives.govpublicationsprologuesummerbridge.html Bridging the Mississippi.Archives.gov October ,Retrieved on .lt;refgt;lt;refgt; Brian McGinty,Lincolns Greatest Case: The River,the Bridge,and the Making of America lt;refgt; In ,The idea was never commercialized,but Lincoln is the only president to hold a patent.lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:americanhistory.educollectionsobject.webcitation.orgaAMeAaarchivedateOctober ,James A.Barret,lt;ref namequot;Donald p.quot;gt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Dirck ,superior,and less expensive route,and the corporation retained the right to demand Barrets payment.lt;ref namequot;Donald p.quot;gt; Lincoln appeared before the Illinois Supreme Court in  cases,in  as sole counsel,of which  were decided in his favor.lt;refgt;Handy,lt;refgt; From  to ,another of Lincolns largest clients was the Illinois Central Railroad.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincolns reputation with clients gave rise to his nickname quot;Honest Abe.who was on trial for the murder of James Preston Metzker.lt;ref namequot;Donaldquot;gt;Donald ,After an opposing witness testified seeing the crime in the moonlight,Lincoln produced a Farmers Almanac showing the moon was at a low angle,drastically reducing visibility.Based on this evidence,Armstrong was acquitted.Lincoln rarely raised objections in the courtroom; but in an  case,where he defended a cousin,Peachy Harrison,who was accused of stabbing another to death,Lincoln angrily protested the judges decision to exclude evidence favorable to his client.Instead of holding Lincoln in contempt of court as was expected,the judge,a Democrat,reversed his ruling,allowing the evidence and acquitting Harrison.lt;ref namequot;Donaldquot;gt;lt;refgt;Harrison ,By the s,slavery was still legal in the southern United States,but had been generally outlawed in the northern states,including Illinois,whose original  Constitution forbade slavery,as required by the Northwest Ordinance.lt;refgt;cite webtitleThe Peculiar Institutionurlhttp:publications.newberry.webcitation.orgdBccYVarchivedateOctober ,accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; Lincoln disapproved of slavery,and the spread of slavery to new U.territory in the west.lt;refgt;cite webtitleLincoln Speaks Outurlhttp:publications.newberry.webcitation.orgdBlWFGiarchivedateOctober ,accessdateJanuary ,Senior Senator Stephen A.Douglas provision,which Lincoln opposed,specified settlers had the right to determine locally whether to allow slavery in new U.territory,rather than have such a decision restricted by the national Congress.lt;refgt;McGovern,Foner argues that Lincoln was a moderate in the middle,lt;refgt;Foner ,File:DredScott.jpgaltPaintingthumbuprightA portrait of Dred Scott.Lincoln denounced the Supreme Court decision in Dred Scott v.Sandford as part of a conspiracy to extend slavery.On October ,in his quot;Abraham Lincoln Peoria speechPeoria Speechquot;,Lincoln declared his opposition to slavery,which he repeated en route to the presidency.lt;refgt;Thomas ,lt;refgt; Speaking in his Kentucky accent,with a very powerful voice,lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt; he said the Kansas Act had a quot;declared indifference,but as I must think,a covert real zeal for the spread of slavery.I cannot but hate it.I hate it because of the monstrous injustice of slavery itself.I hate it because it deprives our republican example of its just influence in the worldamp;nbsp;.quot;lt;refgt;Basler ,In late ,Lincoln ran as a Whig for the U.Senate seat from Illinois.At that time,senators were elected by the state legislature.lt;refgt;Oates,lt;refgt; After leading in the first six rounds of voting in the Illinois assembly,his support began to dwindle,and Lincoln instructed his backers to vote for Lyman Trumbull,who defeated opponent Joel Aldrich Matteson.lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt; The Whigs had been irreparably split by the KansasNebraska Act.Lincoln wrote,quot;I think I am a Whig,but others say there are no Whigs,and that I am an abolitionist .I do no more than oppose the extension of slavery.quot;lt;refgt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.Etulainlt;!authorRobert W.Johannsen gt;pagepublisherSouthern Illinois University date March ,accessdateMay ,Drawing on remnants of the old Whig party,and on disenchanted Free Soil PartyFree Soil,Liberty Party United States,Liberty,and Democratic Party United StatesDemocratic Party members,lt;refgt;McGovern,lt;refgt; At the  Republican National Convention,Lincoln placed second in the contest to become the partys candidate for vice president.lt;refgt;Donald ,Douglas broke with President James Buchanan,leading to a fight for control of the Democratic Party.Some eastern Republicans even favored the reelection of Douglas for the Senate in ,since he had led the opposition to the Lecompton Constitution,which would have admitted Kansas as a slave state.lt;refgt;Oates,lt;refgt; In March ,the Supreme Court issued its decision in Dred Scott v.Sandford; Chief Justice Roger B.Taney opined that blacks were not citizens,and derived no rights from the Constitution.Lincoln denounced the decision,alleging it was the product of a conspiracy of Democrats to support the Slave Power.lt;refgt;Zarefsky,lt;refgt; Lincoln argued,quot;The authors of the Declaration of Independence never intended to say all were equal in color,size,intellect,moral developments,or social capacity,but they did consider all men created equalequal in certain inalienable rights,among which are life,liberty,and the pursuit of happiness.quot;lt;refgt;Jaffa,After the state Republican party convention nominated him for the U.Senate in ,Lincoln delivered his Lincolns House Divided SpeechHouse Divided Speech,drawing on biblerefMark:,quot;A house divided against itself cannot stand.I believe this government cannot endure permanently half slave and half free.It will become all one thing,or all the other.quot;lt;refgt;White,and rallied Republicans across the North.lt;refgt;Harris,in turn,select Lincoln or Douglas as its U.senator.lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Abraham Lincoln by Byers,crop.jpgthumbpxLincoln in ,the year of LincolnDouglas debateshis debates with Stephen A.DouglasStephen Douglas over slavery.The Senate campaign featured the seven LincolnDouglas debates of ,the most famous political debates in American history.lt;refgt;McPherson ,lt;refgt; The principals stood in stark contrast both physically and politically.Lincoln warned that quot;The Slave Powerquot; was threatening the values of republicanism,while Douglas emphasized his Freeport Doctrine,that local settlers were free to choose whether to allow slavery or not,and accused Lincoln of having joined the abolitionists.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The debates had an atmosphere of a prize fight and drew crowds in the thousands.Douglas said that Lincoln was defying the authority of the U.Supreme Court and the Dred Scott decision.lt;refgt;Donald ,Though the Republican legislative candidates won more popular votes,the Democrats won more seats,and the legislature reelected Douglas to the Senate.Despite the bitterness of the defeat for Lincoln,his articulation of the issues gave him a national political reputation.lt;refgt;Carwardine ,lt;refgt; In May ,Lincoln purchased the Illinois StaatsAnzeiger,a Germanlanguage newspaper which was consistently supportive; most of the states ,lt;refgt;Donald ,On February ,Lincoln insisted the moral foundation of the Republicans required opposition to slavery,and rejected any quot;groping for some middle ground between the right and the wrongquot;.lt;refgt;Jaffa,Journalist Noah Brooks reported,quot;No man ever before made such an impression on his first appeal to a New York audience.quot;lt;refgt;Carwardine ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Holzer,to appear in one rivals William H.Seward own state at an event sponsored by the second rivals Salmon P.Chase loyalists,while not mentioning either by name during its deliveryquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In response to an inquiry about his presidential intentions,Lincoln said,quot;The taste is in my mouth a little.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,MainElectoral history of Abraham LincolnUnited States presidential election,File:The Rail Candidate.jpgthumbpxaltLincoln being carried by two men on a long board.On May ,the Illinois Republican State Convention was held in Decatur.lt;refgt;Donald ,Norman B.JuddNorman Judd,Leonard Swett,and Jesse DuBois,and Lincoln received his first endorsement to run for the presidency.lt;refgt;Oates,Lincolns supporters adopted the label of quot;The Rail Candidatequot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In  Lincoln described himself : quot;I am in height,six feet,four inches,nearly; lean in flesh,weighing,on an average,one hundred and eighty pounds; dark complexion,with coarse black hair,and gray eyes.:Large head,with high crown of skull; thick,and large feet.lt;refgt;cite bookauthor,John G.NicolaytitleLincolns personal appearanceurlhttps:books.google.combooks?On May ,at the  Republican National ConventionRepublican National Convention in Chicago,Lincolns friends promised and manipulated and won the nomination on the third ballot,beating candidates such as William H.Seward and Salmon P.Chase.A former Democrat,Hannibal Hamlin of Maine,was nominated for Vice President to balance the ticket.Lincolns success depended on his reputation as a moderate on the slavery issue,and his strong support for Whiggish programs of internal improvements and the protective tariff.lt;refgt;Luthin,On the third ballot Pennsylvania put him over the top.Pennsylvania iron interests were reassured by his support for protective tariffs.lt;refgt;Hofstadter,lt;refgt; Lincolns managers had been adroitly focused on this delegation as well as the others,while following Lincolns strong dictate to quot;Make no contracts that bind mequot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,Most Republicans agreed with Lincoln that the North was the aggrieved party,Throughout the s,Lincoln doubted the prospects of civil war,and his supporters rejected claims that his election would incite secession.lt;refgt;Boritt ,lt;refgt; Meanwhile,Douglas was selected as the candidate of the Northern Democrats.disagreeing with Douglas position on popular sovereignty,and ultimately selected John C.Breckinridge as their candidate.lt;refgt;Donald ,As Lincolns ideas of abolishing slavery grew,so did his supporters.lt;ref namequot;murrinquot;gt;Murrin,John.Liberty,Equality,Power: A History of the American People.Belmont: Clark Baxter,As Douglas and the other candidates went through with their campaigns,Lincoln was the only one of them who gave no speeches.Instead,he monitored the campaign closely and relied on the enthusiasm of the Republican Party.The party did the leg work that produced majorities across the North,and produced an abundance of campaign posters,leaflets,and newspaper editorials.There were thousands of Republican speakers who focused first on the party platform,and second on Lincolns life story,emphasizing his childhood poverty.The goal was to demonstrate the superior power of quot;free laborquot;,whereby a common farm boy could work his way to the top by his own efforts.lt;refgt;Donald ,and sold ,to ,copies.lt;refgt;Donald ,MainUnited States presidential election,imageElectoralCollege.altMap of the U.showing Lincoln winning the Northeast and West,Breckinridge winning the South,Douglas winning Missouri,and Bell winning Virginia,West Virginia,and Kentucky.captionIn ,imageAbraham lincoln inauguration .altA large crowd in front of a large building with many pillars.caption inaugural at the U.Capitol BuildingCapitol building.United States Capitol domeThe dome above the rotunda was still under construction.On November ,Lincoln was elected the th president of the United States,beating Democrat Stephen A.Douglas,John C.Breckinridge of the Southern Democrats,He was the first president from the Republican Party.and he won only two of  counties in all the Southern states.lt;refgt;Mansch,Lincoln received ,votes,Douglas ,votes,Breckinridge ,votes,and Bell ,votes.Turnout was .amp;nbsp;percent,with Lincoln winning the free Northern states,as well as California and Oregon.Douglas won Missouri,and split New Jersey with Lincoln.lt;refgt;Harris,lt;refgt; Bell won Virginia,Tennessee,and Kentucky,and Breckinridge won the rest of the South.lt;refgt;White,Although Lincoln won only a plurality of the popular vote,New Jersey,and Rhode Island,but even if the antiLincoln vote had been combined in every state,Lincoln still would have won a majority in the Electoral College.lt;refgt;Nevins,Ordeal of the Union vol .File:Abraham Lincoln O,crop.As Lincolns election became evident,secessionists made clear their intent to leave the Union before he took office the next March.lt;refgt;Edgar,lt;refgt; On December ,South Carolina took the lead by adopting an ordinance of secession; by February ,Florida,Mississippi,Alabama,Georgia,Louisiana,and Texas followed.lt;ref namequot;Donald,quot;gt;lt;refgt;Potter,the Confederate States of America.lt;ref namequot;Donald,quot;gt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The upper South and border states Delaware,Maryland,Virginia,North Carolina,Tennessee,Kentucky,Missouri,and Arkansas listened to,but initially rejected,the secessionist appeal.lt;refgt;White,lt;refgt; President Buchanan and Presidentelect Lincoln refused to recognize the Confederacy,declaring secession illegal.lt;refgt;Potter,lt;refgt; The Confederacy selected Jefferson Davis as its provisional President on February ,lt;refgt;White,There were attempts at compromise.The Crittenden Compromise would have extended the Missouri Compromise line of ,dividing the territories into slave and free,contrary to the Republican Partys freesoil platform.lt;ref nameWhitegt;White,lt;refgt; Lincoln rejected the idea,saying,quot;I will suffer death before I consentamp;nbsp;.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,Lincoln,however,did tacitly support the proposed Corwin Amendment to the Constitution,lt;refgt;Vorenberg,lt;refgt;lt;ref nameVileppgt;Vile ,Encyclopedia of Constitutional Amendments: Proposed Amendments,and Amending Issues  pp.amp;nbsp;lt;refgt; A few weeks before the war,lt;ref nameLuptongt;Lupton ,http:www.eduih.html Abraham Lincoln and the Corwin Amendment,Retrieved January ,lt;ref nameVilepgt;Vile ,Encyclopedia of Constitutional Amendments: Proposed Amendments,and Amending Issues  p.En route to his inauguration by train,Lincoln addressed crowds and legislatures across the North.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The presidentelect then Baltimore Plotevaded possible assassins in Baltimore,who were uncovered by Lincolns head of security,Allan Pinkerton.On February ,he arrived in disguise in Washington,which was placed under substantial military guard.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincoln directed his Lincolns first inaugural addressinaugural address to the South,proclaiming once again that he had no intention,or inclination,There has never been any reasonable cause for such apprehension.Indeed,It is found in nearly all the published speeches of him who now addresses you.I do but quote from one of those speeches when I declare that quot;I have no purpose,directly or indirectly,to interfere with the institution of slavery in the States where it exists.I believe I have no lawful right to do so,and I have no inclination to do so.quot;Lincolns first inaugural addressFirst inaugural address,March lt;refgt;Sandburg ,The President ended his address with an appeal to the people of the South: quot;We are not enemies,but friends.We must not be enemiesamp;nbsp;.The mystic chords of memory,stretching from every battlefield,and patriot grave,to every living heart and hearthstone,all over this broad land,will yet swell the chorus of the Union,when again touched,as surely they will be,by the better angels of our nature.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,By March ,no leaders of the insurrection had proposed rejoining the Union on any terms.Meanwhile,lt;refgt;Donald ,:Both parties deprecated war,but one of them would make war rather than let the Nation survive,and the other would accept war rather than let it perish,and the war came.lt;refgt;March ,Lincolns second inaugural address.File:Major Robert Anderson.jpgaltportraitthumbpxRobert Anderson Civil WarMajor Anderson,The commander of Fort Sumter,South Carolina,Robert Anderson Civil WarMajor Robert Anderson,sent a request for provisions to Washington,On April ,Confederate forces fired on Union troops at Battle of Fort SumterFort Sumter,forcing them to surrender,and began the war.exaggerating the strength of Unionist sentiment in the South,and not realizing the Southern Unionists were insisting there be no invasion.lt;refgt;Allan Nevins,lt;refgt;Sherman,lt;refgt; Historian Donald,David HerbertDonald concludes that,Sumter showed he adhered to his vow not to be the first to shed fraternal blood.But he also vowed not to surrender the forts.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,On April ,Lincoln called on all the states to send detachments totaling ,troops to recapture forts,protect Washington,and quot;preserve the Unionquot;,which,in his view,still existed intact despite the actions of the seceding states.This call forced the states to choose sides.Virginia declared its secession and was rewarded with the Confederate capital,despite the exposed position of Richmond,VirginiaRichmond so close to Union lines.North Carolina,Tennessee,and Arkansas also voted for secession over the next two months.Secession sentiment was strong in Missouri and Maryland,but did not prevail; Kentucky tried to be neutral.lt;ref namequot;Oates,quot;gt;Oates,:The thunderclap of Sumter produced a startling crystallization of Northern sentimentamp;nbsp;.Anger swept the land.From every side came news of mass meetings,speeches,resolutions,tenders of business support,the muster of companies and regiments,the determined action of governors and legislatures.quot;lt;refgt;Allan Nevins,The War for the Union: The Improvised War   pp.amp;nbsp;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Russell McClintock,Lincoln and the Decision for War: The Northern Response to Secession   pp.On April ,mobs in Baltimore,which controlled the rail links,Baltimore riot of attacked Union troops who were changing trains,and local leaders groups later burned critical rail bridges to the capital.lt;refgt;Heidler ,lt;refgt; John Merryman,a Maryland official involved in hindering the U.troop movements,petitioned Supreme Court Chief Justice and Marylander,Roger B.Taney,author of the controversial proslavery Dred Scott opinion,to issue a writ of habeas corpus,and in June Taney,acting as a circuit judge and not speaking for the Supreme Court,issued the writ,because in his opinion only Congress could suspend the writ.lt;refgt;William C.Harris,Lincoln and the Border States: Preserving the Union University Press of Kansas,pp.amp;nbsp;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite bookauthorlinkMark E.Neely Jr.lastNeely firstMark E.After the Battle of Fort Sumter,Lincoln encountered an unprecedented political and military crisis,and he responded as commanderinchief,using unprecedented powers.He expanded his war powers,and imposed a blockade on all the Confederate shipping ports,disbursed funds before appropriation by Congress,and after suspending habeas corpus,arrested and imprisoned thousands of suspected Confederate sympathizers.Lincoln was supported by Congress and the northern public for these actions.In addition,lt;refgt;Donald ,; Carwardine ,File:RunningtheMachineLincAdmin.jpgthumbpxaltA group of men sitting at a table as another man creates money on a wooden machine.Edwin Stanton,William H.SewardWilliam Seward,Gideon Welles,Lincoln and others.The war effort was the source of continued disparagement of Lincoln,and dominated his time and attention.From the start,it was clear that bipartisan support would be essential to success in the war effort,and any manner of compromise alienated factions on both sides of the aisle,such as the appointment of Republicans and Democrats to command positions in the Union Army.Copperheads criticized Lincoln for refusing to compromise on the slavery issue.Conversely,the Radical Republicans criticized him for moving too slowly in abolishing slavery.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; On August ,In practice,the law had little effect,but it did signal political support for abolishing slavery in the Confederacy.lt;refgt;Donald ,; Carwardine ,In late August ,General John C.Frmont,the  Republican presidential nominee,issued,without consulting his superiors in Washington,a proclamation of martial law in Missouri.He declared that any citizen found bearing arms could be courtmartialed and shot,and that slaves of persons aiding the rebellion would be freed.Lincoln overruled Frmonts proclamation.Lincoln believed that Fremonts emancipation was political; neither militarily necessary nor legal.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; After Lincoln acted,Union enlistments from Maryland,Kentucky,and Missouri increased by over ,troops.lt;refgt;Carwardine ,Lincoln left most diplomatic matters to his Secretary of State,William Seward.At times Seward was too bellicose,so for balance Lincoln stuck a close working relationship with Senator Charles Sumner,the chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The Trent Affair of late  threatened war with Great Britain.The U.Navy had illegally intercepted a British mail ship,the Trent,on the high seas and seized two Confederate envoys; Britain protested vehemently while the U.cheered.Lincoln ended the crisis by releasing the two diplomats.Biographer James G.:his restraint,his avoidance of any outward expression of truculence,his early softening of State Departments attitude toward Britain,his deference toward Seward and Sumner,his withholding of his own paper prepared for the occasion,his readiness to arbitrate,his golden silence in addressing Congress,his shrewdness in recognizing that war must be averted,google.combooks?idViaAQAAIAAJyearpage quoted in Kevin Peraino,Lincoln in the World: The Making of a Statesman and the Dawn of American Power  pp .He kept close tabs on all phases of the military effort,consulted with governors,and selected generals based on their past success as well as their state and party.In January ,after many complaints of inefficiency and profiteering in the War Department,Lincoln replaced Simon Cameron with Edwin Stanton as United States Secretary of WarWar Secretary.Nevertheless,he worked more often and more closely with Lincoln than any other senior official.quot;Stanton and Lincoln virtually conducted the war together,quot; say Thomas and Hyman.lt;refgt;Benjamin P.Thomas and Harold M.Hyman,Stanton,the Life and Times of Lincolns Secretary of War  pp.In terms of war strategy,Lincoln articulated two priorities: to ensure that Washington was welldefended,and to conduct an aggressive war effort that would satisfy the demand in the North for prompt,decisive victory; major Northern newspaper editors expected victory within  days.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Twice a week,Lincoln would meet with his cabinet in the afternoon,lt;refgt;Donald ,such as the Mississippi River;.lt;refgt;Ambrose,lt;refgt; Lincoln saw the importance of Vicksburg,MississippiVicksburg and understood the necessity of defeating the enemys army,rather than simply capturing territory.lt;refgt;Donald ,Lincoln appointed Major General George B.McClellan generalinchief of all the Union armies.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; McClellan,a young West Point graduate,railroad executive,and Pennsylvania Democrat,took several months to plan and attempt his Peninsula Campaign,longer than Lincoln wanted.McClellans repeated delays frustrated Lincoln and Congress,as did his position that no troops were needed to defend Washington.Lincoln insisted on holding some of McClellans troops in defense of the capital; McClellan,who consistently overestimated the strength of Confederate troops,blamed this decision for the ultimate failure of the Peninsula Campaign.lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Lincoln and McClellan .McClellanGeorge McClellan after the Battle of Antietam in .Lincoln removed McClellan as generalinchief in March ,after McClellans quot;Harrisons Landing Letterquot;,in which he offered unsolicited political advice to Lincoln urging caution in the war effort.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; The office remained empty until July,when Henry Halleck was selected for it.lt;refgt;http:www.civilwar.orgeducationhistorybiographieshenrywhalleck.html Henry W.Halleck Civil War Trust.Retrieved March ,lt;refgt; McClellans letter incensed Radical Republicans,who successfully pressured Lincoln to appoint John Pope military officerJohn Pope,a Republican,as head of the new Army of Virginia.Pope complied with Lincolns strategic desire to move toward Richmond from the north,thus protecting the capital from attack.lt;ref namequot;Nevins ,:quot;gt;Nevins ,However,lacking requested reinforcements from McClellan,now commanding the Army of the Potomac,Pope was soundly defeated at the Second Battle of Bull Run in the summer of ,forcing the Army of the Potomac to defend Washington for a second time.lt;ref namequot;Nevins ,:quot;gt; The war also expanded with naval operations in  when the CSS VirginiaCSS Virginia,formerly the USS Merrimack,damaged or destroyed three Union vessels in Norfolk,Virginia,before being engaged and damaged by the USS MonitorUSS Monitor.lt;refgt;Donald ,Despite his dissatisfaction with McClellans failure to reinforce Pope,Lincoln was desperate,and restored him to command of all forces around Washington,to the dismay of all in his cabinet but Seward.lt;refgt;Goodwin,lt;refgt; Two days after McClellans return to command,General Robert E.Lees forces crossed the Potomac River into Maryland,leading to the Battle of Antietam in September .lt;refgt;Goodwin,lt;refgt; The ensuing Union victory was among the bloodiest in American history,but it enabled Lincoln to announce that he would issue an Emancipation Proclamation in January.Having composed the Proclamation some time earlier,lt;refgt;Goodwin,McClellan then resisted the Presidents demand that he pursue Lees retreating and exposed army,As a result,Lincoln replaced Buell with William Rosecrans; and,after the  midterm elections,he replaced McClellan with Republican Ambrose Burnside.lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Union soldiers entrenched along the west bank of the Rappahannock River at Fredericksburg,Virginia B.jpgthumbpxUnion soldiers before Maryes Heights,Second Battle of FredericksburgFredericksburg,just prior to the battle of May ,Burnside,against the advice of the president,Not only had Burnside been defeated on the battlefield,but his soldiers were disgruntled and undisciplined.Desertions during  were in the thousands and they increased after Fredericksburg.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincoln brought in Joseph Hooker,despite his record of loose talk about the need for a military dictatorship.The United States House of Representatives elections,as well as rising inflation,new high taxes,rumors of corruption,the suspension of habeas corpus,Conscriptionthe military draft law,and fears that freed slaves would undermine the labor market.but it lost votes in the cities and the lower Midwest.lt;ref namequot;ReferenceAquot;gt;Nevins vol  pp.quote on p.While Republicans were discouraged,Democrats were energized and did especially well in Pennsylvania,Ohio,Indiana,and New York.The Republicans did maintain their majorities in Congress and in the major states,except New York.as so far conducted,and by the rapid exhaustion of the national resources without progressquot;.In the spring of ,Rosecrans on Chattanooga,Grants on Vicksburg,and a naval assault on Charleston.lt;refgt;Donald ,Hooker was routed by Lee at the Battle of Chancellorsville in May,lt;refgt;Nevins :.lt;refgt; but continued to command his troops for some weeks.He ignored Lincolns order to divide his troops,and possibly force Lee to do the same in Harpers Ferry,and tendered his resignation,which Lincoln accepted.He was replaced by George Meade,who followed Lee into Pennsylvania for the Gettysburg Campaign,which was a victory for the Union,though Lees army avoided capture.At the same time,after initial setbacks,Grant laid siege to Vicksburg and the Union navy attained some success in Charleston harbor.lt;refgt;Donald ,After the Battle of Gettysburg,who resented his civilian interference with their own plans.Even so,he often continued to give detailed directions to his generals as CommanderinChief.lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Emancipation proclamation.jpgthumbpxLincoln presents the first draft of the Emancipation Proclamation to his cabinet.Painted by Francis Bicknell Carpenter in altA darkhaired,bearded,middleaged man holding documents is seated among seven other men.which before ,committed the issue to individual states.territory.At the beginning of the war,Lincoln believed that curtailing slavery in these ways would economically expunge it,as envisioned by the Founding Fathers of the United StatesFounding Fathers,under the constitution.lt;ref namequot;Mackubinquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.nationalreview.combooksowens.asptitleThe LiberatorfirstThomas OwenslastMackubindateMarch ,workNational ReviewpublisherNational Reviewarchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgafJhjarchivedateOctober ,Frmont in August  and by Major General David Hunter in May ,on the grounds that it was not within their power,and it would upset the border states loyal to the Union.lt;refgt;Guelzo ,On June ,endorsed by Lincoln,Congress passed an act banning slavery on all federal territory.In July,the Confiscation Act of  was passed,Although Lincoln believed it was not within Congresss power to free the slaves within the states,he approved the bill in deference to the legislature.and Lincoln was planning to take that action.In that month,Lincoln discussed a draft of the Emancipation Proclamation with his cabinet.In it,he stated that quot;as a fit and necessary military measure,on January ,all persons held as slaves in the Confederate states will thenceforward,and forever,be freequot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,Privately,Lincoln concluded at this point that the slave base of the Confederacy had to be eliminated.However Copperheads argued that emancipation was a stumbling block to peace and reunification.Republican editor Horace Greeley of the highly influential New York Tribune fell for the ploy,lt;refgt;McPherson ,lt;refgt; and Lincoln refuted it directly in a shrewd letter of August ,Although he said he personally wished all men could be free,Lincoln stated that the primary goal of his actions as the U.quoteMy paramount object in this struggle is to save the Union,and is not either to save or to destroy slavery.If I could save the Union without freeing any slave I would do it,What I do about slavery,and the colored race,I do because I believe it helps to save the Union; and what I forbear,I forbear because I do not believe it would help to save the Unionamp;nbsp;.lt;refgt;Basler ,The Emancipation Proclamation,issued on September ,and put into effect on January ,declared free the slaves in  states not then under Union control,with exemptions specified for areas already under Union control in two states.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Lincoln spent the next  days preparing the army and the nation for emancipation,lt;refgt;Louis P.Masur,Once the abolition of slavery in the rebel states became a military objective,as Union armies advanced south,more slaves were liberated until all three million of them in Confederate territory were freed.Lincolns comment on the signing of the Proclamation was: quot;I never,in my life,felt more certain that I was doing right,than I do in signing this paper.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; For some time,He commented favorably on colonization in the Emancipation Proclamation,but all attempts at such a massive undertaking failed.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; A few days after Emancipation was announced,but suggested the removal of General George B.McClellan as commander of the Union Army.lt;refgt;Nevins ,By the spring of ,Lincoln was ready to recruit black troops in more than token numbers.In a letter to Andrew Johnson,the military governor of Tennessee,encouraging him to lead the way in raising black troops,Lincoln wrote,quot;The bare sight of ,lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; By the end of ,at Lincolns direction,General Lorenzo Thomas had recruited  regiments of blacks from the Mississippi Valley.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Frederick Douglass once observed of Lincoln: quot;In his company,I was never reminded of my humble origin,or of my unpopular colorquot;.lt;refgt;Douglass,File:Lincolns Gettysburg Address,Gettysburg.jpgthumbpxThe only confirmed photo of Abraham Lincoln at Gettysburg,some three hours before Gettysburg Addressthe speech.With the great Union victory at the Battle of Gettysburg in July ,and the defeat of the Copperheads in the Ohio election in the fall,despite the New York City draft riots.The stage was set for his address at the Gettysburg battlefield cemetery on November ,lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Defying Lincolns prediction that quot;the world will little note,nor long remember what we say herequot;,the Address became the most quoted speech in American history.lt;ref namequot;Bullaquot;gt;Bulla ,In  words,and three minutes,Lincoln asserted the nation was born not in ,but in ,quot;conceived in Liberty,and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equalquot;.He defined the war as an effort dedicated to these principles of liberty and equality for all.The emancipation of slaves was now part of the national war effort.He declared that the deaths of so many brave soldiers would not be in vain,that slavery would end as a result of the losses,and the future of democracy in the world would be assured,that quot;government of the people,by the people,for the people,shall not perish from the earthquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Wills,File:The Peacemakers .jpgaltPainting of four men conferring in a ships cabin,entitled quot;The Peacemakersquot;.thumbpxPresident Lincoln center right with,from left,Generals William Tecumseh ShermanSherman and Ulysses S.Meades failure to capture Lees army as it retreated from Gettysburg,and the continued passivity of the Army of the Potomac,persuaded Lincoln that a change in command was needed.General Ulysses S.Responding to criticism of Grant after Shiloh,Lincoln had said,quot;I cant spare this man.He fights.quot;lt;refgt;Thomas ,lt;refgt; With Grant in command,and have a top commander who agreed on the use of black troops.lt;refgt;Nevins,Ordeal of the Union Vol.Nevertheless,Lincoln was concerned that Grant might be considering a candidacy for President in ,as McClellan was.Lincoln arranged for an intermediary to make inquiry into Grants political intentions,and being assured that he had none,submitted to the Senate Grants promotion to commander of the Union Army.He obtained Congresss consent to reinstate for Grant the rank of Lieutenant General,which no officer had held since George Washington.lt;refgt;Donald ,Grant waged his bloody Overland Campaign in .This is often characterized as a attrition warfarewar of attrition,Even though they had the advantage of fighting on the defensive,lt;refgt;McPherson ,and Lincoln asked what Grants plans were,to which the general replied,quot;I propose to fight it out on this line if it takes all summer.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,The Confederacy lacked reinforcements,so Lees army shrank with every costly battle.Grants army moved south,crossed the James River,forcing a siege and trench warfare outside Petersburg,Virginia.Lincoln then made an extended visit to Grants headquarters at City Point,Virginia.as Sherman coincidentally managed a hasty visit to Grant from his position in North Carolina.lt;ref namequot;whitehousehistoryquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.whitehousehistory.orgwhhaaboutwhitehousecollectionwhitehousecollectionart.htmltitleThe PeacemakerspublisherThe White House Historical Associationarchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgaJjOaarchivedateOctober ,and replaced the Union losses.lt;refgt;Thomas ,Lincoln authorized Grant to target the Confederate infrastructuresuch as plantations,railroads,but neither Lincoln nor his commanders saw destruction as the main goal,but rather defeat of the Confederate armies.Mark E.Neely Jr.lt;refgt;Neely ,During Earlys Battle of Fort Stevensraid on Washington,in ,Lincoln was watching the combat from an exposed position; Captain Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr.Oliver Wendell Holmes shouted at him,quot;Get down,you damn fool,before you get shot!quot;lt;refgt;Thomas ,lt;refgt; After repeated calls on Grant to defend Washington,Sheridan was appointed and the threat from Early was dispatched.lt;refgt;Donald ,As Grant continued to wear down Lees forces,efforts to discuss peace began.Confederate Vice President Alexander H.StephensStephens led a group to meet with Lincoln,Seward,and others at Hampton Roads ConferenceHampton Roads.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; On April ,and the Confederate government evacuated Richmond.Days later,when that city fell,Lincoln visited the vanquished Confederate capital; as he walked through the city,white Southerners were stonefaced,but freedmen greeted him as a hero.On April ,lt;refgt;Donald ,CSS image cropImage  LINCOLN,AbrahamPresident BEP engraved portrait.MainElectoral history of Abraham LincolnUnited States presidential election,While the war was still being waged,Lincoln faced reelection in .Lincoln was a master politician,bringing togetherand holding togetherall the main factions of the Republican Party,and bringing in War Democrats such as Edwin M.Stanton and Andrew Johnson as well.build support for his own policies,and fend off efforts by Radicals to drop him from the  ticket.lt;refgt;Fish,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Tegeder,lt;refgt; At its  convention,the Republican Party selected Johnson,a War Democrat from the Southern state of Tennessee,as his running mate.To broaden his coalition to include War Democrats as well as Republicans,Lincoln ran under the label of the new National Union Party United StatesUnion Party.lt;refgt;Donald ,When Grants  spring campaigns turned into bloody stalemates and Union casualties mounted,the lack of military success wore heavily on the Presidents reelection prospects,and many Republicans across the country feared that Lincoln would be defeated.Sharing this fear,Lincoln wrote and signed a pledge that,if he should lose the election,quot;gt;Grimsley,quoteThis morning,as for some days past,it seems exceedingly probable that this Administration will not be reelected.Then it will be my duty to so cooperate with the President elect,lt;refgt;Basler ,lt;refgt; Lincoln did not show the pledge to his cabinet,but asked them to sign the sealed envelope.image Electoral Map.altMap of the U.showing Lincoln winning all the Union states except for Kentucky,New Jersey,and Delaware.The Southern states are not included.captionAn Electoral College United Stateselectoral landslide in red for Lincoln in the  election,imageAbraham Lincoln second inaugural address.altA large crowd in front of a large building with many pillars.their candidate,General George B.McClellan,supported the war and repudiated the platform.lt;refgt; the Democratic Party was deeply split,with some leaders and most soldiers openly for Lincoln.By contrast,the National Union Party was united and energized as Lincoln made emancipation the central issue,and state Republican parties stressed the perfidy of the Copperheads.lt;refgt;Randall amp; Current ,lt;refgt; On November ,Lincoln was reelected in a landslide,carrying all but three states,and receiving  percent of the Union soldiers vote.lt;ref namequot;Grimsley,quot;gt;lt;refgt;Paludan,On March ,Lincoln delivered his Lincolns second inaugural addresssecond inaugural address.In it,he deemed the high casualties on both sides to be Gods will.lt;refgt;Noll,quoteFondly do we hopefervently do we praythat this mighty scourge of war may speedily pass away.Yet,if God wills that it continue,until all the wealth piled by the wikt:bondmanbondmans  years of unrequited toil shall be sunk,and until every drop of blood drawn with the lash,shall be paid by another drawn with the sword,as was said ,years ago,so still it must be said,quot;the judgments of the Lord,are true and righteous altogetherquot;.With malice toward none; with charity for all; with firmness in the right,as God gives us to see the right,and for his widow,and his orphanto do all which may achieve and cherish a just and lasting peace,among ourselves,and with all nations.lt;refgt;Abraham Lincoln,Abraham Lincoln: Selected Speeches and Writings Library of America edition,Reconstruction began during the war,and how to determine the fates of Confederate leaders and freed slaves.Shortly after Lees surrender,a general had asked Lincoln how the defeated Confederates should be treated,and Lincoln replied,quot;Let em up easy.quot;lt;refgt;Thomas ,lt;refgt; In keeping with that sentiment,Lincoln led the moderates regarding Reconstruction policy,and was opposed by the Radical Republicans,under Rep.Thaddeus Stevens,Sen.Charles Sumner and Sen.Benjamin Wade,political allies of the president on other issues.Determined to find a course that would reunite the nation and not alienate the South,Lincoln urged that speedy elections under generous terms be held throughout the war.His Ten percent planAmnesty Proclamation of December ,offered pardons to those who had not held a Confederate civil office,had not mistreated Union prisoners,and would sign an oath of allegiance.lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Lincoln and Johnsond.entitled quot;The Rail Splitter At Work Repairing the Union.quot; The caption reads Johnson: Take it quietly Uncle Abe and I will draw it closer than ever.Lincoln: A few more stitches Andy and the good old Union will be mended.As Southern states were subdued,Of special importance were Tennessee and Arkansas,respectively.In Louisiana,Lincoln ordered General Nathaniel P.Banks to promote a plan that would restore statehood when  percent of the voters agreed to it.On the other hand,the Radicals denounced his policy as too lenient,and passed their own plan,the WadeDavis Bill,in .When Lincoln vetoed the bill,the Radicals retaliated by refusing to seat representatives elected from Louisiana,Arkansas,and Tennessee.lt;refgt;Donald ,Lincolns appointments were designed to keep both the moderate and Radical factions in harness.To fill Chief Justice Taneys seat on the Supreme Court,he named the choice of the Radicals,Salmon P.Chase,who Lincoln believed would uphold the emancipation and paper money policies.lt;refgt;Nevins,Ordeal of the Union,Vol IV.After implementing the Emancipation Proclamation,which did not apply to every state,Lincoln declared that such an amendment would quot;clinch the whole matterquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; By December ,a proposed constitutional amendment that would outlaw slavery was brought to Congress for passage.This first attempt at an amendment failed to pass,falling short of the required twothirds majority on June ,in the House of Representatives.After a long debate in the House,a second attempt passed Congress on January ,and was sent to the state legislatures for ratification.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.history.comthisdayinhistoryhousepassesthethamendment titleHouse passes the th Amendment  History.com This Day in History   publisherHistory.com date accessdateNovember ,lt;refgt; Upon ratification,it became the Thirteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution on December ,lt;refgt;cite webtitlePrimary Documents in American History: th Amendment to the U.Constitutionurlhttp:www.govrrprogrambibourdocsthamendment.htmlpublisherLibrary of Congressarchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgaBIwNwarchivedateOctober ,As the war drew to a close,Lincoln stated that his Louisiana plan did not apply to all states under Reconstruction.Shortly before his assassination,Lincoln announced he had a new plan for southern Reconstruction.until readmission under the control of southern Unionists.lt;refgt;Carwardine ,but they make projections based on his known policy positions and political acumen.Lincoln biographers James G.Randall and Richard Current,according to David Lincove,:It is likely that had he lived,Lincoln would have followed a policy similar to Johnsons,that he would have clashed with congressional Radicals,that he would have produced a better result for the freedmen than occurred,and that his political skills would have helped him avoid Johnsons mistakes.lt;refgt;cite booklastLincovefirstDavid A.titleReconstruction in the United States: An Annotated Bibliographyurlhttps:books.google.:Unlike Sumner and other Radicals,He had long made clear his opposition to the confiscation and redistribution of land.He believed,as most Republicans did in April ,that the voting requirements should be determined by the states.He assumed that political control in the South would pass to white Unionists,reluctant secessionists,and forwardlooking former Confederates.But time and again during the war,Lincoln,after initial opposition,had come to embrace positions first advanced by abolitionists and Radical Republicans.amp;nbsp;.along the lines Lincoln proposed just before his death.google.idbmcvwTICamp;pgPAyearpublisherW.File:Abraham Lincoln O by Gardner,crop.pngthumbuprightleftaltAn older,tiredlooking Abraham Lincoln with a beard.Lincoln in February ,about two months before his death.The successful reunification of the states had consequences for the name of the country.The term quot;the United Statesquot; has historically been used,sometimes in the plural quot;these United Statesquot;,and other times in the singular,without any particular grammatical consistency.lt;ref namequot;Presidential Proclamationquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.whitehouse.quote.amp;nbsp;a new meaning was conferred on our countrys nameamp;nbsp;.archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgaAPoABarchivedateOctober ,In recent years,historians such as Harry Jaffa,Herman Belz,John Diggins,Vernon Burton and Eric Foner have stressed Lincolns redefinition of republican values.As early as the s,a time when most political rhetoric focused on the sanctity of the Constitution,lt;refgt;Jaffa,lt;refgt; The Declarations emphasis on freedom and equality for all,in contrast to the Constitutions tolerance of slavery,shifted the debate.As Diggins concludes regarding the highly influential Cooper Union speech of early ,quot;lt;refgt;Diggins,lt;refgt; His position gained strength because he highlighted the moral basis of republicanism,rather than its legalisms.lt;refgt;Foner ,lt;refgt; Nevertheless,in ,Lincoln justified the war in terms of legalisms the Constitution was a contract,and for one party to get out of a contract all the other parties had to agree,lt;refgt;Jaffa,lt;refgt;Orville Vernon Burton,In March ,in Lincolns first inaugural address,he explored the nature of democracy.He denounced secession as anarchy,He said quot;A majority held in restraint by constitutional checks and limitations,and always changing easily with deliberate changes of popular opinions and sentiments,is the only true sovereign of a free people.quot;lt;refgt;Belz ,Lincoln adhered to the Whig theory of the presidency,which gave Congress primary responsibility for writing the laws while the Executive enforced them.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; He signed the Homestead Act in ,The Morrill LandGrant Colleges Act,also signed in ,provided government grants for agricultural colleges in each state.which was completed in .lt;refgt;Paludan,lt;refgt;McPherson ,Infobox U.State  William H.Treasury  Salmon P.Treasury   William P.War   Edwin M.Post   William Dennison Jr.source  lt;refgt;cite webauthorSummers,RoberttitleAbraham Lincolnurlhttp:www.orgdivpotusalincoln.htmlworkInternet Public Library  IPLpublisherU.Michigan and Drexel U.archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgdMTznarchivedateOctober ,and a new Federal income tax.In ,Lincoln signed the second and third Morrill Tariff,the first having become law under James Buchanan.Also in ,Lincoln signed the Revenue Act of ,creating the first U.income tax.lt;refgt;Donald ,which was later changed by the Revenue Act of  to a progressive rate structure.lt;refgt;Paludan,It also established a national currency.In ,Congress created,with Lincolns approval,the United States Department of AgricultureDepartment of Agriculture.lt;ref namequot;Donald  p.quot;gt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In ,Lincoln sent a senior general,John Pope,to put down the quot;Dakota War of Sioux Uprisingquot; in Minnesota.Lincoln conducted his own personal review of each of these warrants,eventually approving  for execution one was later reprieved.lt;refgt;Cox,lt;refgt; President Lincoln had planned to reform federal Indian policy.lt;refgt;Nichols,In the wake of Grants casualties in his campaign against Lee,Lincoln had considered yet another executive call for a military draft,but it was never issued.In response to rumors of one,however,The seizure lasted for two days.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;ref namequot;Donald ,quot;gt;Donald ,lt;refgt; Before Lincolns presidency,Thanksgiving,while a regional holiday in New England since the th century,had been proclaimed by the federal government only sporadically and on irregular dates.The last such proclamation had been during James Madisons presidency  years before.In ,Lincoln declared the final Thursday in November of that year to be a day of Thanksgiving.lt;ref namequot;Donald ,quot;gt; In June ,Lincoln approved the Yosemite Grant enacted by Congress,which provided unprecedented federal protection for the area now known as Yosemite National Park.lt;refgt;cite booklastSchafferfirstJeffrey P.Salmon P.File:Mathew Brady,Portrait of Secretary of the Treasury Salmon P.Chase,officer of the United States government ,full version.jpgthumbrightSalmon Portland Chase was Lincolns choice to be Chief Justice of the United States.and if we should,and he should answer us,we should despise him for it.Therefore we must take a man whose opinions are known.quot;lt;ref namequot;Donald ,quot;gt; Lincoln made five appointments to the United States Supreme Court.Noah Haynes Swayne,nominated January ,and appointed January ,was chosen as an antislavery lawyer who was committed to the Union.Samuel Freeman Miller,nominated and appointed on July ,supported Lincoln in the  election and was an avowed abolitionist.David Davis,Lincolns campaign manager in ,nominated December ,and appointed December ,had also served as a judge in Lincolns Illinois court circuit.Stephen Johnson Field,a previous California Supreme Court justice,was nominated March ,and appointed March ,and provided geographic balance,as well as political balance to the court as a Democrat.Finally,Lincolns Treasury Secretary,Salmon P.Chase,was nominated as Chief Justice,and appointed the same day,on December ,Lincoln believed Chase was an able jurist,would support Reconstruction legislation,and that his appointment united the Republican Party.lt;refgt;Blue,Lincoln appointed  federal judges,including four Associate Justices and one Chief Justice to the Supreme Court of the United States,and  judges to the United States district courts.Lincoln appointed no judges to the United States circuit courts during his time in office.West Virginia,admitted to the Union June ,As a condition for its admission,West Virginias constitution was required to provide for the gradual abolition of slavery.Nevada,which became the third State in the farwest of the continent,was admitted as a free state on October ,lt;refgt;Donald ,File:Lincoln assassination slide c.pngthumbleftaltImage of Lincoln being shot by Booth while sitting in a theater booth.Shown in the presidential booth of Fords Theatre,from left to right,are assassin John Wilkes Booth,Abraham Lincoln,Mary Todd Lincoln,Clara Harris,and Henry Rathbone.he had contacts with the Confederate secret service.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In ,Booth formulated a plan very similar to one of Thomas N.Conrad previously authorized by the Confederacylt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; to kidnap Lincoln in exchange for the release of Confederate prisoners.After attending an April ,speech in which Lincoln promoted voting rights for blacks,an incensed Booth changed his plans and became determined to assassinate the president.lt;refgt;Harrison ,lt;refgt; Learning that the President and Grant would be attending Fords Theatre,Booth formulated a plan with coconspirators to assassinate Lincoln and Grant at the theater,as well as Vice President Johnson and Secretary of State Seward at their homes.Without his main bodyguard,Ward Hill Lamon,Lincoln left to attend the play Our American Cousin on April .At the last minute,Grant decided to go to New Jersey to visit his children instead of attending the play.lt;refgt;Donald ,Lincolns bodyguard,John Parker,left Fords Theater during intermission to drink at the saloon next door.The now unguarded President sat in his state box in the balcony.Seizing the opportunity,Booth crept up from behind and at about :amp;nbsp;pm,aimed at the back of Lincolns head and fired at pointblank range,mortally wounding the President.Major Henry Rathbone momentarily grappled with Booth,but Booth stabbed him and escaped.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.smithsonianmag.comhistoryarchaeologyLincolnsMissingBodyguard.htmltitleLincolns Missing BodyguardfirstPaullastMartindateApril ,workSmithsonian Magazinearchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgaAqLOzqarchivedateOctober ,After being on the run for  days,Booth was tracked down and found on a farm in Virginia,some convertmikm south of Washington.After refusing to surrender to Union troops,Booth was killed by Sergeant Boston Corbett on April .lt;refgt;Steers,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Donald ,Doctor Charles Leale,an Army surgeon,found the President unresponsive,barely breathing and with no detectable pulse.Having determined that the President had been shot in the head,and not stabbed in the shoulder as originally thought,he made an attempt to clear the blood clot,after which the President began to breathe more naturally.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:news.yahoo.comreportfirstdoctorreachshotlincolnfound.After remaining in a coma for nine hours,Lincoln died at :amp;nbsp;am on April .Secretary of War Stanton saluted and said,quot;Now he belongs to the ages.quot;lt;refgt;Donald ,Witnesses have provided other versions of the quote,quot;He now belongs to the ages.quot; and quot;He is a man for the ages.while the citys church bells rang.President Johnson was sworn in at :amp;nbsp;am,less than  hours after Lincolns death.The late President lay in state in the East Room,and then in the Capitol Rotunda from April  through April .For his final journey with his son Willie,url         http:www.lincolnfuneraltrain.comhtmlfuneraltrain.author      Scott D.accessdate  November ,lt;refgt; bore Lincolns remains on a slow circuitous waypoint journey from Washington D.to Springfield,Illinois,as well as many people who gathered in informal trackside tributes with bands,bonfires,and hymn singinglt;refgt;Trostel,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Goodrich,lt;refgt; or silent reverence with hat in hand as the railway procession slowly passed by.Poet Walt Whitman composed When Lilacs Last in the Dooryard Bloomd to eulogize Lincoln,one of four poems he wrote about the assassinated president.lt;refgt;cite book  lastPeck  firstGarrett  titleWalt Whitman in Washington,: The Civil War and Americas Great Poet  year  publisherThe History Press  locationCharleston,SC  isbn  pageslt;refgt; Historians have emphasized the widespread shock and sorrow,but also noted that some Lincoln haters cheered when they heard the news.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorMartha HodestitleMourning Lincolnurlhttps:books.google.idZtBgAAQBAJamp;pgPAyearpublisherYale UPpages,lt;refgt; AfricanAmericans were especially moved; they had lost their Moses.citation neededdateNovember  In a larger sense,lt;refgt;cite bookauthorHodestitleMourning Lincolnurlhttps:books.google.File:AbrahamLincolnOilPaintingRestored.jpgthumbuprightaltA painting of Lincoln sitting with his hand on his chin and his elbow on his leg.Abraham Lincoln HealyLincoln,As a young man,Lincoln was a religious skepticismreligious skeptic,lt;refgt;cite bookauthorDouglas L.WilsontitleHonors Voice: The Transformation of Abraham Lincolnurlhttps:books.google.idKCMuZMsQMCamp;pgPAyearpublisherRandom House Digital,Inc.pageisbnlt;refgt; or,in the words of a biographer,an iconoclasmiconoclast.lt;refgt;Carwardine ,lt;refgt; Later in life,who were mostly Evangelicalismevangelical Protestants.lt;refgt;Carwardine ,lt;refgt; He never joined a church,although he frequently attended with his wife.see cite journalurlhttp:www.edusponsoredrestorationquarterlyarchivessvolnocontentsmartin.he was deeply familiar with the Bible,and he both quoted and praised it.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; He was private about his beliefs and respected the beliefs of others.Lincoln never made a clear profession of Christian beliefs.However he did believe in an allpowerful God that shaped events and,by ,was expressing those beliefs in major speeches.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorMark A.NolltitleA History of Christianity in the United States and Canadaurlhttps:books.google.idVGFwbzzyQCamp;pgPAyearpublisherWm.In the s,Lincoln subscribed to the Doctrine of Necessity,a belief that asserted the human mind was controlled by some higher power.lt;refgt;Donald ,lt;refgt; In the s,Lincoln believed in quot;providencequot; in a general way,lt;refgt;Grant R.Brodrecht,lt;refgt; When he suffered the death of his son Edward,Lincoln more frequently expressed a need to depend on God.lt;refgt;Parrillo,lt;refgt;Wilson,lt;refgt; After Willies death,Lincoln considered why,from a divine standpoint,the severity of the war was necessary.Yet the contest began.And having begun He could give the final victory to either side any day.Yet the contest proceeds.quot;lt;refgt;Wilson,lt;refgt; On the day Lincoln was assassinated,he reportedly told his wife he desired to visit the Holy Land.lt;refgt;Guelzo ,Several claims abound that Lincolns health was declining before the assassination.lt;ref namequot;theatlantic.comquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.theatlantic.comtechnologyarchivewaslincolndyingbeforehewasshottitleWas Lincoln Dying Before He Was Shot?dateMay ,workThe AtlanticaccessdateOctober ,lt;refgt; which manifests with a medullary thyroid carcinoma,Mucosal neuromata with endocrine tumorsmucosal neuromas and a MarfanoidMarfinoid appearance.Others simply claim he had Marfans syndrome,based on his tall appearance with spindly fingers,and the association of possible aortic regurgitation,which back then had a long exposure time.DNA analysis is so far being refused by the Grand Army of the Republic museum in Philadelphia.lt;ref namequot;theatlantic.File:Mr Lincoln.jpgthumbLincolns image is carved into the stone of Mount Rushmore.In Historical rankings of Presidents of the United Statessurveys of U.scholars ranking presidentslt;!Lincoln is st in  of  on that pagegt; conducted since the s,Lincoln is consistently ranked in the top three,often as number one.while legal scholars placed him second after Washington.lt;ref namequot;Tarantoquot;gt;Taranto,lt;refgt; In presidential ranking polls conducted in the United States since ,Lincoln has been rated at the very top in the majority of polls: Schlesinger ,Schlesinger ,Murray Blessing Survey,Chicago Tribune  poll,Schlesinger ,CSPAN ,RidingsMcIver ,Time ,and CSPAN .Generally,the top three presidents are rated as .Lincoln; .George Washington; and .Franklin D.Roosevelt,although Lincoln and Washington,and Washington and Roosevelt,are occasionally reversed.lt;refgt;Densen,John V.Editor,Reassessing The Presidency,The Rise of the Executive State and the Decline of Freedom Ludwig von Mises Institute,pgs.; Ridings,William H.amp; Stuard B.McIver,Rating The Presidents,A Ranking of U.Leaders,From the Great and Honorable to the Dishonest and Incompetent Citadel Press,Kensington Publishing Corp.President Lincolns assassination increased his status to the point of making him a national martyr.Lincoln was viewed by abolitionists as a champion for human liberty.Republicans linked Lincolns name to their party.Many,though not all,in the South considered Lincoln as a man of outstanding ability.lt;refgt;Chesebrough,with even white Southerners in agreement.lt;refgt;Schwartz ,but as the advocate of the common man who doubtless would have supported the welfare state.In the Cold War years,lt;refgt;Schwartz ,Apart from neoConfederates such as Mel Bradford who denounced his treatment of the white South.lt;refgt; for his intense nationalism,support for business,his insistence on stopping the spread of human bondage,and his devotion to the principles of the Founding Fathers.lt;refgt;Belz ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Graebner,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Smith,lt;refgt; As a Whig activist,Lincoln was a spokesman for business interests,favoring high tariffs,banks,internal improvements,and railroads in opposition to the Jacksonian Democracyagrarian Democrats.lt;refgt;Boritt ,lt;refgt; William C.Harris found that Lincolns quot;reverence for the Founding Fathers,the Constitution,the laws under it,lt;refgt;Harris,lt;refgt; James G.his distrust of dangerous agitation,and his reluctance toward ill digested schemes of reformquot;.Randall concludes that,hatred for the slaveholder,thirst for vengeance,partisan plotting,and ungenerous demands that Southern institutions be transformed overnight by outsiders.quot;lt;refgt;Randall ,By the late s,liberals,such as historian Lerone Bennett Jr.Lerone Bennett,were having second thoughts,especially regarding Lincolns views on racial issues.lt;refgt;Zilversmit,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Smith,lt;refgt; Bennett won wide attention when he called Lincoln a white supremacist in .lt;refgt;Bennett,lt;refgt; He noted that Lincoln used ethnic slurs,told jokes that ridiculed blacks,insisted he opposed social equality,and proposed American Colonization Societysending freed slaves to another country.Defenders,such as authors Dirck and Cashin,retorted that he was not as bad as most politicians of his day;lt;refgt;Dirck ,lt;refgt; and that he was a quot;moral visionaryquot; who deftly advanced the abolitionist cause,as fast as politically possible.lt;refgt;Striner,or at least were responsible for pressuring the government on emancipation.lt;refgt;Cashin,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Kelley amp; Lewis,lt;refgt; Historian Barry Schwartz wrote in  that Lincolns image suffered quot;erosion,fading prestige,benign ridiculequot; in the late th century.lt;refgt;Schwartz ,lt;refgt; On the other hand,and not compelled toward fact or reasonquot;.lt;refgt;Donald ,Todays U.President,however,seems to be promoting a sympathetic resurgence for his predecessor,Lincoln.Indeed,President Obama,has insisted on using Lincolns Bible for his swearing in of office at both his inaugurations.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.usatoday.comstorytheovalobamainauguralbiblekennedyking  titleObama to be sworn in with Lincoln,Lincoln has often been portrayed by Hollywood,almost always in a flattering light.lt;refgt;Steven Spielberg,Doris Kearns Goodwin,and Tony Kushner,quot;Mr.Lincoln Goes to Hollywoodquot;,Smithsonian   pp.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Melvyn Stokes,quot;Abraham Lincoln and the Moviesquot;,American Nineteenth Century History  June ,File:Aerial view of Lincoln Memorial  east side EDIT.jpegthumbaltAn aerial photo a large white building with big pillars.Lincoln Memorial in Washington,Lincolns portrait appears on two denominations of United States currency,the Penny United States coinpenny and the United States fivedollar bill bill.His likeness also appears on many U.presidents on U.postage stampsAbraham Lincolnpostage stamps and he has been memorialized in many town,city,and county names,lt;ref namequot;Dennis,quot;gt;Dennis,lt;refgt; including the Lincoln,Nebraskacapital of Nebraska.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.nebraska.govpoigeneralinfo.htmltitleNebraska.govworknebraska.govmoruhistorycultureindex.htmpublisherU.National Park Servicearchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgdfUtolharchivedateOctober ,lt;refgt; Lincoln Memorial,Fords Theatre,and Petersen House where he died in Washington,; and the Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library and Museum in Springfield,Illinois,not far from Lincoln Home National Historic SiteLincolns home,as well as Lincolns Tombhis tomb.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.alplm.webcitation.orgipRLLDarchivedateOctober ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.fordstheatre.orghomeaboutfordstitleAbout Fords publisherFords Theatrearchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgiuxSkarchivedateOctober ,There was also the Great Moments with Mr.Lincoln exhibit in Disneyland,and the Hall of Presidents at Walt Disney World,which had to do with Walt Disney admiring Lincoln ever since he was a little boy.Barry Schwartz,a sociologist who has examined Americas cultural memory,argues that in the s and s,During the Great Depression,he argues,Lincoln served quot;as a means for seeing the worlds disappointments,for making its sufferings not so much explicable as meaningfulquot;.Franklin D.Roosevelt,preparing America for war,used the words of the Civil War president to clarify the threat posed by Germany and Japan.Americans asked,quot;What would Lincoln do?quot;lt;refgt;Barry Schwartz,Abraham Lincoln in the PostHeroic Era: History and Memory in Late TwentiethCentury America  pp.lt;refgt; However,Schwartz also finds that since World War II,Lincolns symbolic power has lost relevance,and this quot;fading hero is symptomatic of fading confidence in national greatnessquot;.He suggested that postmodernism and multiculturalism have diluted greatness as a concept.lt;refgt;Barry Schwartz,Abraham Lincoln in the PostHeroic Era: History and Memory in Late TwentiethCentury America  p.List of Presidents of the United States,cite journallastAdamsfirstCharles F.cite bookisbnoclctitleHalleck: Lincolns Chief of StaffauthorlinkStephen E.AmbroselastAmbrosefirstStephen E.cite bookrefBakerlastBakerfirstJean H.titleMary Todd Lincoln: A BiographypublisherW.cite booklast Bartelt firstWilliam E.cite book editorlastBasler editorfirstRoy P.cite bookrefBelzlastBelzfirstHermantitleAbraham Lincoln,Constitutionalism,titleLincoln,cite journallastBennett JrfirstLeroneauthorlinkLerone Bennett Jr.dateFebruary titleWas Abe Lincoln a White Supremacist?journalEbonyvolumeissuepublisherJohnson Publishingissnurlhttps:books.google.cite bookrefBluelastBluefirstFrederick J.titleSalmon P.NOT CITED IN ARTICLE cite bookrefBorittlastBorittfirstGabor S.cite bookrefBullalastBullafirst David W.authorGregory A.BorchardtitleJournalism in the Civil War ErayearpublisherPeter Lang Publishing Inc.cite journallastCarwardinefirstRichard J.authorlinkRichard CarwardinedateWinter titleLincoln,Evangelical Religion,urlhttp:www.historycooperative.orgjournalsjala.carwardine.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.historycooperative.orgjournalsjala.carwardine.archivedateNovember ,cite bookrefChesebroughlastChesebroughfirstDavid B.cite bookrefCoxlastCoxfirstHank H.cite bookrefCummingslastCummingsfirstWilliam W.authorJames B.cite bookrefDennistitleRed,White,cite bookrefDigginstitleThe Lost Soul of American Politics: Virtue,SelfInterest,and the Foundations of LiberalismlastDigginsfirstJohn P.cite bookrefEdgarfirstWalter B.cite bookrefFonerauthorlinkEric FonerlastFonerfirstEric titleFree Soil,Free Labor,cite bookisbnoclctitleThe Darkest Dawn: Lincoln,Booth,cite bookrefGuelzoauthorlinkAllen C.GuelzolastGuelzofirstAllen C.titleAbraham Lincoln: Redeemer PresidentisbnyearpublisherW.NOT CITED IN ARTICLE cite bookrefGuelzolastGuelzofirstAllen C.cite bookrefHandyfirst James S.lastHandytitleBook Review: Abraham Lincoln,cite bookrefHarrisonoclclastHarrisonfirstJ.HoustontitleSettlers by the Long Grey TrailyearpublisherJ.cite bookrefHarrislastHarrisfirstWilliam C.cite bookrefHaverslastHaversfirstGrant N.cite bookrefHeidlertitleEncyclopedia of the American Civil War: A Political,Social,and Military HistoryeditorsHeidler,David S.; Jeanne T.HeidleryearpublisherW.Norton amp; Company,cite bookrefJaffafirstHarry V.authorLewis,cite bookrefLambeditorsLamb,cite journallastLuptonfirstJohn A.eduih.NOT CITED IN ARTICLE cite bookauthorlinkReinhard H.LuthinrefLuthinfirstReinhard H.cite journallastLuthinfirstReinhard H.McClintock,Russell.Lincoln and the Decision for War: The Northern Response to Secession  https:www.questia.cite book  lastMadison firstJames H.cite bookrefManschlastManschfirstLarry D.titleAbraham Lincoln,cite bookauthorlinkGeorge McGovernrefMcGovernlastMcGovernfirstGeorge S.cite bookrefMcPhersonlastMcPhersonfirstJames M.authorlinkJames M.cite bookrefMcPhersontitleBattle Cry of Freedom: The Civil War EralastMcPhersonfirstJames M.cite bookrefMcPhersonlastMcPhersonfirstJames M.cite bookauthorlinkMark E.Neely Jr.refNeely lastNeely firstMark E.questia.cite journallastNeely Jr.firstMark E.dateDecember titleWas the Civil War a Total War?journalCivil War Historyvolume issuepagesissnoclc urlhttp:muse.edulogin?authamp;typesummaryamp;urljournalscivilwarhistoryv.neely.html doi.cite bookrefNevinslastNevinsfirstAllantitleThe Emergence of Lincoln: Prologue to Civil War,volpublisherScribnersyearisbn,cite bookrefNicholslastNicholsfirstDavid A.titleLincoln Looks West: From the Mississippi to the PacificeditorRichard W.cite bookrefOateslastOatesfirstStephen B.authorlinkStephen B.cite bookrefPetersonlastPetersonfirstMerrill D.cite bookrefPotterlastPotterfirstDavid M.authorDon Edward FehrenbachertitleThe impending crisis,cite bookrefProkopowiczlastProkopowiczfirstGerald J.titleDid Lincoln Own Slaves?cite bookoclcrefRandalllastRandallfirstJames G.authorlinkJames G.RandalltitleLincoln,the Liberal StatesmanyearpublisherDodd,cite bookoclcrefRandalllastRandallfirstJ.authorCurrent,Richard NelsonseriesLincoln the PresidentvolumeIVtitleLast Full MeasurepublisherDodd,NOT CITED IN ARTICLE  cite bookrefReinhartlastReinhartfirstMark S.Inc.issnjstordoi.cite bookrefShermanlastShermanfirstWilliam T.titleMemoirs of General W.cite bookrefSmithlastSmithfirstRobert C.titleConservatism and Racism,cite bookrefTaggtitleThe Unpopular Mr.cite journallastTegederfirstVincent G.ThomasurlauthorlinkEmory M.Thomaslast ThomasfirstEmory M.editorfirstLesley J.editorlastGordoneditorfirstJohn C.cite bookrefThomasfirstBenjamin P.cite bookrefVorenberglastVorenbergfirstMichaeltitleFinal Freedom: the Civil War,the Abolition of Slavery,cite bookauthorWarren,Louis A.titleLincolns Youth: Indiana Years,Seven to TwentyOne,cite bookrefWhitelastWhite Jr.firstRonald C.titleA.Lincoln: A BiographypublisherRandom House,cite bookrefWilsonfirstDouglas L.cite bookrefWinklelastWinklefirstKenneth J.cite bookrefZarefskyauthorlinkDavid ZarefskyisbntitleLincoln,Douglas,and Slavery: In the Crucible of Public DebatelastZarefskyfirstDavid S.historycooperative.orgjournalsjalazilversmit.htmlarchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.historycooperative.orgjournalsjalazilversmit.htmlarchivedateJuly ,Holzer,Harold and Craig L.Symonds,eds.Exploring Lincoln: Great Historians Reappraise Our Greatest President ,Manning,Chandra,quot;The Shifting Terrain of Attitudes toward Abraham Lincoln and Emancipationquot;,Journal of the Abraham Lincoln Association,Winter ,Smith,Adam I.Twentieth Century British History,Dec   pp.Spielberg,Steven; Goodwin,Doris Kearns; Kushner,Tony.quot;Mr.Lincoln Goes to Hollywoodquot;,Smithsonian   pp.amp;nbsp;.Green,Michael S.Lincoln and the Election of  Concise Lincoln Library http:www.amazon.cite bookauthorHolzer,HaroldtitleLincoln PresidentElect: Abraham Lincoln and the Great Secession Winter urlhttps:books.google.cite bookisbntitleTried by War: Abraham Lincoln as Commander in ChieflastMcPhersonfirstJames M.cite bookauthorMiller,Richard LawrencetitleLincoln and His World: The Rise to National Prominence,urlhttps:books.google.idcodBTiRSJcCyearpublisherMcFarlandisbn,vol .Peraino,Kevin.Lincoln in the World: The Making of a Statesman and the Dawn of American Power .cite bookisbnoclctitleLincoln the President  volumeslastRandallfirstJames G.publisherDodd,PLEASE BE CAUTIOUS IN ADDING MORE LINKS TO THIS ARTICLE.is not a collection of links nor should it be used for advertising.Excessive or inappropriate links WILL BE DELETED.See Wikipedia:External links amp; Wikipedia:Spam for details.If there are already plentiful links,replacements on this articles discussion page,to the relevant category at the Open Directory Project dmoz.and link back to that category using the dmoz template.http:www.illinois.govalplmlibraryPagesdefault.http:www.whitehouse.http:www.abrahamlincolnassociation.http:www.lincolnbicentennial.http:www.http:www.cspan.orgvideo?lifeportraitabrahamlincoln quot;Life Portrait of Abraham Lincolnquot;,from CSPANs American Presidents: Life Portraits,June ,http:www.cspan.orgvideo?http:www.shapell.orgmanuscript.aspx?http:lincoln.http:edsitement.http:memory.govdiglibihasloc.natlib.ihas.default.saftafterThomas L.sbefbeforeJohn C.United States presidential election,saftafterUlysses S.DEFAULTSORT:Lincoln,Category:Deaths by firearm in Washington,Category:People from Coles County,Category:People from LaRue County,Category:People from Macon County,Category:People from Spencer County,Category:People murdered in Washington,Category:Politicians from Springfield,Category:United States presidential candidates,Category:United States presidential candidates,image  Aristotle Altemps Inv.caption  Roman copy in marble of a Greek bronzelt;brgt;bust of Aristotle by Lysippus,Circac.amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;BC.lt;brgt;The alabaster mantle clothingmantle is modern.birthdate   BC Stagira ancient cityStagira,lt;brgt;Chalcidice Chalkidiki,deathdate  nowrap BC aged lt;brgt;Euboea,influenced  longitemVirtually all subsequent Western philosophy,Aristotle IPAcenrsttl;lt;refgt;http:www.collinsdictionary.comdictionaryenglisharistotle quot;Aristotlequot; entry in Collins English Dictionary,HarperCollins Publishers,lt;refgt; langgrcgre IPAgrcaristotls,see Felix Jacoby on FGrHist  F .Ingemar Dring,Aristotle in the Ancient Biographical Tradition,Gteborg,ChalkidikiChalkidice,on the northern periphery of Classical Greece.His father,Nicomachus father of AristotleNicomachus,died when Aristotle was a child,whereafter Proxenus of Atarneus became his guardian.lt;refgt;cite web titleBiography of Aristotle urlhttp:www.biography.compeoplearistotle?pageearlylife publisherBiography.com accessdate March lt;refgt; At eighteen,he joined Platos Academy in Athens and remained there until the age of thirtyseven Circac.amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;BC.His writings cover many subjects amp;nbsp;including Physics Aristotlephysics,biology,zoology,metaphysics,logic,ethics,aesthetics,Poetics Aristotlepoetry,theater,music,rhetoric,linguistics,Shortly after Plato died,Aristotle left Athens and,at the request of Philip of Macedon,tutored Alexander the Great starting from amp;nbsp;BC.lt;ref namequot;philosophyquot;gt;Bertrand Russell,A History of Western Philosophy,Simon amp; Schuster,lt;refgt; According to the Encyclopdia Britannica,quot;Aristotle was the first genuine scientist in historyamp;nbsp;.and every scientist is in his debt.Teaching Alexander the Great gave Aristotle many opportunities and an abundance of supplies.The fact that Aristotle was a pupil of Plato contributed to his former views of Platonism,but,following Platos death,Aristotle immersed himself in empirical studies and shifted from Platonism to empiricism.google.combooks?Aristotles views on natural sciences represent the groundwork underlying many of his works.Aristotles views on Aristotelian physicsphysical science profoundly shaped medieval scholarship.Some of Aristotles zoological observations,such as on the hectocotyl reproductive arm of the octopus,were not confirmed or refuted until the th century.His works contain the earliest known formal study of logic,which was incorporated in the late th century into modern formal logic.In metaphysics,especially the Scholasticismscholastic tradition of the Catholic Church.His ethics,though always influential,gained renewed interest with the modern advent of virtue ethics.All aspects of Aristotles philosophy continue to be the object of active academic study today.chapter XXXVIII,titleThe Academica of Cirero  editorfirstJames S.File:The School of Aristotle The Lyceum .jpgthumbpxleftSchool of Aristotle in Mieza,MacedoniaMieza,Macedonia GreeceMacedonia,Aristotle,whose name means quot;the best purposequot;,lt;refgt;cite web lastCampbell firstMichael titleBehind the Name: Meaning,Origin and History of the Name quot;Aristotlequot; urlhttp:www.behindthename.comnamearistotle workBehind the Name: The Etymology and History of First Names publisherwww.behindthename.com accessdate April lt;refgt; was born in amp;nbsp;BC in Stagira ancient cityStagira,Chalcidice,about amp;nbsp;km  miles east of modernday Thessaloniki.Although there is little information on Aristotles childhood,he probably spent some time within the Macedonian palace,making his first connections with the Macedonian monarchy.lt;refgt;Anagnostopoulos,quot;Aristotles Lifequot; in A Companion to Aristotle Blackwell Publishing,At about the age of eighteen,Aristotle moved to Athens to continue his education at Platonic AcademyPlatos Academy.He remained there for nearly twenty years before leaving Athens in amp;nbsp;BC.although it is possible that he feared antiMacedonian sentiments and left before Plato died.lt;ref namequot;Lord Introquot;gt;Carnes Lord,introduction to The Politics by Aristotle Chicago: University of Chicago Press,File:Francesco Hayez .Aristotle then accompanied Xenocrates to the court of his friend Hermias of Atarneus in Asia Minor.There,he traveled with Theophrastus to the island of Lesbos,where together they researched the botany and zoology of the island.Aristotle married Pythias,either Hermiass adoptive daughter or niece.She bore him a daughter,whom they also named Pythias.Soon after Hermias death,Aristotle was appointed as the head of the royal academy of Macedon.During that time he gave lessons not only to Alexander,but also to two other future kings: Ptolemy I SoterPtolemy and Cassander.lt;ref namequot;Peter Greenquot;gt;Peter Green,Alexander of Macedon,University of California Press Ltd.Oxford,England ,In one famous example,he counsels Alexander to be quot;a leader to the Greeks and a despot to the barbarians,to look after the former as after friends and relatives,and to deal with the latter as with beasts or plantsquot;.By amp;nbsp;BC,Artistotle had returned to Athens,establishing his own school there known as the Lyceum ClassicalLyceum.Aristotle conducted courses at the school for the next twelve years.While in Athens,his wife Pythias died and Aristotle became involved with Herpyllis of Stagira,who bore him a son whom he named after his father,Nicomachus son of AristotleNicomachus.According to the Suda,he also had an eromenos,PalaephatusPalaephatus of Abydus.lt;refgt;William George Smith,Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology,vol.http:www.ancientlibrary.comsmithbio.html p.This period in Athens,between  and amp;nbsp;BC,is when Aristotle is believed to have composed many of his works.lt;ref namequot;philosophyquot;gt; He wrote many dialogues of which only fragments have survived.Those works that have survived are in treatise form and were not,for the most part,His most important treatises include Physics AristotlePhysics,Metaphysics AristotleMetaphysics,Nicomachean Ethics,Politics AristotlePolitics,De Anima On the Soul and Poetics AristotlePoetics.Aristotle not only studied almost every subject possible at the time,but made significant contributions to most of them.In physical science,Aristotle studied anatomy,astronomy,embryology,geography,geology,meteorology,physics and zoology.In philosophy,he wrote on aesthetics,ethics,government,metaphysics,politics,economics,psychology,rhetoric and theology.He also studied education,foreign customs,literature and poetry.His combined works constitute a virtual encyclopedia of Greek knowledge.Near the end of his life,Alexander and Aristotle became estranged over Alexanders relationship with Persia and Persians.A widespread tradition in antiquity suspected Aristotle of playing a role in Alexanders death,but there is little evidence.lt;refgt;Peter Green,Alexander of Macedon,University of California Press Ltd.Oxford,England,and .Following Alexanders death,antiMacedonian sentiment in Athens was rekindled.In amp;nbsp;BC,Demophilus and Eurymedon the Hierophant reportedly denounced Aristotle for impiety,lt;refgt; prompting him to flee to his mothers family estate in Chalcis,Claudius AelianusAelian Varia historica .Ingemar Dring,Aristotle in the Ancient Biographical Tradition,Gteborg,Tae.lt;refgt;spaced ndasha reference to Athenss prior Trial of Socratestrial and execution of Socrates.He died in Euboea of natural causes later that same year,lt;refgt;https:books.google.combooks?idifqGuiHoeQCamp;pgPAamp;dqAntipaterAristotlewillamp;sigsQzQVBdRmkspNdZnydMwzAPTc Aristotles Will,Aufstieg und Niedergang der rmischen Welt by Hildegard Temporini,Wolfgang Haase.a pen,lt;refgt;See The Politics of Aristotle translated by Ernest Barker,Oxford: Clarendom Press,xxiii,note ,who refers to Corpus Inscriptionum Graecarum,vol.xii,fasc.Eretria.In general,the details of the life of Aristotle are not wellestablished.lt;refgt;See Shields,Dring,Aristotle in the Ancient Biographical Tradition Gteborg,is a collection of an overview of?ancient biographies of Aristotle.File:Aristotle in Nuremberg Chronicle.jpgthumbuprightAristotle portrayed in the  Nuremberg Chronicle as a scholar of the th century AD.With the Prior Analytics,Aristotle is credited with the earliest study of formal logic,lt;refgt;MICHAEL DEGNAN,Recent Work in Aristotles Logic.Philosophical Books .April : .lt;refgt;Corcoran,John .quot;Aristotles Demonstrative Logicquot;.History and Philosophy of Logic,first I.lt;refgt; However,Plato reports that syntax was devised before him,by Prodicus of Ceos,who was concerned by the correct use of words.but never truly understood the logical implications.he could never actually construct one,thus he relied instead on his dialectic.lt;ref namequot;Bocheski,quot;gt;Bocheski,Plato believed that deduction would simply follow from premises,Consequently,Plato realized that a method for obtaining conclusions would be most beneficial.He never succeeded in devising such a method,but his best attempt was published in his book Sophist dialogueSophist,where he introduced his division method.first Lynn E.What we today call Aristotelian logic,Aristotle himself would have labeled quot;analyticsquot;.The term quot;logicquot; he reserved to mean dialectics.Most of Aristotles work is probably not in its original form,because it was most likely edited by students and later lecturers.The order of the books or the teachings from which they are composed is not certain,but this list was derived from analysis of Aristotles writings.It goes from the basics,the analysis of simple terms in the Categories,the analysis of propositions and their elementary relations in On Interpretation,to the study of more complex forms,namely,syllogisms in the Analytics and dialectics in the Topics and Sophistical Refutations.There is one volume of Aristotles concerning logic not found in the Organon,namely the fourth book of Metaphysics.lt;ref namequot;Bocheski,File:Sanzio  Plato Aristotle.jpgthumbPlato left and Aristotle right,a detail of The School of Athenslt;!This should link to an article about the famous artworkgt;,a fresco by Raphael.Aristotle gestures to the earth,representing his belief in knowledge through empirical observation and experience,while holding a copy of his Nicomachean Ethics in his hand,whilst Plato gestures to the heavens,representing his belief in The Forms,Like his teacher Plato,Aristotles philosophy aims at the Universality philosophyuniversal.Aristotles ontology,however,finds the universal in particular things,which he calls the essence of things,while in Platos ontology,the universal exists apart from particular things,and is related to them as their prototype or wikt:exemplarexemplar.For Aristotle,therefore,epistemology is based on the study of particular phenomena and rises to the knowledge of essences,For Aristotle,below.In a certain sense,Aristotles method is both Inductive reasoninginductive and Deductive reasoningdeductive,while Platos is essentially deductive from A priori and a posterioria priori principles.In Aristotles terminology,and includes fields that would be regarded today as physics,biology and other natural sciences.In modern times,the scope of philosophy has become limited to more generic or abstract inquiries,such as ethics and metaphysics,in which logic plays a major role.In contrast,Aristotles philosophical endeavors encompassed virtually all facets of intellectual inquiry.In the larger sense of the word,Aristotle makes philosophy coextensive with reasoning,which he also would describe as quot;sciencequot;.Note,however,For Aristotle,quot;all science dianoia is either practical,poetical or theoreticalquot; Metaphysics b.By practical science,he means ethics and politics; by poetical science,he means the study of poetry and the other fine arts; by theoretical science,he means physics,mathematics and metaphysics.If logic or quot;analyticsquot; is regarded as a study preliminary to philosophy,the divisions of Aristotelian philosophy would consist of:  Logic;  Theoretical Philosophy,including Metaphysics,Physics and Mathematics;  Practical Philosophy and  Poetical Philosophy.In the period between his two stays in Athens,between his times at the Academy and the Lyceum,Aristotle conducted most of the scientific thinking and research for which he is renowned today.In fact,most of Aristotles life was devoted to the study of the objects of natural science.He did,however,perform original research in the natural sciences,botany,zoology,physics,astronomy,chemistry,meteorology,and several other sciences.Aristotles writings on science are largely qualitative,as opposed to quantitative.Beginning in the th century,scientists began applying mathematics to the physical sciences,and Aristotles work in this area was deemed hopelessly inadequate.His failings were largely due to the absence of concepts like mass,velocity,force and temperature.He had a conception of speed and temperature,but no quantitative understanding of them,which was partly due to the absence of basic experimental devices,like clocks and thermometers.His writings provide an account of many scientific observations,a mixture of precocious accuracy and curious errors.For example,in his History of Animals he claimed that human males have more teeth than females.lt;refgt;Aristotle,History of Animals,lt;refgt; In a similar vein,John Philoponus,and later Galileo GalileiGalileo,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:plato.stanford.eduentriesphiloponus.titleStanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy publisherPlato.stanford.edu accessdate April lt;refgt; On the other hand,quot; pointing out correctly,even if such reasoning was bound to be dismissed for a long time that,thenamp;nbsp;.the sun shines on all the stars and the earth screens none of them.quot;lt;refgt;Aristotle,Meteorology .trans.Webster,rev.Barnes.In places,Todays scientific method assumes that such thinking without sufficient facts is ineffective,Aristotle also had some scientific blind spots.He posited a geocentrismgeocentric cosmology that we may discern in selections of the Metaphysics,which was widely accepted up until the th century.From the rd century to the th century,these thinkers often took Aristotles erroneous positions as given,which held back science in this epoch.lt;refgt;John Burnet classicistBurnet,John.Platonism,Berkeley: University of California Press,lt;refgt; However,For instance,Moreover,He Aristotle refers to many examples of changes now constantly going on,and insists emphatically on the great results which they must produce in the lapse of ages.He instances particular cases of lakes that had dried up,and deserts that had at length become watered by rivers and fertilized.He points to the growth of the Nilotic delta since the time of Homer,to the shallowing of the Palus Maeotis within sixty years from his own timeamp;nbsp;.He alludesamp;nbsp;.to the upheaving of one of the Eolian islands,previous to a volcanic eruption.The changes of the earth,he says,are so slow in comparison to the duration of our lives,that they are overlooked; and the migrations of people after great catastrophes,and their removal to other regions,cause the event to be forgotten.but it becomes sea in those parts where it was land,and again it becomes land where it was sea,and there is reason for thinking that these changes take place according to a certain system,and within a certain period.The concluding observation is as follows: As time never fails,and the universe is eternal,neither the Tanais,nor the Nile,can have flowed for ever.The places where they rise were once dry,and there is a limit to their operations,but there is none to time.therefore,of the earth are not some always sea,and others always continents,but every thing changes in the course of time.lt;refgt;wikiquote:Charles LyellCharles Lyell,https:archive.orgdetailsprinciplesgeolounkngoog Principles of Geology,Aristotle proposed a fifth element,aether,in addition to the four proposed earlier by Empedocles.Earth classical elementEarth,which is cold and dry; this corresponds to the modern idea of a solid.Water classical elementWater,which is cold and wet; this corresponds to the modern idea of a liquid.Air classical elementAir,which is hot and wet; this corresponds to the modern idea of a gas.Fire classical elementFire,which is hot and dry; this corresponds to the modern ideas of Plasma physicsplasma and heat.Aether classical elementAether,Each of the four earthly elements has its natural place.All that is earthly tends toward the center of the universe,the center of the Earth.Water tends toward a sphere surrounding the center.Air tends toward a sphere surrounding the water sphere.Fire tends toward the lunar sphere in which the Moon orbits.When elements are moved out of their natural place,they naturally move back towards it.This is quot;natural motionquot;motion requiring no extrinsic cause.for example,in water,earthy bodies sink while air bubbles rise up; in air,rain falls and flame rises.Outside all the other spheres,the heavenly,fifth element,manifested in the stars and planets,moves in the perfection of circles.Aristotle defined Motion physicsmotion as the actuality of a potentiality as such.lt;refgt;Physics a,as a transition toward a potentially possible state.Because AristotleSubstance,potentiality and actualityactuality and potentiality are normally opposites in Aristotle,other commentators either suggest that the wording which has come down to us is erroneous,or that the addition of the quot;as suchquot; to the definition is critical to understanding it.eduarismot workInternet Encyclopedia of Philosophy archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.Causality,the four causes lt;!Material cause describes the material out of which something is composed.Thus the material cause of a table is wood,and the material cause of a car is rubber and steel.It is not about action.It does not mean one domino knocks over another domino.The formal cause is its form,the arrangement of that matter.It tells us what a thing is,that any thing is determined by the definition,form,pattern,essence,whole,synthesis or archetype.It embraces the account of causes in terms of fundamental principles or general laws,as the whole i.macrostructure is the cause of its parts,a relationship known as the wholepart causation.Plainly put,the formal cause is the idea existing in the first place as exemplar in the mind of the sculptor,and in the second place as intrinsic,determining cause,embodied in the matter.Formal cause could only refer to the essential quality of causation.A simple example of the formal cause is the mental image or idea that allows an artist,architect,or engineer to create his drawings.The efficient cause is quot;the primary sourcequot;,or that from which the change under consideration proceeds.nonliving or living,acting as the sources of change or movement or rest.Representing the current understanding of causality as the relation of cause and effect,take the two dominoes,this time of equal weighting,the first is knocked over causing the second also to fall over.The final cause is its purpose,or that for the sake of which a thing exists or is done,including both purposeful and instrumental actions and activities.The final cause or teleos is the purpose or function that something is supposed to serve.This covers modern ideas of motivating causes,such as volition,need,desire,ethics,or spiritual beliefs.Additionally,things can be causes of one another,causing each other reciprocally,as hard work causes fitness and vice versa,although not in the same way or function,the one is as the beginning of change,the other as the goal.Moreover,Simply it is the goal or purpose that brings about an event.Our two dominoes require someone or something to intentionally knock over the first domino,because it cannot fall of its own accord.Aristotle marked two modes of causation: proper prior causation and accidental chance causation.All causes,proper and incidental,can be spoken as potential or as actual,particular or generic.The same language refers to the effects of causes,so that generic effects assigned to generic causes,particular effects to particular causes,operating causes to actual effects.Essentially,causality does not suggest a temporal relation between the cause and the effect.Aristotle held more accurate theories on some optical concepts than other philosophers of his day.The second oldest written evidence of a camera obscura after Mozi c.BC can be found in Aristotles documentation of such a device in amp;nbsp;BC in Problemata.Aristotles apparatus contained a dark chamber that had a single small hole,or aperture,to allow for sunlight to enter.the sun would still be correctly displayed as a round object.In modern cameras,this is analogous to the Diaphragm opticsdiaphragm.the image was magnified.lt;refgt;cite web lastLahanas firstMichael urlhttp:www.mlahanas.deGreeksOptics.htm titleOptics and ancient Greeks publisherMlahanas.de accessdate April  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.mlahanas.deGreeksOptics.According to Aristotle,spontaneity and chance are causes of some things,distinguishable from other types of cause.Chance as an incidental cause lies in the realm of sumbebekosaccidental things.but with the result of another thing not intended taking place.For example: A person seeks donations.That person may find another person willing to donate a substantial sum.However,if the person seeking the donations met the person donating,not for the purpose of collecting donations,but for some other purpose,Aristotle would call the collecting of the donation by that particular donator a result of chance.It must be unusual that something happens by chance.In other words,if something happens all or most of the time,we cannot say that it is by chance.There is also more specific kind of chance,which Aristotle names quot;luckquot;,that can only apply to human beings,because it is in the sphere of moral actions.According to Aristotle,luck must involve choice and thus deliberation,and only humans are capable of deliberation and choice.quot;What is not capable of action cannot do anything by chancequot;.lt;refgt;Aristotle,Physics .Aristotle defines metaphysics as quot;the knowledge of hylomorphismimmaterial being,quot; or of quot;being in the highest degree of abstraction.quot; He refers to metaphysics as quot;first philosophyquot;,as well as quot;the theologic science.Substance,and he concludes that a particular substance is a combination of both matter and form.In book VIII,he distinguishes the matter of the substance as the Material substratumsubstratum,or the stuff of which it is composed.For example,the matter of a house is the bricks,stones,timbers etc.or whatever constitutes the potential house,while the form of the substance is the actual house,The formula that gives the components is the account of the matter,and the formula that gives the differentia is the account of the form.lt;refgt;Aristotle,With regard to the change Potentiality and actualitykinesis and its causes now,as he defines in his Physics AristotlePhysics and On Generation and Corruption ba,growth and diminution,locomotion,alteration,which is change in quality.The coming to be is a change where nothing persists of which the resultant is a property.Referring to potentiality,this is what a thing is capable of doing,or being acted upon,if the conditions are right and it is not prevented by something else.For example,the seed of a plant in the soil is potentially dynamei plant,and if is not prevented by something,it will become a plant.Potentially beings can either act poiein or be acted upon paschein,which can be either innate or learned.For example,the eyes possess the potentiality of sight innateamp;nbsp; being acted upon,while the capability of playing the flute can be possessed by learning exerciseamp;nbsp; acting.Actuality is the fulfillment of the end of the potentiality.Because the end telos is the principle of every change,and for the sake of the end exists potentiality,therefore actuality is the end.Referring then to our previous example,we could say that an actuality is when a plant does one of the activities that plants do.quot;For that for the sake of which a thing is,is its principle,and the becoming is for the sake of the end; and the actuality is the end,and it is for the sake of this that the potentiality is acquired.For animals do not see in order that they may have sight,but they have sight that they may see.quot;lt;refgt;Aristotle,In summary,which is also a final cause or end.Then Aristotle proceeds and concludes that the actuality is prior to potentiality in formula,in time and in substantiality.With this definition of the particular substance i.matter and form,Aristotle tries to solve the problem of the unity of the beings,for example,quot;what is it that makes a man onequot;?Since,according to Plato there are two Ideas: animal and biped,how then is man a unity?However,according to Aristotle,the potential being matter and the actual one form are one and the same thing.lt;refgt;Aristotle,Aristotles predecessor,Plato,argued that all things have a universal form,which could be either a property,or a relation to other things.When we look at an apple,for example,we see an apple,and we can also analyze a form of an apple.In this distinction,there is a particular apple and a universal form of an apple.Moreover,we can place an apple next to a book,so that we can speak of both the book and apple as being next to each other.Plato argued that there are some universal forms that are not a part of particular things.For example,it is possible that there is no particular good in existence,but quot;goodquot; is still a proper universal form.Aristotle disagreed with Plato on this point,arguing that all universals are instantiated.Aristotle argued that there are no universals that are unattached to existing things.According to Aristotle,if a universal exists,either as a particular or a relation,then there must have been,must be currently,or must be in the future,something on which the universal can be predicated.Consequently,according to Aristotle,then it does not exist.In addition,Aristotle disagreed with Plato about the location of universals.As Plato spoke of the world of the forms,a location where all universal forms subsist,according to Aristotle,the form of apple exists within each apple,rather than in the world of the forms.In Aristotelian science,especially in biology,which contain error and superstition.File:Octopus.File:Torpedo fuscomaculata.File:Triakis semifasciata.Aristotle is the earliest natural historian whose work has survived in some detail.Aristotle certainly did research on the natural history of Lesbos,and the surrounding seas and neighbouring areas.The works that reflect this research,such as History of Animals,Generation of Animals,and Parts of Animals,contain some observations and interpretations,along with sundry myths and mistakes.His observations on catfish,Electric rayelectric fish Torpedo genusTorpedo and anglerfish are detailed,as is his writing on cephalopods,namely,Octopus,Sepia cuttlefish and the paper nautilus Argonauta argo.His description of the hectocotylushectocotyl arm,used in sexual reproduction,was widely disbelieved until its rediscovery in the th century.He separated the aquatic mammals from fish,and knew that sharks and rays were part of the group he called Selach selachians.lt;ref namequot;Singer,Charles quot;gt;Singer,Charles.A short history of biology.Oxford .He gave accurate descriptions of ruminants fourchambered forestomachs,lt;refgt;Emily Kearns,quot;Animals,knowledge about,quot; in Oxford Classical Dictionary,rd ed.Aristotle distinguished about  species of birds,mammals and fishes.lt;ref namequot;BergstromDugatkinquot;gt;cite bookauthorCarl T.BergstromauthorLee Alan DugatkintitleEvolutionurlhttps:books.google.combooks?google.combooks?What the modern zoologist would call vertebrates and invertebrates,but of a different kind from vertebrates.Animals with blood were divided into livebearing mammals,and eggbearing birds and fish.Invertebrates animals without blood are insects,crustacea divided into nonshelled  cephalopods  and shelled and testacea molluscs.In some respects,this incomplete classification is better than that of Linnaeus,who crowded the invertebrata together into two groups,Insecta and Vermes worms.For Charles Singer,lt;refgt;Aristotle,of course,is not responsible for the later use made of this idea by clerics.Aristotle believed that intellectual purposes,final causes,guided all natural processes.Noting that quot;no animal has,at the same time,both tusks and horns,quot; and quot;a singlehooved animal with two horns I have never seen,quot; Aristotle suggested that Nature,giving no animal both horns and tusks,was staving off vanity,and giving creatures faculties only to such a degree as they are necessary.Noting that ruminants had multiple stomachs and weak teeth,he supposed the first was to compensate for the latter,with Nature trying to preserve a type of balance.lt;refgt;Mason,A History of the Sciences pp.In a similar fashion,the scala naturae.lt;refgt;Mayr,The Growth of Biological Thought,; see also: Lovejoy,The Great Chain of Beinglt;refgt; His system had eleven grades,arranged according quot;to the degree to which they are infected with potentialityquot;,expressed in their form at birth.The highest animals laid warm and wet creatures alive,the lowest bore theirs cold,dry,and in thick eggs.Aristotle also held that the level of a creatures perfection was reflected in its form,but not preordained by that form.Ideas like this,and his ideas about souls,are not regarded as science at all in modern times.He placed emphasis on the types of soul an organism possessed,asserting that plants possess a vegetative soul,responsible for reproduction and growth,animals a vegetative and a sensitive soul,responsible for mobility and sensation,and humans a vegetative,a sensitive,and a rational soul,capable of thought and reflection.lt;refgt;Aristotle,Aristotle,in contrast to earlier philosophers,but in accordance with the Egyptians,placed the rational soul in the heart,rather than the brain.lt;refgt;Mason,A History of the Sciences pp.lt;refgt; Notable is Aristotles division of sensation and thought,which generally went against previous philosophers,with the exception of Alcmaeon of CrotonAlcmaeon.lt;refgt;Guthrie,A History of Greek Philosophy Vol.pp.File:Theophrastus  frontespizio.which was originally written around  BC.Aristotles successor at the Lyceum ClassicalLyceum,Theophrastus,even into the Middle Ages.Many of Theophrastus names survive into modern times,such as carpos for fruit,and pericarpion for seed vessel.Rather than focus on formal causes,as Aristotle did,Theophrastus suggested a mechanistic scheme,drawing analogies between natural and artificial processes,and relying on Aristotles concept of the efficient cause.Theophrastus also recognized the role of sex in the reproduction of some higher plants,though this last discovery was lost in later ages.lt;refgt;Mayr,The Growth of Biological Thought,; Mason,A History of the Sciences,After Theophrastus,the Lyceum failed to produce any original work.Though interest in Aristotles ideas survived,they were generally taken unquestioningly.lt;refgt;Annas,Classical Greek Philosophy pp.The first medical teacher at Alexandria,HerophilosHerophilus of Chalcedon,corrected Aristotle,placing intelligence in the brain,and connected the nervous system to motion and sensation.Herophilus also distinguished between veins and arteryarteries,noting that the latter pulse while the former do not.lt;refgt;Mason,A History of the Sciences pp.teleology and after the rise of Christianity,quot;lt;refgt;Mayr,The Growth of Biological Thought,; quotation from p lt;refgt; Aristotles ideas of natural history and medicine survived,but they were generally taken unquestioningly.lt;refgt;Annas,Classical Greek Philosophy,Aristotles psychology,given in his treatise On the Soul peri psyche,often known by its Latin title De Anima,posits three kinds of soul quot;psychesquot;: the vegetative soul,the sensitive soul,and the rational soul.Humans have a rational soul.The unique part of the human,rational soul is its ability to receive forms of other things and compare them.For Aristotle,the soul psyche was a simpler concept than it is for us today.By soul he simply meant the HylomorphismBodysoul hylomorphismform of a living being.Because all beings are composites of form and matter,the form of living beings is that which endows them with what is specific to living beings,the ability to initiate movement or in the case of plants,growth and chemical transformations,which Aristotle considers types of movement.lt;refgt;Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy,article http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlepsychology quot;Psychologyquot;.According to Aristotle,lt;refgt;cite book lastBloch firstDavid urlhttps:books.google.a memory is a mental picture wikt:phantasmphantasm in which Aristotle defines in De Anima,as an appearance which is imprinted on the part of the body that forms a memory.These changes are the same as those involved in the operations of sensesensation,common sense,and thinking .It does not matter if the experience was seen or heard,lt;refgt;cite book lastCarruthers firstMary urlhttps:books.google.Aristotle uses the word quot;memoryquot; for two basic abilities.First,Second,Therefore,memory is of the past,sfnBlochp prediction is of the future,and sensation is of the present.The retrieval of our quot;imprintsquot; cannot be performed suddenly.A transitional channel is needed and located in our past experiences,both for our previous experience and present experience.However,He believed the young and the old do not properly develop an quot;imprintquot;.Young people undergo rapid changes as they develop,while the elderlys organs are beginning to decay,thus stunting new quot;imprintsquot;.Likewise,Because intellectual functions are not involved in memory,memories belong to some animals too,but only those in which have perception of time.people are continually weaving together new quot;imprintsquot; of things they experience.In order to search for these quot;imprintsquot;,people search the memory itself.lt;refgt;cite book lastWarren firstHoward urlhttps:books.google.if one experience is offered instead of a specific memory,that person will reject this experience until they find what they are looking for.Recall memoryRecollection occurs when one experience naturally follows another.If the chain of quot;imagesquot; is needed,one memory will stimulate the other.If the chain of quot;imagesquot; is not needed,but expected,then it will only stimulate the other memory in most instances.When people recall experiences,they stimulate certain previous experiences until they have stimulated the one that was needed.sfnCarruthersp Only humans will remember quot;imprintsquot; of intellectual activity,such as numbers and words.Animals that have perception of time will be able to retrieve memories of their past observations.Remembering involves only perception of the things remembered and of the time passed.When an quot;imprintquot; is recalled,it may bring forth a large group of related quot;imprintsquot;.Aristotle believed the chain of thought,which ends in recollection of certain quot;imprintsquot;,was connected systematically in three sorts of relationships: similarity,contrast,and contiguity.These three laws make up his Laws of Association.Aristotle believed that past experiences are hidden within our mind.A force operates to awaken the hidden material to bring up the actual experience.According to Aristotle,association is the power innate in a mental state,which operates upon the unexpressed remains of former experiences,allowing them to rise and be recalled.Before understanding Aristotles take on dreams,first his idea of sleep must be examined.Aristotle gives an account of his explanation of sleep in On Sleep and Wakefulness.pdcnet.including the senses,so it can be revitalized.lt;ref namequot;Ref quot;gt; While a person is asleep,the critical activities,which include thinking,sensing,recalling and remembering,do not function as they do during wakefulness.which is the result of a sensation.lt;ref namequot;Ref quot;gt; However,the senses are able to work during sleep,all of the senses are not inactive during sleep,only the ones that are weary.Dreams do not involve actually sensing a stimulus because,as discussed,the senses do not work as they normally do during sleep.lt;ref namequot;Ref quot;gt; In dreams,sensation is still involved,but in an altered manner than when awake.the next thing they look at appears to be moving in a wave like motion.When a person perceives a stimulus and the stimulus is no longer the focus of their attention,it leaves an impression.lt;ref namequot;Ref quot;gt; However,lt;ref namequot;Aristotle on Dreaming: What Goes on in Sleep when the Big Fire goes outquot;gt; So,dreams result from these lasting impressions.Since impressions are all that are left and not the exact stimuli,dreams will not resemble the actual experience that occurred when awake.During sleep,a person is in an altered state of mind.they become easily deceived by what appears in their dreams.When asleep,they are unable to help a person judge what is happening in their dream.lt;ref namequot;Aristotle on Dreaming: What Goes on in Sleep when the Big Fire goes outquot;gt; So,the dreamer is left to accept the dream because they lack the choice to judge it.New consciousness reader seriesdatepublisherJeremy P.Tarcher,Inc.locationLos Angeles,lt;ref namequot;Webbquot;gt; These ideas were contradictory to what had been believed about dreams,Aristotle also includes in his theory of dreams what constitutes a dream and what does not.lt;ref namequot;Modrakquot;gt; Secondly,lt;ref namequot;Modrakquot;gt; For example,while a person is sleeping,a door shuts and in their dream they hear a door is shut,Aristotle argues that this sensory experience is not part of the dream.lt;ref namequot;Modrakquot;gt; The actual sensory experience is perceived by the senses,the fact that it occurred while the person was asleep does not make it part of the dream.lt;ref namequot;Modrakquot;gt; Lastly,Aristotle considered ethics to be a practical rather than theoretical study,one aimed at becoming good and doing good rather than knowing for its own sake.He wrote several treatises on ethics,including most notably,the Nicomachean Ethics.Aristotle taught that virtue has to do with the proper function ergon of a thing.An eye is only a good eye in so much as it can see,because the proper function of an eye is sight.Aristotle reasoned that humans must have a function specific to humans,eudaimonia,generally translated as quot;happinessquot; or sometimes quot;well beingquot;.often translated as moral or ethical virtue or excellence.lt;refgt;Nicomachean Ethics Book I.See for example chapter  http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.AbekkerpageDa a.but by teachers,and experience,leading to a later stage in which one consciously chooses to do the best things.the wisdom of an accomplished theorytheoretical or speculative thinker,or in other words,a philosopher.lt;refgt;Nicomachean Ethics Book VI.File:Aristotleconstitutions.In addition to his works on ethics,which address the individual,Aristotle addressed the city in his work titled Politics AristotlePolitics.Aristotle considered the city to be a natural community.Moreover,quot;for the whole must of necessity be prior to the partquot;.and as a collection of parts none of which can exist without the others.Aristotles conception of the city is organic,and he is considered one of the first to conceive of the city in this manner.lt;refgt;cite book lastEbenstein firstAlan authorlinkAlan O.Although he was aware of the existence and potential of larger empires,a gt;.The aim of the city is not just to avoid injustice or for economic stabilitylt;!b gt;,but rather to allow at least some citizens the possibility to live a good life,and to perform beautiful acts: quot;The political partnership must be regarded,therefore,as being for the sake of noble actions,not for the sake of living togetherlt;!a gt;.quot; This is distinguished from modern approaches,beginning with social contract theory,quot;Aristotle Discovers the Economyquot; in Primitive,Archaic and Modern Economies: Essays of Karl Polanyi ed.Dalton,Boston ,amp;nbsp;lt;ref nameHutchinsonJohnsongt;cite webauthorD.HutchinsonauthorMonte Ransome Johnsonlastauthorampyesurlhttp:blog.protrepticus.infonewreconstructionincludesgreektext.htmltitleNew Reconstruction,:For we all agree that the most excellent man should rule,the supreme by nature,and that the law rules and alone is authoritative; but the law is a kind of intelligence,a discourse based on intelligence.And again,what standard do we have,what criterion of good things,that is more precise than the intelligent man?For all that this man will choose,if the choice is based on his knowledge,are good things and their contraries are bad.a man with bravery to live bravely,likewise a selfcontrolled man to live with selfcontrol,Hence its evident that,according to the most authoritative judgment,intelligence is supreme among goods.Aristotle considered epic poetry,tragedy,comedy,Dithyrambdithyrambic poetry and music to be Mimesisimitative,each varying in imitation by medium,object,and manner.lt;refgt;Aristotle,Poetics I alt;refgt; For example,music imitates with the media of rhythm and harmony,whereas dance imitates with rhythm alone,and poetry with language.The forms also differ in their object of imitation.Comedy,for instance,Lastly,the forms differ in their manner of imitation  through narrative or character,through change or no change,and through drama or no drama.lt;refgt;Aristotle,lt;refgt;Aristotle,Aristotle taught that tragedy is composed of six elements: plotstructure,character,style,thought,spectacle,and lyric poetry.lt;refgt;Aristotle,not the characters,is the chief focus of tragedy.Tragedy is the imitation of action arousing pity and fear,and is meant to effect the catharsis of those same emotions.Aristotle concludes Poetics with a discussion on which,if either,is superior: epic or tragic mimesis.He suggests that because tragedy possesses all the attributes of an epic,possibly possesses additional attributes such as spectacle and music,is more unified,and achieves the aim of its mimesis in shorter scope,it can be considered superior to epic.lt;refgt;Aristotle,Aristotle was a keen systematic collector of riddles,folklore,lt;refgt;Temple,Olivia,and Temple,Robert translators,https:books.google.combooks?ISBN  Cf.Introduction,xixii.Aristotles analysis of procreation describes an active,ensouling masculine element bringing life to an inert,passive female element.On this ground,lt;ref namequot;Morsinkquot;gt;cite journal lastMorsink firstJohannes  urlhttp:www.jstor.orgstable.titleWas Aristotles Biology Sexist?journalJournal of the History of Biology dateSpring   volume  issue  pages  doi.bflt;refgt; However,Aristotle gave equal weight to womens happiness as he did to mens,lt;refgt;cite book lastRoberts firstAristotle; translatorfirst W.translatorlastRhys  editorHoneycutt,Lee titleRhetoric chapterBook I,Chapter urlhttp:rhetoric.eserver.orgaristotlerhet.html  quoteWhere,as among the Lacedaemonians,the state of women is bad,almost half of human life is spoilt.File:Aristotelis De Moribus ad Nicomachum.Cornell University,Aristotle: Introductory Readings.Indianapolis,Indiana: Hackett Publishing Company,Inc.Introduction,xixii.lt;refgt; from the surviving Aristotelian corpus.the surviving works do not appear to have been so.with some books duplicating or summarizing each other,Some of the individual works within the corpus,including the Constitution of Athens,are regarded by most scholars as products of Aristotles quot;school,quot; perhaps compiled under his direction or supervision.Others,such as On Colors,may have been produced by Aristotles successors at the Lyceum,Theophrastus and Strato of LampsacusStraton.Still others acquired Aristotles name through similarities in doctrine or content,such as the De Plantis,possibly by Nicolaus of Damascus.lt;refgt;Lynn Thorndike,quot;Chiromancy in Medieval Latin Manuscripts,quot; Speculum  ,; Roger A.Pack,quot;PseudoArisoteles: Chiromantia,quot; Archives dhistoire doctrinale et littraire du Moyen ge  ,; Pack,quot;A PseudoAristotelian Chiromancy,quot; Archives dhistoire doctrinale et littraire du Moyen ge  ,According to a distinction that originates with Aristotle himself,his writings are divisible into two groups: the quot;exotericquot; and the quot;esotericquot;.lt;refgt;harvnbBarnesp; Aristotle himself: Nicomachean Ethics a.Aristotle himself never uses the term quot;esotericquot; or quot;acroamaticquot;.For other passages where Aristotle speaks of exterikoi logoi,see W.Ross,Aristotles Metaphysics ,vol.Ross defends an interpretation according to which the phrase,at least in Aristotles own works,usually refers generally to quot;discussions not peculiar to the Peripatetic schoolquot;,rather than to specific works of Aristotles own.and the more technical works intended for use within the Lyceum course  school esoteric.lt;refgt;cite book lastHouse firstHumphry urlhttps:archive.sfnBarnesp However,one classic scholar offers an alternative interpretation.quot;lt;refgt;cite book authorAmmonius  date   title On Aristotles Categories  location Ithaca,Current knowledge of what exactly the exoteric writings were like is scant and dubious,though many of them may have been in dialogue form.Fragments of some of Aristotles dialogues have survived.sfnBarnesp However,according to the Wikipedia article Gregory Nagy publisher or year is wrong quot;Taylor and Francis,London,; Routledge,quot;gt;Originally published in cite book lastBarnes firstJ.authorlinkJonathan Barnes date titleRoman Aristotle editorfirstJ.editorlastBarnes editorfirstM.One major question in the history of Aristotles works,then,is how were the exoteric writings all lost,and how did the ones we now possess come to us.lt;refgt;.The definitive,English study of these questions is cite book lastBarnes firstJ.authorlinkJonathan Barnes date titleRoman Aristotle editorfirstJ.editorlastBarnes editorfirstM.lt;refgt;quot;Sulla.quot;lt;refgt; The manuscripts were left from Aristotle to his successor Theophrastus,who in turn willed them to Neleus of Scepsis.Neleus supposedly took the writings from Athens to Scepsis,where his heirs let them languish in a cellar until the st century BC,when Apellicon of Teos discovered and purchased the manuscripts,bringing them back to Athens.According to the story,introducing a number of errors into the text.When Lucius Cornelius Sulla occupied Athens in  BC,he carried off the library of Apellicon to Rome,lt;refgt;Ancient Rome: from the early Republic to the assassination of Julius Caesar  Page ,Matthew Dillon,Lynda Garlandlt;refgt;lt;refgt;The Encyclopedia Americana,Volume   Page ,titleIntroduction to the Politics,lt;refgt; Lord voices a number of reservations concerning this story,however.First,Second,there is quot;incontrovertible evidence,quot; Lord says,Third,And fourth,Lord sees a number of postAristotelian interpolations in the Politics AristotlePolitics,for example,but is generally confident that the work has come down to us relatively intact.On the one hand,the surviving texts of Aristotle do not derive from finished literary texts,but rather from working drafts used within Aristotles school,as opposed,on the other hand,separate works,distinguished them from those of Theophrastus and other Peripatetics,edited them,and finally compiled them into the more cohesive,larger works as they are known today.lt;refgt;Anagnostopoulos,quot;Aristotles Works and Thoughtsquot;,A Companion to Aristotle Blackwell Publishing,See also,harvnbBarnespp.File:Aristotle by Jusepe de Ribera.File:Rembrandt  Aristotle with a Bust of Homer  WGA.jpgthumbpxquot;Aristotle with a bust of Homerquot; by Rembrandt.File:Arabic aristotle.jpgthumbpxAn thirteenthcentury Islamic portrayal of Aristotle right.File:Uni Freiburg  Philosophen .More than  years after his death,Aristotle remains one of the most influential people who ever lived.He contributed to almost every field of human knowledge then in existence,and he was the founder of many new fields.According to the philosopher Bryan Magee,quot;it is doubtful whether any human being has ever known as much as he didquot;.Aristotle was the founder of formal logic,lt;refgt;W.Guthrie .quot;https:books.google.combooks?Cambridge University Press.ISBN lt;refgt; pioneered the study of zoology,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.britannica.com accessdate April  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.britannica.Inc.Despite these achievements,the influence of Aristotles errors is considered by some to have held back science considerably.Russell also refers to Aristotles ethics as quot;repulsivequot;,and calls his logic quot;as definitely antiquated as Ptolemaic astronomyquot;.Russell notes that these errors make it difficult to do historical justice to Aristotle,until one remembers how large of an advance he made upon all of his predecessors.The immediate influence of Aristotles work was felt as the Lyceum grew into the Peripatetic school.Aristotles notable students included Aristoxenus,Dicaearchus,Demetrius of Phalerum,Eudemos of Rhodes,Harpalus,Hephaestion,Meno disambiguationMeno,Mnason of Phocis,Nicomachus son of AristotleNicomachus,and Theophrastus.botanists,and researchers.He had also learned a great deal about Persian customs and traditions from his teacher.when the old philosopher released his works to the public,quot;lt;refgt;Plutarch,The first Greek Christians to comment extensively on Aristotle were John Philoponus,Elias,and David in the sixth century,and Stephen of Alexandria in the early seventh century.lt;refgt;Richard Sorabji,Aristotle Transformed London,movement,and other elements of Aristotelian thought.lt;refgt;Richard Sorabji,Aristotle Transformed London,lt;refgt; After a hiatus of several centuries,apparently sponsored by Anna Comnena.lt;refgt;Richard Sorabji,Aristotle Transformed London,; ,Aristotle was one of the most revered Western thinkers in early Islamic theology.Most of the still extant works of Aristotle,lt;ref namequot;ReferenceAquot;gt;Encyclopedia of Islam,Aristutalislt;refgt; as well as a number of the original Greek commentaries,were translated into Arabic and studied by Muslim philosophers,scientists and scholars.Averroes,Avicenna and Alpharabius,who wrote on Aristotle in great depth,also influenced Thomas Aquinas and other Western Christian scholastic philosophers.lt;refgt;Comm.Magnum in Aristotle,De Anima,III,lt;refgt;almuallim althani,Aristutalislt;refgt; The title quot;teacherquot; was first given to Aristotle by Muslim scholars,In accordance with the GreeksGreek theorists,the Muslims considered Aristotle to be a dogmatic philosopher,the author of a closed system,and believed that Aristotle shared with Plato essential tenets of thought.Some went so far as to credit Aristotle himself with neoPlatonic metaphysical ideas.With the loss of the study of ancient Greek in the early medieval Latin West,Aristotle was practically unknown there from c.AD  to c.except through the Latin translation of the Organon made by Boethius.In the twelfth and thirteenth centuries,interest in Aristotle revived and Latin Christians had translations made,both from Arabic translations,such as those by Gerard of Cremona,such as those by James of Venice and William of Moerbeke.After Thomas Aquinas wrote his theology,working from Moerbekes translations,stimulating a revival of Aristotelianism in Europe that continued into the Renaissance.See Summa Theologica,Part I,Question ,etc.These thinkers blended Aristotelian philosophy with Christianity,bringing the thought of Ancient Greece into the Middle Ages.:Twenty bookes,clad in blak or reed,:Of aristotle and his philosophie,lt;refgt;Geoffrey Chaucer,The Canterbury Tales,Prologue,:I saw the Master there of those who know,:Amid the philosophic family,:By all admired,:There Plato too I saw,and Socrates,:Who stood beside him closer than the rest.seder tra filosofica famiglia.Tutti lo miran,che nnanzi a li altri pi presso li stanno;lt;brgt; Dante,LInferno Hell,Canto IV.lt;refgt;Durant,lt;refgt; However debatable this is,Aristotle rigid separated action from production,and argued for the deserved subservience of some people quot;natural slaveryslavesquot;,and the natural superiority virtue,arete of others.It is Martin Heidegger,not Nietzsche,who elaborated a new interpretation of Aristotle,intended to warrant his deconstruction of scholastic and philosophical tradition.More recently,lt;refgt;Kelvin Knight,Aristotelian Philosophy,Polity Press,passim.These texts,as opposed to Aristotles lost works,are technical philosophical treatises from within Aristotles school.Berlin,which in turn is based on ancient classifications of these works.File:Aristotle  Jefferson Building  Library of Congress.jpgthumbpxquot;ARISTOTLEquot; near the ceiling of the Great Hall in the Library of Congress.The Aristotle Mountains along the Oscar II Coast of Graham Land,Antarctica,are named after Aristotle.He was the first person known to conjecture,in his book Meteorology,the existence of a landmass in the southern highlatitude region and call it quot;Antarcticaquot;.lt;refgt;https:data.auaadcgazscardisplayname.gazid Aristotle Mountains.SCAR Composite Antarctic Gazetteer.Aristoteles crater is a crater on the Moon bearing the classical form of Aristotles name.The secondary literature on Aristotle is vast.The following references are only a small selection.AckrillAckrill J.Essays on Plato and Aristotle,Oxford University Press,USA.cite booklastAckrillfirstJ.Cite booklastAdler firstMortimer J.cite booklast Ammonius editorlastCoheneditorfirstS.MarceditorlastMatthewseditorfirstGareth Btitle On Aristotles Categorieslocation Ithaca,Ross,Bakalis Nikolaos.Handbook of Greek Philosophy: From Thales to the Stoics Analysis and Fragments,Cite book lastBocheski firstI.Bolotin,David .An Approach to Aristotles Physics: With Particular Attention to the Role of His Manner of Writing.Albany: SUNY Press.A contribution to our understanding of how to read Aristotles scientific works.Myles BurnyeatBurnyeat,et al.Notes on Book Zeta of Aristotles Metaphysics.Oxford: Subfaculty of Philosophy.cite bookeditorlastCantoreditorfirstNorman F.editorfirstPeter L.MasspublisherBlaisdell Publishing Co.Chappell,Aristotles Conception of Matter,Journal of Philosophy : .Code,Alan.Potentiality in Aristotles Science and Metaphysics,Pacific Philosophical Quarterly .De Groot,Jean .Aristotles Empiricism: Experience and Mechanics in the th Century BC,Parmenides Publishing,Frede,Michael.Essays in Ancient Philosophy.Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press.cite booklastFullerfirstB.Eugene GendlinGendlin,Eugene T.Line by Line Commentary on Aristotles De Anima,Volume : Books I amp; II; Volume : Book III.Spring Valley,New York: The Focusing Institute.http:www.focusing.orgaristotle Available online in PDF.Gill,Mary Louise.Aristotle on Substance: The Paradox of Unity.Princeton: Princeton University Press.Cite book lastGuthrie firstW.Halper,Edward C.One and Many in Aristotles Metaphysics,Volume : Books Alpha  Delta,Parmenides Publishing,ISBN .Halper,Edward C.One and Many in Aristotles Metaphysics,Volume : The Central Books,Parmenides Publishing,ISBN .Terence IrwinIrwin,http:www.cyjack.comcognitionAristotlesfirstprinciples.pdf Aristotles First Principles.Oxford: Clarendon Press,ISBN .Alberto JoriJori,Alberto.Aristotele,cite bookeditorlastKiernaneditorfirstThomas P.Knight,Kelvin.Aristotelian Philosophy: Ethics and Politics from Aristotle to MacIntyre,Polity Press.Lewis,Frank A.Substance and Predication in Aristotle.Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.LloydLloyd,Aristotle: The Growth and Structure of his Thought.Cambridge: Cambridge Univ.ISBN .Lord,Carnes.Introduction to The Politics,by Aristotle.Chicago: Chicago University Press.Loux,Michael J.Primary Ousia: An Essay on Aristotles Metaphysics  and .Ithaca,NY: Cornell University Press.Maso,Stefano Ed.Natali,Carlo Ed.Seel,Gerhard Ed.Reading Aristotle: Physics VII.: What is Alteration?Proceedings of the International ESAPHYELE Conference,Parmenides Publishing.cite journallastOwenfirstG.Barnes,Schofield,and R.Sorabji,eds.Articles on Aristotle Vol .Science.London: Duckworth .Pangle,Lorraine Smith .Aristotle and the Philosophy of Friendship.Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.Reeve,Substantial Knowledge: Aristotles Metaphysics.Indianapolis: Hackett.Cite book lastRose firstLynn E.Cite book lastRoss firstSir David  authorlink  W.in print since .Scaltsas,Substances and Universals in Aristotles Metaphysics.Ithaca: Cornell University Press.Strauss,Leo .quot;On Aristotles Politicsquot;,in The City and Man,Chicago; Rand McNally.Cite book lastTaylor firstHenry Osborn urlhttp:www.ancientlibrary.commedicineindex.html archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.ancientlibrary.commedicineindex.archive.orgwebhttp:www.ancientlibrary.commedicine.Cite book lastVeatch firstHenry B.authorlink  Henry Babcock Veatch titleAristotle: A Contemporary Appreciation publisherIndiana U.Press locationBloomington date For the general reader.cite booklastWoodsfirstM.PhilPaperscategoryaristotle.InPhothinker.: hlist http:www.eduaristotl Aristotle general article http:www.eduarisbio Biology http:www.eduariseth Ethics http:www.eduarislog Logic http:www.eduarismet Metaphysics http:www.eduarismot Motion and its Place in Nature http:www.eduarispoe Poetics http:www.: hlist http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotle Aristotle general article http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotelianismrenaissance Aristotle in the Renaissance http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlebiology Biology http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlecausality Causality http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlecommentators Commentators on Aristotle http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotleethics Ethics http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlelogic Logic http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlemathematics Mathematics http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlemetaphysics Metaphysics http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlenatphil Natural philosophy http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlenoncontradiction Noncontradiction http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlepolitics Political theory http:plato.stanford.eduentriesaristotlepsychology Psychology http:plato.stanford.OL authorOLA.http:www.concharto.orgsearcheventsearch.PlanetMathurlnameAristotletitleAristotle.At the http:classics.eduBrowseindexAristotle.html Massachusetts Institute of Technology primarily in English.en icon gr icon http:www.perseus.tufts.educgibinperscoll?At the https:ebooks.adelaide.auaaristotle University of Adelaide primarily in English.gr icon fr icon http:remacle.orgbloodwolfphilosophesAristotetable.htm P.The volume  Bekker edition of Aristotles Works in Greek http:isnature.orgFilesAristotle PDFdothttp:grid.ceth.rutgers.Bekkers Prussian Academy of Sciences edition of the complete works of Aristotle at Archive.org: hlist https:archive.orgdetailsaristotelisoperaarisrich vol.https:archive.orgdetailsaristotelisoperaarisrich vol.https:archive.orgdetailsaristotelisoperaarisrich vol.https:archive.orgdetailsaristotelisoperaarisrich vol.https:archive.orgdetailsaristotelisoperaarisrich vol.en icon http:demonax.infodoku.idclassical:aristotle Aristotle Collection translation.commentclean up,imageGeorge Gershwin An American in Paris.pngimageGershwin Paris.An American in Paris is a jazzinfluenced symphonic poem by the American composer George Gershwin,written in .Inspired by the time Gershwin had spent in Paris,Gershwin composed An American in Paris on commission from the conductor Walter Damrosch.He scored the piece for the standard instruments of the symphony orchestra plus celesta,saxophones,and automobile horns.He brought back some Parisian taxi horns for the New York premiere of the composition,which took place on Decemberamp;nbsp;,in Carnegie Hall,with Damrosch conducting the New York Philharmonic.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:nyphil.orgmediapdfsprogramnotesGershwinAnAmericaninParis.prg accessdatelt;refgt; Gershwin completed the orchestration on November ,less than four weeks before the works premiere.lt;refgt;cite web  url  http:www.kennedycenter.orgcalendar?Gershwin collaborated on the original program notes with the critic and composer Deems Taylor,quot; When the tone poem moves into the blues,quot;our American friend .has succumbed to a spasm of homesickness.quot; But,quot;nostalgia is not a fatal disease.Gershwin was attracted by Maurice Ravels unusual chords.but he accepted him as a student.Gershwin went to Paris in  ready to study and to enjoy his first trip to Paris.After his initial student audition with Ravel turned into a sharing of musical theories,Ravel said he couldnt teach him but he would send a letter referring him to Nadia Boulanger.While the studies were cut short,Robert and Mabel Shirmer.Gershwin strongly encouraged Ravel to come to the United States for a tour,something Ravel had been reluctant to do.To this end,upon his return to New York,Gershwin joined the efforts of Ravels friend Robert Schmitz,a pianist Ravel had met during the War to urge Ravel to tour the U.fee for the tour,an enticement Gershwin knew would be important to Ravel.Gershwin greeted Ravel in New York in February  at the start of Ravels U.Tour,and joined  Ravel again later in the tour in Los Angeles.After a lunch together with Chaplin in Beverly Hills,Ravel was persuaded to perform an unscheduled house concert in a friends music salon,performing among kindred spirits.Ravels tour reignited Gershwins desire to return to Paris which he did in March .Yet after playing for her,she told him she could not teach him.quot;  This did not set Gershwin back,Paris at this time hosted many expatriate writers: among them Ezra Pound,Yeats,Ernest Hemingway; and artist Pablo Picasso.Gershwin based An American in Paris on a melodic fragment called quot;Very Parisiennequot;,written in  on his first visit to Paris as a gift to his hosts,Robert and Mabel Schirmer.Gershwin explained in Musical America,listens to the various street noises,and absorbs the French atmosphere.The piece is structured into five sections,which culminate in a loose Ternary formABA format.This A section featured duple meter,singsong rhythms,and diatonic melodies with the sounds of oboe,English horn,and taxi horns.The quot;Allegroquot; that follows continues to express homesickness in a faster twelvebar blues.In the B section,Gershwin uses common time,syncopated rhythms,and bluesy melodies with the sounds of trumpet,saxophone,and snare drum.quot;Moderato con graziaquot; is the last A section that returns to the themes set in A.After recapitulating the quot;walkingquot; themes,Gershwin overlays the slow blues theme from section B in the final Grandioso.An American in Paris is scored for  flutes rd doubling on piccolo,oboes,English horn,clarinets in soprano clarinetBflat,bass clarinet in Bflat,bassoons,French hornhorns in F,trumpets in Bflat,trombones,tuba,timpani,snare drum,bass drum,Triangle musical instrumenttriangle,wood block,cymbals,low and high Tomtom drumtomtoms,xylophone,glockenspiel,celesta,vehicle horntaxi horns labeled as A,C and D with circles around them,alto saxophonesoprano saxophone,tenor saxophonesoprano saxophonealto saxophone,baritone saxophonesoprano saxophonealto saxophone,and String sectionstrings.Although most modern audiences have heard the taxi horns using the notes A,C and D,it has recently come to lightlt;ref namequot;nytimesquot;gt;cite newsurlhttp:www.nytimes.comtheaterhavewebeenplayinggershwinwrongforyears.htmltitleHave We Been Playing Gershwin Wrong for  Years?BMusicflatlt;subgt;lt;subgt;,Dlt;subgt;lt;subgt;,and Alt;subgt;lt;subgt;.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.music.umich.eduamigershwin?p title Gershwin Taxi Horn Photo Clarifies MysterypublisherUniversity of Michigan School of Music,Theatre amp; Dancedateaccessdatelt;refgt; It is likely that in labeling the taxi horns as A,C and D with circles,The revised edition by F.CampbellWatson calls for three saxophones,alto,tenor and baritone.He stated that Damroschs sluggish,dragging tempo caused him to walk out of the hall during a matinee performance of this work.The audience,according to Edward Cushing,good and bad,ordinarily arouses.Some did not think it belonged in a program with classical composers Csar Franck,Richard Wagner,or Guillaume Lekeu on its premiere.Gershwin responded to the critics,quot;Its not a Beethoven Symphony,you know.Its a humorous piece,nothing solemn about it.Its not intended to draw tears.If it pleases symphony audiences as a light,jolly piece,a series of impressions musically expressed,it succeeds.On September ,The Gershwin family,working in conjunction with the Library of Congress and the University of Michigan,are working to make scores available to the public that represent Gershwins true intent.or if the score will document changes in the orchestration during Gershwins composition process.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.orgnewshourrundownnewcriticaleditionofgeorgeandiragershwinsworkstobecompiled titleNew,critical edition of George and Ira Gershwins works to be compiled amp;; PBS NewsHour websitePbs.The entire project may take  to  years to complete,but An American in Paris will be an early volume in the series.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.music.umich.eduamigershwin?pageid titleThe Editions  Gershwin websiteMusic.umich.edu date accessdatelt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:musicologynow.amsnet.orggeorgeandiragershwincriticaledition.html titleMusicology Now: George and Ira Gershwin Critical Edition websiteMusicologynow.amsnet.Two Urtext Editions of the work have been published by the German publisher BNote Music in .The changes made by CampbellWatson have been withdrawn in both editions.In the extended Urtext,bars of music have been reintegrated.Conductor Walter Damrosch had cut them shortly before the first performance.lt;refgt;cite web titleAn American in Paris Urtext  urlhttps:www.bnote.setwerkdetailamp;kompidamp;bnnramp;lcenwebsiteBnote.File:American in Paris.An American in Paris has been frequently recorded.drawn from members of the Philadelphia Orchestra.Gershwin was on hand to quot;supervisequot; the recording; however,Then,a little later,Shilkret discovered there was no one to play the brief celesta solo during the slow section,B flat,a higher C and a lower D.lt;ref namequot;nytimesquot;gt;  The radio broadcast of the Septemberamp;nbsp;,Hollywood Bowl George Gershwin Memorial Concert,in which An American in Paris,also conducted by Shilkret,was second on the program,was recorded and was released in  in a twoCD set.Arthur Fiedler and the Boston Pops Orchestra recorded the work for RCA Victor,including one of the first stereo recordings of the music.In ,Arturo Toscanini and the NBC Symphony Orchestra recorded the music in Carnegie Hall,one of the few commercial recordings Toscanini made of music by an American composer.The Seattle Symphony also recorded a version in  of Gershwins original score,before he made numerous edits resulting in the score as we hear it today.lt;refgt;cite weblastBargreen firstMelinda urlhttp:community.seattletimes.nwsource.comarchive?seattletimes.nwsource.recorded live at the Aragon Ballroom in Chicago Columbia RecordsColumbia GL  and CL .MGM released the musical film An American in Paris filmAn American in Paris,featuring Gene Kelly and Leslie Caron.Winning the  Best Picture Oscar and numerous other awards,the film was directed by Vincente Minnelli,featured many tunes of Gershwin,and concluded with an extensive,costing ,Rimler,Walter.George Gershwinamp;nbsp; An Intimate Portrait.Urbana,University of Illinois Press,Pollack,Howard.George Gershwinamp;nbsp; His Life and Work.Berkeley,University of California Press,IMSLPworkAn American in Paris Gershwin,http:www.archive.YouTubeziENwJlUIAn American in Paris,New York Philharmonic,Leonard Bernstein,DEFAULTSORT:American In Paris,commentv.website    http:www.oscars.The Academy Awards are the oldest awards ceremony for achievements in motion pictures.The categorys original name was Best Art Direction,but was changed to its current name in  for the th Academy Awards.lt;ref namequot;Music Rulesquot;gt;Cite weburlhttp:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleases.html titleMusic Rules Approved for th Academy Awards accessdate workoscars.Since ,the award is shared with the set decorators.The films below are listed with their production year for example,the  Academy Award for Best Art Direction is given to a film from .In the lists below,the winner of the award for each year is shown first,followed by the other nominees.Awards resulted from  nominations.lt;ref namequot;theoscarsitequot;gt;cite web urlhttp:theoscarsite.comwhoswhogibbonsc.htm titleCedric Gibbons Biography accessdate worktheoscarsite.comlt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;findagravequot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.findagrave.comcgibinfg.pagegramp;GRid titleFind A Grave: Cedric Gibbons accessdate workfindagrave.Nominations resulted in  awards.Nominations resulted in no awards.Whoopee!filmWhoopee!William S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Eddie Imazult;brgt;Edwin B.William S.Albert S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Frederic Hopelt;brgt;Edwin B.William S.Darlinglt;brgt;David S.Hall art directorDavid S.Carl J.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;John B.Goodman art directorJohn B.Charles D.Charles D.William S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;William A.rowspan stylequot;textalign:centerquot;  lt;br gt;smallth Academy Awardsthlt;refgt;From ,the award was split into Blackandwhite and color.Arise,Richard Day art directorRichard Daylt;brgt;Joseph C.My Son,My Son filmMy Son,Lewis J.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;John S.Richard Day art directorRichard Daylt;brgt;Joseph C.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Nathan H.Martin Obzinalt;brgt;Jack Ottersonlt;brgt;Russell A.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Robert Usherlt;brgt;Samuel M.John Hughes art directorJohn Hugheslt;brgt;Fred M.John DuCasse Schultzelt;brgt;Edward G.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Randall Duelllt;brgt;Edwin B.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Urie McClearylt;brgt;Edwin B.Richard Day art directorRichard Daylt;brgt;Joseph C.Raoul Pene Du Boislt;brgt;Stephen A.Albert S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Randall Duelllt;brgt;Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;Jack D.John B.Goodman art directorJohn B.Goodmanlt;brgt;Jack Ottersonlt;brgt;Russell A.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Roland Andersonlt;brgt;Samuel M.Take a Letter,Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;Jack Ottersonlt;brgt;Russell A.Gausmanlt;brgt;Ira S.James Basevilt;brgt;William S.Albert S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Paul Groesselt;brgt;Edwin B.Carl Weyllt;brgt;George J.Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;John B.Goodman art directorJohn B.Goodmanlt;brgt;Russell A.Gausmanlt;brgt;Ira S.James Basevilt;brgt;Joseph C.John Hughes art directorJohn Hugheslt;brgt;George J.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Daniel Cathcartlt;brgt;Edwin B.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;William Ferrarilt;brgt;Paul Huldschinskylt;brgt;Edwin B.John Hughes art directorJohn Hugheslt;brgt;Fred M.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Robert Usherlt;brgt;Samuel M.MarkLee Kirklt;brgt;Victor A.Albert S.John B.Goodman art directorJohn B.Goodmanlt;brgt;Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;Russell A.Gausmanlt;brgt;Ira S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Daniel B.Cathcartlt;brgt;Edwin B.Wiard Ihnenlt;brgt;A.Albert S.James Basevilt;brgt;William S.Darlinglt;brgt;Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Frank E.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Roland Andersonlt;brgt;Samuel M.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Hans Peters art directorHans Peterslt;brgt;Edwin B.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Ernst Fegtelt;brgt;Samuel M.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Urie McClearylt;brgt;Edwin B.William S.Darlinglt;brgt;Lyle Wheelerlt;brgt;Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Frank E.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Walter H.Tylerlt;brgt;Samuel M.Richard Day art directorRichard Daylt;brgt;Nathan H.Juranlt;brgt;Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Paul S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Paul Groesselt;brgt;Edwin B.Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Paul S.Robert M.Roger K.William O.Lyle Wheelerlt;brgt;Joseph C.Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Paul S.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;Richard A.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;Jack D.Samuel M.George Davis art directorGeorge W.Davislt;brgt;Lyle WheelerLyle R.Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Walter M.Edwin B.Hans Dreierlt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;Richard A.Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Fred J.Paul S.Edwin B.Willslt;brgt;Jack D.Edwin B.Paul S.Thomas Littlelt;brgt;Walter M.Edward Carfagnolt;brgt;Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;William A.Keogh Gleasonlt;brgt;Edwin B.Walter M.Viva Zapata!Arthur Kramslt;brgt;Edwin B.John McCarthy,lt;brgt;Charles S.Paul S.Hugh Huntlt;brgt;Edwin B.Paul S.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Paul S.Foxlt;brgt;Walter M.Arthur Kramslt;brgt;Edwin B.Keogh Gleasonlt;brgt;Arthur Kramslt;brgt;Jack D.Moorelt;brgt;Edwin B.Jack D.Moorelt;brgt;Edwin B.Samuel M.Edwin B.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.Leagues Under the Sea  film,Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;E.Edwin B.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Paul S.Samuel M.Samuel M.Edwin B.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;Hugh B.Joseph C.Edward S.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Paul S.Oliver Smith designerOliver Smithlt;brgt;Joseph C.Walter M.Samuel M.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Malcolm F.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;F.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;A.Samuel M.Comerlt;brgt;Frank R.William R.Lyle R.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Stuart A.Lyle R.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Paul S.James W.Ross J.Ralph S.Cedric Gibbonslt;brgt;Hans Peters art directorHans Peterslt;brgt;E.Edwin B.Willislt;brgt;F.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.rowspan stylequot;textalign:centerquot;  lt;br gt;smallth Academy Awardsthlt;refgt;From ,the two awards were combined.Samuel M.William A.Edwin B.William A.Edwin B.William A.Horning smallList of posthumous Academy Award winners and nomineesposthumous awardlt;brgt;E.Henry Gracelt;brgt;F.Bell,Lyle R.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Paul S.Samuel M.rowspan stylequot;textalign:centerquot;  lt;br gt;smallnd Academy Awardsndlt;refgt;In ,the awards were again split in two.Lyle R.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Stuart A.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.Edward G.Suddenly,Last Summer filmSuddenly,William A.Lyle R.Wheelerlt;brgt;Franz Bachelinlt;brgt;Herman A.Walter M.William A.Richard H.Russell A.Gausmanlt;brgt;Ruby R.Edward G.Joseph McMillan Johnsonlt;brgt;Kenneth A.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.Russell A.Samuel M.Edward G.Victor A.Samuel M.Hal Pereiralt;brgt;Walter H.Samuel M.Samuel M.Comerlt;brgt;Frank R.George Davis art directorGeorge Davislt;brgt;J.Samuel M.Comerlt;brgt;Robert R.Samuel M.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Paul S.Samuel M.Comerlt;brgt;James W.Henry Gracelt;brgt;Don Greenwood Jr.Henry Gracelt;brgt;Robert R.Hush Hush,Edward G.Carroll Clarklt;brgt;William H.George Davis art directorGeorge Davislt;brgt;E.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Stuart A.What a Way to Go!Henry Gracelt;brgt;Charles S.Robert R.Richard Day art directorRichard Daylt;brgt;William Creberlt;brgt;David S.Hall art directorDavid S.Ray Moyerlt;brgt;Fred M.Walter M.Whos Afraid of Virginia Woolf?filmWhos Afraid of Virginia Woolf?Edward G.The Gospel According to St.Matthew filmThe Gospel According to St.Is Paris Burning?Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Stuart A.Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;George C.John McCarthy,Robert R.Bentonlt;brgt;James W.Walter M.John W.Brown set decoratorJohn W.Walter M.Scottlt;brgt;Stuart A.Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;George C.Oliver!filmOliver!Walter M.Star!filmStar!Walter M.Hello,Dolly!filmHello,Dolly!Robert F.Boylelt;brgt;George B.Edward G.Gaily,Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;George C.Jack D.They Shoot Horses,Dont They?filmThey Shoot Horses,Dont They?Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;E.Jack D.Moorelt;brgt;Mickey S.Samuel M.Tora!Tora!Tora!John B.Robert F.Mary,Queen of Scots  filmMary,John Boxlt;brgt;Gil Parrondolt;brgt;Robert W.Donald M.James W.Brother Sun,George R.Richard Sylbertlt;brgt;W.Alexander Golitzenlt;brgt;E.Peter Ellenshawlt;brgt;John B.Mansbridgelt;brgt;Walter H.Richard Sylbertlt;brgt;W.George C.Robert F.George C.Mickey S.George R.George R.George C.John W.John M.Michael D.Michael D.James L.George DeTitta Sr.lt;brgt;George DeTitta,Stuart Craiglt;brgt;Robert W.Lawrence G.Paulllt;brgt;David L.Norman Reynoldslt;brgt;Fred Holelt;brgt;James L.Michael D.Geoffrey Kirklandlt;brgt;Richard Lawrence art directorRichard Lawrencelt;brgt;W.Stewart Campbelllt;brgt;Peter R.Jim Poynterlt;brgt;George R.Mel Bournelt;brgt;Angelo P.John H.Anthony D.Carol Joffelt;brgt;Leslie Bloomlt;brgt;George DeTitta Jr.Patrizia von Brandensteinlt;brgt;William A.slt;!Thomas E.Chris A.Robert J.Michael D.Confidential filmL.The Talented Mr.Ripley filmThe Talented Mr.Crouching Tiger,Moulin Rouge!Anthony D.Good Night,and Good Luck.Gretchen Rau and Leslie E.Beth A.Victor J.James J.commentReverted WP:AGFgood faith edits by Special:Contributions.User talk:.talk: Not improvements.text xml:spacepreserveRedirectOscarsThe Oscarthe filmThe Oscar filmother usesOscar!image           Academy Award trophy.website         URLhttp:oscar.The Academy Awards,or quot;Oscarsquot;,The various category winners are awarded a copy of a statuette,officially called the Academy Award of Merit,which has become commonly known by its nickname quot;Oscarquot;.The awards,first presented in  at the Hollywood Roosevelt Hotel,are overseen by A.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.oscars.orgaboutacademyawardsindex.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgaboutacademyawardsindex.htmlarchivedate April lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:www.comewarticle,archive.orgwebhttp:www.comewarticle,The awards ceremony was first broadcast to radio in  and televised in .It is now seen live in more than  countries and can be streamed live online.lt;refgt;cite webtitleHistory of the Academy Awardsurlhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsabouthistory.htmlpublisherAcademy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciencesaccessdate January archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.the Emmy Awards for television,the Tony Awards for theatre,and the Grammy Awards for music and recording,are modeled after the Academy Awards.lt;refgt;cite webtitleThe Oscars  Feb th urlhttp:www.platinumagencygroup.losangelescdrkwebsiteplatinumagencygroup.The th Academy Awards ceremony was held at the Dolby Theatre on February ,and hosted by Chris Rock.A total of ,Oscars have been awarded since the inception of the award through the th.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.oscars.orgoscarsstatuettetitleOscar StatuetteworkOscars.The first Academy Awards presentation was held on May ,at a private dinner function at the Hollywood Roosevelt Hotel with an audience of about  people.The postawards party was held at the Mayfair Hotel.lt;ref namequot;historyquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsabouthistory.webcitation.Fifteen statuettes were awarded,honoring artists,directors and other participants in the filmmaking industry of the time,for their works during the  period.The ceremony ran for amp;nbsp;minutes.Winners had been announced to media three months earlier; however,that was changed for the second ceremony in .Since then,for the rest of the first decade,the results were given to newspapers for publication at :amp;nbsp;pm on the night of the awards.the Academy has,since ,used a sealed envelope to reveal the name of the winners.The first Best Actor awarded was Emil Jannings,He had to return to Europe before the ceremony,At that time,Jannings received the award for two movies in which he starred during that period,and Janet Gaynor later won a single Oscar for performances in three films.With the fourth ceremony,however,the system changed,and professionals were honored for a specific performance in a single film.For the first six ceremonies,the eligibility period spanned two calendar years.At the th ceremony,held on March ,Until then,foreignlanguage films had been honored with the Special Achievement Award.The th Academy Awards,held in ,presented the first Academy Award for Best Animated Feature.Since ,all Academy Awards ceremonies always end with the Academy Award for Best Picture.Although there are seven other types of annual awards presented by the Academy the Irving G.Thalberg Memorial Award,the Jean Hersholt Humanitarian Award,the Gordon E.Sawyer Award,the Academy Scientific and Technical Award,the Academy Award for Technical Achievement,the John A.the best known one is the Academy Award of Merit more popularly known as the Oscar statuette.Made of goldplated britannia metalbritannium on a black metal base,it is .amp;nbsp;in .amp;nbsp;cm tall,weighs .amp;nbsp;lb .The five spokes represent the original branches of the Academy: Actors,Writers,Directors,Producers,and Technicians.lt;refgt;cite weburl http:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsaboutawardsoscar.html?archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsaboutawardsoscar.html?url  http:abcnews.comABCUnivisionEntertainmentmeetemiliofernandezfaceoscarsstory?The statuettes presented at the initial ceremonies were goldplated solid bronze.Within a few years the bronze was abandoned in favor of britannia metal,a pewterlike alloy which is then plated in copper,nickel silver,and finally,karat gold.lt;refgt;cite webtitle  Oscar Statuetteurl  http:www.oscars.orgoscarsstatuettewebsite  Oscars.org !Oscars were made of painted plaster for three years.Following the war,the Academy invited recipients to redeem the plaster figures for goldplated metal ones.lt;refgt;cite weburl http:www.oscars.comlegacy?pnstatuetteamp;pagetitle Oscar Statuette: Manufacturing,archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.comlegacy?The original Oscar mold was cast in  at the C.Shumway amp; Sons Foundry in Batavia,Illinois,From  to ,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.boston.combigpictureatwork.archive.orgwebhttp:www.boston.combigpictureatwork.html archivedate  February  lt;!Owens amp; Company.url  http:www.foxnews.comprinterfriendlywiresJan,OscarGoldplatedJourney,https:news.google.comnewspapers?nidamp;datamp;idnUlAAAAIBAJamp;sjidffFAAAAIBAJamp;pg,Lodi NewsSentinellt;!DEAD LINK urlhttp:www.google.comhostednewsaparticleALeqMjLcVqoMSqeuUPUWfAQpffewDVMVgt;lt;!DEAD LINK archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.In  the Academy returned to bronze as the core metal of the statuettes,handing manufacturing duties to Rock Tavern,New York based Polich Tallix Fine Art Foundry.oscars.accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt; While based on a digital scan of an original  Oscar,the new statuettes will retain their modernera dimensions and black pedestal.Cast in liquid bronze from d printed ceramic molds and polished,they are then electroplated in karat gold by Brooklyn,New York based Epner Technology.The time required to produce  such statuettes is roughly  months.urlhttp:www.hollywoodreporter.comnewsoscarstatuettegetsafacepublisherThe Hollywood ReporterworkGregg KildaydateFebruary ,accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt; R.Owens is expected to continue producing other awards for the Academy and service existing Oscars.lt;refgt;cite webtitleOSCAR STATUETTES,longtime creation of Chicagobased company,will now be made in New Yorkurlhttp:chicago.suntimes.accessdateFebruary ,The origin of the name Oscar is disputed.One biography of Bette Davis,who was a president of the Academy,claims that she named the Oscar after her first husband,band leader Harmon Oscar Nelson.lt;refgt;cite weburl http:www.imdb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.imdb.comnamenmbio archivedate  March  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; Another claimed origin is that the Academys Executive Secretary,Margaret Herrick,lt;refgt;quot;Oscarquot; in the Oxford English Dictionary,June  Draft Revision.quot;Employees have affectionately dubbed their famous statuette Oscar.lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:www.time.comtimemagazinearticle,html  workTime  titleCinema: Oscars  date March  archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.time.comtimemagazinearticle,lt;refgt;cite weburl http:d.disney.comnewsoscarwinningwalttitle OscarWinning WaltpublisherDisney.comaccessdate   February archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:d.disney.To prevent information identifying the Oscar winners from leaking ahead of the ceremony,Oscar statuettes presented at the ceremony have blank baseplates.Until ,Since ,a party held immediately after the Oscar ceremony.In ,the R.Owens company made  engraved nameplates ahead of the ceremony,bearing the names of every potential winner.The  or so nameplates for nonwinning nominees were recycled afterwards.dateFebruary ,urlhttp:www.hollywoodreporter.titleGovernors Ball Secrets: Welcome to the Engraving Station,urlhttp:parade.dateFebruary ,Since ,If a winner refuses to agree to this stipulation,then the Academy keeps the statuette.lt;refgt;Levy ,pg lt;refgt;  In December ,Orson Welles  Oscar for Citizen Kane Best Original Screenplay was put up for auction,lt;refgt;cite newsurl  http:www.comshowbizorsonwellesoscarindex.accessdate  December ,archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.comshowbizorsonwellesoscarindex.htmlarchivedate  lt;refgt; On December ,it sold in an online auction for US,lt;ref namequot;Welles Oscar soldquot;gt;cite newstitleOrson Welles Citizen Kane Oscar brings ,urlhttp:www.comshowbizorsonwellesoscarindex.htmlaccessdateApril ,newspaperCNNdateDecember ,authorDuke,Alanarchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.comshowbizorsonwellesoscarindex.Harold Russell needed money for his wifes medical expenses.In a controversial decision,and on August ,in New York City,the Oscar sold to a private collector for ,Russell defended his action,saying,quot;I dont know why anybody would be critical.My wifes health is much more important than sentimental reasons.The movie will be here,even if Oscar isnt.quot; Harold Russell is the only Academy Award winning actor to ever sell an Oscar.While the Oscar is owned by the recipient,it is essentially not on the open market.url  http:www.forbes.comcxlroscarsales.htmltitle  Psst!Wanna Buy An Oscar?workForbes authorLacey RosedateFebruary ,accessdate April ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.forbes.comcxlroscarsales.but the Academy won the legal battle by getting a permanent injunction.Although some Oscar sales transactions have been successful,some buyers have subsequently returned the statuettes to the Academy,which keeps them in its treasury.lt;refgt;Levy ,Since ,Academy Award nomination results have been announced to the public in late January.Prior to that,the results were announced in early February.The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences AMPAS,a professional honorary organization,maintains a voting membership of ,as oflcy.lt;refgt;cite news  authorSandy Cohen  titleAcademy Sets Oscars Contingency Plan  urlhttp:news.archive.orgwebhttp:news.Academy membership is divided into different branches,with each representing a different discipline in film production.Actors constitute the largest voting bloc,numbering ,members  percent of the Academys composition.lt;refgt;cite newsurl  http:news.ukhientertainment.archive.orgwebhttp:news.ukhientertainment.stm archivedate  March  lt;!All AMPAS members must be invited to join by the Board of Governors,on behalf of Academy Branch Executive Committees.New membership proposals are considered annually.The Academy does not publicly disclose its membership,The  release also stated that it has just under ,voting members.While the membership had been growing,stricter policies have kept its size steady since then.lt;refgt;cite weburl  http:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleases.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleases.Of the ,active voters confirmed,were Caucasian,were male,and  were found to be over the age of .of voting members are former nominees  and winners .lt;refgt;cite newslastHornfirstJohntitleUnmasking the Academyurlhttp:www.latimes.comentertainmentnewsmoviesacademylaetunmaskingoscaracademyprojecthtml,htmlstoryaccessdate October newspaperThe Los Angeles TimesdateFeb ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.latimes.comentertainmentnewsmoviesacademylaetunmaskingoscaracademyprojecthtml,In May ,the Academy sent a letter advising its ,or so voting members that an online system for Oscar voting will be implemented in .lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.archive.orgwebhttp:mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.According to Rules  and  of the official Academy Awards Rules,a film must open in the previous calendar year,from midnight at the start of January  to midnight at the end of December ,in Los Angeles County,California and play for seven consecutive days,to qualify except for the Best Foreign Language Film.url  http:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsrulesrule.archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsrulesrule.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburl  https:submissions.oscars.orgFAQ.the  Academy Award for Best PictureBest Picture winner,The Hurt Locker,was actually first released in ,thus qualifying for the nd Academy Awards awards.Foreign films must include English subtitles,and each country can submit only one film per year.url  http:www.youbioit.archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.youbioit.Rule  states that a film must be featurelength,defined as a minimum of amp;nbsp;minutes,except for short subject awards,lt;refgt;cite weburl  http:www.oscars.orgsitesdefaultfilesaarules.pdfarchiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgsitesdefaultfilesaarules.the film will be ineligible for Academy Awards in any year.The form includes the production credits for all related categories.Then,each form is checked and put in a Reminder List of Eligible Releases.active members.For most categories,only directors vote for directors,writers for writers,actors for actors,etc.In the special case of Best Picture,all voting members are eligible to select the nominees.In all major categories,a variant of the single transferable vote is used,lt;ref namequot;TheEnvelopequot;gt;cite web archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:theenvelope.latimes.comawardsoscarsenvoscarvotejan,print.story?collenvhomeheadlines archivedate October  urlhttp:theenvelope.latimes.comawardsoscarsenvoscarvotejan,print.story?firstSteve lastPond  accessdate dateJanuary ,publisherLos Angeles Timeslt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.comarticleoscarvoterballotreaderpollresultstitleOscars: The wacky way the Academy counts votes,including Foreign Film,Documentary and Animated Feature Film,nominees are selected by special screening committees made up of members from all branches.lt;ref namequot;TheEnvelopequot; gt;lt;ref namequot;voxquot; gt; Since ,the Best Picture winner has been chosen by instant runoff voting.lt;ref namequot;voxquot;gt;cite press releaseurlhttp:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleasesa.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleasesa.htmlarchivedate October lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.comoscarsballottitleThe Oscars messedup voting process,explainedlastVanDerWerfffirstTodd ondateFebruary ,a producer of the  Best Picture nominee,The Hurt Locker,File:st Acad Awards.jpgthumbpxst Academy Awards Presentations,Pantages Theatre HollywoodPantages Theatre,Hollywood,File:st Academy Awards Ceremony.JPGthumbpxst Academy Awards Presentations,Dolby Theatre,Hollywood,The major awards are presented at a live televised ceremony,most commonly in late February or early March following the relevant calendar year,and six weeks after the announcement of the nominees.It is the culmination of the film awards season,which usually begins during November or December of the previous year.This is an elaborate extravaganza,Black tie dress is the most common outfit for men,although fashion may dictate not wearing a bowtie,and musical performers sometimes do not adhere to this.and the fact that they are performing is often used to promote the television broadcast.The Oscars were first televised in  by NBC,which continued to broadcast the event until ,when American Broadcasting CompanyABC took over,televising the festivities including the first color broadcast of the event in  through ,after which NBC resumed the broadcasts.ABC once again took over broadcast duties in ,and has broadcast the Oscars ever since; its current contract with the Academy runs through .lt;refgt;cite press releaseurl http:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleasesb.date  February accessdate   February archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgpresspressreleasesb.The ceremony was broadcast live internationally for the first time via satellite in ,but only two South American countries,Chile and Brazil,purchased the rights to air the broadcast.By that time,the television rights to the Academy Awards had been sold in  countries.A decade later,the rights were already being sold to  countries,and by ,the TV rights to the Awards were licensed in  countries.which would cut into the Academy Awards audience.The earlier date is also to the advantage of ABC,as it now usually occurs during the highly profitable and important February sweeps period.Some years,the ceremony is moved into early March in deference to the Winter Olympics.which for decades had been a grievance from members and the general public.Advertising is somewhat restricted,however,The Awards show holds the distinction of having won the most Emmys in history,with  wins and  nominations.lt;refgt;cite newsurl  http:goldderby.latimes.comawardsgoldderbyemmysloveforoscarscontinueswithnominations.workLos Angeles Times authorTom ONeildate  July accessdate   August  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:goldderby.latimes.comawardsgoldderbyemmysloveforoscarscontinueswithnominations.html archivedate  August  lt;!After many years of being held on Mondays at :amp;nbsp;pm Eastern Time ZoneEastern: p.m Pacific Time ZonePacific,in  the ceremonies were moved to Sundays at :amp;nbsp;pm Eastern:amp;nbsp;pm Pacific.lt;refgt;cite newsurl  http:www.nytimes.commoviestvnotesmovingoscarnight.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nytimes.commoviestvnotesmovingoscarnight.that Los Angeles rushhour traffic jams could be avoided,and that an earlier start time would allow viewers on the East Coast to go to bed earlier.lt;refgt;https:news.google.comnewspapers?nidamp;datamp;idCsiAAAAIBAJamp;sjideqYFAAAAIBAJamp;pg,lt;refgt;https:news.google.comnewspapers?nidamp;datamp;idsKEiAAAAIBAJamp;sjidlaoFAAAAIBAJamp;pg,Never Say Never: Academy Awards move to Sunday The Item   March .Google News Archive.lt;refgt; The Academy has contemplated moving the ceremony even further back into January,citing TV viewers fatigue with the film industrys long awards season.However,such an accelerated schedule would dramatically decrease the voting period for its members,Also,lt;refgt;cite newsurl  http:articles.latimes.workLos Angeles Times authorJohn Horndate  October accessdate   February archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:articles.latimes.Originally scheduled for April ,the th Academy Awards ceremony was postponed for two days,because of the assassination of Dr.Martin Luther King,On March ,the rd Academy Awards was postponed for one day,an In Memoriam segment was introduced,lt;ref namequot;fawcettquot;gt;cite newsurlhttp:www.guardian.archive.orgwebhttp:www.guardian.ukfilmmaroscarsfarrahfawcett archivedate  April  lt;!a selection compiled by a small committee of Academy members.lt;refgt;cite newsfirstSandylastCohentitleOscars In Memoriam segment is touching to watch,painful to make urlhttp:www.usatoday.comlifemoviesmovieawardsoscarsoscarmemorialsegmentN.Criticism was also levied for many years regarding another aspect,In terms of broadcast length,the ceremony generally averages three and a half hours.The first Oscars,in ,lasted amp;nbsp;minutes.At the other end of the spectrum,the  ceremony lasted four hours and four minutes.lt;refgt;Ehbar,Ned February ,quot;Did you know?quot; Metro.New York City.lt;refgt; In ,This,according to organizer Bill Mechanic,lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:www.guardian.archive.orgwebhttp:www.guardian.ukfilmfeboscarwinnersspeechescut  archivedate lt;refgt; In ,in a further effort to streamline speeches,winners dedications were displayed on an onscreen news tickerticker.urlhttp:www.usatoday.Although still dominant in ratings,while the show itself also faced mixed reception.Following the show,Variety magazineVariety reported that ABC was,in negotiating an extension to its contract to broadcast the Oscars,seeking to have more creative control over the broadcast itself.Currently and nominally,AMPAS is responsible for most aspects of the telecast,including the choice of production staff and hosting.urlhttp:variety.Historically,More than .million viewers tuned to the telecast for the th Academy Awards in ,the year of Titanic  filmTitanic,which generated close to US million at the North American box office preOscars.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:seattletimes.nwsource.comhtmlbusinesstechnologyoscarads.archive.orgwebhttp:seattletimes.nwsource.comhtmlbusinesstechnologyoscarads.million viewers.lt;ref namequot;usatodayoscarquot;gt;cite news  urlhttp:www.usatoday.comlifemoviesmovieawardsoscarsoscartelecastx.however,was the nd Academy Awards Best Picture Midnight Cowboy which drew a .household rating on  April .lt;refgt;cite newsauthorJustin Oppelaar urlhttp:www.variety.comindex.com date accessdatearchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.variety.comindex.By contrast,The th Academy Awards which awarded lowbudgeted,independent film Crash  filmCrash with a preOscar gross of US.million generated an audience of .million with a household rating of .lt;refgt;cite news  urlhttp:www.usatoday.comlifetelevisionnewsnielsenanalysisx.the th Academy Awards telecast was watched by .million viewers on average with an .household rating,the lowest rated and least watched ceremony to date,in spite of celebrating  years of the Academy Awards.lt;refgt;cite web  urlhttp:www.capecodonline.comappspbcs.dllarticle?AIDLIFE  titleOscar ratings worst ever workThe Washington Post archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.capecodonline.comappspbcs.dllarticle?File:Hollywood Pantages Theatre .jpgthumbuprightPantages Theatre HollywoodPantages Theatre,the first Academy Awards were presented at a banquet dinner at the Hollywood Roosevelt Hotel.From  to ,TCL Chinese TheatreGraumans Chinese Theatre in Hollywood then hosted the awards from  to ,followed by the Shrine Auditorium in Los Angeles from  to .url  http:www.oscars.orgaboutacademyawardsvenues.archiveurl  https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgaboutacademyawardsvenues.From  to ,the awards were presented at Hollywoods Pantages Theatre HollywoodPantages Theatre.With the advent of television,the awards from  to  took place simultaneously in Hollywood and New York,after which the ceremony took place solely in Los Angeles.The Oscars moved to the Santa Monica Civic Auditorium in Santa Monica,California in .By ,the Academy decided to move the ceremonies back to Los Angeles,the Kodak Theatre now known as the Dolby Theatre became the current venue of the presentation.lt;refgt;cite newstitleOscars home renamed Dolby Theatre urlhttp:www.cbsnews.comoscarshomerenameddolbytheatre publisherCBS News accessdateMay ,deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.cbsnews.In the first year of the awards,the Best Directing award was split into two separate categories Drama and Comedy.At times,From the s through the s,the Art Direction now Production Design,Cinematography,Prior to ,the Production Design award was called Art Direction,while the Makeup and Hairstyling award was called Makeup.Another award,entitled the Academy Award for Best Original Musical,is still in the Academy rulebooks and has yet to be discontinued.However,due to continuous insufficient eligibility each year,it has not been awarded since  when Purple Rain filmPurple Rain won.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsrulesrule.org date accessdatearchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.oscars.orgawardsacademyawardsrulesrule.Academy Award for Best DirectingBest Director,The Board of Governors meets each year and considers new award categories.To date,Best Casting: rejected in lt;!reference to suite.com removed,Best Stunt Coordination: rejected every year from  to lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:www.filmschoolrejects.comopinionsitstimetocreateanoscarforstuntcoordinatorsetrav.archive.orgwebhttp:www.filmschoolrejects.comopinionsitstimetocreateanoscarforstuntcoordinatorsetrav.php  archivedate lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:actionfest.archive.orgwebhttp:actionfest.hollywoodreporter.archive.orgwebhttp:www.hollywoodreporter.latimes.commoviesenvfistuntsaug,story?archive.orgwebhttp:theenvelope.latimes.commoviesenvfistuntsaug,story?Best Title Design: rejected in lt;!reference to suite.com removed,The Special Academy Awards are voted on by special committees,rather than by the Academy membership as a whole.They are not always presented on a consistent annual basis.Gordon E.Irving G.Due to the positive exposure and prestige of the Academy Awards,William Friedkin,an Academy Awardwinning film director and former producer of the ceremony,expressed this sentiment at a conference in New York in ,lt;refgt;cite AV media peopleFriedkin,archive.orgwebhttp:fora.Tim Dirks,editor of American Movie ClassicsAMCs filmsite.has written of the Academy Awards,quoteUnfortunately,the critical worth,artistic vision,cultural influence and innovative qualities of many films are not given the same voting weight.Especially since the s,but they havent necessarily been great films with depth or critical acclaim by any measure.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.filmsite.orgoscars.html titleAcademy Awards  The Oscars accessdate October archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.filmsite.orgoscars.biographical dramas,romantic dramedies,and family melodramas,most of which are released in the U.the last three months of the calendar year.The Oscars have been infamously known for selecting specific genres of movies to be awarded.This has led to the coining of the term Oscar bait,describing such movies.by favoring Oscar bait over audience favorites,lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:www.nypost.accessdate January   workNew York Post firstKyle lastSmitharchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nypost.The th Academy Awardsth awards ceremony became the target of a boycott,based on critics perception that its allwhite acting nominee list reflected bias.In response,the Academy initiated quot;historicquot; changes in membership by the year .lt;refgt;cite newslastSimsfirstDavidtitleCan a Boycott Change the Oscars?urlhttp:www.theatlantic.comentertainmentarchivecanaboycottchangetheoscarspublisherThe AtlanticdateJanuary ,accessdateFebruary ,rollingstone.commoviesnewsacademypromiseshistoricchangestodiversifymembershippublisherRolling StonedateJanuary ,accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:encyclopedia.thefreedictionary.comTaylor,Elizabeth titleTaylor,Elizabeth accessdate October lt;refgt;better sourcedateApril  personal popularity,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:incontention.p titleWhats the worst Best Actor choice of all time?accessdate October archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:incontention.parchivedatelt;refgt; atonement for past mistakes,lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:bennylabamba.comarchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:bennylabamba.google.The first to do so was Dudley Nichols Best Writing in  for The Informer  filmThe Informer.lt;ref namequot;DYKquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.biography.comoscarsoscarsdidyouknow.jsptitleThe Oscars Did You Know?accessdate June  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.biography.comoscarsoscarsdidyouknow.jsp archivedate  June  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; George C.Scott described it as a meat parade,saying I dont want any part of it.quot;lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:news.ukhiobituaries.archive.orgwebhttp:news.ukhiobituaries.stm  archivedate lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:www.time.comtimemagazinearticle,html  workTime  titleShow Business: Meat Parade  date March  archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.time.comtimemagazinearticle,html  archivedate lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.biography.comoscarsoscarsdidyouknow.jsp titleFast Facts  Did You Know?publisherBiography.com date May  accessdate February  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.biography.comoscarsoscarsdidyouknow.jsp archivedate  February  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; The third was Marlon Brando,who refused his award Best Actor for s The Godfather,citing the film industrys discrimination and mistreatment of Native Americans.At the th Academy Awards ceremony,Brando sent Sacheen Littlefeather to read a page speech detailing his criticisms.The th Independent Spirit Awards in ,usually held in Santa Monica the Saturday before the Oscars,marked the first time it was moved to a Friday and a change of venue to L.The annual quot;Night Beforequot;,traditionally held at the Beverly Hills Hotel,begun in  and generally known as the party of the season,benefits the  Motion Picture and Television Fund,The Governors Ball is the Academys official afterparty,including dinner until ,The Vanity Fair afterparty,historically at the former Mortons restaurant,It has become a tradition to give out gift bags to the presenters and performers at the Oscars.In recent years these gifts have also been extended to award nominees and winners.lt;ref namequot;ABCGiftBagquot;gt;cite weblastValentifirstCatherinetitleNo Oscar?How About a Gift Bag?urlhttp:abcnews.comBusinessstory?idpublisherABC Newsaccessdate March archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:abcnews.comBusinessstory?In  the value was reported to be as high as US,lt;ref namequot;CBSGiftBagquot;gt;cite newslastPetersonfirstKimtitleOscars gift bag has ,worth of swagurlhttp:www.cbsnews.comnewsoscarsgiftbaghasworthofswagpublisherCBS Newsaccessdate March archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.cbsnews.Internal Revenue Service issued a statement regarding the gifts and their taxable status.govuacIRSStatementonOscarGoodieBagspublisherIRS.govaccessdate March archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.Oscar gift bags have included vacation packages to Hawaii and Mexico and Japan,a private dinner party for the recipient and friends at a restaurant,videophones,a fournight stay at a hotel,watches,bracelets,vacation packages,spa treatments,bottles of vodka,maple salad dressing,and weightloss gummie candy.comEntertainmentsurprisingfreebiesinsideoscarnomineesgiftbagsstory?idpublisherABC Newsaccessdate March archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:abcnews.comEntertainmentsurprisingfreebiesinsideoscarnomineesgiftbagsstory?archive.orgwebhttp:variety.Celebrities visiting the gifting suite included Judith Hoag,Carolyn Hennesy,Kate Linder,Chris Mulkey,Jim OHeir,and NBA player John Salley.comarticlesnoveltyAdamEveHadSecretRoomGiftingSuiteforOscarsCelebs.htmlpublisherAdult Video Newsaccessdate March archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:business.comarticlesnoveltyAdamEveHadSecretRoomGiftingSuiteforOscarsCelebs.From  onwards,results are LiveSD,Viewers,lt;br gt;millionslt;ref namequot;tvbythenumbersquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:tvbythenumbers.zapit.accessdateMarch ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:tvbythenumbers.zapit.Ad price,lt;ref name  tvbythenumbers gt;lt;ref namequot;kantarmediaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:kantarmediana.accessdateMarch ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:kantarmediana.Adjusted Price,lt;br gt; United States DollarUSD,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:tvbythenumbers.zapit.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.forbes.InflationUSD.comtvratingsearlyratingsoscarslooktobeupslightlyfromlastyear workVariety dateMarch ,accessdateMarch ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:variety.comtvnewsoscaradpriceshitalltimehighasabcsellsouttelecastexclusive workVariety dateMarch ,accessdateMarch ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:variety.InflationUSD.r  InflationUSD.lt;ref namequot;nielsenquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.nielsen.comusennewswiretopsoftvandsocialmedia.htmltitleTops of : TV and Social MediaworkTV by the Numbers firstSara lastBibel dateDecember ,accessdateMarch ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nielsen.comusennewswiretopsoftvandsocialmedia.InflationUSD.r  InflationUSD.lt;ref namequot;varquot;gt;cite newsurlhttp:www.variety.comarticleVR?categoryidamp;csamp;nidtitleCrystal,social media fuel Oscar ratings  last  Kissell  firstRick  dateFebruary ,accessdateApril ,InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.InflationUSD.The term quot;Oscarquot; is a registered trademark of the AMPAS; however,in the Italian language,it is used generic trademarkgenerically to refer to any award or award ceremony,regardless of which field,an activity the AMPAS discourages.lt;refgt;http:www.hollywoodreporter.comnewscourtoscarmaybegeneric Court: Oscar may be generic term in Italian  Hollywood Reporterlt;!Bot generated title gt;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:uk.reuters.comarticleindustryoscardcidUKN Court: Oscar may be generic term in Italian  Reuterslt;!Brokaw,Lauren .http:web.archive.orgwebhttp:thedailytruffle.com:oscarweekpartiestheweeklyjuiceoscaredition quot;Wanna see an Academy Awards invite?We got it along with all the major annual events surrounding the Oscarsquot;.Los Angeles: The Daily Truffle.Wright,Jon .The Lunacy of Oscar: The Problems with Hollywoods Biggest Night.Thomas Publishing,Inc.Official websitehttp:oscar.http:www.oscars.http:awardsdatabase.oscars.orgampasawardsBasicSearchInput.dmozArtsMoviesAwardsAcademyAwardsAcademy Awards.http:www.time.comtimearchivecollections,coscars,shtml quot;Oscar Greatsquot; at Time magazineTime magazine.image           Actrius film poster.based on        based onstage play E.narrator        lt;!production companies  ublCanalCanal EspaaEls Films de la Rambla S.gross           lt;!please use condensed and rounded values,quot;.millionquot; not quot;,by Josep Maria Benet i Jornet.The film has no male actors,with all roles played by females.lt;ref namequot;El Paisquot;gt;cite newslastTorresfirstRosannatitleE.de Benet i Jornet,es llevada al cine y al teatrourlhttp:elpais.comdiariocultura.lt;ref namequot;Daily Mailquot;gt;cite newslastTookyfirstChristophertitleRipe for a siesta.urlhttps:www.highbeam.comdocG.the television star Assumpta Roca Rosa Maria Sard,and dubbing director Maria Caminal Anna Lizaran.lt;ref nameSFFgt;cite web  urlhttp:www.stockholmfilmfestival.The film had first screened at the same location in .lt;ref namequot;LA Timesquot;gt;cite newslastTHomasfirstKevintitleSometimes,the World Gets in the Wayurlhttp:articles.latimes.In Movie  Film  Review,the film quot;is visually unimaginative,never escapes its stage origins,and is almost totally lacking in revelation or surprising incidentquot;.lt;ref nameTookeygt;  Noting that there were quot;occasional,refreshing moments of intergenerational bitchinessquot;,they did not quot;justify comparisons to All About Evequot;,and were quot;insufficiently different to deserve critical parallels with Rashomonquot;.lt;ref nameTookeygt; He also wrote that The Guardian called the film a quot;slow,stuffy chamberpiecequot;,moviefilmreview.comdevFilm.but does not stray far from a theatrical rendering of the story.quot;lt;ref nameMRQEgt;cite weblaststafftitleActrius urlhttp:www.mrqe.won Best Catalan Film Actress at Butaca Awards,shared by Nria Espert,Rosa Maria Sard,Anna Lizaran,nominated for Best Screenplay at Goya Awards,official websitehttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:venturapons.comfilmografiaactrices.html Wayback Machineas archived February ,Infobox booklt;!image          Animalia book cover.alt            Book cover: a larger picture framed by smaller pictures,all of which contain different animals,Infobox publicationimageAnimalia.Animalia is an illustrated Childrens literaturechildrens book by Graeme Base.It was originally published in ,followed by a tenth anniversary edition in ,and a th anniversary edition in .Over three million copies have been sold.lt;refgt;cite weblastPuffin BookstitleAnimalia th Anniversary Editionurlhttp:www.puffin.with an embossed gold jacket.lt;refgt;cite weblastABE BookstitleAnimalia Numbered and Signed anniversary editionurlhttp:www.abebooks.Animalia is an alliterationalliterative alphabet book and contains twentysix illustrations,one for each letter of the alphabet.Each illustration features an animal from the animal kingdom A is for alligator,B is for butterfly,etc.along with a short poem utilizing the letter of the page for many of the words.As an additional challenge,the author has hidden a picture of himself as a child in every picture.Julia MacRae Books published an Animalia colouring book in .lt;refgt;cite weblastPenguin BookstitleAnimalia Colouring Bookurlhttp:www.penguin.auproductsanimaliacolouringbookaccessdate June lt;refgt;   Abrams BooksH.Abrams also published a wall calendar colouring book version for children the same year.lt;refgt;cite weblastLibraryThing.comtitleAnimalia  Coloring Calendarurlhttp:www.librarything.Abrams published The Animalia Wall Frieze,a foldout over  feet in length,in which the author created new riddles for each letter.lt;refgt;cite weblastBookFinder.comtitleThe Animalia Wall Friezeurlhttp:www.bookfinder.The Great American Puzzle Factory created a piece jigsaw puzzle based on the books cover.lt;refgt;cite weblastAmazon.comtitleAnimalia piece jigsaw puzzleurlhttp:www.amazon.A Animalia TV seriestelevision series was also created,based on the book,which airs in the United States,Australia,Canada,the United Kingdom,Norway and Venezuela.It also airs on Minimax TV channelMinimax for the Czech Republic and Slovakia.And recently in Greece on the channel ET GreeceET.lt;refgt;cite weblastCurriculum PresstitleAnimalia  Primary teaching resourceurlhttp:www.curriculumpress.The Base Factory and AppBooks released Animalia as an application for iPad and iPhoneiPod Touch.lt;refgt;cite weblastMyBookCorner.autitleAnimalia  Anniversary Editionurlhttp:www.mybookcorner.Animalia won the Young Australians Best Book Award in  for Best Picture Story Book.lt;refgt;cite weblastYabba.orgtitleAward Winners   through urlhttp:yabba.Kids Own Australian Literature Awards named Animalia the  Picture Book Winner.lt;refgt;cite weblastKOALA New South WalestitleComplete list of KOALA winners  to urlhttp:www.koalansw.austorageCompletelistwinnersto.http:www.graemebase.http:www.animalia.http:www.thelittlebigbookclub.ausitesthelittlebigbookclub.aufilesfilestitleresourcelearningtimeyearsjuly.text xml:spacepreserveInternational Atomic Time TAI,lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:adsabs.harvard.educgibinnphbibquery?bibcodeCeMec.G titleIs the International Atomic Time TAI a coordinate time or a proper time?publisherAdsabs.harvard.edu date accessdate May lt;refgt; It is the basis for Coordinated Universal Time UTC,which is used for civil timekeeping all over the Earths surface,and for Terrestrial Time,which is used for astronomical calculations.as of when the last leap second was added,lt;ref namequot;Bulletin C quot;gt;cite weburlhttp:hpiers.obspm.freoppcbulbulcbulletinc.The  seconds results from the initial difference of  seconds at the start of ,plus  leap seconds in UTC since .carried over from nonuniform time standards based on the rotation of the Earth.Specifically,both Julian Dates and the Gregorian calendar are used.TAI in this form was synchronised with Universal Time at the beginning of ,and the two have drifted apart ever since,due to the changing motion of the Earth.dgfi.badw.defileadminIAGdocsTravauxBIPM.sfnTimen.lt;refgt;Circular T .lt;refgt;McCarthy amp;Seidelmann ,The participating institutions each broadcast,in realtime datareal time,a frequency signal with timecodes,which is their estimate of TAI.Time codes are usually published in the form of UTC,which differs from TAI by a wellknown integer number of seconds.These time scales are denoted in the form UTCNPL in the UTC form,where NPL in this case identifies the National Physical Laboratory,The TAI form may be denoted TAINPL.The latter is not to be confused with TANPL,which denotes an independent atomic time scale,not synchronised to TAI or to anything else.The clocks at different institutions are regularly compared against each other.The International Bureau of Weights and Measures BIPM,France,lt;refgt;quot;Timequot; n.lt;refgt;  This combined time scale is published monthly in ftp:ftp.bipm.frpubtaipublicationcirt Circular T,and is the Canonical formcanonical TAI.The same circular also gives tables of TAITAk,for the various unsynchronised atomic time scales.Aside from this,once published in Circular T the TAI scale is not revised.In hindsight it is possible to discover errors in TAI,and to make better estimates of the true proper time scale.Atomic timekeeping services started experimentally in ,UK NPL.The quot;Greenwich Atomicquot; GA scale began in  at the Royal Greenwich Observatory.The International Time Bureau BIH began a time scale,Tlt;subgt;mlt;subgt; or AM,in July ,The United States Naval Observatory began the A.scale   September ,using an Atomichron commercial atomic clock,followed by the NBSA scale at the National Bureau of Standards,Boulder,Colorado.Both the BIH scale and A.January  :: at the corresponding UT instant.The procedures used by the BIH evolved,and the name for the time scale changed: quot;Aquot; in  and quot;TABIHquot; in .lt;refgt;McCarthy amp; Seidelmann ,amp;ndash;.lt;refgt;  This synchronisation was inevitably imperfect,depending as it did on the astronomyastronomical realisation of UT.At the time,UT as published by various observatories differed by several hundredths of a second.The SI second was defined in terms of the caesium atom in ,lt;refgt;McCarthy amp; Seidelmann ,amp;ndash;.lt;refgt; During this time,irregularities in the atomic time were detected and corrected.In  it was suggested that nearby masses caused clocks to operate at different rates,but this was disproven in .lt;refgt;William Markowitz.quot;Nondependence of Frequency on Mass: A Differential Experimentquot; doi:.science.In the s,Starting from Julian Date .January  ::,corrections were applied to the output of all participating clocks,so that TAI would correspond to proper time at mean sea level the geoid.Because the clocks had been on average well above sea level,this meant that TAI slowed down,by about one part in a trillion.The former uncorrected time scale continues to be published,under the name EAL Echelle Atomique Libre,meaning Free Atomic Scale.lt;refgt;McCarthy amp; Seidelmann,Geocentric Coordinate Time TCG,and Terrestrial Time TT,which represent three fundamental time scales in the solar system.lt;refgt;Brumberg V.amp; Kopeikin S.quot;Relativistic time scales in the solar systemquot;,Cel.Mech.Dyn.Astron.Vol.http:adsabs.harvard.eduabsCeMDA.Blt;refgt;  All three of these time scales were defined to read JD .January  ::.exactly at that instant.The offset is to provide continuity with the older Ephemeris Time.TAI was henceforth a realisation of TT,with the equation TTTAI  TAI  .amp;nbsp;s.lt;refgt;McCarthy amp; Seidelmann,amp;ndash;.the CCTF would consider discussing the possibility of suppressing TAI,as it would remain parallel to the continuous UTC.urlhttp:www.bipm.orgccCCTFAllowedCCTFnoteonUTCITUR.UTC began.the discontinuities being arranged so that UTC approximated UT until the end of ,and UT thereafter.lt;refgt;McCarthy amp; Seidelmann ,amp;ndash;.Precision Time Protocol,urlftp:maia.usno.navy.milsertaiutc.publisherTime Service Dept.urlhttp:www.bipm.orgenscientifictaitai.urlhttp:www.bipm.date  n.refsfnRefTimen.firstD.firstP.publisherWileyVCH Verlag GmbH amp; Co.http:www.bipm.frenusScientificctimetime.http:www.uktime Time and Frequency Section  National Physical Laboratory,http:hpiers.obspm.http:www.nist.govphyslabdivfaq.http:www.ucolick.orgslaleapsecstimescales.http:www.nist.govpmldivgrpprimaryfrequencystandards.cite weburlhttp:inmsienm.nrccnrc.caresearchopticalfrequencyprojectse.htmlfemtosecondtitleOptical frequency comb for metrology and timekeepingarchiveurlhttp:web.archive.orgwebhttp:inmsienm.nrccnrc.caresearchopticalfrequencyprojectse.http:jjy.nict.jpindexe.html Japan Standard Time Project,NICT,ftp:ftp.bipm.orgpubtaiscaletimeservices.pdf Bureau International des Poids et Mesures: TAI TIME DISSEMINATION SERVICES,http:www.ipses.comengIndepthanalysisStandardoftimedefinition Standard of time definition: UTC,GPS,File:Belisaire demandant laumone JacquesLouis David.jpgthumbGiving alms to the poor is often considered an altruistic action.Altruism or selflessness is the opposite of selfishness.The word was coined by the French philosopher Auguste Comte in French,as altruisme,for an antonym of egoism.lt;refgt;cite webtitlealtruism n .urlhttp:www.etymonline.comindex.isbnpageurlhttps:books.google.combooks?idBIUEPaCamp;dqlt;refgt; He derived it from the Italian altrui,which in turn was derived from Latin alteri,meaning quot;alterityother peoplequot; or quot;somebody elsequot;.google.combooks?pleasure and quality of life,time,probability of survival or reproduction,but benefits,either directly or indirectly,another thirdparty individual,without the expectation of reciprocity or compensation for that action.Steinberg suggests a definition for altruism in the clinical setting,lt;refgt;Cite journalurl  title  Altruism in medicine: its definition,nature,Altruism can be distinguished from feelings of loyalty,in that whilst the latter is predicated upon social relationships,altruism does not consider relationships.Much debate exists as to whether quot;truequot; altruism is possible in human psychology.The theory of psychological egoism suggests that no act of sharing,helping or sacrificing can be described as truly altruistic,as the actor may receive an intrinsic reward in the form of personal gratification.The actor also may not be expecting a reward.Used in this sense,it is usually contrasted with ethical egoismegoism,which is defined as acting to the benefit of ones self.The concept has a long history in Philosophyphilosophical and Ethicsethical thought.Auguste Comte,and has become a major topic for psychologists especially evolutionary psychology researchers,evolutionary biologists,and ethologyethologists.Whilst ideas about altruism from one field can have an impact on the other fields,In simple terms,altruism is caring about the welfare of other people and acting to help them.Scientific viewpointslt;!Marcel Mausss book The Gift contains a passage: quot;Note on alms.In it,lt;blockquotegt;Alms are the fruits of a moral notion of the gift and of fortune on the one hand,and of a notion of sacrifice,on the other.Generosity is an obligation,This is the ancient morality of the gift,which has become a principle of justice.Compare altruism ethicsAltruism ethics  perception of altruism as selfsacrifice.Compare almsexplanation of alms in various scriptures.File:Manner of Francis Wheatley,Giving alms to beggar children.In the science of ethology the study of animal behaviour,and more generally in the study of social evolution,emergency aid,help to coalition partners,Tip gratuitytipping,courtship gifts,production of public goods,and environmentalism.lt;ref namequot;AEPquot;gt;Pat Barcaly.The evolution of charitable behaviour and the power of reputation.In Cite journal  last  Roberts  first  S.editorlast  Roberts  doi  .acprof:oso.editorfirst  S.Kin selection.lt;refgt;cite webtitleBiological Altruismurlhttp:plato.stanford.Even subtle cues indicating kinship may unconsciously increase altruistic behavior.One kinship cue is facial resemblance.Another cue is having the same family name,especially if rare,and this has been found to increase helping behavior.Another study found more cooperative behavior the greater the number of perceived kin in a group.This effect was especially strong for firstborns,who are typically close to their families.Vested interests.People are likely to suffer if their friends,allies,and similar social ingroups suffer or even disappear.Helping such group members may therefore eventually benefit the altruist.Making ingroup membership more noticeable increases cooperativeness.Reciprocal altruism.lt;refgt;cite journaldoi.lastTriversfirstR.Direct Reciprocity social psychologyreciprocity.lt;refgt;cite journaldoi.science.The effective tit for tat strategy is one game theorygame theoretic example.Another method is to announce publicly that someone has given a large donation.On the other hand,people will avoid or even retaliate against those perceived not to be cooperating.People sometimes mistakenly fail to help when they intended to,or their helping may not be noticed,which may cause unintended conflicts.As such,::People are more likely to cooperate on a task if they can communicate with one another first.This may be due to better assessments of cooperativeness or due to exchange of promises.They are more cooperative if they can gradually build trust,instead of being asked to give extensive help immediately.Thus,as is common,may reduce cooperative behaviors in the group.Indirect reciprocity.lt;refgt;cite journaldoi.Strong reciprocity.jtbi.Pseudoreciprocity.lt;refgt;cite journalyeartitleGenetic and Cultural Evolution of Cooperation,Signalling theoryCostly signaling and the handicap principle.lt;refgt;Cite journaldoi.lastZahavifirstA.This may signal to others that the altruist is a valuable potential partner.Costly signaling is pointless if everyone has the same traits,resources,Similarly,Heroic risktaking has also been interpreted as a costly signal of ability.File:FEMA    Photograph by Andrea Booher taken on  in Texas.jpgthumbVolunteers assist Hurricane victims at the Houston Astrodome,following Hurricane Katrina.is publicly announced,is discussed,or is simply being observed by someone else.This have been documented in many studies.lt;ref namequot;AEPquot;gt;Wendy Iredal and Mark van Vugt.In Cite journal  last  Roberts  first  S.editorlast  Roberts  doi  .acprof:oso.editorfirst  S.:Women have been found to find altruistic men to be attractive partners.When looking for a longterm partner,On the other hand,some have shorter time horizons than others and these people tend to be less cooperative.This may be because such extrinsic,topdown incentives may replace partially or in whole intrinsic and reputational incentives,motivating the person to focus on obtaining the extrinsic rewards,which overall may make the behaviors less desirable.This may possibly be used as derogatory tactic against altruists,especially by those who are noncooperators.Group selection.Thus,Group selection theory has been criticized by many other evolutionary scientists.Where does good come from?April ,http:www.boston.combostonglobeideasarticleswheredoesgoodcomefromlt;refgt;lt;refgt;E.Wilson.Biologist E.Wilson on Why Humans,Like Ants,Need a Tribe.April .The Daily Beast.http:www.thedailybeast.comnewsweekbiologisteowilsononwhyhumanslikeantsneedatribe.File:Helping the homeless.Instead,evolution has shaped psychological mechanisms,such as emotions,that promote altruistic behaviors.Research has found that people are more altruistic to kin than to nokin,to friends than to strangers,to those attractive than to those unattractive,to noncompetitors than to competitors,and to members ingroups than to members of outgroup.The study of altruism was the initial impetus behind George R.Prices development of the Price equation,which is a mathematical equation used to study genetic evolution.An interesting example of altruism is found in the cellular slime moulds,such as DictyostelidDictyostelium mucoroides.These protists live as individual amoebae until starved,Selective investment theory proposes that close social bonds,and associated emotional,cognitive,and neurohormonal mechanisms,evolved in order to facilitate longterm,lt;refgt;cite journaldoi.splilastBrownfirstS.lastBrownfirstR.groups.umich.eduBrownStephanie.pdfformatPDFjournalPsychological Inquiryvolumepageslt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.icts.inmediauploadsTalkDocumentStLouisTelmoFIN.There are problems of early stage evolution of altruism.A first emotionally empathic individual would,if it was genetic,have been effectively exploited to death by the preexisting nonempathic individuals.lt;refgt;Epigenetic Inheritance and Evolution; The Lamarckian Dimension.by Eva Jablonka; Marion J.Lamb.Evolution .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Evolution in Four Dimensions: Genetic,Epigenetic,Behavioral and Symbolic Variation in the History of Life by Eva Jablonka; Marion Lamb.lt;refgt; This applies regardless how far back in evolution the problem is moved,lt;refgt;Margulis,Lynn,and Dorion Sagan .Microcosmos: Four Billion Years of Evolution from Our Microbial Ancestors,lt;refgt;cite journal  last  Cooper Jr  first  W.last  Pyron  first  R.last  Garland Jr  first  T.rspb.lt;refgt; It is de facto impossible that mutations for emotional empathy,ability to recognize it in others,and a direction of it towards those individuals would all occur at the same time.lt;refgt;Provine,William B.Sewall Wright and Evolutionary Biology.University of Chicago Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Wright,quot;The roles of mutation,inbreeding,crossbreeding,and selection in evolutionquot;.lt;refgt;Edwards,The fundamental theorem of natural selection.Biological Reviewslt;refgt;lt;refgt;Wassersug,and R.Wassersug,Fitness fallacies.Jorge Moll and Jordan Grafman,neuroscientists at the National Institutes of Health and LABSDOr Hospital Network J.using functional magnetic resonance imaging.In their research,published in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences USA in October ,lt;refgt;Human frontomesolimbic networks guide decisions about charitable donation,a primitive part of the brain that usually lights up in response to food and sex.However,another brain circuit was selectively activated: the subgenual cortexseptal region.These structures are intimately related to social attachment and bonding in other species.Altruism,the experiment suggested,hardwired and pleasurable.urlhttp:www.washingtonpost.comwpdyncontentarticleAR.titleIf It Feels Good to Be Good,quot; Psychological altruism is contrasted with psychological egoism,which refers to the motivation to increase ones own welfare.lt;ref namequot;encyclopediaquot;gt;quot;Altruism.quot; International Encyclopedia of the Social Sciences.William A.Darity,nd ed.Vol.Detroit: Macmillan Reference USA,Gale Virtual Reference Library.Web.April .There has been some debate on whether or not humans are truly capable of psychological altruism.lt;ref namequot;batsonquot;gt;Batson,Altruism in humans.New York,NY US: Oxford University Press.lt;ref namequot;prosocialquot;gt;Batson,A history of prosocial behavior research.In A.Kruglanski,Wolfgang StroebeW.Stroebe,Kruglanski,Eds.Handbook of the history of social psychology pp.New York,NY US: Psychology Press.lt;refgt; However,because altruism ultimately benefits the self in many cases,the selflessness of altruistic acts is brought to question.lt;ref namequot;noaltruismquot;gt;cite journal  last  Maner  first  J.last  Luce  first  C.last  Neuberg  first  S.last  Cialdini  first  R.last  Brown  first  S.last  Sagarin  first  B.He identified four major motives for altruism: altruism to ultimately benefit the self egoism,to ultimately benefit the other person altruism,to benefit a group collectivism,or to uphold a moral principle principlism.Altruism that ultimately serves selfish gains is thus differentiated from selfless altruism,but the general conclusion has been that empathyinduced altruism can be genuinely selfless.lt;ref namequot; bastonquot;gt;Batson,Ahmad,amp; Stocks,Four forms of prosocial motivation: Egoism,altruism,collectivism,and principlism.In D.Dunning,Dunning Eds.Social motivation pp.New York,NY US: Psychology Press.Feelings of empathic concern are contrasted with feelings of personal distress,which compel people to reduce their own unpleasant emotions.lt;ref namequot;encyclopediaquot;gt; Helping behavior is seen in humans at about two years old,when a toddler is capable of understanding subtle emotional cues.lt;refgt;cite journallastSvetlovafirstM.lastNicholsfirstS.lastBrownellfirstC.File:Peace Corps Volunteer swearing in Cambodia,jpgthumbPeace Corps trainees swearing in as volunteers in Cambodia,In psychological research on altruism,studies often observe altruism as demonstrated through prosocial behaviors such as helping,comforting,sharing,cooperation,philanthropy,and community service.Greater numbers of bystanders decrease individual feelings of responsibility.lt;ref namequot;encyclopediaquot;gt;lt;refgt;cite journal  last  Hudson  first  James M.last  Bruckman  first  Amy S.sjls lt;refgt; However,lt;refgt;cite journalauthorvan der Linden,titleCharitable Intent: A Moral or Social Construct?A Revised Theory of Planned Behavior Modeldoi.lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journallastMusickfirstM.lastWilsonfirstJ.Slt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journal  last  Koenig  first  L.last  McGue  first  M.last  Krueger  first  R.last  Bouchard  first    year    title  Religiousness,antisocial behavior,x lt;refgt; In a study of older adults,those who volunteered were significantly higher on life satisfaction and will to live,and significantly lower in Depression mooddepression,anxiety,and somatization.lt;ref namequot;elderlyquot;gt;cite journallastHunterfirstK.lastHunterfirstM.but physical health and longevity as well,attributable to the activity and social integration it encourages.last  Krause  first  M.hlt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journallastBrownfirstS.lastBrownfirstR.lastHousefirstJ.lastSmithfirstD.pmidlt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journallastPostfirstS.yeartitleAltruism,Happiness,lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journal lastMoen firstP.lastDempsterMcclain firstD.lastWilliams firstR.lt;refgt; A study on adults ages  found that during the fouryear study period,people who volunteered for two or more organizations had a  lower likelihood of dying.After controlling for prior health status,it was determined that volunteerism accounted for a  reduction in mortality.lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt;cite journallastOmanfirstD.lastThoresenfirstC.lastMcMahonfirstK.lt;ref namequot;countingkindnessquot;gt;cite journallastOtakefirstK.lastShimaifirstS.lastTanakaMatsumifirstJ.lastOtsuifirstK.lastFredricksonfirstB.It is important to note that,while research supports the idea that altruistic acts bring about happiness,it has also been found to work in the opposite directionthat happier people are also kinder.The relationship between altruistic behavior and happiness is bidirectional.Studies have found that generosity increases linearly from sad to happy affective states.lt;ref namequot;moodandgenerosityquot;gt;cite journallastUnderwoodfirstB.lastFromingfirstW.lastMoorefirstB.yeartitleMood,attention,and altruism: A search for mediating variablesjournalDevelopmental Psychologyvolumeissuepagesdoi.lt;ref namequot;volunteerquot;gt; For example,lt;ref namequot;overwhelmedquot;gt;cite journallastSchwartzfirstC.lastMeisenhelderfirstJ.lastMafirstY.lastReedfirstG.Dpmidlt;refgt; Additionally,while generous acts make people feel good about themselves,it is also important for people to appreciate the kindness they receive from others.positive affect,offering emotional support,sleep quality,and wellbeing.quot;.lt;ref namequot;gratitudequot;gt;cite journallastShimaifirstS.lastOtakefirstK.lastParkfirstN.lastPetersonfirstC.lastSeligmanfirstM.slt;refgt; Psychologists generally refer to this virtuous cycle of helping others,doing good and subsequently feeling good as quot;the helpers highquot;.lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:odewire.comthehelperEshigh.quot;Sociologists have long been concerned with how to build the good societyquot; quot;Altruism,Morality,and Social Solidarityquot;.American Sociological Association.lt;refgt;http:www.asanet.orgsectionsaltruism.cfm American Sociological Association: Altruism,Morality and Social Solidaritylt;!Bot generated title gt;lt;refgt;.The structure of our societies and how individuals come to exhibit charitable,philanthropic,and other prosocial,altruistic actions for the common good is a largely researched topic within the field.The American Sociology Association ASA acknowledges Public sociology saying,quot;The intrinsic scientific,policy,Morality,and Social Solidarityquot; ASA.and promotes an altruistic focus in order to benefit the world and people it studies.How altruism is framed,organized,carried out,PathologyPathological altruism is when altruism is taken to an unhealthy extreme,and either harms the altruistic person,or wellintentioned actions cause more harm than good.The term quot;pathological altruismquot; was popularised by the book Pathological Altruism.Examples include depression and burnout seen in healthcare professionals,an unhealthy focus on others to the detriment of ones own needs,hoarding of animals,lt;refgt;http:ukcatalogue.comproduct.Most,if not all,of the worlds religions promote altruism as a very important moral value.Buddhism,Christianity,Hinduism,Islam,Jainism,Judaism and Sikhism,etc.place particular emphasis on altruistic morality.One challenge facing religious followers,is whether altruism should cross the boundary between religious groups,or if altruistic expression to other faiths is selective.which in itself is contrary to the concept of selflessness.File:Monks collecting alms  Bun Vat Phu.Altruism figures prominently in Buddhism.Love and compassion are components of all forms of Buddhism,and are focused on all beings equally: love is the wish that all beings be happy,and compassion is the wish that all beings be free from suffering.quot;Many illnesses can be cured by the one medicine of love and compassion.These qualities are the ultimate source of human happiness,and the need for them lies at the very core of our beingquot; Dalai Lama.lt;ref namequot;Speech by the Dalai Lamaquot;gt;http:www.dalailama.compage.wiley.comdoi.bewi.pdf  journal  Berichte zur Wissenschaftsgeschichte  volume    pages    doi  .bewi.Since quot;all beingsquot; includes the individual,love and compassion in Buddhism are outside the opposition between self and other.In practical terms,however,since most of us are spontaneously selfcentered,Buddhism encourages us to focus love and compassion on others,and thus can be characterized as quot;altruistic.quot; Many would agree with the Dalai Lama that Buddhism as a religion is kindness toward others.Still,the notion of altruism is modified in such a worldview,In the context of larger ethical discussions on moral action and judgment,but from the law of karma,which functions like a natural law of cause and effect.then as a natural consequence I will experience suffering; if I cause happiness,then as a natural consequence I will experience happiness.In Buddhism,karma Pli kamma is strictly distinguished from vipakavipka,meaning quot;fruitquot; or quot;resultquot;.Most types of karmas,with good or bad results,will keep one in the wheel of Samsara Buddhismsamsra; others will liberate one to nirvananirvna.Buddhism relates karma directly to motives behind an action.Motivation usually makes the difference between quot;goodquot; and quot;badquot;,In Buddhism,karma is not the only cause of all that happens.As taught in the early texts,the commentarial tradition classified causal mechanisms governing the universe in five categories,google.google.File:Ahinsa.The fundamental principles of Jainism revolve around the concept of altruism,not only for humans but for all sentient beings.Jainism preaches the view of Ahimsa  to live and let live,thereby not harming sentient beings,uncompromising reverence for all life.It also considers all living things to be equal.The first Tirthankara,Rishabhdev introduced the concept of altruism for all living beings,from extending knowledge and experience to others to donation,giving oneself up for others,nonviolence and compassion for all living things.Jainism prescribes a path of nonviolence to progress the soul to this ultimate goal.Ones unconquered mind with anger,pride ego,deceit,greed and uncontrolled sense organs are the powerful enemies of humans.Anger spoils good relations,pride destroys humility,deceit destroys peace and greed destroys everything.Jainism recommends conquering anger by forgiveness,pride by humility,deceit by straightforwardness and greed by contentment.Jains believe that to attain enlightenment and ultimately liberation,one must practice the following ethical principles major vows in thought,speech and action.The degree to which these principles are practiced is different for householders and monks.The householders are encouraged to practice the abovementioned five vows.The monks have to observe them very strictly.With consistent practice,it will be possible to overcome the limitations gradually,accelerating the spiritual progress.The principle of nonviolence seeks to minimize karmas which limit the capabilities of the soul.Because all living beings possess a soul,great care and awareness is essential in ones actions.Jainism emphasizes the equality of all life,advocating harmlessness towards all,whether the creatures are great or small.This policy extends even to microscopic organisms.File:StThomasMount Theresa.Altruism is central to the teachings of Jesus found in the Gospel,especially in the Sermon on the Mount and the Sermon on the Plain.From biblical to medieval Christian traditions,as in the Paul the ApostlePauline phrase quot;love seeks not its own interests.quot; In his book Indoctrination and Selfdeception,by analysis of otherregard within creative individuation of the self,and by contrasting love for the few with love for the many.Love confirms others in their freedom,shuns propaganda and masks,assures others of its presence,and is ultimately confirmed not by mere declarations from others,but by each persons experience and practice from within.As in practical arts,the presence and meaning of love becomes validated and grasped not by words and reflections alone,but in the making of the connection.lt;refgt;Summa Theologica,II:II Quaestio ,quot;lt;refgt;Nichomachean Ethics IX.alt;refgt; he concluded that though we are not bound to love others more than ourselves,we naturally seek the common good,the good of the whole,more than any private good,the good of a part.However,he thinks we should love God more than ourselves and our neighbours,In coining the word Altruism,as stated above,Auguste ComteComte was probably opposing this Thomistic doctrine,which is present in some theological schools within Catholicism.Many biblical authors draw a strong connection between love of others and love of God.John  states that for one to love God one must love his fellowman,and that hatred of ones fellowman is the same as hatred of God.Thomas Jay Oord has argued in several books that altruism is but one possible form of love.An altruistic action is not always a loving action.Oord defines altruism as acting for the others good,German philosopher Max Scheler distinguishes two ways in which the strong can help the weak.One way is a sincere expression of Christian love,quot;motivated by a powerful feeling of security,strength,and inner salvation,of the invincible fullness of ones own life and existencequot;.nothing but the urge to turn away from oneself and to lose oneself in other peoples business.quot;lt;refgt;cite booklastSchelerfirstMaxtitleRessentimentyearpageslt;refgt; At its worst,Scheler says,quot;love for the small,the poor,the weak,and the oppressed is really disguised hatred,repressed envy,an impulse to detract,etc.directed against the opposite phenomena: wealth,strength,power,largesse.In Islam,the concept thr  altruism is the notion of preferring others to oneself.For Sufis,this means devotion to others through complete forgetfulness of ones own concerns,where concern for others is rooted to be a demand made by Allah on the human body,considered to be property of Allah alone.This is similar to the notion of chivalry,but unlike that European concept,in ithar attention is focused on everything in existence.A constant concern for Allah i.God results in a careful attitude towards people,animals,and other things in this world.Press location  Washington,God and dedication to people.Thirteenthcentury Turkish Sufi poet Yunus Emre explained this philosophy as quot;Yaratlan severiz,Yaratandan trquot; or We love the creature,because of The Creator.For many Muslims,ithar must be practiced as a religious obligation during specific Islamic holidays.However,ithar is also still an Islamic ideal to which all Muslims should strive to adhere at all times.Judaism defines altruism as the desired goal of creation.The famous Rabbi Abraham Isaac Kook stated that love is the most important attribute in humanity.The moral principles,Lights of holiness,essays,letters,or giving,which is the intention of altruism.This can be altruism towards humanity that leads to altruism towards the creator or God.Kabbalah defines God as the force of giving in existence.Modern Kabbalah developed by Rabbi Yehuda Ashlag,in his writings about the future generation,focuses on how society could achieve an altruistic social framework.lt;refgt;cite book last  Ashlag first  Yehuda title  Building the Future Society url  http:www.kabbalah.infoengcontentviewframe?engcontentviewfullamp;main year   publisher  Laitman Kabbalah Publishers location  Thornhill,Canada isbn   pages   lt;refgt; Ashlag proposed that such a framework is the purpose of creation,and everything that happens is to raise humanity to the level of altruism,love for one another.Ashlag focused on society and its relation to divinity.lt;refgt;cite book last  Ashlag first  Yehuda title  Building the Future Society url  http:www.kabbalah.infoengcontentviewframe?engcontentviewfullamp;main year   publisher  Laitman Kabbalah Publishers location  Thornhill,Altruism is essential to the Sikh religion.affection,sacrifice,patience,harmony,truthfulness.The fifth Nanak,Guru Arjun Dev sacrificed his life to uphold  carats of pure truth,the greatest gift to humanity,the Guru Granth.Guru Tegh Bahadur,sacrificed his head to protect weak and defenseless people against atrocity.In the late seventeenth century,Guru Gobind Singh Ji the tenth guru in Sikhism,was in war with the Moghul rulers to protect the people of different faiths when a fellow Sikh,Bhai Kanhaiya,attended the troops of the enemy.He gave water to both friends and foes who were wounded on the battlefield.Sikh soldiers brought Bhai Kanhaiya before Guru Gobind Singh Ji,quot;What were you doing,and why?quot; asked the Guru.quot;I was giving water to the wounded because I saw your face in all of them,quot; replied Bhai Kanhaiya.The Guru responded,quot;Then you should also give them ointment to heal their wounds.You were practicing what you were coached in the house of the Guru.lt;refgt;cite book author  O.Ralhan title  The great gurus of the Sikhs year   publisher  Anmol Publications Pvt Ltd.Swami Sivananda,an Advaita scholar,reiterates the same views in his commentary synthesising Vedanta views on the Brahma Sutras,a Vedantic text.In his commentary on Chapter  of the Brahma Sutras,Sivananda notes that karma is insentient and shortlived,and ceases to exist as soon as a deed is executed.Hence,karma cannot bestow the fruits of actions at a future date according to ones merit.Furthermore,one cannot argue that karma generates apurva or Merit Buddhismpunya,which gives fruit.Since apurva is nonsentient,it cannot act unless moved by an intelligent being such as a god.It cannot independently bestow reward or punishment.lt;refgt;Sivananda,Swami.Phaladhikaranam,Topic ,Sutras .The opposing view is ethical egoism,which maintains that moral agents should always act in their own selfinterest.Both ethical altruism and ethical egoism contrast with utilitarianism,A related concept in descriptive ethics is psychological egoism,the thesis that humans always act in their own selfinterest and that true altruism is impossible.Altruria,Giving Pledge,pledge by Gates,The Power of Half,how a family came to decide to sell its home,cite book last  Batson first  Charles title  The Altruism Question year   publisher  L.Erlbaum,doi  .science.last  Nowak  first  M.bibcode  Sci.last  Fehr  first  E.last  Fischbacher  first  U.doi  .bibcode  Natur.Auguste ComteComte,Auguste,Catechisme positiviste  or Catechism of Positivism,Congreve,London: Kegan Paul,last  Knox  first  T.title  The volunteers folly and socioeconomic man: some thoughts on altruism,rationality,doi  .Peter KropotkinKropotkin,Peter,Nietzsche,Friedrich,PierreJoseph Proudhon,Lysander Spooner,Matt Ridley,Oliner,Samuel P.and Pearl M.Towards a Caring Society: Ideas into Action.West Port,CT: Praeger,last  Madsen  first  E.last  Tunney  first  R.last  Fieldman  first  G.last  Plotkin  first  H.last  Dunbar  first  R.last  Richardson  first  J.last  McFarland  first  D.doi  .cite journal  last  Wedekind  first  C.last  Milinski  first  M.pnas.bibcode  PNAS.last  MonkTurner  first  E.last  Blake  first  V.last  Chniel  first  F.last  Forbes  first  S.last  Lensey  first  L.last  Madzuma  first  J.doi  .cite episodeseriesRadiolab titleThe Good Showurlhttp:www.radiolab.http:altruists.org What is Altruism?http:www.doneet.com Altruistic Fundraisers Doneet,http:www.kabbalah.infoengkabkabbalahvideoclipsgivingandreceiving quot;Giving and Receivingquot; from Kabbalah.http:them.polylog.orgfcsen.http:beta.inmind.orgnode Altruism: Myth or Reality?http:www.humboldt.cite journalauthorDharol Tankersley,Jill Stowe amp; Scott A.nnurlhttp:www.nature.comneurojournalvnabsnn.http:ibcsr.orgindex.conscience,image  Ayn Rand.birthplace  Saint PetersburgSt.Petersburg,deathplace  New York City,New York,restingplace  Kensico Cemeterylt;br gt;Valhalla,New YorkValhalla,New York,almamater  Saint Petersburg State UniversityHistoryPetrograd State University diploma in history,spouse  marriageFrank OConnorendw.signature  Ayn Rand signature .langru  ; OldStyleDateFebruary January amp;nbsp; March ,was a Russianborn American novelist,philosopher,lt;refgt; playwright,and screenwriter.She is known for her two bestselling novels,The Fountainhead and Atlas Shrugged,and for developing a philosophical system she called Objectivism Ayn RandObjectivism.Born and educated in Russian AmericanRussia,Rand moved to the United States in .She had a play produced on Broadway in .After two early novels that were initially unsuccessful in America,she achieved fame with her  novel,The Fountainhead.she published her bestknown work,the novel Atlas Shrugged.Afterward,she turned to nonfiction to promote her philosophy,publishing her own magazines and releasing several collections of essays until her death in .Rand advocated reason as the only means of acquiring knowledge,and rejected faith and religion.She supported rational egoismrational and ethical egoism,and rejected Altruism ethicsaltruism.In politics,she condemned the initiation of force as immoral,and instead supported laissezfaire capitalism,which she defined as the system based on recognizing individual rights.lt;ref namequot;rightsquot;gt;harvnbGotthelfpp; harvnbPeikoffpplt;refgt; In art,Rand promoted romantic realism.She was sharply critical of most philosophers and philosophical traditions known to her,except for Aristotle and some AristotelianismAristotelians,and classical liberals.lt;refgt;harvnbONeillpp; harvnbSciabarrapp,Literary critics received Rands fiction with mixed reviews,though academic interest has increased in recent decades.lt;ref namequot;growingquot;gt;cite news lastCohen firstDavid urlhttp:www.theguardian.comeducationdecinternationaleducationnews.highereducation titleA growing concern workThe Guardian dateDecember ,locationLondon accessdateApril ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news lastMarcus firstJon urlhttp:www.timeshighereducation.article titleAyn Rand revival gathers pace in US universities,despite detractors workTimes Higher Education dateJuly ,accessdateApril ,both to the public and in academic settings.lt;ref namequot;politicalinfluencequot;gt;harvnbBurnsp; harvnbGladsteinpp,Rand was born Alisa Zinovyevna Rosenbaum langru   on February ,She was the eldest of the three daughters of Zinovy Zakharovich Rosenbaum and his wife,Anna Borisovna ne Kaplan,largely nonobservant Jews.Zinovy Rosenbaum was a successful pharmacist and businessman,eventually owning a pharmacy and the building in which it was located.lt;refgt;cite episodeseriesThe Tomorrow ShowauthorTom SnydernetworkNBCairdateJuly ,lt;refgt; At the prestigious Stoiunina Gymnasium,her closest friend was Vladimir Nabokovs younger sister,Olga.Rand supported republican ideals.lt;refgt;harvnbSciabarrapp,; harvnbGladsteinplt;refgt; She was twelve at the time of the February Revolution of ,during which she favored Alexander Kerensky over Tsar Nicholas II.Her fathers business was confiscated and the family displaced.They fled to the Crimean Peninsula,which was initially under control of the White Army during the Russian Civil War.She later recalled that,while in high school,she determined that she was an atheist and that she valued reason above any other human virtue.After graduating from high school in the Crimea at ,Rand returned with her family to Petrograd as Saint Petersburg was renamed at that time,where they faced desperate conditions,on occasion nearly starving.File:Spb  University Embankment .After the Russian Revolution,universities were opened to women,allowing Rand to be in the first group of women to enroll at Petrograd State University,lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsplt;refgt; where,at the age of ,she began her studies in the department of social pedagogy,majoring in history.lt;refgt;harvnbSciabarrapplt;refgt; who would be her greatest influence and counterinfluence,respectively.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpp,lt;refgt; Able to read French,German and Russian,Rand also discovered the writers Fyodor Dostoevsky,Victor Hugo,Edmond Rostand,and Friedrich Schiller,who became her perennial favorites.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpp,Along with many other quot;bourgeoisquot; students,Rand was purged from the university shortly before graduating.However,after complaints from a group of visiting foreign scientists,many of the purged students were allowed to complete their work and graduate,lt;refgt;harvnbHellerp; harvnbBrittingplt;refgt; which Rand did in October .For one of her assignments,she wrote an essay about the Polish actress Pola Negri,which became her first published work.By this time she had decided her professional surname for writing would be Rand,lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingplt;refgt; possibly as a Cyrillic contraction of her birth surname,lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinp; harvnbHellerplt;refgt; and she adopted the first name Ayn,meaning quot;eyequot;.lt;refgt;Rand said the origin of Ayn was Finnish harvRandp,but some biographical sources question this,suggesting it may come from a Hebrew nickname.harvnbHellerpp provides a detailed discussion.File:Pola Negri by Ayn Rand cover.jpgthumbuprightaltA brown book cover with blackandwhite drawings and text in Russian.Cover of Rands first published work,word monograph on femme fatale Pola Negri published in .In the autumn of ,Rand was granted a Visa documentvisa to visit American relatives.lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenp; harvnbBurnspplt;refgt; She departed on January ,lt;refgt;harvnbHellerpplt;refgt; When she arrived in New York City on February ,lt;refgt;harvnbHellerplt;refgt; Intent on staying in the United States to become a screenwriter,she lived for a few months with relatives in Chicago,one of whom owned a movie theater and allowed her to watch dozens of films for free.She then set out for Hollywood,California.Initially,Rand struggled in Hollywood and took odd jobs to pay her basic living expenses.A chance meeting with famed director Cecil B.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpplt;refgt; While working on The King of Kings,she met an aspiring young actor,Frank OConnor; the two were married on April ,She became a Permanent residence United Statespermanent US resident in July ,and United States nationality lawNaturalizationbecame an American citizen on March ,she worked for a time as the head of the costume department at RKO Studios.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpp; harvnbPaxtonpp,lt;refgt; She made several attempts to bring her parents and sisters to the United States,but they were unable to acquire permission to emigrate.lt;refgt;harvnbHellerpp; harvnbBrittingpp,although it was never produced.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpp,lt;refgt; This was followed by the courtroom drama Night of January th,first produced by E.Clive in Hollywood in  and then successfully reopened on Broadway theaterBroadway in .Each night the quot;juryquot; was selected from members of the audience,and one of the two different endings,depending on the jurys quot;verdictquot;,would then be performed.lt;refgt;harvnbHellerpp,lt;refgt; In ,Paramount Pictures produced a The Night of January th filmmovie loosely based on the play.Rand did not participate in the production and was highly critical of the result.The heroine is an actress who embodies Randian ideals.nytimes.combooksreviewaynrandsidealpresentsaprotagonistfamiliarinhersuperiority.htmlaccessdateAugust ,workThe New York TimesdateAugust ,Rands first published novel,the semiautobiographical We the Living,was published in .Set in Soviet Russia,it focused on the struggle between the individual and the state.In a  foreword to the novel,Rand stated that We the Living quot;is as near to an autobiography as I will ever write.It is not an autobiography in the literal,but only in the intellectual sense.The plot is invented,the background is not.lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinplt;refgt; although European editions continued to sell.lt;refgt;Ralston,Richard E.quot;Publishing We the Livingquot;.In harvnbMayhewplt;refgt; After the success of her later novels,Rand was able to release a revised version in  that has since sold over three million copies.lt;refgt;Ralston,Richard E.quot;Publishing We the Livingquot;.In harvnbMayhewplt;refgt; In ,without Rands knowledge or permission,the novel was made into a pair of Italian films,Noi vivi and Addio,Kira.Rediscovered in the s,The Fountainhead.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsp; harvnbHellerplt;refgt; It was published in England in ,but Rand initially could not find an American publisher.As with We the Living,Rands later success allowed her to get a revised version published in ,which has sold more than .million copies.lt;refgt;Ralston,Richard E.quot;Publishing Anthemquot;.During the s,Rand became politically active.This work led to Rands first public speaking experiences,an experience she greatly enjoyed.She became friends with journalist Henry Hazlitt and his wife,and Hazlitt introduced her to the Austrian School economist Ludwig von Mises.Despite her philosophical differences with them,Rand strongly endorsed the writings of both men throughout her career,and both of them expressed admiration for her.Once Mises referred to Rand as quot;the most courageous man in Americaquot;,The God of the Machine.Rands first major success as a writer came with The Fountainhead in ,a romantic and philosophical novel that she wrote over a period of seven years.placing others above themselves.who threatened to quit if his employer did not publish it.lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingpplt;refgt; While completing the novel,Rand was prescribed Benzedrine,a brand of amphetamine,to fight fatigue.but when the book was done,she was so exhausted that her doctor ordered two weeks rest.The Fountainhead eventually became a worldwide success,bringing Rand fame and financial security.lt;refgt;harvnbDohertyp; harvnbBrandenpplt;refgt; In ,Rand sold the rights for a The Fountainhead filmfilm version to Warner Bros.and she returned to Hollywood to write the screenplay.Finishing her work on that screenplay,she was hired by producer Hal Wallis as a screenwriter and scriptdoctor.Although the planned book was never completed,a condensed version was published as an essay titled quot;The Only Path to Tomorrowquot;,in the January  edition of Readers Digest magazine.She became involved with the Motion Picture Alliance for the Preservation of American Ideals,a Hollywood antiCommunist group,and wrote articles on the groups behalf.She also joined the antiCommunist American Writers Association.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp,which Rand considered rude.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp; harvnbHellerpplt;refgt; In ,during the Second Red Scare,portraying life there as being much better and happier than it actually was.but she was not allowed to testify about it.Rand described the process as quot;futilequot;.After several delays,the film version of The Fountainhead was released in .Although it used Rands screenplay with minimal alterations,she quot;disliked the movie from beginning to endquot;,complaining about its editing,acting,and other elements.File:Famous fantastic mysteries .In the years following the publication of The Fountainhead,Rand received numerous letters from readers,some of whom the book profoundly influenced.In  Rand moved from Los Angeles to New York City,where she gathered a group of these admirers around her.and Barbaras cousin Leonard Peikoff.Later she began allowing them to read the drafts of her new novel,Atlas Shrugged,as the manuscript pages were written.In  Rands close relationship with the younger Nathaniel Branden turned into a romantic affair,with the consent of their spouses.lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenpp,Atlas Shrugged,published in ,was considered Rands Masterpiecemagnum opus.as a corollary,the demonstration of a new moral philosophy: the morality of rational selfinterest.quot;lt;refgt;Salmieri,Gregory.quot;Atlas Shrugged on the Role of the Mind in Mans Existencequot;.The plot involves a dystopian United States in which the most creative industrialists,scientists,The novels hero and leader of the strike,John Galt,With this fictional strike,Rand intended to illustrate that without the efforts of the rational and productive,the economy would collapse and society would fall apart.The novel includes elements of Romance novelromance,nytimes.comopiniondowd.html dateApril ,newspaperThe New York Times accessdateJuly ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;harvnbMcConnellplt;refgt; mystery fictionmystery,and science fiction,a lengthy monologue delivered by Galt.Despite many negative reviews,Atlas Shrugged became an international bestseller.In an interview with Mike Wallace,Rand declared herself quot;the most creative thinker alivequot;.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsplt;refgt; After completing the novel,Rand fell into a severe depression.In  Nathaniel Branden established Nathaniel Branden Lectures,later incorporated as the Nathaniel Branden Institute NBI,to promote Rands philosophy.Rand later published some of these articles in book form.Critics,including some former NBI students and Branden himself,with some describing NBI or the Objectivist movement itself as a cult or religion.from literature and music to sexuality and facial hair,and some of her followers mimicked her preferences,wearing clothes to match characters from her novels and buying furniture like hers.sometimes reacting coldly or angrily to those who disagreed with her.lt;refgt;harvnbDohertypp; harvnbHellerp; harvnbBurnsplt;refgt; However,some former NBI students believe the extent of these behaviors has been exaggerated,with the problem being concentrated among Rands closest followers in New York.Throughout the s and s,Princeton UniversityPrinceton,Columbia UniversityColumbia,lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenpplt;refgt; Harvard,and MIT.lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenplt;refgt; She also began delivering annual lectures at the Ford Hall Forum,responding afterward to questions from the audience.lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinplt;refgt; During these speeches and Qamp;A sessions,she often took controversial stances on political and social issues of the day.These included supporting abortion rights,lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp,while also advocating the repeal of all laws about it.lt;refgt;harvnbHellerpp,most strongly Barry Goldwater in United States presidential election,whose candidacy she promoted in several articles for The Objectivist Newsletter.File:Ayn Rand Marker.jpgthumbleftGrave marker for Rand and her husband at Kensico Cemetery in Valhalla,New YorkaltA twin gravestone bearing the name quot;Frank OConnorquot; on the left,In  Nathaniel Branden began an affair with the young actress Patrecia Scott,note: spelling is correct,please do not removegt; whom he later married.Nathaniel and Barbara Branden kept the affair hidden from Rand.When she learned of it in ,though her romantic relationship with Branden had already ended,lt;refgt;harvnbBrittingplt;refgt; Rand terminated her relationship with both Brandens,which led to the closure of NBI.quot;lt;refgt;harvnbHellerplt;refgt; In subsequent years,Rand and several more of her closest associates parted company.Rand underwent surgery for lung cancer in  after decades of heavy smoking.she retired from writing her newsletter and,despite her initial objections,allowed Evva Pryor,a social worker from her attorneys office,to enroll her in Social Security United StatesSocial Security and Medicare United StatesMedicare.especially after the death of her husband on November ,Rand died of heart failure on March ,at her home in New York City,lt;refgt;harvnbHellerplt;refgt; and was interred in the Kensico Cemetery,Valhalla,New York.lt;refgt;harvnbHellerpp,lt;refgt; Rands funeral was attended by some of her prominent followers,including Alan Greenspan.A convertftmadjon floral arrangement in the shape of a dollar sign was placed near her casket.lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenplt;refgt; In her will,Rand named Leonard Peikoff the heir to her estate.Rand called her philosophy quot;Objectivismquot;,describing its essence as quot;the concept of man as a heroic being,with his own happiness as the moral purpose of his life,with productive achievement as his noblest activity,and reason as his only absolute.epistemology,ethics,political philosophy and aesthetics.In metaphysics,Rand supported philosophical realism,and opposed anything she regarded as mysticism or supernaturalism,including all forms of religion.lt;refgt;Den Uyl,Douglas J.amp; Rasmussen,Douglas B.quot;Ayn Rands Realismquot;.In epistemology,she considered all knowledge to be based on sense perception,the validity of which she considered axiomatic,lt;refgt;harvnbPeikoffpp; harvnbGotthelfplt;refgt; and reason,including quot;instinct,intuition,revelation,or any form of just knowing.which she summarized in the form of a Razor philosophyphilosophical razor.Known as quot;Rands razor,quot;lt;refgt;cite webtitleRands RazorworkThe Ayn Rand Lexiconurlhttp:aynrandlexicon.comlexiconrandsrazor.htmlaccessdatelt;refgt;  In her Introduction to Objectivist Epistemology,Rand presented a theory of concept formation and rejected the analyticsynthetic dichotomy.In ethics,Rand argued for rational egoismrational and ethical egoism rational selfinterest,as the guiding moral principle.She said the individual should quot;exist for his own sake,neither sacrificing himself to others nor sacrificing others to himself.lt;refgt;harvnbRandp; harvnbBadhwarLong; harvnbPeikoffpp,lt;ref namequot;Badhwar quot;gt; and held that the initiation of force was evil and irrational,writing in Atlas Shrugged that quot;Force and mind are opposites.Rands political philosophy emphasized individual rights including Private propertyproperty rights,lt;ref namequot;rightsquot;gt; She opposed statism,which she understood to include theocracy,absolute monarchy,Nazism,fascism,communism,democratic socialism,and dictatorship.she preferred the term quot;radical for capitalismquot;.She worked with conservatives on political projects,but disagreed with them over issues such as religion and ethics.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp,; harvnbDen UylRasmussenpp; harvnbDohertypp; harvnbBrandenplt;refgt; She denounced libertarianism,which she associated with anarchism.quot; According to Rand,art allows philosophical concepts to be presented in a concrete form that can be easily grasped,thereby fulfilling a need of human consciousness.lt;refgt;harvnbSciabarrapplt;refgt; As a writer,the art form Rand focused on most closely was literature,Aquinas,and Ayn Rand.lt;ref namequot;Sciabarrapquot;gt;harvnbSciabarraplt;refgt; In a  interview with Mike Wallace,when asked where her philosophy came from,she responded,quot;Out of my own mind,with the sole acknowledgement of a debt to Aristotle,the only philosopher who ever influenced me.I devised the rest of my philosophy myself.quot;lt;refgt;harvnbPodritskeSchwartzpplt;refgt; However,she also found early inspiration in Friedrich Nietzsche,lt;refgt;harvnbHellerp; harvnbBurnspp,lt;refgt;harvnbRandp; harvnbBurnspp; harvnbSciabarrapp,lt;refgt; in passages from the first edition of We the Living which Rand later revised,lt;refgt;harvnbMerrillpp; harvnbSciabarrap; LoiretPrunet,Valerie.quot;Ayn Rand and Feminist Synthesis: Rereading We the Livingquot;.In harvnbGladsteinSciabarraplt;refgt; and in her overall writing style.lt;refgt;harvnbBadhwarLong; Sheaffer,Robert.quot;Rereading Rand on Gender in the Light of Pagliaquot;.In harvnbGladsteinSciabarrap.lt;refgt; However,by the time she wrote The Fountainhead,Rand had turned against Nietzsches ideas,lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp,lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp; harvnbSciabarrapp,; Mayhew,Robert.quot;We the Living  and quot;.In harvnbMayhewp.lt;refgt; Among the philosophers Rand held in particular disdain was Immanuel Kant,whom she referred to as a quot;monsterquot;,Rand said her most important contributions to philosophy were her quot;theory of concepts,her ethics,and her discovery in politics that evilthe violation of rightsconsists of the initiation of force.quot;I am not primarily an advocate of capitalism,but of egoism; and I am not primarily an advocate of egoism,but of reason.If one recognizes the supremacy of reason and applies it consistently,all the rest follows.During Rands lifetime,her work evoked both extreme praise and condemnation.Rands first novel,We the Living,was admired by the literary critic H.Mencken,lt;refgt;harvnbRandpp,lt;refgt; her Broadway play Night of January th was both a critical and popular success,lt;ref namequot;Pruettequot;gt;cite news firstLorine lastPruette workThe New York Times dateMay ,titleBattle Against Evil pageBR urlhttp:select.nytimes.comgstabstract.html?resFFDDCBCAEDFF accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:select.nytimes.comgstabstract.html?resFFDDCBCAEDFF archivedateMay ,lt;ref namequot;Gladstein quot;gt; However,they became bestsellers largely through word of mouth.The first reviews Rand received were for Night of January th.Reviews of the production were largely positive,lt;ref namequot;Branden quot;gt; Rand believed that her first novel,We the Living,was not widely reviewed,but Rand scholar Michael S.Berliner says quot;it was the most reviewed of any of her worksquot;,with approximately  different reviews being published in more than  publications.Overall these reviews were more positive than the reviews she received for her later work.lt;refgt;Berliner,Michael S.quot;Reviews of We the Livingquot;.In harvnbMayhewpplt;refgt; Her  novella Anthem received little attention from reviewers,both for its first publication in England and for subsequent reissues.lt;refgt;Berliner,Michael S.quot;Reviews of Anthemquot;.Rands first bestseller,The Fountainhead,received far fewer reviews than We the Living,and reviewers opinions were mixed.lt;ref namequot;tfreviewsquot;gt;Berliner,Michael S.quot;The Fountainhead Reviewsquot;.beautifully and bitterlyquot;,lt;ref namequot;Pruettequot;gt; There were other positive reviews,lt;ref namequot;tfreviewsquot;gt; Some negative reviews focused on the length of the novel,Rands  novel Atlas Shrugged was widely reviewed,and many of the reviews were strongly negative.lt;ref namequot;Gladstein quot;gt;lt;ref namequot;asreviewsquot;gt;Berliner,Michael S.quot;The Atlas Shrugged Reviewsquot;.In harvnbMayhewpplt;refgt; In the National Review,claiming quot;From almost any page of Atlas Shrugged,a voice can be heard,from painful necessity,commanding: To a gas chambergo!nationalreview.comarticlesbigsisterwatchingyouflashback dateDecember ,accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nationalreview.comarticlesbigsisterwatchingyouflashback archivedateMay ,deadurlnolt;refgt; Atlas Shrugged received positive reviews from a few publications,including praise from the noted book reviewer John Chamberlain journalistJohn Chamberlain,I hope you picked it up off the floor of the subway and threw it in the nearest garbage pail.Straus,Rands nonfiction received far fewer reviews than her novels had.The tenor of the criticism for her first nonfiction book,For the New Intellectual,was similar to that for Atlas Shrugged,page urlhttp:select.nytimes.comgstabstract.html?resFFBBACBAFDFF accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:select.nytimes.comgstabstract.html?resFFBBACBAFDFF archivedateMay ,Brown locationBoston year oclc page Reprinted from Esquire magazineEsquire,July .lt;refgt; Her subsequent books got progressively less attention from reviewers.On the th anniversary of Rands birth in ,Edward Rothstein,writing for The New York Times,while criticizing her characters quot;isolated rejection of democratic societyquot;.lt;ref namequot;NYTquot;gt;cite news urlhttp:www.nytimes.combooksrand.html?pagewantedall workThe New York Times titleConsidering the Last Romantic,Ayn Rand,at  firstEdward lastRothstein dateFebruary ,accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nytimes.combooksrand.html?pagewantedall archivedateMay ,deadurlnolt;refgt; In ,heraldscotland.comthephilosophicalartoflookingoutnumberone.workThe Herald GlasgowThe Herald dateFebruary ,accessdateApril ,lt;refgt; In ,lt;ref name  quot;GQBquot;gt;cite journal urlhttp:www.comentertainmentbooksaynranddickbooksfountainhead?accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.comentertainmentbooksaynranddickbooksfountainhead?printabletrue archivedateMay ,File:Ayn Rand quote,American Adventure,Epcot Center,Walt Disney World.quot; Ayn RandA quote from Rands book The Fountainhead,Rands Atlas Shrugged was the second most popular choice,after the Bible.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:ari.aynrand.orgmediacenterpressreleasesaynrandhitsamillionagain titleAyn Rand Hits a Million.Again!publisherAyn Rand Institute dateMay ,accessdateApril ,lt;refgt; In ,Modern Library readers voted Atlas Shrugged the th centurys finest work of fiction,followed by The Fountainhead in second place,Anthem in seventh,and We the Living eighth; none of the four appeared on the critics list.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.modernlibrary.comtopbestnovels title Best Novels publisherModern Library accessdateNovember ,lt;refgt; Although Rands influence has been greatest in the United States,there has been international interest in her work.Machan locationNew Delhi,lt;refgt;cite news agencyAgence FrancePresseJiji Press titleIn India,Ayn Rand never out of style workJapan Times dateJune ,Rands contemporary admirers included fellow novelists,such as Ira Levin,Kay Nolte Smith and L.Neil Smith,and later writers such as Erika Holzer and Terry Goodkind have been influenced by her.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsjriggenbach.pdf accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsjriggenbach.pdf archivedateMay ,Rush,and Rock volume issue dateFall  pages urlhttp:www.eduprojectssciabarraessaysrush.htm accessdateApril ,lt;refgt; Rand provided a positive view of business,and in response business executives and entrepreneurs have admired and promoted her work.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspplt;refgt; John A.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsp; harvnbBrandenplt;refgt; while Mark Cuban,owner of the Dallas Mavericks,and John P.Mackey,CEO of Whole Foods,among others,have said they consider Rand crucial to their success.lt;ref namequot;NYTimesquot;gt;cite news urlhttp:www.nytimes.combusinessatlas.html?accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nytimes.combusinessatlas.html?ramp;orefsloginamp;pagewantedprint archivedateMay ,liveaction comedies,dramas,and game shows,lt;ref namequot;illustratedquot;gt;harvnbSciabarrapplt;refgt; as well as in movies and video games.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsplt;refgt; She,or a character based on her,lt;refgt;harvnbSciabarraplt;refgt; Nick Gillespie,editor in chief of Reason magazineReason,has remarked that quot;Rands is a tortured immortality,one in which shes as likely to be a punch line as a protagonist.quot; and that quot;jibes at Rand as cold and inhuman,run through the popular culturequot;.lt;refgt;cite episode titleBook Bag: Marking the Ayn Rand Centennial episodelink urlhttp:www.orgtemplatesstorystory.storyId seriesDay to Day serieslinkDay to Day networkNational Public Radio airdateFebruary ,creditsAlex Chadwick host,Nick Gillespie contributorlt;refgt; Two movies have been made about Rands life.A  documentary film,Ayn Rand: A Sense of Life,was nominated for the Academy Award for Documentary Feature.lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinplt;refgt; The Passion of Ayn Rand filmThe Passion of Ayn Rand,a  television adaptation of the The Passion of Ayn Rand bookbook of the same name,won several awards.postage stamp designed by artist Nick Gaetano.lt;refgt;cite book titleKrauseMinkus Standard Catalog of U.Stamps editorfirstMaurice D.virtualstampclub.comus.htmltitleU.Stamp Schedule dateSeptember ,workVirtual Stamp ClubaccessdateAugust ,lt;ref namequot;politicalinfluencequot;gt; Jim Powell historianJim Powell,a senior fellow at the Cato Institute,lt;refgt;cite journal lastPowell firstJim authorlinkJim Powell historian titleRose Wilder Lane,Isabel Paterson,and Ayn Rand: Three Women Who Inspired the Modern Libertarian Movement urlhttp:www.thefreemanonline.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.thefreemanonline.deadurlnolt;refgt; and David Nolan libertarianDavid Nolan,one of the founders of the Libertarian Party United StatesLibertarian Party,stated that quot;without Ayn Rand,the libertarian movement would not existquot;.lt;refgt;harvnbBrandenplt;refgt; In his history of the libertarian movement,File:TDTP.the hero of Rands novel Atlas ShruggedaltIn a large outdoor crowd,She faced intense opposition from William F.Buckley,and other contributors for the National Review magazine.They published numerous criticisms in the s and s by Whittaker Chambers,Garry Wills,and M.Stanton Evans.Nevertheless,such as being prochoice and an atheist.lt;ref namequot;MJonesquot;gt;cite journal urlhttp:motherjones.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:motherjones.commediaandrandplayed archivedateMay ,The lates financial crisis spurred renewed interest in her works,especially Atlas Shrugged,which some saw as foreshadowing the crisis,lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinp; harvnbDohertypplt;refgt; During this time,signs mentioning Rand and her fictional hero John Galt appeared at Tea Party protests.lt;refgt;harvnbDohertypplt;refgt; There was also increased criticism of her ideas,especially from the political left,particularly through her influence on Alan Greenspan.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnsplt;refgt; For example,the talented,and the powerful as the oppressedquot;,lt;refgt;cite journal firstCorey lastRobin titleGarbage and Gravitas urlhttp:www.thenation.comarticlegarbageandgravitas journalThe Nation dateJune ,accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.thenation.comarticlegarbageandgravitas archivedateMay ,During Rands lifetime her work received little attention from academic scholars.lt;ref namequot;receptionquot;gt; When the first academic book about Rands philosophy appeared in ,many of them in The Personalist.and only three such articles appeared during the rest of the s.lt;refgt;harvnbGladsteinpp,Since Rands death,interest in her work has gradually increased.mirror.theinfo.orgrand.html titleThe Heirs Of Ayn Rand: Has Objectivism Gone Subjective?journalLingua Franca magazineLingua Franca dateSeptember  volume issue pages accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:linguafranca.mirror.theinfo.orgrand.html archivedateMay ,the most recent of which is quot;an explosion of scholarshipquot; since the year .lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspplt;refgt; However,Gladstein,Chris Matthew Sciabarra,Allan Gotthelf,Edwin A.Locke and Tara Smith philosopherTara Smith have taught her work in academic institutions.Sciabarra coedits the Journal of Ayn Rand Studies,and has been active in sponsoring seminars about Rand and her ideas.lt;refgt;harvnbGotthelfpp,atlassociety.orgonaynrandgotthelflt;refgt; Smith has written several academic books and papers on Rands ideas,including Ayn Rands Normative Ethics: The Virtuous Egoist,a volume on Rands ethical theory published by Cambridge University Press.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.rutlandherald.comappspbcs.dllarticle?accessdateJune ,lt;refgt; Scholars of English and American literature have largely ignored her work,Rand scholars Douglas Den Uyl and Douglas B.Rasmussen,while stressing the importance and originality of her thought,describe her style as quot;literary,hyperbolic and emotionalquot;.Rands ethics are quot;a most immense achievement,the study of which is vastly more fruitful than any other in contemporary thought.quot;lt;refgt;Wheeler,Jack.quot;Rand and Aristotlequot;.lt;refgt;cite web lastLewis firstJohn David authorlinkJohn David Lewis urlhttp:www.litencyc.comphpspeople.dateOctober ,lt;refgt; In a  interview in the Chronicle of Higher Education,Sciabarra commented,quot;I know they laugh at Randquot;,while forecasting a growth of interest in her work in the academic community.volume issue pagesAA accessdateApril ,Libertarian philosopher Michael Huemer has argued that very few people find Rands ideas convincing,especially her ethics,lt;ref namequot;whyrandquot;gt;cite web firstMichael lastHuemer urlhttp:www.catounbound.orgmichaelhuemerwhyaynrandsomealternateanswers titleWhy Ayn Rand?Some Alternate Answers workCato Unbound dateJanuary ,accessdateAugust ,lt;refgt; which he believes is difficult to interpret and may lack logical coherence.lt;refgt;cite journal firstMichael lastHumer titleIs Benevolent Egoism Coherent?workThe Journal of Ayn Rand Studies volume issue dateSpring  pages urlhttp:aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsmhuemer.pdf archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsmhuemer.pdf archivedateSeptember ,lt;refgt; He attributes the attention she receives to her being a quot;compelling writerquot;,especially as a novelist.Thus,Friedrich Hayek,or Frederic Bastiat,but also Rands own nonfiction works.Political scientist Charles Murray political scientistCharles Murray,while praising Rands literary accomplishments,criticizes her claim that her only quot;philosophical debtquot; was to Aristotle,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.claremont.orgpublicationscrbid.articledetail.asp publisherThe Claremont Institute titleWho is Ayn Rand?firstCharles lastMurray year accessdateDecember ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.claremont.orgpublicationscrbid.articledetail.asp archivedateDecember ,Although Rand maintained that Objectivism was an integrated philosophical system,philosopher Robert H.lt;refgt;cite journal firstRobert H.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsrbass.pdf archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsrbass.pdf archivedateNovember ,Rands heir Leonard Peikoff established the Ayn Rand Institute,a nonprofit organization dedicated to promoting Rands ideas and works.In ,philosopher David Kelley founded the Institute for Objectivist Studies,now known as The Atlas Society.lt;refgt;harvnbBurnspp; harvnbGladsteinpp,lt;refgt; In  historian John McCaskey organized the Anthem Foundation for Objectivist Scholarship,which provides grants for scholarly work on Objectivism in academia.The University of Texas at Austin,the University of Pittsburgh,and University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill are among the schools that have received grants.NOTE: This is a selected bibliography and not meant to be comprehensive.Only major works published in her lifetime are included.Please start a discussion on the talkpage if you think the selection ought to be altered.Thank you.Cite web refharv urlhttp:plato.stanford.eduentriesaynrand titleAyn Rand lastBadhwar firstNeera lastLong firstRoderick T.authorlinkRoderick Long editorfirstEdward N.ed editorlastZalta editorlinkEdward N.Zalta dateJune ,workStanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy accessdateJune ,Cite book refharv titleAyn Rand lastBaker firstJames T.locationBoston,Cite book refharv titleOn Classical Liberalism and Libertarianism lastBarry firstNorman P.authorlinkNorman P.Barry locationNew York publisherSt.Cite journal refharv firstBrian lastDoherty titleShes Back!urlhttp:reason.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:reason.comarchivesaynrandisbacksinglepage archivedateMay ,aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsmgladstein.pdf accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsmgladstein.pdf archivedateMay ,Cite book refharv titleAyn Rand and the World She Made lastHeller firstAnne C.Cite encyclopedia refharv lastKukathas firstChandran authorlinkChandran Kukathas year titleRand,Cite book refharv titleAyn Rand and Song of Russia lastMayhew firstRobert locationLanham,Cite book refharv titleThe Ideas of Ayn Rand lastMerrill firstRonald E.locationLa Salle,locationNew York publisherLittlefield,Cite book refharv lastRand firstAyn editorlastMayhew editorfirstRobert year titleAyn Rand Answers,Cite book refharv editorfirstJohn R.reasonpapers.compdfrp.pdf accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.reasonpapers.compdfrp.pdf archivedateMay ,Cite journal refharv lastSciabarra firstChris Matthew urlhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarscsciabarra.archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarscsciabarra.pdf archivedateMay ,eduprojectssciabarraessaysillustratedrand.pdf pages accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.eduprojectssciabarraessaysillustratedrand.pdf archivedateOctober ,Cite book refharv lastSeddon firstFred titleAyn Rand,Objectivists,and the History of Philosophy publisherUniversity Press of America locationLanham,Cite journal refharv lastWalsh firstGeorge V.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsgwalsh.pdf accessdateApril ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.aynrandstudies.comjarsarchivesjarsjarsgwalsh.pdf archivedateMay ,locationBurlington,Spoken WikipediaAynRand.oggAynRand.http:ari.aynrand.Gutenberg author idRand,http:hdl.govloc.msseadmss.http:www.aynrandlexicon.cite IEPurlidrand titleAyn Alissa Rand firstStephen R.cite SEP urlidaynrand titleAyn Rand lastBadhwar firstNeera K.lastLong firstRoderick T.dateOctober ,http:www.cspan.orgvideo?Goodreads author.DEFAULTSORT:Rand,image              AlainConnes.birthplace        Draguignan,workinstitutions  IHS,almamater         cole Normale Suprieure,Alain Connes IPAfral knlang; born  April  is a French mathematician,currently Professor at the Collge de France,IHS,The Ohio State University and Vanderbilt University.He was an Invited Professor at the Conservatoire national des arts et mtiers .lt;refgt;Alain Connes,Gomtrie noncommutative ,Universit de tous les savoirs,Editions Odile Jacob,Alain Connes studies operator algebras.In his early work on von Neumann algebras in the s,Following this he made contributions in Ktheoryoperator Ktheory and index theory,BaumConnes conjecture.He was a member of Nicolas BourbakiBourbaki.google.combooks?idCXnynJCamp;pgPA.Connes has applied his work in areas of mathematics and theoretical physics,including number theory,differential geometry and particle physics.lt;refgt;http:www.scientificamerican.comarticle.idthegeometerofparticle Scientific Americain,The Geometer of Particle Physics,Connes was awarded the Fields Medal in ,the Crafoord Prize in  and the gold medal of the CNRS in .He is a member of the French Academy of Sciences and several foreign academies and societies,including the Royal Danish Academy of Sciences and LettersDanish Academy of Sciences,Norwegian Academy of Science and LettersNorwegian Academy of Sciences,Russian Academy of Sciences,and United States National Academy of SciencesUS National Academy of Sciences.Alain Connes and Matilde Marcolli: Noncommutative Geometry,Quantum Fields and Motives,Colloquium Publications,American Mathematical Society,ISBN  http:www.alainconnes.orgdocsbookwebfinal.Alain Connes,Andre Lichnerowicz,Marcel Paul Schutzenberger,Jennifer Gage translator: Triangle of Thought,American Mathematical Society,JeanPierre Changeux,Alain Connes,DeBevoise translator: Conversations on Mind,Matter,and Mathematics,Princeton University Press,Alain Connes: Noncommutative Geometry,Academic Press,ISBN lt;refgt;cite journalauthorSegal,IrvingauthorlinkIrving SegaltitleReview: Noncommutative geometry,by Alain ConnesjournalBull.Amer.Math.Soc.yearvolumeissuepagesurlhttp:www.orgjournalsbullSS.pdfdoi.http:www.alainconnes.org Alain Connes Official Web Site containing http:www.alainconnes.orgendownloads.php downloadable papers,and his book http:www.alainconnes.orgdocsbookbigpdf.pdf Noncommutative geometry,ISBN X.http:resonaances.blogspot.comalainconnesstandardmodel.An http:www.irViewNewsInfo.NTID interview with Alain Connes and a http:www.math.columbia.eduwoitwordpress?DEFAULTSORT:Connes,image  Allan Dwan .birthplace  Toronto,deathplace  Los Angeles,Allan Dwan  April    December  was a pioneering Canadianborn American motion picture director,producer and screenwriter.Born Joseph Aloysius Dwan in TorontoToronto,Ontario,Canada,Dwan,ne Hunt,moved with his family to the United States when he was seven years old,on December ,by ferry from Windsor to Detroit,according to his naturalization petition of August .His elder brother,Leo Garnet Dwan ,became a physician.At the University of Notre Dame,Allan Dwan studied engineering and began working for a lighting company in Chicago.However,he took the job.lt;ref namequot;Kevin Brownlow quot;gt;cite book authorBrownlow,Kevin titleThe Parades Gone By .publisherBallantine Books,Inc.locationNew York year page lt;refgt; At that time,Soon,a number of movie companies worked there yearround and,in ,Dwan began working parttime in Hollywood.While still in New York,lt;ref namequot;frankensteinquot;gt;cite news lastFournier firstPierre url http:io.gizmodo.Dwan operated Flying A Studios in La Mesa,California from August  to July .lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:eastcountymagazine.orgnodetitleLa mesa to honor its tinseltown roots aug.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:lamesa.patch.On  August ,California.After making a series of westerns and comedies,Douglas Fairbanks,notably in the acclaimed  Robin Hood  filmRobin Hood.Dwan directed Gloria Swanson in eight feature films,and one short film made in the shortlived soundonfilm process Phonofilm.This short,also featuring Thomas Meighan and Henri de la Falaise,was produced as a joke,for the  April  quot;Lambs Gambolquot; for The Lambs,with the film showing Swanson crashing the allmale club.Following the introduction of the sound filmtalkies,Dwan helped launch the career of two other very successful Hollywood directors,Victor Fleming,and Marshall Neilan,who became an actor,director,writer and producer.Over a long career spanning almost  years,Dwan directed  motion pictures,some of which were highly acclaimed,such as the  box office hit,Sands of Iwo Jima.He directed his last movie in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.commemberscatalogSearchResult.aspx?Filmography  accessdateDecember ,He died in Los Angeles at the age of ninetysix,and is interred in the San Fernando Mission Cemetery,Mission Hills,California.Dwan has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at  Hollywood Boulevard.The Lamb,the Woman,FixIt  filmMr.East Side,West Side  filmEast Side,What a Widow!Brownlow,Kevin,The Parades Gone By.Bogdanovich,Peter,Foster,Charles,Lombardi,Frederic,http:www.virtualhistory.commoviepersonallandwan Allan Dwan profile,virtualhistory.DEFAULTSORT:Dwan,commentChanged quot;R from CamelCasequot; tag to quot;R from subpagequot;.commentChanged quot;R from CamelCasequot; tag to quot;R from subpagequot;.text xml:spacepreservesee alsoPortal:Algeria!imageflag       Flag of Algeria.imagecoat       Algeria emb .elmouradia.dzarabesymboletextesconstitution.htm titleConstitution of Algeria,Art.languageArabic publisherElmouradia.dz accessdate January lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;CONSTENquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.apndz.orgapnenglishconstitutiontitre.htm titleConstitution of Algeria; Art.publisherApndz.org date November  accessdate January  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.apndz.orgapnenglishconstitutiontitre.imagemap        Algeriaorthographicprojection.officiallanguages  hlist Arabiclt;ref namequot;constitutionquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.apndz.orgapnenglishconstitutiontitre.htm titleConstitution of Algeria; Art.publisherApndz.org date November  accessdate January  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.apndz.orgapnenglishconstitutiontitre.dzimagesdocPROJETDEREVISIONDELACONSTITUTIONDECEMBRE.nowrapArabBerberlt;ref namequot;AlgeriaFactbookquot;gt;cite web urlhttps:www.govlibrarypublicationstheworldfactbookgeosag.populationestimate  ,lt;ref namequot;ONSquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.dzDemographie.populationcensus  ,populationdensitykm  .populationdensitysqmi  .GDPPPP          .billion lt;refgt;IMF World Economic Outlook WEO,October  http:knoema.comIMFWEOOctimfworldeconomicoutlookweooctober?GDPPPPpercapita  ,lt;refgt;IMF World Economic Outlook WEO,October  http:knoema.comIMFWEOOctimfworldeconomicoutlookweooctober?GDPnominal      .billion lt;refgt;IMF World Economic Outlook WEO,October   http:knoema.comIMFWEOOctimfworldeconomicoutlookweooctober?GDPnominalpercapita  ,lt;refgt;IMF World Economic Outlook WEO,October  http:knoema.comIMFWEOOctimfworldeconomicoutlookweooctober?Gini             .Giniref         lt;refgt;cite web author Staff urlhttps:www.govlibrarypublicationstheworldfactbookfields.webcitation.HDIyear         lt;!Please use the year to which the data refers,HDIchange       increaselt;!HDI              .HDIref          lt;ref namequot;HDIquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:hdr.undp.orgsitesdefaultfileshdrstatisticalannex.driveson        rightlt;refgt;cite news lastGeoghegan firstTom urlhttp:news.ukhi.stm titleCould the UK drive on the right?cctld            .dzlt;brgt;.a minority,identify as Berber even though many Algerians have Berber origins.The Factbook explains that of the approximately  who identify as Berber,most live in the Kabylie region,more closely identify with Berber heritage instead of Arab heritage,and are Muslim.Algeria langarlarge translaralJazir; langber Dzayer,officially the Peoples Democratic Republic of Algeria,is a sovereign state in North Africa on the Mediterranean SeaMediterranean coast.Its capital and most populous city is Algiers,located in the countrys far north.With an area of convertkmsqmi,Algeria is the list of countries and dependencies by areatenthlargest country in the world,and the largest in Africa and the Arab world.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttps:www.govlibrarypublicationstheworldfactbookrankorderrank.to the east by Libya,to the west by Morocco,to the southwest by Western Sahara,Mauritania,and Mali,to the southeast by Niger,and to the north by the Mediterranean Sea.The country is a Semipresidential systemsemipresidential republic consisting of  provinces and ,communes.Abdelaziz Bouteflika has been President of AlgeriaPresident since .Ancient Algeria has known many empires and dynasties,including ancient Numidians,Phoenicians,PunicCarthaginians,Ancient RomeRomans,Vandals,Byzantine EmpireByzantines,Umayyads,Abbasids,Idrisid,Aghlabid,Rustamid,Fatimids,Zirid,Hammadids,Almoravids,Almohads,Ottomans and the French AlgeriaFrench colonial empire.Berbers are generally considered to be the indigenous inhabitants of Algeria.Following the Muslim conquest of the MaghrebArab conquest of North Africa,most indigenous inhabitants were ArabizationArabised; thus,although most Algerians are Berber in origin,most identify with Arab identity .En masse,Algerians are a mix of Berbers with some additional elements such as  Arabs,Turkic peoplesTurks and Andalusians people from southern Spain who migrated after the reconquista.Algeria is a regional powerregional and middle power.The North African country supplies large amounts of natural gas to Europe,and energy exports are the backbone of the economy.Sonatrach,the national oil company,is the largest company in Africa.with whom they are a close ally.lt;ref namequot;AlgeriaSpendingquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.com accessdate December lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.edunsarchivnukevaultebbindex.htm titleThe Nuclear Vault: The Algerian Nuclear Problem publisherGwu.edu accessdate March lt;refgt; Algeria is a member of the African Union,the Arab League,OPEC,the United Nations and is the founding member of the Arab Maghreb UnionMaghreb Union.The countrys name derives from the city of Algiers.The citys name in turn derives from the Arabic alJazir ,quot;The Islandsquot;,lt;refgt;OEtymDalgerialt;refgt; a truncated form of the older Jazir Ban Mazghanna   ,quot;Islands of the Mazghanna Tribequot;,lt;ref nameidrisigt;alIdrisi,In the region of Ain Hanech Sada Province,early remnants ,BC of hominid occupation in North Africa were found.BC similar to those in the Levant.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.ulpgc.estarhaAinHanech.Mohamed  authorde Heinzelin,Jean accessdate January lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.stoneageinstitute.orgainhanech.html titleResearch at Ain Hanech,Algeria publisherStoneageinstitute.Tools of this era,starting about ,are called Aterian after the archeological site of Bir el Ater,south of Tebessa.This industry appears to have spread throughout the coastal regions of the Maghreb between ,and ,BClt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.plosgenetics.orgarticleinfoAdoiF.Fjournal.pgen.This life,richly depicted in the Tassili nAjjer paintings,predominated in Algeria until the classical period.who are the indigenous peoples of northern Africa.google.idZcztukCauthorBrett,Michael authorFentress,File:Timgad rue.jpgthumbnailrightAncient Roman Empire ruins of Timgad.Street leading to the Arch of Trajan.File:GM Djemila Roman Theatre.From their principal center of power at Carthage,a Phoenician presence existed at Tipasa,east of Cherchell,Hippo Regius modern Annaba and Rusicade modern Skikda.These settlements served as market towns as well as anchorages.As Carthaginian power grew,its impact on the indigenous population increased dramatically.Berber civilization was already at a stage in which agriculture,manufacturing,trade,and political organization supported several states.Trade links between Carthage and the Berbers in the interior grew,File:Egypt,Rome,Carthage and Numidia.jpgthumbnailrightNumidia along with Egypt,Rome,By the early th century BC,Berbers formed the single largest element of the Carthaginian army.In the Mercenary WarRevolt of the Mercenaries,They succeeded in obtaining control of much of Carthages North African territory,and they minted coins bearing the name Libyan,used in Greek to describe natives of North Africa.The Carthaginian state declined because of successive defeats by the Romans in the Punic Wars.In  BC the city of Carthage was destroyed.As Carthaginian power waned,the influence of Berber leaders in the hinterland grew.By the nd century BC,several large but loosely administered Berber kingdoms had emerged.Two of them were established in Numidia,behind the coastal areas controlled by Carthage.West of Numidia lay Mauretania,which extended across the Moulouya River in modernday Morocco to the Atlantic Ocean.The high point of Berber civilization,unequaled until the coming of the Almohads and Almoravids more than a millennium later,was reached during the reign of Massinissa in the nd century BC.After Masinissas death in  BC,the Berber kingdoms were divided and reunited several times.Massinissas line survived until  AD,when the remaining Berber territory was annexed to the Roman Empire.File:GM Massinissa.For several centuries Algeria was ruled by the Romans,who founded many colonies in the region.Like the rest of North Africa,Algeria was one of the breadbaskets of the empire,exporting cereals and other agricultural products.Augustine of HippoSaint Augustine was the bishop of Hippo Regius modernday Algeria,located in the Roman province of Africa Roman provinceAfrica.The Germanic Vandals of Geiseric moved into North Africa in ,and by  controlled coastal Numidia.google.combooks?idQfmrHjfZRoCamp;pgRAPAvolumeyearpublisherCambridge University PressisbnpageschapterVandal Africa,lt;refgt; They did not make any significant settlement on the land,as they were harassed by local tribes,military and cultural revival.lt;ref namequot;vandafquot;gt;lt;refgt;cite journallastMattinglyfirstD.titleThe Laguatan: A Libyan Tribal Confederation in the late Roman Empire.File:Jugurtha.File:Mansourah.jpgthumbnailrightMansourah mosque,File:FatimidCaliphate.pngthumbnailFatimid Caliphate at its greatest extent.After negligible resistance from the locals,After the fall of the Umayyad Caliphate,numerous local dynasties emerged,including the Aghlabids,Almohads,Abdalwadid,Zirids,Rustamids,Hammadids,Almoravids and the Fatimids.During the Middle Ages,North Africa was home to many great Scholars,Saints,the great Sufi masters Abu MadyanSidi Boumediene Abu Madyan and Sidi El Houari,as well as the Emirs Abd alMuminAbd Al Mumin and Yaghmurasen Ibn ZyanYghmrasen.It was during this time period that the Fatimids or children of Fatima,daughter of Muhammad,came to the Maghreb.These quot;Fatimidsquot; went on to found a long lasting dynasty stretching across the Maghreb,Hejaz,and the Levant,boasting a secular inner government,as well as a powerful army and navy,primarily made of Arabs and levantians extending from Algeria to their capital state of Cairo.The Fatimid caliphate began to collapse when its governors the Zirids seceded.In order to punish them the Fatimids sent the Arab Banu Hilal and Banu Sulaym against them.The resultant war is recounted in the epic Taghribat Bani HilalTghribt.In AlTghrbt the Amazigh Zirid Hero Khalifa alZanatiKhlf AlZnat asks daily,for duels,The Zirids however were ultimately defeated ushering in an adoption of Arab customs and culture.The indigenous Berber peopleAmazigh tribes however remained largely independent,and depending on tribe,location,and time controlled varying parts of the Maghreb,at times unifying it as under the Fatimids.The Fatimid Islamic state,also known as Fatimid Caliphate made an Islamic empire that included North Africa,Sicily,Palestine regionPalestine,Jordan,Lebanon,Syria,the Red Sea coast of Africa,Tihamah,Hejaz,and Yemen.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.britannica.qantaramed.orgqantarapublicshowcarte.cartecarte titleQantara publisherQantaramed.org accessdate September lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.qantaramed.orgqantarapublicshowdocument.doid titleQantara  Les Almoravides  publisherQantaramed.The Berber peopleAmazighs historically consisted of several tribes.The two main branches were the Botr and Barns tribes,who were divided into tribes,and again into subtribes.Each region of the Maghreb contained several tribes for example,Sanhadja,Houaras,Zenata,MasmudaMasmouda,Kutama,Awarba,and Berghwata.All these tribes made independent territorial decisions.lt;refgt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.Ibn Khaldun provides a table summarizing the Amazigh dynasties of the Maghreb region,the Zirid,Banu Ifran,Maghrawa,Almoravid,Hammadid,Almohad,Merinid,Abdalwadid,Wattasid,Meknassa and Hafsid dynasties.lt;refgt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.In the early th century,Spain constructed fortified outposts presidios on or near the Algerian coast.Spain took control of few coastal towns like Mers el Kebir in ; Oran in ; and Tlemcen,Mostaganem,and Tns,in .In the same year,few merchants of Algiers ceded one of the rocky islets in their harbor to Spain,which built a fort on it.lt;refgt;cite webtitleEuropean Offensiveurlhttp:countrystudies.usalgeria.MainBanu HilalThere reigned in Ifriqiya,current Tunisia,a BerbersBerber family,Zirid dynastyZirid,somehow recognizing the suzerainty of the Fatimid CaliphateFatimid caliph of Cairo.Probably in ,the Zirid ruler or viceroy,elMuizz,decided to end this suzerainty.The Fatimid state was too weak to attempt a punitive expedition; The Viceroy,elMuizz,also found another means of revenge.both Banu Hilal and Banu Sulaym among others,whose presence disrupted farmers in the Nile Valley since the nomads would often loot.This not only prompted the Bedouins to leave,but the Fatimidtreasury even gave them a light expatriation cash allowance.Whole tribes set off with women,children,ancestors,animals and camping equipment.Some stopped on the way,especially in Cyrenaica,The Zirid ruler tried to stop this rising tide,but each meeting,the last under the walls of Kairouan,his troops were defeated and Arabs remained masters of the field.The flood was still rising and in ,the Arabs spread on the high plains of Constantine,AlgeriaConstantine where they gradually choked Beni Hammad FortQalaa of Banu Hammad,as they had done Kairouan few decades ago.From there,they gradually gained the upper Algiers and Oran plains,some were forcibly taken by the Almohads in the second half of the th century.We can say that in the th century there were in all of North Africa,File:Barbarossa Hayreddin Pasha.File:Old algiers th century.jpgthumbOld Algiers in the th century,The region of Algeria was partially ruled by Ottomans for three centuries from  to .In  the Turkish peopleTurkish privateer brothers Aruj and Hayreddin Barbarossa,who operated successfully under the Hafsids,moved their base of operations to Algiers.forcing the previous ruler,Abu Hamo Musa III of the Bani Ziyad dynasty,to flee.Hayreddin succeeded him as military commander of Algiers.The Ottoman EmpireOttoman sultan gave him the title of beylerbey and a contingent of some ,janissaries.With the aid of this force,The next beylerbey was Hayreddins son Hasan Pasha son of BarbarossaHasan,who assumed the position in .Until  the area was governed by officers who served terms with no fixed limits.Subsequently,with the institution of a regular Ottoman administration,governors with the title of pasha ruled for threeyear terms.The pasha was assisted by janissaries,known in Algeria as the ojaq and led by an Agha Ottoman Empireagha.Discontent among the ojaq rose in the mids because they were not paid regularly,and they repeatedly revolted against the pasha.As a result,the agha charged the pasha with corruption and incompetence and seized power in .Plague diseasePlague had repeatedly struck the cities of North Africa.Algiers lost from ,to ,inhabitants to the plague in ,and suffered high fatalities in ,and .the taifa rebelled,killed the agha,and placed one of its own in power.The new leader received the title of dey.After ,the right to select the dey passed to the divan,a council of some sixty nobles.It was at first dominated by the ojaq; but by the th century,it had become the deys instrument.In ,the dey persuaded the sultan to recognize him and his successors as regent,replacing the pasha in that role,although Algiers remained a part of the Ottoman Empire.The dey was in effect a constitutional autocrat.The dey was elected for a life term,but in the  years  that the system survived,fourteen of the twentynine deys were assassinated.Despite usurpation,military coups,and occasional mob rule,the daytoday operation of Ottomon government was remarkably orderly.Although the regency patronized the tribal chieftains,it never had the unanimous allegiance of the countryside,where heavy taxation frequently provoked unrest.Autonomous tribal states were tolerated,and the regencys authority was seldom applied in the Kabylie.lt;ref namequot;csaquot;gt;cite webtitleAlgeriaamp;nbsp; Ottoman Ruleurlhttp:countrystudies.usalgeria.File:Debarquement et maltraitement de prisonniers a alger.JPGthumbSlavery in the Ottoman EmpireChristian slaves in Algiers,lt;ref namequot;Davisquot;gt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.idqzcBJSCamp;pgamp;dqvonepageamp;qamp;ffalse titleChristian Slaves,Muslim Masters: White Slavery in the Mediterranean,the Barbary Coast and Italy,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerEGazetteerTopicshistoryAmericanandMilitaryBarbaryPiratesBritannica.html titleBarbary PiratesEncyclopdia Britannica,publisherPenelope.uchicago.edu accessdate April lt;refgt; They also did a brisk business in ransoming some of the captives.According to Robert Davis,from the th to th century,pirates captured  million to .million Europeans as slaves.lt;ref namequot;barbaryquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.ukhistorybritishempireseapowerwhiteslaves.shtml titleBritish Slaves on the Barbary Coast publisherBbc.uk date February  author Robert Davislt;refgt; They often made raids,called Ghazi warriorRazzias,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.ukhistorybritishempireseapowerwhiteslaves.Christopher  date  Spring   urlhttp:www.cityjournal.orghtmlurbanitiesthomasjefferson.Hayreddin captured the island of Ischia,taking ,prisoners,and enslaved some ,inhabitants of Lipari,almost the entire population.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.nytimes.comstyleihttrsiced.Turgut Reis enslaved the entire population of the Maltese island of Gozo,between ,and ,sending the captives to Libya.In ,pirates sacked Vieste in southern Italy and took an estimated ,captives as slaves.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.centrovacanzeoriente.itcvorienteendintorni.jsparchiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.centrovacanzeoriente.itcvorienteendintorni.jsp archivedate July  titleMonte SantAngelo publishercentrovacanzeoriente.Barbary corsairs captured the town of Ciutadella Minorca,destroyed it,slaughtered the inhabitants and took ,survivors as slaves to Istanbul.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.holidaysmenorca.comhistory.php titleHistory of Menorcalt;refgt; Barbary pirates often attacked the Balearic Islands,and in response,the residents built many coastal watchtowers and fortified churches.The threat was so severe that residents abandoned the island of Formentera.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:researchnews.eduarchivewhtslav.htm archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:researchnews.eduarchivewhtslav.Between  and ,England lost  merchant ships to Barbary pirates.augustus .Rijksmuseum SKA.jpegthumbThe Bombardment of Algiers Bombardment of Algiers by the AngloDutch fleet,to support the ultimatum to release European slaves,In July  two pirate ships from Algiers sailed as far as Iceland,lt;refgt;http:www.visindavefur.issvar.id quot;Vsindavefurinn: Hverjir stu raunverulega a Tyrkjarninu?quot;.Vsindavefurinn.lt;refgt; Turkish Abductionsraiding and capturing slaves.lt;refgt;http:www.visindavefur.issvar.id quot;Vsindavefurinn: Hva gerist  Tyrkjarninu?quot;.Vsindavefurinn.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.heimaslod.isindex.phpTurkishinvasionwalk quot;Turkish invasion walkquot;.heimaslod.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Etravel Travel service.http:www.visitwestmanislands.comsidurturkishinvasion quot;Turkish Invasion  Visit Westman Islands .comquot;.visitwestmanislands.lt;refgt; Two weeks earlier another pirate ship from Sale,MoroccoSal in Saadi dynastyMorocco had also raided in Iceland.Some of the slaves brought to Algiers were later ransomed back to Iceland,but some chose to stay in Algeria.In  pirate ships from Algeria raided the Faroe Islands.lt;refgt;http:www.visindavefur.issvar.id quot;Vsindavefurinn: Voru Tyrkjarn framin  rum lndum?quot;.Vsindavefurinn.In the th century,the pirates forged affiliations with Caribbean powers,paying a quot;license taxquot; in exchange for safe harbor of their vessels.lt;refgt;cite journallastMackiefirstErin SkyetitleWelcome the Outlaw: Pirates,Maroons,and Caribbean CounterculturesjournalCultural Critiquedate January volumeissuepagesdoi.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerEGazetteerTopicshistoryAmericanandMilitaryBarbaryPiratesBritannica.Following those wars,Algeria was weaker,and Europeans,with an AngloDutch fleet commanded by the British Edward Pellew,st Viscount ExmouthLord Exmouth,Bombardment of Algiers attacked Algiers.After a ninehour bombardment,In addition,the Dey agreed to end the practice of enslaving Christians.lt;refgt;cite bookauthor Littell,Eliakim  titleThe Museum of foreign literature,science and art urlhttps:books.google.combooks?idLwXYICamp;pgPA year publisherE.File:Arrival of Marshal Randon in AlgierErnestFrancis Vacherot mg .Under the pretext of French conquest of AlgeriaThe Fan Affaira slight to their consul,the French invaded and captured Algiers in .lt;refgt;cite webtitleBackground Note: Algeriaurlhttp:www.state.govrpaeibgn.htmworkU.Department of Statelt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book author Horne,Alistair titleA Savage War of Peace: Algeria  publisherNYRB Classics location Broadway,New York,lt;refgt;Chisholm,Hugh,quot;https:en.wikisource.orgwikiEncyclopCAdiaBritannicaBarbaryPirates Barbary Piratesquot;.Encyclopdia Britannica th ed.Cambridge University Press.urlhttp:gallica.frark:bptkbf.imageaccessdate February yearpublisherG.MassonpagestranstitleThe figurative demographics of Algerialt;refgt;unreliable source?dateFebruary  The population of Algeria,which stood at about .million in ,reached nearly  million in .lt;refgt;cite webtitleAlgeria Djazaria historical demographic data of the whole countryurlhttp:www.populstat.infoAfricaalgeriac.htmworkPopulation Statisticspublisherpopulstat.infoaccessdate June author Lahmeyer,Jan date October lt;refgt; French policy was predicated on quot;civilizingquot; the country.lt;refgt;cite bookauthor Ruedy,John Douglas titleModern Algeria: The Origins And Development of a Nation urlhttps:books.google.combooks?lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.countrydata.comcgibinqueryr.html titleCountry Data publisherCountrydata.com accessdate November unreliable source?dateJanuary lt;refgt; During this period,a small but influential Frenchspeaking indigenous elite was formed,made up of Berbers mostly from Kabyle PeopleKabyles.As a consequence,French government favored the Kabyles.lt;refgt;cite bookauthorHargreaves,Alec G.authorMcKinney,Mark titlePostColonial Cultures in France urlhttps:books.google.combooks?File:Abd alQadir.From  until independence,One of Frances longestheld overseas territories,who became known as colons and later,as PiedNoirs.Between  and ,French people immigrated to Algeria.lt;refgt;cite booklastRandellfirstKeithtitleFrance: Monarchy,Republic and Empire,urlhttps:books.google.combooks?and the application of modern agricultural techniques that increased the amount of arable land.lt;refgt;cite book author Horne,New York,NY  year isbn pagelt;refgt; Many Europeans settled in Oran and Algiers,and by the early th century they formed a majority of the population in both cities.lt;refgt;Albert Habib Hourani,Malise Ruthven .quot;https:books.google.combooks?idegbObmewzCamp;pgPAamp;dqamp;hlenvonepageamp;qamp;ffalse A history of the Arab peoplesquot;.Harvard University Press.Gradually,dissatisfaction among the Muslim population,which lacked political and economic status in the colonial system,gave rise to demands for greater political autonomy,and eventually independence from France.Tensions between the two population groups came to a head in ,when the first violent events of what was later called the Algerian War began.Historians have estimated that between ,and ,lt;refgt;cite news  url  http:news.ukhieurope.and the French conducted severe reprisals.The war concluded in ,selfdetermination referendum.The number of European PiedNoirs who fled Algeria totaled more than ,between  and .lt;refgt;https:books.google.combooks?Paul A.Silverstein,Published  by Indiana University Press,ISBN  page .lt;refgt; The exodus to mainland France accelerated after the Oran massacre of ,in which hundreds of militants entered European sections of the city,and began attacking civilians.File:Houari Boumedienes Portrait.Moroccos claim to Greater Moroccoportions of western Algeria led to the Sand War in .Ben Bella was  Algerian coup dtatoverthrown in  by Houari Boumediene,his former ally and defence minister.Under Ben Bella,But,he relied much more on the army for his support,and reduced the sole legal party to a symbolic role.He collective farmingcollectivised agriculture and launched a massive industrialization drive.Extraction of petroleumOil extraction facilities were nationalized.This was especially beneficial to the leadership after the international  oil crisis.In the s and s under President Houari Boumediene,Algeria pursued a programme of industrialisation within a statecontrolled socialist economy.Boumedienes successor,Chadli Bendjedid,introduced some liberal economic reforms.He promoted a policy of Arabisation in Algerian society and public life.Teachers of Arabic,brought in from other Muslim countries,spread conventional Islamic thought in schools and sowed the seeds of a return to Orthodox Islam.The Algerian economy became increasingly dependent on oil,leading to hardship when the price collapsed during the s oil glut.This Is Now: The Battle of Algiers and After.urlhttp:muse.edujournalsrhrsummaryv.prochaska.Bendjedid introduced a multiparty system.Political parties developed,such as the Islamic Salvation Front FIS,a broad coalition of Muslim groups.legislative elections.Fearing the election of an Islamist government,the authorities intervened on  January ,cancelling the elections.It banned the FIS,triggering a civil insurgency between the Fronts armed wing,the Armed Islamic Group of AlgeriaArmed Islamic Group,and the national armed forces,in which more than ,people are thought to have died.lt;refgt;quot;http:www.nytimes.comworlddieinoneofalgeriancivilwarsworstmassacres.html  Die in One of Algerian Civil Wars Worst Massacres quot;.The New York Times.August .lt;refgt; At several points in the conflict,the situation in Algeria became a point of international concern,most notably during the crisis surrounding Air France Flight ,a hijacking perpetrated by the Armed Islamic Group.The Armed Islamic Group declared a ceasefire in October .Algeria held Algerian presidential election,elections in ,orgreportfreedomworldalgeria.He worked to restore political stability to the country and announced a Civil Concord initiative,approved in a Algerian Civil Concord referendum,referendum,under which many political prisoners were pardoned,in force until  January .The AIS disbanded and levels of insurgent violence fell rapidly.The Groupe Salafiste pour la Prdication et le Combat GSPC,a splinter group of the Group Islamic Arme,continued a terrorist campaign against the Government.File:A Market in Algeria.Bouteflika was reelected in the Algerian presidential election,April  presidential election after campaigning on a programme of national reconciliation.The programme comprised economic,institutional,political and social reform to modernise the country,raise living standards,and tackle the causes of alienation.It also included a second amnesty initiative,the Charter for Peace and National Reconciliation,which was approved in a Algerian national reconciliation referendum,referendum in September .It offered amnesty to most guerrillas and Government security forces.In November ,the Algerian Constitution was amended following a vote in Parliament,removing the twoterm limit on Presidential incumbents.This change enabled Bouteflika to stand for reelection in the Algerian presidential election,presidential elections,and he was reelected in April .During his election campaign and following his reelection,the construction of one million new housing units,and to continue public sector and infrastructure modernisation programmes.A continuing series of protests throughout the country started on  December ,inspired by similar Arab Springprotests across the Middle East and North Africa.On  February ,the government lifted Algerias yearold state of emergency.lt;refgt;cite news url  http:articles.comworldalgeria.emergencyislamistpartyalgerianpressserviceemergencydeclaration?archive.orgwebhttp:articles.comworldalgeria.emergencyislamistpartyalgerianpressserviceemergencydeclaration?the electoral code,and the representation of women in elected bodies.lt;ref namequot;aaeoquot; gt; In April ,Bouteflika promised further constitutional and political reform.lt;ref namequot;facoquot;gt;cite webtitleCountry Profile: Algeria urlhttp:www.ukentravelandlivingabroadtraveladvicebycountrycountryprofilemiddleeastnorthafricaalgeria?profileall publisherForeign and Commonwealth Office deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.ukentravelandlivingabroadtraveladvicebycountrycountryprofilemiddleeastnorthafricaalgeria?profileall archivedate December  lt;refgt; However,File:Kabylieneige.File:Tadrart Rouge.jpgThe Tadrart Rouge near Djanet.File:El TarfAlgerie.jpgEl Taref Province,In eastern Algeria.File:Ouarsenis ,Wilaya de Tissemsilt Algrie.jpgOuarsenis,File:Les Aiguades.File:Djanet,Tassili.jpgThe Tassili nAjjer.File:SeraidiAnnaba.jpgEdough National Park,Algeria is the largest country in Africa,the Arab world,and the Mediterranean Basin.Its southern part includes a significant portion of the Sahara.To the north,the Tell Atlas form with the Saharan Atlas,further south,two parallel sets of reliefs in approaching eastbound,and between which are inserted vast plains and highlands.Both Atlas tend to merge in eastern Algeria.The highest point is Mount Tahat formatnum:  m.File:Algeria relief.pngthumbThe Sahara,and longitudes th meridian westW and th meridian eastE.Most of the coastal area is hilly,sometimes even mountainous,and there are a few natural harbours.The area from the coast to the Tell Atlas is fertile.South of the Tell Atlas is a steppe landscape ending with the Saharan Atlas; farther south,there is the Sahara desert.lt;ref nameLOCgt;cite weblastMetzfirstHelen ChapintitleAlgeria : a country studyurlhttp:lcweb.govfrdcsdztoc.The Ahaggar Mountains langar ,also known as the Hoggar,are a highland region in central Sahara,southern Algeria.They are located about convertkmabbron south of the capital,Algiers,and just west of Tamanghasset.Algiers,Oran,Constantine,AlgeriaConstantine,and Annaba are Algerias main cities.File:Algeria map of Kppen climate classification.svgthumbpxAlgeria map of Kppen climate classification.File:Vue de Taghit.File:Agoulmime.jpgthumbleftLake Agoulmime,Tikjda.In this region,midday desert temperatures can be hot year round.After sunset,however,the clear,dry air permits rapid loss of heat,and the nights are cool to chilly.Enormous daily ranges in temperature are recorded.The highest official temperature was convert.CF at In Salah.lt;refgt;cite webtitleExtreme Weatheramp;nbsp; A Guide and Record Bookurlhttp:www.mherrera.orgtemp.htmpublisherW.Norton Pressarchiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.Rainfall is fairly plentiful along the coastal part of the Tell Atlas,ranging from converttommabbron annually,the amount of precipitation increasing from west to east.Precipitation meteorologyPrecipitation is heaviest in the northern part of eastern Algeria,where it reaches as much as convertmmabbron in some years.Farther inland,the rainfall is less plentiful.Algeria also has erg landformergs,or sand dunes,between mountains.Among these,in the summer time when winds are heavy and gusty,temperatures can get up to convertFCabbrondispflip.File:Cdre du Chlia  Algeria.The varied vegetation of Algeria includes coastal,mountainous and grassy desertlike regions which all support a wide range of wildlife.Many of the creatures comprising the Algerian wildlife live in close proximity to civilization.The most commonly seen animals include the wild boars,jackals,and gazelles,although it is not uncommon to spot fennecs foxes,and jerboas.Algeria also has a small African leopard and Saharan cheetah population,but these are seldom seen.A species of deer,the Barbary stag,inhabits the dense humid forests in the northeastern areas.A variety of bird species makes the country an attraction for bird watchers.The forests are inhabited by boars and jackals.Barbary macaques are the sole native monkey.Snakes,monitor lizards,Many animals are now extinct,including the Barbary lions,Atlas bears and West African crocodilecrocodiles.lt;refgt;quot;http:journals.plos.orgplosonearticle?journal.pone.Crocodiles in the Sahara Desert: An Update of Distribution,Habitats and Population Status for Conservation Planning in Mauritaniaquot;.PLOS ONE.February .In the north,some of the native flora includes Macchia scrub,olive trees,oaks,cedruscedars and other conifers.The mountain regions contain large forests of evergreens Aleppo pine,juniper,and evergreen oak and some deciduous trees.FicusFig,eucalyptus,agave,and various palm trees grow in the warmer areas.The grape vine is indigenous to the coast.In the Sahara region,some oases have palm trees.Acacias with wild olives are the predominant flora in the remainder of the Sahara.Camels are used extensively; the desert also abounds with venomous and nonvenomous snakes,scorpions,and numerous insects.File:Hmicycle de lassemble populaire nationale Algrie.File:Presidentabdelazizbouteflika.JPGthumbleftupright.Algeria is an authoritarian regime,according to the Democracy Index .lt;refgt;cite web  titleDemocracy Index   urlhttp:graphics.comPDFDemocracyIndexweb.pdfworkeiu.lt;refgt;cite web  titleFreedom of the Press   urlhttp:www.freedomhouse.orguploadsfopFreedomofthePresstables.pdf  publisherFreedom House  accessdate May  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.freedomhouse.orguploadsfopFreedomofthePresstables.Elected politicians are considered to have relatively little sway over Algeria.Instead,a group of unelected civilian and military quot;dcideursquot;,known as quot;le pouvoirquot; quot;the powerquot;,actually rule the country,even deciding who should be president.The most powerful man may be Mohamed Medine,head of the military intelligence.lt;refgt;cite newstitleStill waiting for real democracyurlhttp:www.economist.comnodepublisherThe Economistdate May lt;refgt; In recent years,many of these generals have died or retired.After the death of General Larbi Belkheir,Bouteflika put loyalists in key posts,notably at Sonatrach,and secured constitutional amendments that make him reelectable indefinitely.lt;refgt;cite newstitleThe president and the policeurlhttp:www.economist.The head of state is the president of Algeria,who is elected for a fiveyear term.The president was formerly limited to two fiveyear terms,but a constitutional amendment passed by the Parliament on  November  removed this limitation.lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:news.ukhiafrica.archive.orgwebhttp:news.ukhiafrica.stm archivedate  November   deadurl nolt;refgt; Algeria has universal suffrage at  years of age.lt;ref namequot;AlgeriaFactbookquot;gt; The President is the head of the Algerian Armyarmy,the Council of Ministers of AlgeriaCouncil of Ministers and the High Security Council.He appoints the Prime Minister of AlgeriaPrime Minister who is also the head of government.lt;ref namequot;presidentquot;gt;Articles: ,and  of the Algerian constitution cite weblastAlgerian governmenttitleConstitutionurlhttp:www.conseilconstitutionnel.dzConstitution.The Algerian parliament is bicameral; the lower house,the Peoples National Assembly,has  members who are directly elected for fiveyear terms,while the upper house,the Council of the Nation,has  members serving sixyear terms,of which  members are chosen by local assemblies and  are appointed by the president.lt;ref namefitw gt; According to the Constitution of Algeriaconstitution,no political association may be formed if it is quot;based on differences in religion,language,race,gender,profession,or regionquot;.In addition,political campaigns must be exempt from the aforementioned subjects.conseilconstitutionnel.dzConstitution.Parliamentary elections were last held in Algerian legislative election,May ,and were judged to be largely free by international monitors,though local groups alleged fraud and irregularities.lt;ref namefitwgt;cite webtitleAlgeriaurlhttp:www.freedomhouse.the National Liberation Front AlgeriaFLN won  seats,the militarybacked National Rally for Democracy AlgeriaNational Rally for Democracy won ,and the Islamist Green Algeria Alliance won .File:Ramtane Lamamra cropped.jpgthumbupright.Ramtane Lamamra,File:Abdelaziz Bouteflika and George W Bush .jpgthumbPresident Abdelaziz Bouteflika and George W.Bush exchange handshakes at the Windsor Hotel Toya Resort and Spa in Tyako Town,Abuta District,Hokkaid in .With them are Dmitriy Medvedev,left,and Yasuo Fukuda,right.In October ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.infoprod.archive.orgwebhttp:www.infoprod.nominally established in ,but which has carried little practical weight.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.arabicnews.comansubDailyDay.html publisherArabicNews.com titleBin Ali calls for reactivating Arab Maghreb Union,TunisiaMaghreb,Politics date February  accessdate April  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.arabicnews.comansubDailyDay.Giving incentives and rewarding best performers,as well as offering funds in a faster and more flexible manner,It has a budget of .billion and provides the bulk of funding through a number of programmes.File:Sudz.The military of Algeria consists of the Peoples National Army ANP,the Algerian National Navy MRA,and the Algerian Air Force QJJ,plus the Territorial Air Defence Forces.Total military personnel include ,active,reserve,and ,paramilitary staff  estimate.lt;ref nameIISSTMBgt;cite book titleThe Military Balance  author Hackett,James ed.zawya.comprintstory.storyidvnTSamp;laccessdate July lt;refgt; Service in the military is compulsory for men aged ,for a total of  months.lt;refgt;quot;Loi  relative au service nationalquot;,JORADP ,August,th lt;refgt; The military expenditure was .of the gross domestic product GDP in .amp;nbsp;billion.It also agreed to return old aircraft purchased from the former USSR.Russia is also building two Kilo class submarinetype diesel submarines for Algeria.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.warandpeace.Algeria is divided into  provinces of Algeriaprovinces wilayas,districts of Algeriadistricts daras and ,Municipalities of Algeriamunicipalities baladiyahs.Each province,district,and municipality is named after its Capital politicalseat,which is usually the largest city.The administrative divisions have changed several times since independence.When introducing new provinces,the numbers of old provinces are kept,hence the nonalphabetical order.With their official numbers,File:Algeria Export Treemap.jpgthumbpxGraphical depiction of the countrys exports in  colourcoded categories.Algeria is classified as an upper middle income country by the World Bank GroupWorld Bank.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:siteresources.worldbank.orgDATASTATISTICSResourcesCLASS.The economy remains dominated by the state,a legacy of the countrys socialist postindependence development model.In recent years,including the need to diversify the economy,strengthen political,economic and financial reforms,improve the business climate and reduce inequalities amongst regions.Public spending has increased by  annually during the past  years.The  publicinvestment programme will cost US billion,of which will go to human development.File:Theatre doran.The Algerian economy grew by .in ,driven by public spending,in particular in the construction and publicworks sector,and by growing internal demand.If hydrocarbons are excluded,growth has been estimated at .Growth of  is expected in ,rising to .in .The rate of inflation was  and the budget deficit  of GDP.The currentaccount surplus is estimated at .of GDP and at the end of December ,official reserves were put at US billion.lt;ref nameaaeogt; Inflation,the lowest in the region,has remained stable at  on average between  and .lt;ref namequot;MFWAquot;gt;cite weburlhttp:www.mfwa.orgalgeriaalgeriafinancialsectorprofile.File:Algeria,Trends in the Human Development Index .pngthumbpxAlgeria,In  Algeria announced a budgetary surplus of .billion,increase in comparison to  surplus.In general,the country exported  billion worth of commodities while it imported  billion.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:english.nuqudy.comGeneralOverviewNorthAfricaAlgeriaNonOilExp titleAlgeria NonOil Exports Surge  publishernuqudy.Thanks to strong hydrocarbon revenues,In addition,Algerias List of countries by external debtexternal debt is extremely low at about  of GDP.lt;ref namequot;AlgeriaFactbookquot;gt; The economy remains very dependent on hydrocarbon wealth,and,despite high foreign exchange reserves US billion,equivalent to three years of imports,the agricultural sector and services recorded growth of  and .respectively.Algeria has not joined the WTO,despite several years of negotiations.lt;refgt;cite webtitleDoing Business in Algeriaurlhttp:algiers.usembassy.govdoingbusinessalgeria.htmlpublisherEmbassy of the United States Algiers,In March ,Russia agreed to erase .amp;nbsp;billion of Algerias Soviet UnionSovietera debtlt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.brtsis.com titleBrtsis,Brief on Russian Defence,Trade,Security and Energy publisherBrtsis.com accessdate November  archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.brtsis.the first by a Russian leader in half a century.In return,President of AlgeriaAlgerian President Abdelaziz Bouteflika agreed to buy .amp;nbsp;billion worth of combat planes,airdefence systems and other arms from Russia,according to the head of Russias state arms exporter Rosoboronexport.lt;refgt;cite news titleRussia Agrees Algeria Arms Deal,Writes Off Debt agencyReuters date March  urlhttp:www.sauress.comenspaenlt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news author Marsaud,fractufrarticlesarticle.asp  accessdate  August  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.fractufrarticlesarticle.File:Algeria pipelines map.Algeria,whose economy is reliant on petroleum,has been an OPEC member since .Its crude oil production stands at around .million barrelsday,but it is also a major gas producer and exporter,with important links to Europe.lt;ref nameopbgt;cite webtitleOPEC Bulletin urlhttp:www.opec.orgopecwebflipbookOBOBassetsbasichtmlpage.htmlpagelt;refgt; Hydrocarbons have long been the backbone of the economy,accounting for roughly  of budget revenues,of GDP,and over  of export earnings.The U.Energy Information Administration reported that in ,Algeria had convertTcuft of proven natural gas reservesnaturalgas reserves.lt;ref namequot;ciawfbquot;gt;cite weburlhttps:www.govlibrarypublicationstheworldfactbookrankorderrank.htmltitleCountry Comparison: Natural Gas  Proved ReservespublisherCia.Nonhydrocarbon growth for  was projected at .To cope with social demands,the authorities raised expenditure,especially on basic food support,employment creation,support for SMEs,and higher salaries.Income from oil and gas rose in  as a result of continuing high oil prices,though the trend in production volume is downwards.lt;ref nameaaeogt; Production from the oil and gas sector in terms of volume,continues to decline,dropping from .million tonnes to  million tonnes between  and .Nevertheless,the sector accounted for  of the total volume of exports in ,against  in ,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.tsaalgerie.com date May  author Benchicou,Mohamed deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.tsaalgerie.comactualiteitemletempsdescrapules archivedate March  lt;refgt; and  of budgetary receipts,or USD .billion.The Algerian national oil company is Sonatrach,which plays a key role in all aspects of the oil and natural gas sectors in Algeria.All foreign operators must work in partnership with Sonatrach,which usually has majority ownership in productionsharing agreements.lt;refgt;cite webtitleCountry Analysis Briefsamp;nbsp; Algeria urlhttp:www.govcabsAlgeriapdf.pdf publisherEnergy Information Administration deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.govcabsAlgeriapdf.Despite a decline in total unemployment,youth and women unemployment is high.lt;ref nameimfartgt;cite webtitleAlgeria:  Article IV Consultationurlhttp:www.orgexternalpubsftscrcr.pdfpublisherIMFlt;refgt; Unemployment particularly affects the young,with a jobless rate of .among the  age group.The overall rate of unemployment was  in ,but remained higher among young people,with a rate of .for those aged between  and .The government strengthened in  the job programmes introduced in ,lt;ref nameaaeogt;cite webtitleAlgeriaurlhttp:www.africaneconomicoutlook.File:DjanetAlgerianight.unesco.orgenstatespartiesdzaccessdate September lt;refgt; including Al Qala of Beni Hammad,the first capital of the Hammadid empire; Tipasa,a Phoenician and later Roman town; and Djmila and Timgad,both Ancient RomeRoman ruins; MZab Valley,The only natural World Heritage Sites is the Tassili nAjjer,a mountain range.File:Les fusillsmtroAlger.File:Autoroute est ouest ghomri.JPGthumbThe main highway connecting the Moroccan to the Tunisian border,The Algerian road network is the densest in Africa; its length is estimated at ,amp;nbsp;km of highways,with more than ,structures and a paving rate of .This network will be complemented by the Algeria EastWest HighwayEastWest Highway,a major infrastructure project currently under construction.It is a way,amp;nbsp;km long highway,linking Annaba in the extreme east to the Tlemcen in the far west.Algeria is also crossed by the TransSahara Highway,which is now completely paved.Mali,Niger,Nigeria,Chad and Tunisia.There is a substantial increase in the amount of drinking water supplied from reservoirs,longdistance water transfers and desalination at a low price to consumers,thanks to the countrys substantial oil and gas revenues.In  the capital Algiers transformed its intermittent water supply into a to continuous one,along with considerable improvements in wastewater treatment.However,Another challenge is the pollution of water resources.source       lt;ref namequot;Katebquot;gt;cite bookauthor Kamel KatebtitleEuropens,quot;indignesquot; et juifs en Algrie urlhttps:books.google.combooks?dzIMGarmatureFINAL.In January  Algerias population was an estimated .amp;nbsp;million,who are mainly ArabBerber ethnically.lt;ref namequot;AlgeriaFactbookquot;gt;lt;ref namequot;Algeriaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.algerie.comalgerielEalgeriecomptaitmillionsdEhabitantsauerjanvierons titleLAlgrie comptait ,lastPolonifirstSilvialastParacchinifirstTatiana lastZerjallastDahmani firstM.FathallahfirstMohamed lastMakrelouflastVincenzo firstL.volume issue journalAm.Hum.Genet.pageslt;refgt; At the outset of the th century,its population was approximately four million.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:countrystudies.usalgeria.coastal area; the inhabitants of the Sahara desert are mainly concentrated in oasisoases,although some .amp;nbsp;million remain nomadic or partly nomadic.of Algerians are under the age of .Women make up  of the countrys lawyers and  of its judges and also dominate the field of medicine.Increasingly,women are contributing more to household income than men.of university students are women,according to university researchers.lt;refgt;cite news authorSlackman,Michael urlhttp:www.nytimes.comworldafricaalgeria.Between ,and ,Sahrawi peopleSahrawis from Western Sahara live in the Sahrawi refugee camps,lt;ref namequot;UNHCRAlgeriaquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.unhcr.orgpagesee.refugees.orgresourcesrefugeewarehousingarchivedworldrefugeesurveyswrscountryupdatesalgeria.html titleWorld Refugee Survey : Algeria publisherU.Committee for Refugees and Immigrants year accessdate December  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.refugees.orgresourcesrefugeewarehousingarchivedworldrefugeesurveyswrscountryupdatesalgeria.html archivedate August  lt;refgt; in the western Algerian Sahara desert.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.irinnews.Palestinian refugees,lt;ref namequot;UNHCRAlgeriaquot;gt;lt;ref namequot;USCRIAlgeriaquot;gt; In ,Overseas ChineseChinese migrant workers lived in Algeria.lt;refgt;cite newsurlhttp:news.ukhiafrica.The largest concentration of Algerian migrants outside Algeria is in France,which has reportedly over .million Algerians of up to the second generation.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.insee.frfrthemesdocument.Indigenous Berbers as well as Phoenicians,Ancient RomeRomans,Byzantine GreeksByzantines,Arab peopleArabs,Turkish peopleTurks,various SubSaharan Africans,and French peopleFrench  have contributed to the history of Algeria.lt;refgt;cite webauthor UNESCO year titleDiversit et interculturalit en Algrie urlhttp:rabat.unesco.orgIMGpdfDiversiteInterculturalitAlgerie.pdf publisherUNESCO page deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:rabat.unesco.orgIMGpdfDiversiteInterculturalitAlgerie.lt;refgt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.combooks?John Douglas publisherIndiana University Pressisbnyearlt;refgt; Moreover,google.combooks?File:Tenus traditionnelles algriennes .There are ,to  million former Turks in AlgeriaAlgerian Turks,descendants of Turkish rulers,soldiers,doctors and others who ruled the region during the Ottoman EmpireOttoman rule in North Africa.musavirlikler.traltdetay.archive.orgwebhttp:www.musavirlikler.traltdetay.meaning descendants of Turkish men and native Algerian women.Hurst amp; Co.Despite the dominance of the Berber culture and ethnicity in Algeria,majority of Algerians identify with an Arabicbased identity,especially after the Arab nationialism rising in the th century.google.combooks?google.combooks?The largest of these are the Kabyles,who live in the Kabylie region east of Algiers,the Chaoui of Northeast Algeria,the Tuaregs in the southern desert and the ChenouasShenwa people of North Algeria.google.combooks?During the colonial period,there was a large  in lt;ref namequot;Cookquot;gt;Cite book  authorCook,Bernard A.They were primarily of French,Spanish peopleSpanish and Italian peopleItalian origin.Almost all of this population left during the war of independence or immediately after its end.lt;refgt;cite bookurlhttps:books.google.combooks?File:Panneau de signalisation multilingue  Issers Algrie.jpgthumbTraffic sign in Isser municipalityIsser in three languages: Arabic,Berber languagesBerber,Modern Standard Arabic is the official language.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.diplomatie.gouv.frfrpayszonesgeoalgeriepresentationalgerieindex.Colloquial Algerian Arabic is heavily infused with borrowings from French and Berber.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.magharebia.com date June  deadurlunfit archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.magharebia.the predominant Berber language,is taught and is partially coofficial with a few restrictions in parts of Kabylie.Although French languageFrench has no official status,Algeria is the secondlargest Francophone country in the world in terms of speakers,lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.senat.frcolloquesactesmondialisationfrancophonieactesmondialisationfrancophonie.html titleLa mondialisation,une chance pour la francophonie publisherSenat.fr accessdate January  http:www.webcitation.orgFhBDeanP Archive quot;LAlgrie,nonmembre de lOrganisation internationale de la Francophonie,comptabilise la seconde communaut francophone au monde,avec environ  millions de locuteurs,suivie par la Cte dIvoire avec prs de  millions de locuteurs francophones,le Qubec avec  millions et la Belgique avec plus de  millions de francophones.quot;lt;refgt; and French is widely used in government,media newspapers,radio,local television,It can be regarded as the de facto coofficial language of Algeria.In ,million Algerians could read and write in French.lt;refgt;cite webtitleLe dnombrement des francophonesurlhttp:www.francophonie.orgIMGpdfe.pdfpublisherOrganisation internationale de la Francophonie http:www.webcitation.orgFhBOXsN Archive p.comme pour lAlgrie ,millions en lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,quot; and quot;.Nombre de personnes ges de cinq ans et plus dclarant savoir lire et crire le franais,daprs les donnes du recensement de  communiques par lOffice national des statistiques dAlgrie.Algeria emerged as a bilingual state after .lt;refgt;cite newslastNew firstThe urlhttp:topics.blogs.nytimes.nytimes.lt;ref namequot;leclercquot;gt;cite web  authorLeclerc,url  http:www.tlfq.ulaval.caAXLAFRIQUEalgeriedemo.htm  accessdate  January  archiveurl https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.tlfq.ulaval.caaxlafriquealgeriedemo.titleReligion in Algeria,Pew Research CenterPew Researchlt;ref namepewgt;http:www.globalreligiousfutures.orgcountriesalgeriareligiousdemography?Pew Research Center.bar percentFreedom of religion in AlgeriaOthergray.Islam is the predominant religion with  of the population.lt;ref namequot;AlgeriaFactbookquot;gt; There are about ,Ibadis in the Mzab Valley in the region of Ghardaia.lt;refgt;unreliable source?dateAugust reasonangelfire.com is a usergenerated website.linked page is to a quot;chapter quot; of an unknown work.it presents no credentials of author and no link to a main page.cite weburlhttp:www.angelfire.comazresconmgcibadi.There were an estimated ,Christianity in AlgeriaChristians in Algeria in .lt;refgt;cite newstitleAlgerian Christian converts finedurlhttp:news.ukhiafrica.stmpublisherBBC News  date June lt;refgt; In a  study the UNO estimated there were ,Catholicslt;refgt;Deeb,Mary Jane.quot;Religious minoritiesquot; Algeria Country Study.Federal Research Division,Library of Congress; Helen Chapan Metz,December .This article incorporates text from this source,which is in the public domain.http:lcweb.govfrdcsabout.htmllt;refgt; and ,Protestants in Algeria.lt;refgt;Deeb,Mary Jane.quot;http:lcweb.govcgibinqueryr?frdcstdy:fieldDOCIDdz Religious minoritiesquot; Algeria Country Study.Federal Research Division,Library of Congress; Helen Chapan Metz,December .This article incorporates text from this source,which is in the public domain.lt;refgt; A  study estimates ,Muslims converted to Christianity in Algeria.academia.Following the Algerian RevolutionRevolution and Algerian independence,all but ,of the countrys ,Jews left the country,of whom about  moved to France with the PiedNoirs and  moved to Israel.Algeria has given to the Muslim world a number of prominent thinkers.The name only a few: Emir Abdelkader,Abdelhamid Ibn Badis,Mouloud Kacem NaitBelkacem,Malek Bennabi,Mohamed Akroun,and others.File:Bensari.jpgthumbAlgerian musicians in Tlemcen.Modern Algerian literature,split between Arabic,Berber languagesTamazight and French,has been strongly influenced by the countrys recent history.List of Algerian writersFamous novelists of the th century include Mohammed Dib,Albert Camus,Kateb Yacine and Ahlam Mosteghanemi while Assia Djebar is widely translated.Among the important novelists of the s were Rachid Mimouni,later vicepresident of Amnesty International,and Tahar Djaout,murdered by an Islamist group in  for his secularist views.lt;refgt;cite web titleTahar Djaout publisherFrench Publishers Agency urlhttp:www.frenchpubagency.fuseactionpeople.though born in Tunis,wrote the Muqaddima while staying in Algeria.The works of the Sanusi family in precolonial times,and of Emir Abdelkader and Sheikh Ben Badis in colonial times,are widely noted.The Latin author Apuleius was born in Madaurus Mdaourouch,in what later became Algeria.Contemporary Algerian cinema is various in terms of genre,exploring a wider range of themes and issues.sllf.qmul.File:Portraitracim.Algerian painters,like :fr:Mohamed RacimMohamed Racim or Baya,attempted to revive the prestigious Algerian past prior to French colonization,In this line,Mohamed Temam,Abdelkhader Houamel have also returned through this art,scenes from the history of the country,the habits and customs of the past and the country life.Other new artistic currents including the one of Mhamed Issiakhem,Mohammed Khadda and Bachir Yelles,appeared on the scene of Algerian painting,abandoning figurative classical painting to find new pictorial ways,Mohammed Khaddalt;ref nameartgt;cite weburlhttp:www.khadda.com titleMohammed Khadda publisherKhadda.com accessdate January lt;refgt; and Mhamed Issiakhem have been notable in recent years.The historic roots of Algerian literature goes back to the Numidian era,when Apuleius wrote The Golden Ass,the only Latin novel to survive in its entirety.This period had also known Augustine of Hippo,Nonius Marcellus and Martianus Capella,among many others.The Middle Ages have known many Arabic writers who revolutionized the Arab world literature,with authors like Ahmad alBuni,Ibn Manzur and Ibn Khaldoun,who wrote the Muqaddimah while staying in Algeria,and many others.Albert Camus was an Algerianborn French PiedNoir author.In  he was awarded the Nobel Prize in literature.double imagerightLucius Apuleius Platonicus,from Crabbes Historical Dictionary,published in  C.jpgKateb Yacine Nedjma authograph.Today Algeria contains,in its literary landscape,big names having not only marked the Algerian literature,but also the universal literary heritage in Arabic and French.As a first step,there is the publication of novels as the Algerian trilogy of Mohammed Dib,or even Nedjma of Kateb Yacine novel which is often regarded as a monumental and major work.Malek Bennabi,Malek Haddad,Moufdi Zakaria,Abdelhamid Ben Badis,Mohamed Lad AlKhalifa,Mouloud Mammeri,Frantz Fanon,and Assia Djebar.In the aftermath of the independence,several new authors emerged on the Algerian literary scene,they will attempt through their works to expose a number of social problems,among them there are Rachid Boudjedra,Rachid Mimouni,Leila Sebbar,Tahar Djaout and Tahir Wattar.Currently,a part of Algerian writers tends to be defined in a literature of shocking expression,due to the terrorism that occurred during the s,Among the most noted recent works,there is the writer,the swallows of Kabul and the attack of Yasmina Khadra,the oath of barbarians of Boualem Sansal,Commented out: File:Dahman harrachi.The undisputed master of this music is El Hadj MHamed El Anka.File:Anka.File:Cheb Khaled performed in Oran on July th .Folk music styles include Bedouin music,characterized by the poetic songs based on long kacida poems; Kabyle music,based on a rich repertoire that is poetry and old tales passed through generations; Shawiya music,a folklore from diverse areas of the Aurs Mountains.Rahaba music style is unique to the Aures.Souad Massi is a rising Algerian folk singer.Other Algerian singers of the diaspora include Manel Filali in Germany and Kenza Farah in France.Tergui music is sung in Tuareg languages generally,Tinariwen had a worldwide success.Finally,the stafi music is born in Stif and remains a unique style of its kind.Modern music is available in several facets,Ra music is a style typical of Western Algeria.Algeria RapRap,relatively recent style in Algeria,is experiencing significant growth.File:Chronique des annees de braise.jpgthumbChronicle of the Years of Fire,the film won the Palme dOr prize at the  Cannes Film Festival.lt;ref namequot;festivalcannes.comquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.festivalcannes.comenarchivesficheFilmidyear.html titleFestival de Cannes: Chronicle of the Years of Fire accessdate April workfestivalcannes.allocated to production,renovate the cinema stock and remedy the weak links in distribution and exploitation.The financial support provided by the state,through the Fund for the Development of the Arts,Techniques and the Film Industry FDATIC and the Algerian Agency for Cultural Influence AARC,plays a key role in the promotion of national production.Between  and ,FDATIC subsidised  films feature films,documentaries and short films.In mid,AARC had already supported a total of  films,including  feature films,short films and  documentaries.According to the European Audiovisual Observatorys LUMIERE database,and ,respectively.lt;refgt;Ali,Sahar  March  http:www.intdocumentsRapportAlgCArieFR.pdf ALGRIE.Algeria won the Palme dOr for Chronicle of the Years of Fire ,two Oscars for Z  filmZ ,and other awards for The Battle of Algiers.File:ACON  CIV ALG .Various games have existed in Algeria since antiquity.In the Aurs MountainsAures,people played several games such As El Kherdba or El khergueba chess variant.Playing cards,checkers and chess games are part of Algerian culture.lt;refgt;cite web  urlhttp:www.britannica.The second Algerian Medalist was Alain Mimoun in  Summer Olympics in Melbourne.Several men and women were champions in athletics in the s including Noureddine Morceli,Hassiba Boulmerka,Nouria MrahBenidaNouria MerahBenida,and Taoufik Makhloufi,all specialized in middle distance running.lt;refgt;cite web  urlhttp:www.Football in AlgeriaFootball is the most popular sport in Algeria.Several names are engraved in the history of the sport,including Lakhdar Belloumi,Rachid Mekhloufi,Hacne LalmasHassen Lalmas,Rabah Madjer,Salah Assad and Djamel Zidane.The Algeria national football team qualified for the  FIFA World Cup,FIFA World Cup,FIFA World Cup and  FIFA World Cup.In addition,lt;refgt;cite news  urlhttp:www.skysports.File:Bulgur wheat salad.Algerian cuisine is rich and diverse.The country was considered as the quot;granary of Romequot;.It offers a component of dishes and varied dishes,depending on the region and according to the seasons.The cuisine uses cereals as the main products,since they are always produced with abundance in the country.There is not a dish where cereals are not present.Algerian cuisine varies from one region to another,according to seasonal vegetables.It can be prepared using meat,fish and vegetables.Among the dishes known,couscous,lt;ref namequot;WDLquot;gt;cite web url  http:www.orgenitem title  Luce Ben Aben,Moorish Women Preparing Couscous,Algiers,Algeria website  World Digital Library year   accessdate   September  lt;refgt; chorba,Rechta,Chakhchoukha,Berkoukes,Shakshouka,Mthewem,Chtitha,Mderbel,Dolma,Brik or Bourek,Garantita,Lhamhlou,etc.Merguez sausage is widely used in Algeria,but it differs,depending on the region and on the added spices.Cakes are marketed and can be found in cities either in Algeria,in Europe or North America.However,traditional cakes are also made at home,following the habits and customs of each family.Among these cakes,there are Tamina,Chrik,Garn logzelles,Griouech,Kalb ellouz,Makroud,Mbardja,Mchewek,Samsa,Tcharak,Baghrir,Khfaf,Zlabia,Aarayech,Ghroubiya and Mghergchette.Algerian pastry also contains Tunisian or French cakes.Marketed and homemade bread products include varieties such as Kessra or Khmira or Harchaya,chopsticks and socalled washers Khoubz dar or Matloue.Other tradionel meals ChakhchokhaHassouaTchichaMahjouba and Doubara are famous in Biskra.Algeria had inadequate numbers of physicians .per ,people,nurses .per ,people,and dentists .per ,people.Some  of Algerians living in urban areas,but only  of those living in rural areas,had access to quot;improved sanitationquot;.According to the World Bank,Given Algerias young population,policy favors preventive health care and clinics over hospitals.In keeping with this policy,the government maintains an immunization program.However,poor sanitation and unclean water still cause tuberculosis,hepatitis,measles,typhoid fever,cholera and dysentery.The poor generally receive health care free of charge.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:lcweb.govfrdcsprofilesAlgeria.lt;refgt;cite bookauthor Kemp,Thomas Jay titleInternational Vital Records Handbookurlhttps:books.google.combooks?File:Nouria BenghabritRemaoun in Blida.JPGthumbNouria BenghabritRemaoun,Since the s,in a centralized system that was designed to significantly reduce the rate of illiteracy,now the literacy rate is around .Since ,Arabic is used as the language of instruction during the first nine years of schooling.From the third year,French is taught and it is also the language of instruction for science classes.The students can also learn English,Italian,Spanish and German.In ,new programs at the elementary appeared,therefore the compulsory schooling does not start at the age of six anymore,but at the age of five.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.pressedz.comrevuedepresseversionimprimablelesveritesdebenbouzid.html titleEcoles prives,Tamazight,enseignement du Franais,syndicatsamp;nbsp;.Les vrits de Benbouzid publisherPressedz.Apart from the  private,learning at school,the Universities of the State are free of charge.After nine years of primary school,students can go to the high school or to an educational institution.The school offers two programs: general or technical.At the end of the third year of secondary school,students pass the exam of the bachelors degree,which allows once it is successful to pursue graduate studies in universities and institutes.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.algeriedz.comarticle.html titleLe taux danalphabtisme en Algrie est de ,publisherAlgeriedz.File:Des levesen Algrie.Education is officially compulsory for children between the ages of six and .In ,the illiteracy rate for people over  was .for men and .for women.The province with the lowest rate of illiteracy was Algiers Province at .while the province with the highest rate was Djelfa Province at .dzIMGpdfpopnational.Algeria has  universities and  institutions of higher education,which must accommodate a million Algerians and ,foreign students in .The University of Algiers,founded in ,is the oldest,it offers education in various disciplines law,medicine,science and letters.Even if some of them offer instruction in Arabic like areas of law and the economy,most of the other sectors as science and medicine continue to be provided in French and English.Among the most important universities,there are the University of Sciences and Technology Houari Boumediene,the University of Mentouri Constantine,University of Oran EsSenia.they occupy the th and th row in Africa.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:webometrics.infoenAfricaAlgeria titleAlgeria amp;; Ranking Web of Universities publisherWebometrics.info accessdate January  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:webometrics.Ageron,CharlesRobert .Modern Algeriaamp;nbsp; A History from  to the Present.Translated from French and edited by Michael Brett.London: C.Hurst amp; CoHurst.ISBN .Aghrout,Ahmed; Bougherira,Redha M.Algeria in Transitionamp;nbsp; Reforms and Development Prospects.Routledge.ISBN .Bennoune,Mahfoud .The Making of Contemporary Algeriaamp;nbsp; Colonial Upheavals and PostIndependence Development,Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.ISBN .Frantz FanonFanon,Frantz ;  paperback.The Wretched of the Earth.Grove Press.ASIN BFWAW,ISBN .Alistair HorneHorne,Alistair .A Savage War of Peace: Algeria .Viking Adult.ISBN ,Laouisset,Djamel .A Retrospective Study of the Algerian Iron and Steel Industry.New York City: Nova Publishers.ISBN .Roberts,Hugh .The Battlefieldamp;nbsp; Algeria,Studies in a Broken Polity.London: Verso Books.ISBN .Ruedy,John .Modern Algeriaamp;nbsp; The Origins and Development of a Nation.Bloomington: Indiana University Press.ISBN .Stora,Benjamin .Algeria,amp;nbsp; A Short History.Ithaca,New York: Cornell University Press.ISBN .Sidaoui,Riadh .quot;Islamic Politics and the Militaryamp;nbsp; Algeria quot;.https:books.google.combooks?idUouRFVxywIQC Religion and Politicsamp;nbsp; Islam and Muslim Civilisation.Farnham: Ashgate Publishing.ISBN .http:www.elmouradia.http:www.http:www.eduifsfrmCountryProfile.aspx?http:www.enpiinfo.eucountrymed.http:www.zmne.huaarmsdocsVolumeIssuepdf.This is a list of characters in Ayn Rands novel Atlas Shrugged.The following are major characters from the novel.they are listed as quot;majorquot; characters in a widely available study guide,such as CliffsNotes,SparkNotes,they are the focus of an essay in a scholarly book about the novel,such as Essays on Ayn Rands Atlas Shrugged or Ayn Rands Atlas Shrugged.Deleted image removed: Image:TaylorSchillingasDagnyTaggart.jpgthumbupright.rightTaylor Schilling as Dagny Taggart in the  film.Dagny Taggart is the protagonist of the novel.She is VicePresident in Charge of Operations for Taggart Transcontinental,under her brother,James Taggart.Given James incompetence,Dagny is responsible for all the workings of the railroad.Francisco dAnconia is one of the central characters in Atlas Shrugged,an owner by inheritance of the worlds largest copper mining operation.He is a childhood friend,and the first love,of Dagny Taggart.A child prodigy of exceptional talents,Francisco was dubbed the quot;climaxquot; of the dAnconia line,an already prestigious family of skilled industrialists.He began working while still in school,proving that he could have made a fortune without the aid of his familys wealth and power.Later,Francisco bankrupts the dAnconia business to put it out of others reach.His full name is given as quot;Francisco Domingo Carlos Andres Sebastin dAnconiaquot;.lt;refgt;The accent in the given name Sebastin is in accordance with Spanish orthography; however,the same rule would require writing Andrs.John Galt is the primary male hero of Atlas Shrugged.He initially appears as an unnamed menial worker for Taggart Transcontinental,who often dines with Eddie Willers in the employees cafeteria,and leads Eddie to reveal important information about Dagny Taggart and Taggart Transcontinental.Only Eddies side of their conversations is given in the novel.Later in the novel,the reader discovers this workers true identity.Before working for Taggart Transcontinental,Galt worked as an engineer for the Twentieth Century Motor Company,where he secretly invented a generator of usable electric energy from ambient static electricity,but abandoned his prototype,and his employment,when dissatisfied by an easily corrupted novel system of payment.This prototype was found by Dagny Taggart and Hank Rearden.Galt himself remains concealed,throughout much of the novel,in a valley concealed by himself,where he unites the most skillful inventors and business leaders under his leadership.Much of the books third division is given to his broadcast speech,which presents the authors philosophy of Objectivism.Henry known as quot;Hankquot; Rearden is one of the central characters in Atlas Shrugged.He owns the most important steel company in the United States,and invents Rearden Metal,an alloy stronger than steel with similar properties to stainless steel.He lives in Philadelphia with his wife Lillian,his brother Philip,and his elderly mother.Rearden represents a type of selfmade man or prototypical hero,but responds sexually to Dagny Taggart.His father and grandfather worked for the Taggarts,and himself likewise.He is completely loyal to Dagny and to Taggart Transcontinental.Willers does not possess the creative ability of Galts associates,After Dagny shifts her attention and loyalty to saving the captive Galt,Willers maintains the railroad until its collapse.One of Galts first followers,and world famous as a pirate,who seizes relief ships sent from the United States to the Peoples States of Europe.they have enough capital to rebuild the world.Kept in the background for much of the book,which only knows of Ludlow as a retired film star.Considered a misfit by Galts other adherents,he views his actions as a means to speed the world along in understanding Galts perspective.According to Barbara Branden,who was closely associated with Rand at the time the book was written,there were sections written describing Danneskjlds adventures at sea,cut from the final published text.lt;refgt;Reedstrom,Karen.http:barbarabranden.cominterview.html  Interview with Full Context.Barbara Branden interview in Full Context,October .Republished on barbarabranden.Retrieved  June .lt;refgt; In a  comment at a lecture,Ayn Rand admitted that Danneskjlds name was a tribute to Victor Hugos novel,Hans of Iceland,wherein the hero becomes the first of the Counts of Danneskjld.In the published book,Danneskjld is always seen through the eyes of others Dagny Taggart or Hank Rearden,except for a brief paragraph in the very last chapter.The President of Taggart Transcontinental and the books most important antagonist.Taggart is an expert influence peddler but incapable of making operational decisions on his own.He relies on his sister,Dagny Taggart,to actually run the railroad,In a sense,he is the antithesis of Dagny.and the horror that he will succeed at this.In the final chapters of the novel,The unsupportive wife of Hank Rearden,who dislikes his habits and secretly at first seeks to ruin Rearden to prove her own value.Lillian achieves this,when she passes information to James Taggart about her husbands affair with his sister.Lillian thereafter uses James Taggart for sexual satisfaction,until Hank abandons her.Ferris is a biologist who works as quot;coordinatorquot; at the State Science Institute.He uses his position there to deride reason and productive achievement,and publishes a book entitled Why Do You Think You Think?He clashes on several occasions with Hank Rearden,and twice attempts to blackmail Rearden into giving up Rearden Metal.Ferris hosts the demonstration of the Project X weapon,and is the creator of the Ferris Persuader,a torture machine.When John Galt is captured by the looters,Ferris uses the device on Galt,but it breaks down before extracting the information Ferris wants from Galt.A former professor at Patrick Henry University,and along with colleague Hugh Akston,mentor to Francisco dAnconia,John Galt and Ragnar Danneskjld.He has since become a sellout,one who had great promise but squandered it for social approval,to the detriment of the free.including the instrument of his demise: Project X Xylophone.The character was,in part,modeled on J.Robert Oppenheimer,whom Rand had interviewed for an earlier project,and his part in the creation of nuclear weapons.lt;refgt;David Harriman,Journals of Ayn Rand,esp.lt;refgt; To his former student Galt,Stadler represents the epitome of human evil,as the quot;man who knew betterquot; but chose not to act for the good.The incompetent and treacherous lobbyist whom Hank Rearden reluctantly employs in Washington,Washington,who rises to prominence and authority throughout the novel through trading favours and disloyalty.In return for betraying Hank by helping broker the Equalization of Opportunity Bill which,by restricting the number of businesses each person may own to one,forces Hank to divest most of his companies,he is given a senior position at the Bureau of Economic Planning and National Resources.Later in the novel he becomes its Top Coordinator,a position that eventually becomes Economic Dictator of the country.The following secondary characters also appear in the novel.but do not meet the criteria for quot;major.quot; Minor characters who are not listed in secondary works are not listed here.Hugh Akston is identified as quot;One of the last great advocates of reason.where he taught Francisco dAnconia,John Galt,and Ragnar Danneskjld.He was,along with Robert Stadler,a father figure to these three.Akstons name is so hallowed that a young lady,on hearing that Francisco had studied under him,is shocked.She thought he must have been one of those great names from an earlier century.He now works as a cook in a roadside diner,and proves extremely skillful at the job.When Dagny tracks him down,and before she discovers his true identity,he rejects her enthusiastic offer to manage the dining car services for Taggart Transcontinental.He is based on Aristotle.Jeff Allen is a tramp who stows away on a Taggart train during one of Dagnys crosscountry trips.Instead of throwing him out,she allows him to ride as her guest.as well as a hint of John Galts true background.Calvin Atwood is owner of Atwood Light and Power Company and joins Galts strike.Mayor Bascom is the mayor of Rome,Wisconsin,who reveals part of the history of the Twentieth Century Motor Company.Blodgett is the scientist who pulls the lever to demonstrate Project X.Orren Boyle is the head of Associated Steel,antithesis of Hank Rearden and a friend of James Taggart.He is an investor in the San Sebastin Mines.Laura Bradford is an actress and Kip Chalmerss mistress.Bill Brent is the chief dispatcher for the Colorado Division of Taggart Transcontinental,who tries to prevent the Taggart Tunnel disaster.She marries him thinking he is the heroic person behind Taggart Transcontinental.Cherryl is at first harsh towards Dagny,having believed Jim Taggarts descriptions of his sister,until she questions employees of the railroad.Upon learning that her scorn had been misdirected,Cherryl puts off apologizing to Dagny out of shame until the night before she commits suicide,when she confesses to Dagny that when she married Jim,She eventually commits suicide,unable to live with her worthless husband,and unable to escape.Millie Bush was quot;a mean,Emma Chalmers,Kip Chalmers mother,gains some influence after his death.Known as quot;Kips Ma,As a result,the years wheat crop from Minnesota never reaches the rest of the country,but instead rots in storage; also,the soybean crop is lost,having been reaped too early.Kip Chalmers is a Washington man who has decided to run for election as Legislator from California.On the way to his campaign,the Taggart Transcontinental train that is carrying him encounters a split rail,resulting in the destruction of its diesel engine.The result is the suffocation of all passengers and the destruction of the Taggart Tunnel.Dan Conway is the middleaged president of the PhoenixDurango railroad.Running a railroad is just about the only thing he knows.When the Antidogeatdog Rule is used to drive his business out of Colorado,he loses the will to fight,and resigns himself to a quiet life of books and fishing.Ken Danagger owns Danagger Coal in Pennsylvania.He helps Hank Rearden illegally make Rearden Metal,Quentin Daniels is an enterprising engineer hired by Dagny Taggart to reconstruct John Galts motor.Partway through this process,Quentin withdraws his effort for the same reasons John Galt himself had.Dagnys pursuit of Quentin leads her to Galts Gulch.Sebastian dAnconia was the th or th Century founder of the dAnconia dynasty.leaving behind a palace and his beloved.Started a small mine in South America,which became the beginning of a mining empire and a new fortune and a new palace.Eventually sent for his beloved who had waited for him many years.He is the role model which Francisco dAnconia looks to,as Dagny Taggart looks to Nathaniel Taggart.Francisco remarks that their respective ancestors would have liked each other.Balph Eubank is called quot;the literary leader of the agequot;,despite the fact that no book he has written has sold more than ,copies.He complains that it is disgraceful that artists are treated as peddlers,and that there should be a law limiting the sales of books to ,copies.He is a misogynist who thinks it disgusting that Dagny Taggart is a railroad vicepresident.The Fishwife is one of the strikers,disheveled hair and large eyesquot;,and is a writer.Galt says she quot;wouldnt be published outside.She believes that when one deals with words,one deals with the mind.quot; According to Barbara Branden in her book The Passion of Ayn Rand,google.combooks?lt;refgt;cite webauthorLeonard Peikoff urlhttp:www.peikoff.cominatlasshruggedwhenjohnisgivingdagnythetour titleIn Atlas Shrugged,when John is giving Dagny the tour of the valley,Did Ayn Rand intend this character to be a representation of herself?Podcast  Peikoff publisherPeikoff.Lawrence Hammond runs Hammond Cars in Colorado,one of the few companies in existence that still produces topquality vehicles.He eventually quits and joins the strike.Richard Halley is Dagny Taggarts favorite composer,who mysteriously disappeared after the evening of his greatest triumph.Halley spent years as a struggling and unappreciated composer.At age ,his opera Phaethon was performed for the first time,to an audience who booed and heckled it.After  years,Phaethon was performed again,but this time it was received to the greatest ovation the opera house had ever heard.The following day,Halley retired,sold the rights to his music,and disappeared.It is later revealed that he has joined the strike and settled in Galts Gulch.William Hastings is the widow of the chief engineer at the Twentieth Century Motor Company.Her husband quit shortly after Galt did and joined the strike some years later.Her lead allows Dagny to find Hugh Akston.Thomas Hendricks is a famous brain surgeon who developed a new method of preventing strokes.He joined Galts strike when the American medical system was put under government control.but he has only one major appearance: during the Washington meeting with Hank Rearden.A failed businessman,he laments constantly that noone ever gave him a chance.Gwen Ives is Hank Reardens secretary.Owen Kellogg is Assistant to the Manager of the Taggart Terminal in New York.He catches Dagny Taggarts eye as one of the few competent men on staff.After seeing the sorry state of the Ohio Division,she decides to make him its new Superintendent.However,as soon as she returns to New York,Kellogg informs her that he is quitting his job.Owen Kellogg eventually reaches,and settles in,Galts Gulch.Gilbert KeithWorthing is a British novelist of erstwhile fame,now neglected but still considered a quot;walking classicquot;.after giving some statements.Fred Kinnan is a labor leader and member of the looter cabal.Unlike the others,however,Kinnan is straightforward and honest about his purpose.At the end of Galts threehour speech,he expresses admiration for the man,as he says what he means.Despite this,Kinnan admits that he is one of the people Galt is out to destroy.Paul Larkin is an unsuccessful,middleaged businessman,a friend of the Rearden family.He meets with the other Looters to work out a plan to bring Rearden down.James Taggart knows he is friends with Hank Rearden and challenges his loyalty,and Larkin assures Taggart that he will go along with them.Eugene Lawson heads the Community Bank of Madison,then gets a job with the government when it his bank goes bankrupt.One of the looters cabal,he is a collectivist who abhors production and moneymaking.He believes melody is a primitive vulgarity.He is one of Lillian Reardens friends and a member of the cultural elite.Pat Logan is the engineer on the first run of the John Galt Line.He later strikes.Kay Ludlow is a beautiful actress and the wife of Ragnar Danneskjld.Dick McNamara is a contractor who finished the San Sebastian Line.Dagny Taggart plans to hire him to lay the new Rearden Metal track for the Rio Norte Line,but before she does so,he mysteriously disappears.She later discovers that he has joined the strike and settled in Galts Gulch.Cuffy Meigs is the Director of Unification for the railroad business.He carries a pistol and a lucky rabbits foot,and he dresses in a military uniform,and has been described as quot;impervious to thoughtquot;.Meigs seizes control of Project X and accidentally destroys it,demolishing the countrys last railroad bridge across the Mississippi River and killing himself,his men,and Dr.Stadler.Dave Mitchum is a statehired superintendent of the Colorado Division of Taggart Transcontinental.He is partially responsible for the Taggart Tunnel disaster.Chick Morrison holds the position of quot;Morale Conditionerquot; in the government.He quits when society begins to collapse and flees to a stronghold in Tennessee.His fellow looters consider it unlikely that he will survive.Horace Bussby Mowen is the president of the Amalgamated Switch and Signal Company,Inc.of Connecticut.Dagny Taggart hires Mowen to produce switches made of Rearden Metal.He is reluctant to build anything with this unproven technology,and has to be cajoled into accepting the contract.When pressured by public opinion,he discontinues production of the switches,forcing Dagny to find an alternative source.When the order came down,he liquidated his entire business,paid off his depositors,and joined Galts strike.He is the legal owner of the land where Galts Gulch is located.Mulligans birth name was Michael,which Mulligan took as a compliment.When Narragansetts ruling was reversed on appeal,he retired and joined the strike.At the end of the novel,he is seen editing the United States Constitution,Nealy is incompetent,but Dagny can find no one better in all the country.Nealy believes that anything can get done with enough muscle power.He sees no role for intelligence in human achievement.He relies on Dagny and Ellis Wyatt to run things,and resents them for doing it,because it appears to him like they are just bossing people around.Ted Nielsen is the head of Nielsen Motors.He eventually goes on strike,along with most of the other industrialist quot;producerquot; types,by closing his motor factory.Dagny later finds him when she visits Galts Gulch for the first time.Betty Pope is a wealthy socialite who is having a meaningless sexual affair with James Taggart.She is deliberately crude in a way that casts ridicule on her high social position.Potter holds some undefined position with the State Science Institute.He is sent to try to obtain the rights to Rearden Metal.He believes that man is nothing but a collection of chemicals,reason is a superstition,it is futile to seek meaning in life,and the duty of a philosopher is to show that nothing can be understood.Reardens mother,whose name is not mentioned,lives with Rearden at his home in Philadelphia.She is involved in charity work,and berates Rearden whenever she can.She dotes on her weak son Philip Rearden.Philip Rearden is the younger brother of Hank Rearden.He lives in his brothers home in Philadelphia and is completely dependent on him.He is resentful of his brothers charity.Dwight Sanders owns Sanders Aircraft,a producer of highquality airplanes,and joins the strike.Bertram Scudder is an editorial writer for the magazine The Future.He typically bashes business and businessmen,but he never says anything specific in his articles,relying on innuendo,sneers,and denunciation.He wrote a hatchet job on Hank Rearden called The Octopus.He is also vocal in support of the Equalization of Opportunity Bill.He believes that ideas are just air,that this is no time for talk,but for action.Global Progress is a sponsor of the Equalization of Opportunity Bill.Gerald and Ivy Starnes are the two surviving children of Jed Starnes,the founder of the Twentieth Century Motor Company.Together with their sincedeceased brother Eric,they instituted a communistic paymentandbenefits program that drove the company into bankruptcy.Gerald,a dying alcoholic,and Ivy,a New AgepseudoBuddhist ascetic,Eric was a weak,attentionseeking man with a pathological desire to be loved.He committed suicide after the woman he loved married another man.Gerald claims that he always acted for the good of the employees,but he was vain and incompetent and often threw lavish parties using company funds.Ivy,on the other hand,is described as a sadist who relishes seeing others in poverty,but who has no desire for wealth of her own.Andrew Stockton runs the Stockton Foundry in Stockton,Colorado.When he joins the strike,he opens a foundry in Galts Gulch.Nathaniel quot;Natquot; Taggart was the founder of Taggart Transcontinental.He built his railroad without any government handouts,and ran the business for no other reason than to turn a profit.He began as a penniless adventurer and ended up as one of the wealthiest men in the country.and never apologized for becoming wealthy and successful.He was one of the most hated men of his time.Dagny is often inspired by looking at a statue of Nat Taggart at the railroad headquarters,It is suspected that he is modeled after James Jerome Hill,builder or the Great Northern Railroad.Thompson is the quot;Head of StateHead of the Statequot; for the United States.He is not particularly intelligent and has a very undistinguished look.He knows politics,however,and is a master of public relations and backroom deals.Rands notes indicate that she modeled him on President Harry S.Truman,Lester Tuck is the press agent for Kip Chalmers.Dagny considers him the least bad of the government representatives,since he does have some real knowledge on the running of trains.She notices,however,that he is the least appreciated by his own bosses.The Wet Nurse Tony is a young bureaucrat sent by the government to watch over Reardens mills.Though he starts out as a cynical follower of the looters code,his experience at the mills transforms him,and he comes to respect and admire the producers.He is shot attempting to inform Hank Rearden about a government plot,but does succeed in warning Rearden just before he dies.Ellis Wyatt is the head of Wyatt Oil.When first introduced,he is aggressive towards Dagny,whom he does not yet know and whom he blames for what are,in fact,her brothers policies which directly threaten his business.When the government passes laws and decrees which make it impossible for him to continue,he sets all his oil wells on fire,leaving a jeering note: quot;I am leaving it as I found it.Take over.Its yours.Later Dagny meets him in Galts Gulch.http:www.atlaslisted.cite book titleThe New Ayn Rand Companion lastGladstein firstMimi Reisel locationWestport,locationBurlington,DEFAULTSORT:Atlas Shrugged Characters,commentRedirect to Atlas Shrugged,moved content.See talk page.commentReverting possible vandalism by Special:Contribs.to version by Peter SamFan.WP:CBFPReport False Positive?Thanks,WP:CBNGClueBot NG.AnthropologyimageFile:P human body.File:Encyclopedia of Anthropology.Anthropology is the study of humans and their societysocieties in the past and present.lt;ref nameoedgt;cite web  titleanthropology  urlhttp:oxforddictionaries.comdefinitionenglishanthropology?britannica.urlhttp:www.aaanet.orgaboutwhatisanthropology.linguistic anthropology,which investigates the influence of language in social life,and biological anthropologybiological or physical anthropology,Archaeology,which studies past human cultures through investigation of physical evidence,is thought of as a branch of anthropology in the United States,lt;refgt;citation titleCultural Anthropology: The Human Challenge firstWilliam A.last Haviland first Harald E.it is viewed as a discipline in its own right,or grouped under other related disciplines such as history.The abstract noun wiktionary:anthropologyanthropology is first attested in reference to history.lt;ref nameoedgt;refngroupnRichard Harvey astrologerRichard Harveys  Philadelphus,a defense of the legend of Brutus of BritainBrutus in History of BritainBritish history,includes the passage quot;Genealogy or issue which they had,Artes which they studied,Actes which they did.This part of History is named Anthropology.google.combooks?quot;humanquot; and lgos langgrclinktext,quot;sciencestudyquot;.lt;ref nameoedgt;Oxford English Dictionary,stamp;nbsp;ed.quot;anthropology,quot; Oxford University Press Oxford,lt;refgt; Its adjectival form appeared in the works of Aristotle.lt;ref nameoedgt; It began to be used in English,possibly via French languageFrench langfranthropologie,by the early th century.a Discourse or Description of Man,or of a Mans Body.the Bartholins,founders of the University of Copenhagen,Du Prat  year  titleInstitutions anatomiques de Gaspar Bartholin,Hnault et J.Hnault  chapterPreface .Anthropology,that is to say the science that treats of man,is divided ordinarily and with reason into Anatomy,which considers the body and the parts,and Psychology,which speaks of the soul.refngroupnIn French: LAnthropologie,cest  dire la science qui traite de lhomme,est divise ordinairment amp; avec raison en lAnatomie,qui considere le corps amp; les parties,et en la Psychologie,qui parle de lAme.Sporadic use of the term for some of the subject matter occurred subsequently,such as the use by tienne Serres in  to describe the natural history,or paleontology,of man,based on comparative anatomy,Various shortlived organizations  of anthropologists had already been formed.The Socit Ethnologique de Paris,the first to use Ethnology,was formed in .Its members were primarily antislavery activists.When slavery was abolished in France in  the Socit was abandoned.Meanwhile,the Ethnological Society of New York,currently the American Ethnological Society,was founded on its model in ,as well as the Ethnological Society of London in ,a breakaway group of the Aborigines Protection Society.lt;ref nameSchillergt;harvnbSchillerpplt;refgt; These anthropologists of the times were liberal,antislavery,and proHuman rightshumanrights activists.They maintained international connections.Theorists in such diverse fields as comparative anatomyanatomy,Comparative method linguisticslinguistics,and  Ethnology,making  featurebyfeature comparisons of their subject matters,were beginning to suspect that similarities between animals,languages,and folkways were the result of processes or laws unknown to them then.lt;refgt;harvnbSchillerplt;refgt; For them,Darwin and Wallace unveiled evolution in the late s.There was an immediate rush to bring it into the social sciences.the Society of Anthropology of ParisSocit dAnthropologie de Paris,meeting for the first time in Paris in .Delivered in the Lectureroom of the U.publisherD.Lothrop amp; Co.; Judd amp; Detweiler  urlGoogle booksdEJAQAAIAAJplainurlyes.lt;refgt;refngroupnAs Robert Fletcher anthropologistFletcher points out,the French society was by no means the first to include anthropology or parts of it as its topic.Previous organizations used other names.The German Anthropological Association of St.Petersburg,however,in fact met first in ,but due to the death of its founder never met again.lt;ref nameFletchergt; When he read Darwin he became an immediate convert to Transformisme,as the French called evolutionism.lt;refgt;harvnbSchillerplt;refgt; His definition now became quot;the study of the human group,considered as a whole,in its details,and in relation to the rest of naturequot;.Broca,being what today would be called a Neurosurgeryneurosurgeon,had taken an interest in the pathology of speech.He wanted to localize the difference between man and the other animals,which appeared to reside in speech.He discovered the speech center of the human brain,today called Brocas area after him.His interest was mainly in Biological anthropology,but a German philosopher specializing in psychology,Theodor Waitz,took up the theme of general and social anthropology in his sixvolume work,entitled Die Anthropologie der Naturvlker,The title was soon translated as quot;The Anthropology of Primitive Peoplesquot;.The last two volumes were published posthumously.Waitz defined anthropology as quot;the science of the nature of manquot;.he was an Animismanimist.Following Brocas lead,Waitz points out that anthropology is a new field,which would gather material from other fields,but would differ from them in the use of comparative anatomy,physiology,and psychology to differentiate man from quot;the animals nearest to himquot;.He stresses that the data of comparison must be empirical,gathered by experimentation.It is to be presumed fundamentally that the species,man,is a unity,and that quot;the same laws of thought are applicable to all menquot;.Waitz was influential among the British ethnologists.which henceforward would follow the path of the new anthropology rather than just ethnology.It was the nd society dedicated to general anthropology in existence.Representatives from the French Socit were present,though not Broca.In his keynote address,printed in the first volume of its new publication,The Anthropological Review,Hunt stressed the work of Waitz,adopting his definitions as a standard.lt;ref namehuntgt; Among the first associates were the young Edward Burnett Tylor,inventor of cultural anthropology,and his brother Alfred Tylor,a geologist.Previously Edward had referred to himself as an ethnologist; subsequently,an anthropologist.Similar organizations in other countries followed: The American Anthropological Association in ,the Anthropological Society of Madrid ,the Anthropological Society of Vienna ,the Italian Society of Anthropology and Ethnology ,and many others subsequently.The majority of these were evolutionist.One notable exception was the :de:Berliner Gesellschaft fr Anthropologie,Ethnologie und UrgeschichteBerlin Society of Anthropology  founded by Rudolph Virchow,known for his vituperative attacks on the evolutionists.Not religious himself,he insisted that Darwins conclusions lacked empirical foundation.most independent,most publishing their own journals,and all international in membership and association.The major theorists belonged to these organizations.None of the  faculty members were under a department named anthropology.many thousands in number.Anthropology has diversified from a few major subdivisions to dozens more.Practical anthropology,the use of anthropological knowledge and technique to solve specific problems,has arrived; for example,Organization has reached global level.For example,the World Council of Anthropological Associations WCAA,quot;a network of national,currently contains members from about three dozen nations.wcaanet.orgindex.Since the work of Franz Boas and Bronisaw Malinowski in the late th and early th centuries,longterm indepth examination of context,Cultural anthropology in particular has emphasized cultural relativism,holism,and the use of findings to frame cultural critiques.lt;ref namequot;Hylland Eriksen  p.quot;gt;Hylland Eriksen,Thomas.quot;What is Anthropologyquot; Pluto.London.lt;refgt; This has been particularly prominent in the United States,from Boas arguments against thcentury racial ideology,through Margaret Meads advocacy for gender equality and sexual liberation,to current criticisms of postcolonialismpostcolonial oppression and promotion of multiculturalism.see Spiro,Melford E.quot; in Culture and Human Nature: Theoretical Papers of Melford E.Spiro.Edited by B.Kilborne and L.Langness,amp;nbsp;.Chicago: University of Chicago Press.lastGoodyfirstJacktitleAfter Tylor: British Social Anthropology .journalThe American Historical Reviewvolumeissueyearpagesissndoi.In Great Britain and the Commonwealth countries,the British tradition of social anthropology tends to dominate.In the United States,cultural anthropologycultural,These fields frequently overlap,but tend to use different methodologies and techniques.Kollr in .In noncolonial European countries,social anthropology is now defined as the study of social organization in nonstate societies.lt;refgt;Layton,Robert  An Introduction to Theory in Anthropology.Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.Anthropology is a global discipline where humanities,social,and natural sciences are forced to confront one another.Anthropology builds upon knowledge from natural sciences,including the discoveries about the origin and evolution of HumanHomo sapiens,human physical traits,human behavior,the variations among different groups of humans,how the evolutionary past of Homo sapiens has influenced its social organization and culture,and from social sciences,including the organization of human social and cultural relations,institutions,social conflicts,etc.lt;refgt;http:www.aaanet.orgaboutWhatisAnthropology.lt;refgt;Harris,Marvin.The Rise of Anthropological Theory.Alta Mira Press.revised from ; Harris,Marvin.Theories of Culture in Postmodern Times.Altamira.lt;refgt;lt;ref nameAhmedgt;Cite journal  last  Ahmed  first  Akbar S.jstor   lt;refgt; As such,lt;refgt;cite journal titleLanguage,Anthropology and Cognitive Science authorBloch,refharv lt;refgt; global studies,and various ethnic studies.According to Clifford Geertz,Long after natural history,moral philosophy,philology,and political economy have dissolved into their specialized successors,it has remained a diffuse assemblage of ethnology,human biology,comparative linguistics,and prehistory,held together mainly by the vested interests,sunk costs,and administrative habits of academia,and by a romantic image of comprehensive scholarship.Segal editorSylvia J.as well as a shift toward the analysis of modern societies.During the s and s,lt;refgt;Geertz,Behar,Clifford amp; Jameslt;refgt;Page neededdateOctober  During this shift,In contrast,archaeology and biological anthropology remained largely positivist.Due to this difference in epistemology,the four subfields of anthropology have lacked cohesion over the last several decades.while social anthropology is the study of the relationships among persons and groups.literature and the arts how ones culture affects experience for self and group,contributing to more complete understanding of the peoples knowledge,customs,and institutions,while social anthropology is more related to sociology and history.lt;ref namequot;Ingoldpxvquot;gt; in that it helps develop understanding of social structures,typically of others and other populations such as minorities,subgroups,dissidents,etc.There is no hardandfast distinction between them,and these categories overlap to a considerable degree.Inquiry in sociocultural anthropology is guided in part by cultural relativism,the attempt to understand other societies in terms of their own cultural symbols and values.Ethnography can refer to both a methodology and the product of ethnographic research,an ethnographic monograph.As methodology,ethnography is based upon longterm fieldwork within a community or other research site.Participant observation is one of the foundational methods of social and cultural anthropology.lt;refgt;Bernard,Russell,Research Methods in Anthropology.Altamira Press,lt;refgt;  Ethnology involves the systematic comparison of different cultures.etic,or technical point of view.The study of kinship and social organization is a central focus of sociocultural anthropology,as kinship is a human universal.law and conflict resolution,patterns of consumption and exchange,material culture,technology,infrastructure,gender relations,ethnicity,childrearing and socialization,religion,myth,symbols,values,etiquette,worldview,sports,music,nutrition,recreation,games,food,festivals,and language which is also the object of study in linguistic anthropology.Comparison across cultures is a key element of method in sociocultural anthropology,including the industrialized and deindustrialized West.White  year  volume  pages  refharv  urlhttp:repositories.cdlib.orgimbssocdynwpStandardCrossCulturalSample  authorlinkDouglas R.Africa File:African sccs cultures.hlist Nama peopleNama Hottentot   !CircumMediterranean File:Circummediterannean sccs cultures.East Eurasia File:East eurasian sccs cultures.Insular Pacific File:Insular pacific.North America File:North american sccs cultures.South America File:South america SCCS cultures.File:Human remains.jpgthumbleftForensic anthropologists can help identify skeletonized human remains,such as these found lying in scrub in Western Australia,evolutionary,and demographic dimensions.and that generate,maintain or change contemporary genetic and physiological variation.lt;refgt;University of Toronto.Research Subfields: Physical or Biological.Retrieved  March ,from http:anthropology.utoronto.File:Iowa archaeology edgewater.JPGthumbExcavations at the yearold Edgewater Park Site,Archaeology is the study of the human past through its material remains.Artifacts,faunal remains,and human altered landscapes are evidence of the cultural and material lives of past societies.who are presumed to have lived in similar ways.lt;refgt;Robbins,amp; Larkin,Cultural Anthropology: A problem based approach.Toronto,ON: Nelson Education Ltd.verbal and nonverbal,variation in language across time and space,the social uses of language,and the relationship between language and culture.Linguistic anthropologists often draw on related fields including sociolinguistics,pragmatics,cognitive linguistics,semiotics,discourse analysis,and narrative analysis.lt;refgt;Salzmann,Zdenk.Language,culture,and society: an introduction to linguistic anthropology.Boulder,CO: Westview Press.media,music,Several anthropologists have noted that the Western categories of painting,sculpture,or literature,conceived as independent artistic activities,do not exist,or exist in a significantly different form,in most nonWestern contexts.lt;refgt;Robert Layton.The Anthropology of Art.lt;refgt; To surmount this difficulty,anthropologists of art have focused on formal features in objects which,without exclusively being artistic,have certain evident aesthetic qualities.Boas Primitive Art,File:Punu mask Gabon.JPGthumbuprightleftA Punu tribe mask.audiences,and other cultural and social aspects of mass media.The types of ethnographic contexts explored range from contexts of media production e.ethnographies of newsrooms in newspapers,journalists in the field,film production to contexts of media reception,following audiences in their everyday responses to media.Other types include cyber anthropology,a relatively new area of internet research,as well as ethnographies of other areas of research which happen to involve media,such as development work,social movements,or health education.This is in addition to many classic ethnographic contexts,where media such as radio,newspaperthe press,new media and television have started to make their presences felt since the early s.lt;refgt;Deborah Spitulnik.Anthropology and Mass Media,Annual Review of Anthropology,: lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Lila AbuLughod.The Interpretation of Cultures after Television,Representations,that emphasize its cultural,social,material,cognitive,biological,Visual anthropology  is concerned,in part,with the study and production of ethnographyethnographic photography,film and,since the mids,new media.While the term is sometimes used interchangeably with ethnographic film,visual anthropology also encompasses the anthropological study of visual representation,including areas such as performance,museums,art,and the production and reception theoryreception of anthropology of mediamass media.Visual representations from all cultures,such as sandpaintings,tattoos,sculptures and reliefs,cave paintings,scrimshaw,jewelry,hieroglyphics,paintings and photographs are included in the focus of visual anthropology.Economic,political economic,Economic anthropology attempts to explain human economic behavior in its widest historic,geographic and cultural scope.It has a complex relationship with the discipline of economics,of which it is highly critical.Its origins as a subfield of anthropology begin with the PolishBritish founder of Anthropology,Bronislaw Malinowski,and his French compatriot,Marcel Mauss,Economic Anthropology remains,for the most part,focused upon exchange.The school of thought derived from Marx and known as Political Economy focuses on production,in contrast.and have now turned to examine corporations,banks,and the global financial system from an anthropological perspective.including,but not limited to,noncapitalist societies.Three main areas of interest rapidly developed.Sahlins work on Huntergatherers as the original affluent society did much to dissipate that image.The second area was concerned with the vast majority of the worlds population at the time,the peasantry,many of whom were involved in complex revolutionary wars such as in Vietnam.The third area was on colonialism,imperialism,and the creation of the capitalist worldsystem.annurev.lt;refgt; More recently,It is a,quot;complex of related,researchbased,initiation of direct action,andor the formulation of policyquot;.lt;refgt;cite booklastKedia,Satishfirstand Willigen J.VantitleApplied Anthropology: Domains of ApplicationyearpublisherPraegerlocationWestport,Connpages,lt;refgt; More simply,Anthropology of development  tends to view development from a critical perspective.The kind of issues addressed and implications for the approach simply involve pondering why,if a key development goal is to alleviate poverty,is poverty increasing?Why is there such a gap between plans and outcomes?Why is development so externally driven rather than having an internal basis?In short why does so much planned development fail?Kinship,feminism,or it can refer to the patterns of social relationships themselves.Over its history,anthropology has developed a number of related concepts and terms,such as quot;kinshipdescentquot;,quot;descent groupsquot;,quot;lineage anthropologylineagesquot;,quot;affinity lawaffinesquot;,quot;cognatic kinshipcognatesquot;,and even quot;fictive kinshipquot;.Broadly,and also relatives by marriage.Feminist anthropology is a four field approach to anthropology archaeologyarcheological,biological anthropologybiological,cultural anthropologycultural,linguistic anthropologylinguistic that seeks to reduce male bias in research findings,anthropological hiring practices,and the scholarly production of knowledge.Anthropology engages often with feminists from nonWestern traditions,whose perspectives and experiences can differ from those of white European and American feminists.Historically,Feminist anthropologists are centrally concerned with the construction of gender across societies.Feminist anthropology is inclusive of http:www.springerreference.comdocshtmlchapterdbid.html birth anthropology as a specialization.Medical,nutritional,psychological,Medical anthropology is an interdisciplinary field which studies quot;human health and disease,health care systems,and biocultural adaptationquot;.lt;ref nameMcElroygt;Cite book year authorMcElroy,A chapterMedical Anthropology editorD.Levinson editorM.Ember titleEncyclopedia of Cultural Anthropology urlhttp:www.univie.atethnomedicinePDFMedicalAnthropologie.pdf isbn refharv postscriptlt;!Bot inserted parameter.Either remove it; or change its value to quot;.quot; for the cite to end in a quot;.quot;,as necessary.gt;inconsistent citationslt;refgt;  Currently,the interaction of social,; Beneduce,On the other hand,such as cultural psychiatry and transcultural psychiatry or ethnopsychiatry.nutritionnutritional status and food security,and how changes in the former affect the latter.If economic and environmental changes in a community affect access to food,food security,and dietary health,Nutritional status affects overall health status,work performance potential,language,practices,and conceptual categoriesshape processes of human cognition,emotion,perception,motivation,and mental health.It also examines how the understanding of cognition,emotion,motivation,lt;refgt;DAndrade,The development of cognitive anthropology.New York,Cambridge University Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Schwartz,White,et al.Eds.New Directions in Psychological Anthropology.Cambridge,Cambridge University Press.Cognitive anthropology seeks to explain patterns of shared knowledge,cultural innovation,ethnographers,archaeologists,linguists,As with transpersonal psychology,the field is much concerned with altered states of consciousness ASC and transpersonal experience.However,the roles of Mythologymyth,ritual,diet nutritiondiet,and Literaturetexts in evoking and interpreting extraordinary experiences Young and Goulet .Political anthropology concerns the structure of Form of governmentpolitical systems,looked at from the basis of the structure of societies.a new development started from the s,bureaucracies and markets entered both ethnographic accounts and analysis of local phenomena.The turn towards complex societies meant that political themes  were taken up at two main levels.First of all,Second of all,An anthropology of the state developed,and it is a most thriving field today.Geertz comparative work on quot;Negaraquot;,the Balinese state is an early,famous example.lt;refgt;cite book  author  Greenhouse,Carol J.title  Praying for Justice: Faith,Order,crime,sanctions,or formal regulation.More  recent applications include issues such as human rights,legal pluralism,Sullivan lt;refgt;  and political uprisings.Public Anthropology was created by Robert Borofsky,a professor at Hawaii Pacific University,public conversations about them with the explicit goal of fostering social changequot; http:www.publicanthropology.org Borofsky .Nature,lt;refgt;Dumit,Joseph.DavisFloyd,Robbie.Cyborg Anthropology.Routledge International Encyclopedia of Women,Digital anthropology is the study of the relationship between humans and digitalera technology,and extends to various areas where anthropology and technology intersect.It is sometimes grouped with cultural anthropologysociocultural anthropology,and sometimes considered part of material culture.The field is new,and thus has a variety of names with a variety of emphases.These include technoanthropology,lt;refgt;cite web  urlhttp:www.studyguide.cyberanthropology,lt;refgt;cite book  urlhttp:xirdalium.Alexander  isbnlt;refgt; and virtual anthropology.Gerhard authorBookstein,Ecological anthropology is defined as the quot;study of cultural adaptations to environmentsquot;.lt;ref namequot;Townsendquot;gt;cite booklastTownsendfirstPatricia K.Ill.and how people used elements of their culture to maintain their ecosystems.lt;ref namequot;Kottak CP quot;gt;cite journallastKottakfirstConrad P.jstortitleThe New Ecological AnthropologyjournalAmerican Anthropologistvolumepageyeardoi.lt;refgt; The contemporary perspective of environmental anthropology,and arguably at least the backdrop,if not the focus of most of the ethnographies and cultural fieldworks of today,is political ecology.Many characterize this new perspective as more informed with culture,politics and power,globalization,localized issues,and more.annurev.and to prevent corporate exploitation and damage of land.Often,the observer has become an active part of the struggle either directly organizing,participation or indirectly articles,documentaries,books,ethnographies.google.combooks?It is also the study of the history of various ethnic groups that may or may not exist today.Ethnohistory uses both historical and ethnographic data as its foundation.Its historical methods and materials go beyond the standard use of documents and manuscripts.Practitioners recognize the utility of such source material as maps,music,paintings,photography,folklore,oral tradition,site exploration,archaeological materials,museum collections,enduring customs,language,and place names.lt;ref namequot;Axtellquot;gt;cite journal  last  Axtell  first  J.and the comparison of religious beliefs and practices across cultures.lt;ref namequot;Cassirerquot;gt;Ernst CassirerCassirer,Ernst  https:books.google.combooks?idpefWSviLsCamp;pgPA An Essay On Man,Myth and Religion,amp;nbsp;.note : See,for instance,RR Marett,Faith,Hope,and Charity in Primitive Religion,the Gifford Lectures Macmillan,Lecture II,ff.amp;nbsp;.quot;lt;ref namequot;Cassirerquot;gt; and that every religion is a cultural product,created by the human community that worships it.lt;ref namequot;Guthriepquot;gt;Guthrie  https:books.google.combooks?idwlNJQoZlGCCamp;pgPA pp.Urban anthropology is concerned with issues of urbanization,poverty,and neoliberalism.antiurban by definitionquot;.lt;refgt;Hannerz,Ulf .Exploring the City: Inquiries Toward an Urban Anthropology,These two methods are overlapping and dependent of each other.By defining different types of cities,one would use social factors as well as economic and political factors to categorize the cities.By directly looking at the different social issues,one would also be studying how they affect the dynamic of the city.lt;refgt;Griffiths,Michael.Flemming Christiansen,and Malcolm Chapman.Chinese Consumers: The Romantic Reappraisal.Ethnography,Sept ,It is a burgeoning interdisciplinary field that overlaps with a number of other disciplines,including anthropology,ethology,medicine,psychology,veterinary medicine and zoology.lt;refgt;Mills,Daniel S.https:books.google.combooks?idvrueZDfPUzoCamp;pgPA quot;Anthrozoologyquot;,The Encyclopedia of Applied Animal Behaviour and Welfare.CABI ,lt;refgt; It includes scholars from a diverse range of fields,including anthropology,sociology,biology,and philosophy.lt;refgt;DeMello,Margo.Teaching the Animal: HumanAnimal Studies Across the Disciplines.Lantern Books,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.animalsandsociety.orgcontentindex.pid Animals amp; Society Institute,accessed  February .lt;refgt;refngroupnNote that anthrozoology should not be confused with quot;animal studiesquot;,which often refers to animal testing.lt;ref nameBiocultsyngt;cite book last Goodman firstAlan H.author Thomas L.Leatherman eds.google.Evolutionary anthropology is based in natural science and social science,combining the Human development biologyhuman development with socioeconomic factors.Evolutionary anthropology is concerned with both biological and cultural evolution of humans,past and present.It is based on a scientific approach,and brings together fields such as archaeology,behavioral ecology,psychology,primatology,and genetics.It is a dynamic and interdisciplinary field,drawing on many lines of evidence to understand the human experience,past and present.burned,mutilated or otherwise unrecognizable.Paleoanthropology combines the disciplines of paleontology and physical anthropology.It is the study of ancient humans,as found in fossil Hominidaehominid evidence such as Petrifactionpetrifacted bones and footprints.which was founded in .lt;refgt;http:www.aaanet.orgabout AAAnet.orglt;refgt; Membership is made up of anthropologists from around the globe.lt;refgt;http:www.aaanet.orgmembershipuploadMAYAAA.pdf AAAnet.Hundreds of other organizations exist in the various subfields of anthropology,sometimes divided up by nation or region,and many anthropologists work with collaborators in other disciplines,such as geology,physics,zoology,paleontology,anatomy,music theory,art history,sociology and so on,belonging to professional societies in those disciplines as well.lt;refgt;Johanson,Donald and Kate Wong.Lucys Legacy.Kindle Books.; Netti,Bruno.The Study of Ethnomusicology.University of Illinois Press,AIBR.Asociacin de Antroplogos Iberoamericanos en RedAsociacin de Antroplogos Iberoamericanos en Red,http:www.radicalanthropologygroup.Anthropologists,like other researchers especially historians and scientists engaged in field research,have over time assisted state policies and projects,especially colonialism.lt;ref name  quot;pbutehquot;gt;Asad,Talal,Anthropology amp; the Colonial Encounter.Atlantic Highlands,NJ: Humanities Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;van Breman,Jan,and Akitoshi Shimizu  Anthropology and Colonialism in Asia and Oceania.Richmond,Surrey: Curzon Press.That the discipline grew out of colonialism,perhaps was in league with it,and derived some of its key notions from it,consciously or not.See,for example,Gough,Pels and Salemink,but cf.Lewis .lt;ref nameGellnergt;Gellner,Ernest  Postmodernism,Reason,and Religion.LondonNew York: Routledge.Pp: .That ethnographic work was often Ahistoricismahistorical,Time and Its Other.As part of their quest for scientific objectivity,presentday anthropologists typically urge cultural relativism,which has an influence on all the subfields of anthropology.but be examined dispassionately on their own terms.There should be no notions,in good anthropology,of one culture being better or worse than another culture.lt;refgt;LeviStrauss,Claude.The Savage Mind.; Womack,Mari.Being Human.Ethical commitments in anthropology include noticing and documenting genocide,infanticide,racism,mutilation including circumcision and subincision,and torture.Topics like racism,slavery,Marvin.Cows,Pigs,Wars,and Witches.lt;refgt; to geneslt;refgt;http:www.timeshighereducation.ukstory.storyCodeamp;sectioncode Timeshighereducation.uklt;refgt; to acculturation have been proposed,not to mention theories of colonialism and many others as root causes of Mans inhumanity to man.To illustrate the depth of an anthropological approach,one can take just one of these topics,such as quot;racismquot; and find thousands of anthropological references,stretching across all the major and minor subfields.lt;refgt;cite webtitleStatement on quot;Racequot;urlhttp:www.aaanet.orgstmtsracepp.htmpublisherAmerican Anthropological AssociationdateMay lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.sciencemag.orgcgicontentsummary?Shanklin,Eugenia.Anthropology amp; Race; Faye V.Harrison.quot;The Persistent Power of Race in the Cultural and Political Economy of Racism.quot; Annual Review of Anthropology.Allan Goodman.quot;The Problematics of quot;Racequot; in Contemporary Biological Anthropology.quot; In Biological Anthropology: The State of the Science.; Yearbook of Physical Anthropology,quot;Melanin,Afrocentricityamp;nbsp;.quot; :.; see Stanfords recent collection of overarching bibliographies on race and racism,http:library.stanford.edudeptsssrgmiscrace.html Library.stanford.Anthropologists involvement with the U.government,in particular,has caused bitter controversy within the discipline.Franz Boas publicly objected to US participation in World War I,But by the s,Fascist Italy,and Imperial Japan.Many served in the armed forces,while others worked in intelligence for example,Office of Strategic Services and the Office of War Information.At the same time,David H.lt;refgt;Horowitz,Lewis ed.The Rise and Fall of Project Camelot.lt;refgt; Many anthropologists students and teachers were active in the antiwar movement.Their codes of ethics or statements may proscribe anthropologists from giving secret briefings.no secret research,no secret reports or debriefings of any kind should be agreed to or given.Anthropologists,along with other social scientists,are working with the US military as part of the US Armys strategy in Afghanistan.lt;refgt;http:www.csmonitor.compswosc.under the Human Terrain System HTS program; in addition,HTS teams are working with the US military in Iraq.lt;refgt;cite webtitleThe Human Terrain System: A CORDS for the st Centuryurlhttp:www.army.milprofessionalWritingvolumesvolumedecember.htmlarchiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.army.milprofessionalWritingvolumesvolumedecember.htmlarchivedate January lt;refgt; In ,in part,that,quot;When ethnographic investigation is determined by military missions,not subject to external review,where data collection occurs in the context of war,integrated into the goals of counterinsurgency,In summary,while we stress that constructive engagement between anthropology and the military is possible,quot;lt;refgt;http:blog.aaanet.After the war,There are several characteristics that tend to unite anthropological work.lt;ref namequot;Hylland Eriksen  p.quot;gt; The quest for holism leads most anthropologists to study a particular place,problem or phenomenon in detail,using a variety of methods,over a more extensive period than normal in many parts of academia.In the s and s decade,calls for clarification of what constitutes a culture,of how an observer knows where his or her own culture ends and another begins,and other crucial topics in writing anthropology were heard.These dynamic relationships,between what can be observed on the ground,whether cultural,biological,linguistic or archaeological.lt;refgt;Rosaldo,Renato.Culture and Truth: The remaking of social analysis.Beacon Press.; Inda,John Xavier and Renato Rosaldo.The Anthropology of Globalization.WileyBlackwell.Biological anthropologists are interested in both human variationlt;refgt;Robert Jurmain,Lynn Kilgore,Wenda Trevathan,and Russell L.Ciochon.Introduction to Physical Anthropology.th Edition.Wadsworth.chapters I,III and IV.; Wompack,Mari.Being Human.Prentice Hall.amp;nbsp;.lt;refgt; and in the possibility of human universals behaviors,ideas or concepts shared by virtually all human cultures.lt;refgt;Brown,Donald.Human Universals.McGraw Hill.; Roughley,Neil.Being Humans: Anthropological Universality and Particularity in Transciplinary Perspectives.Walter de Gruyter Publishing.lt;refgt;  They use many different methods of study,but modern population genetics,participant observation and other techniques often take anthropologists quot;into the field,quot; which means traveling to a community in its own setting,to do something called quot;fieldwork.quot;  On the biological or physical side,human measurements,genetic samples,nutritional data may be gathered and published as articles or monographs.Along with dividing up their project by theoretical emphasis,anthropologists typically divide the world up into relevant time periods and geographic regions.Human time on Earth is divided up into relevant cultural traditions based on material,such as the Paleolithic and the Neolithic,of particular use in archaeology.Citation neededdateNovember  Further cultural subdivisions according to tool types,since mapping cultures is central to both sciences.By making comparisons across cultural traditions timebased and cultural regions spacebased,anthropologists have developed various kinds of comparative method,a central part of their science.Because anthropology developed from so many different enterprises see History of Anthropology,including but not limited to Fossil collectingfossilhunting,Explorationexploring,documentary filmmaking,paleontology,primatology,antiquity dealings and curatorship,philology,etymology,genetics,regional analysis,ethnology,history,philosophy,and religious studies,lt;refgt;Erickson,Paul A.and Liam D.Murphy.A History of Anthropological Theory.Broadview Press.amp;nbsp;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;George Stocking,quot;Paradigmatic Traditions in the History of Anthropology.quot; In George Stocking,lt;refgt; it is difficult to characterize the entire field in a brief article,although attempts to write histories of the entire field have been made.lt;refgt;Leaf,Murray.Man,Mind and Science: A History of Anthropology.Columbia University Press.both in terms of time past societies and space nonEuropeannonWestern societies.lt;refgt;See the many essays relating to this in Prem Poddar and David Johnson,Historical Companion to Postcolonial Thought in English,Edinburgh University Press,See also Prem Poddar et al.Historical Companion to Postcolonial LiteraturesContinental Europe and its Empires,Edinburgh University Press,lt;refgt; For example,the classic of urban anthropology,lt;refgt;Ulf Hannerz  quot;Exploring the City: Inquiries Toward an Urban Anthropologyquot;,ISBN ,Now there exist many works focusing on peoples and topics very close to the authors quot;homequot;.lt;ref namequot;Lewisquot;gt;Lewis,Herbert S.http:links.jstor.orgsici?siciAACATMOAAIE.like History and Sociology,on the contrary focus disproportionately on the West.lt;refgt;Jack Goody  https:books.google.combooks?In France,the study of Western societies has been traditionally left to sociologists,but this is increasingly changing,the Anthropological Research Center of Contemporary Societies.research is set in settings such as scientific laboratories,social movements,governmental and nongovernmental organizations and businesses.lt;refgt;Fischer,Michael M.Emergent Forms of Life and the Anthropological Voice.Duke University Press,Don Morrell JR.Theological anthropology,Philosophical anthropology,cite encyclopedia  lastJackson  firstJohn L.cite book  lastGeertz  firstClifford  year  titleAfter the fact: two countries,four decades,one anthropologist  locationCambridge,cite book  authormask  lastMead  firstMargaret  year  titleLetters from the field,Four Ways: British,German,French,cite book  lastDAndrade  firstR.chapterThe Sad Story of Anthropology:   editorfirstE.cite book  lastDarnell  firstRegna.year  titleInvisible Genealogies: A History of Americanist Anthropology  locationLincoln,cite book  lastGisi  firstLucas Marco  year  titleEinbildungskraft und Mythologie.Die Verschrnkung von Anthropologie und Geschichte im .cite book  lastHarris  firstMarvin.cite book  lastKehoe  firstAlice B.last  Lewis  first  H.doi  .cite journal  lastLewis  firstH.cite book  lastLewis  firstH.authormask  year  chapterAnthropology,the Cold War,and Intellectual History  editorfirstR.editorlastDarnell  editorfirstF.editorlastGleach  titleHistories of Anthropology Annual,Vol.cite book  lastSeraShriar  firstEfram  year  titleThe Making of British Anthropology,seriesScience and Culture in the Nineteenth Century,cite book  refharv  titlePaul Broca,Founder of French Anthropology,cite book  lastStocking  firstGeorge,year  titleRace,locationWestport,Conn.cite book  lastClifford  firstJames  firstGeorge E.cite book  lastHarris  firstMarvin  year  titleCulture,People,cite book  lastSalzmann  firstZdenk  year  titleLanguage,culture,and society: an introduction to linguistic anthropology  locationBoulder,cite book  editorlastShweder  editorfirstRichard A.editorfirstRobert A.editorlastLeVine  year  titleCulture Theory: essays on mind,self,and emotion  locationCambridge,Frederick Collingwood for the Anthropological Society of London  locationLondon  publisherLongman,Green,Longman,germananthropology.cite web  urlhttp:www.aaanet.cite web  urlhttp:www.easaonline.cite web  firstEd  lastHagen  year  titleAAPA  urlhttp:www.physanth.cite web  urlhttp:www.cite web  urlhttp:www.aibr.org  titleAIBR,cite web  urlhttp:hraf.yale.cite web  urlhttp:www.practicinganthropology.cite web  urlhttp:radicalanthropologygroup.cite web  urlhttp:www.therai.cite web  urlhttp:www.sfaa.cite web  urlhttp:anthro.amnh.cite web  titleDepartment of Anthropology  urlhttp:anthropology.cite web  urlhttps:aio.therai.ukaio.natural,economic and social sciences that are used in the practice and understanding of agriculture.veterinary medicineVeterinary science,but not animal science,is often excluded from the definition.Agriculture,agricultural science,The three terms are often confused.However,Agriculture concerns techniques,including the application of agronomic research.Agronomy is research and development related to studying and improving plantbased crops.Production techniques e.irrigation management,Improving agricultural productivity in terms of quantity and quality e.selection of droughtresistant crops and animals,development of new pesticides,yieldsensing technologies,simulation models of crop growth,Minimizing the effects of pests weeds,insects,pathogens,nematodes on crop or animal production systems.Transformation of primary products into endconsumer products e.production,preservation,Prevention and correction of adverse environmental effects e.soils retrogression and degradationsoil degradation,waste management,Theoretical production ecology,Traditional agricultural systems,sometimes termed subsistence agriculture,which feed most of the poorest people in the world.which may be more sustainable than some modern agricultural systems.Food production and demand on a global basis,with special attention paid to the major producers,such as China,India,Brazil,the USA and the EU.Various sciences relating to agricultural resources and the environment e.soil science,agroclimatology; biology of agricultural crops and animals e.crop science,animal science and their included sciences,ruminant nutrition,including genetic engineering,molecular markers,molecular diagnostics,vaccines,and tissue culture,to modify living organisms: plants,animals,and microorganisms.lt;refgt;cite web  urlhttp:absp.cornell.eduresourcesbriefsdocumentswarpbriefsengscr.pdf  titleWhat is Agricultural Biotechnology?the time it takes the soil to rebuild its aggregates and organic matter.Yields will decrease temporarily because of nitrogen being immobilized in the crop residue,which can take a few months to several years to decompose,With the exception of theoretical production ecologytheoretical agronomy,research in agronomy,more than in any other field,is strongly related to local areas.It can be considered a science of ecoregions,because it is closely linked to soil properties and climate,which are never exactly the same from one place to another.Many people think an agricultural production system relying on local weather,soil characteristics,and specific crops has to be studied locally.Others feel a need to know and understand production systems in as many areas as possible,and the human dimension of interaction with nature.Agricultural science began with Gregor Mendels genetic work,Citation neededdateDecember  In the United States,a scientific revolution in agriculture began with the Hatch Act of ,which used the term quot;agricultural sciencequot;.The SmithHughes Act of  shifted agricultural education back to its vocational roots,but the scientific foundation had been built.lt;refgt;Hillison J.http:pubs.aged.tamu.edujaepdfvol.pdf The Origins of Agriscience: Or Where Did All That Scientific Agriculture Come From?Journal of Agricultural Education.lt;refgt; After ,lt;ref nameScienceForAggt;Huffman WE,Evenson RE.http:books.google.combooks?idZWcolrGftTC Science for Agriculture.Blackwell Publishing.Intensification of agriculture since the s in developed and developing countries,often referred to as the Green Revolution,As the oldest and largest human intervention in nature,the environmental impact of agriculture in general and more recently intensive agriculture,industrial development,such as integrated pest management,waste managementwaste treatment technologies,landscape architecture,genomics,In fact,New technologies,such as biotechnology and computer science for data processing and storage,and technological advances have made it possible to develop new research fields,including genetic engineering,agrophysics,improved statisticsstatistical analysis,and precision farming.Balancing these,as above,including interaction of Religion and Agriculturereligion and agriculture,and the nonmaterial components of agricultural production systems.File:Norman Borlaug.jpgthumbpxNorman Borlaug,father of the Green Revolution.Eli Whitney,This requires promoting good management of natural resources and respect for the environment,Economic,environmental,and social aspects of agriculture sciences are subjects of ongoing debate.Recent crises such as avian influenza,International Food Policy Research Institute,http:www.press.edubookstitlepages.html Agricultural Research,Livelihoods,Johns Hopkins University Press Food Policy Reportlt;ref namequot;Briefquot;gt;http:www.ifpri.orgpublicationagriculturalresearchlivelihoodsandpoverty Agricultural research,livelihoods,and poverty  International Food Policy Research Institute IFPRIlt;!Claude Bourguignon,Regenerating the Soil: From Agronomy to Agrology,Other India Press,Pimentel David,Pimentel Marcia,Computer les kilocalories,Crs,septoct.Russell E.Walter,Soil conditions and plant growth,Longman group,London,Salamini Francesco,Oezkan Hakan,Brandolini Andrea,SchaeferPregl Ralf,Martin William,Genetics and geography of wild cereal domestication in the Near East,in Nature,vol.Saltini Antonio,Storia delle scienze agrarie,vols,Bologna ,ISBN ,ISBN ,ISBN ,Vavilov Nicolai I.Starr Chester K.editor,The Origin,Variation,Immunity and Breeding of Cultivated Plants.Selected Writings,in Chronica botanica,Waltham,Mass.Vavilov Nicolai I.World Resources of Cereals,Leguminous Seed Crops and Flax,Academy of Sciences of Urss,National Science Foundation,Washington,Israel Program for Scientific Translations,Winogradsky Serge,Microbiologie du sol.Problmes et methodes.Cinquante ans de recherches,Masson amp; c.http:www.cgiar.http:www.usda.govmainmain.http:www.icar.http:www.iita.http:www.ilri.http:nal.usda.https:www.crops.https:www.agronomy.https:www.soils.https:www.researchgate.netscienceAgriculturalscience Agricultural Science Researchers,http:www.fisaonline.deindex.http:www.sdaglabs.http:eppws.nmsu.commentReverting possible vandalism by Special:Contribs.to version by Smetanahue.WP:CBFPReport False Positive?Thanks,WP:CBNGClueBot NG.File:Alchemy of Happiness.Alchemy is a philosophical and protoscienceprotoscientific tradition practiced throughout Europe,Egypt and Asia.It aimed to purify,mature,and perfect certain objects.handle.netspo.titleEncyclopdie ou Dictionnaire Raisonn des Sciences,des Arts,et des Mtiers,Vol.lt;refgt;lt;ref namelindygt;harvpLindenpp amp; .lt;refgt;refngroupnFor a detailed look into the problems of defining alchemy,see HarvnbLindenpp Common aims were chrysopoeia,the transmutation of elementstransmutation of quot;base metalsquot; e.a universal solvent.lt;refgt;citation contributionAlchemy contributionurlhttp:dictionary.reference.combrowsealchemy titleDictionary.com .in the Hellenistic periodHellenistic and western tradition,the achievement of gnosis.lt;ref namelindy gt; In Europe,the creation of a philosophers stone was variously connected with all of these projects.In English,the term is often limited to descriptions of European alchemy,but similar practices existed in the Chinese alchemyFar East,the RasayanaIndian subcontinent,and the Alchemy and chemistry in medieval IslamMuslim world.In Europe,academia.eduwithSeymourH.MauskopfandWilliamR.NewmanAnIntroductiontoChemicalKnowledgeintheEarlyModernWorldOsiris .lt;refgt; particularly history of chemistrychemistry and history of medicinemedicine.Islamic and European alchemists developed a structure of basic laboratory techniques,theory,terminology,and experimental method,some of which are still in use today.However,Their work was guided by HermeticismHermetic principles related to Magic paranormalmagic,mythology,and religion.lt;refgt; that they should be understood as complementary.history of medicinemedicine,and charlatanism.The latter interests historians of esotericism,history of psychologypsychologists,and some philosophers and spiritualityspiritualists.The subject has also made an ongoing impact on literature and the arts.Despite this split,lt;ref namequot;Antoine Faivre .quot;gt;Antoine Faivre,Wouter J.Hanegraaff.Western esotericism and the science of religion.The word alchemy was borrowed from Old French alquemie,alkimie,taken from Medieval Latin alchymia,and which is in turn borrowed from Arabic alkmiy rtllangar philosophers stone.The Arabic word is borrowed from Late Greek chmea ,chma lt;refgt;http:oxforddictionaries.comviewentrymengbDWSMENGB alchemy,lt;ref nameOEDgt;OEDalchemy Or see OEtymDalchemyaccessdateApril ,lt;refgt; This ancient Greek word was derived fromlt;refgt;See,for example,the etymology for  in Cite book edition  Eighth edition,Chmia ,based on the Egyptian languageEgyptian name for Egypt,kme hieroglyphic khmi,lit.black earth,as opposed to red desert sand.lt;refgt;See,for example,perseus.tufts.eduhoppermorph?Alchemy covers several philosophical traditions spanning some four millennia and three continents.One can distinguish at least three major strands,which appear to be largely independent,at least in their earlier stages: Chinese alchemy,centered in China and its zone of cultural influence; RasayanaIndian alchemy,centered on the Indian subcontinent; and Western alchemy,to the Muslim worldIslamic world,and finally Middle Agesmedieval Europe.whereas Western alchemy developed its own philosophical system that was largely independent of,but influenced by,various Western religions.It is still an open question whether these three strands share a common origin,or to what extent they influenced each other.File:Zosimosapparat.jpgthumbleftpx Ambix,cucurbit and retort of Zosimos of PanopolisZosimos,from Marcelin Berthelot,Collection des anciens alchimistes grecs  vol.Paris,where the city of Alexandria was a center of alchemical knowledge,and retained its preeminence through most of the Greek and Roman periods.lt;refgt;New Scientist,December lt;refgt; Here,elements of technology,religion,mythology,and Hellenistic philosophy,each with their own much longer histories,combined to form the earliest known records of alchemy in the West.Zosimos of Panopolis wrote the oldest known books on alchemy,They wrote in Greek languageGreek and lived in Egypt under Roman EmpireRoman rule.though there is little to no evidence for his assertion.Roman,and Egyptian mythology to illuminate their works and allegorize alchemical transmutation.lt;refgt;Yves Bonnefoy.Roman and European Mythologies.University of Chicago Press,lt;refgt;  These included the pantheon of gods related to the Classical planets,Isis,Osiris,Jason,and many others.The central figure in the mythology of alchemy is Hermes Trismegistus or ThriceGreat Hermes.His name is derived from the deitygod Thoth and his Greek counterpart Hermes.Hermes and his caduceus or serpentstaff,were among alchemys principal symbols.According to Clement of Alexandria,he wrote what were called the quot;fortytwo books of Hermesquot;,covering all fields of knowledge.lt;refgt;s:AnteNicene FathersVolume IICLEMENT OF ALEXANDRIAThe Stromata,or MiscellaniesBook VIChapter IV.Clement,Stromata,called the hermeticismhermetic philosophy by its early practitioners.These writings were collected in the first centuries of the common era.Technology  The dawn of Western alchemy is sometimes associated with that of metallurgy,extending back to amp;nbsp;scbc.Few original Egyptian documents on alchemy have survived,most notable among them the Stockholm papyrus and the Leyden papyrus X.Dating from scadamp;nbsp;,they contained recipes for dyeing and making artificial gemstones,cleaning and fabricating pearls,and manufacturing of imitation gold and silver.lt;refgt;HarvnbLindenplt;refgt; These writings lack the mystical,philosophical elements of alchemy,but do contain the works of Bolus of Mendes or PseudoDemocritus,which aligned these recipes with theoretical knowledge of astrology and the classical elements.lt;ref namequot;Chemistry,BensaudeVincent ,pquot;gt;A History of Chemistry,BensaudeVincent,Isabelle Stengers,Harvard University Press,plt;refgt; Between the time of Bolus and Zosimos,the change took place that transformed this metallurgy into a Hermetic art.Philosophy  Alexandria acted as a melting pot for philosophies of Pythagoreanism,Platonism,Stoicism and Gnosticism which formed the origin of alchemys character.lt;ref namequot;Chemistry,BensaudeVincent ,pquot; gt; An important example of alchemys roots in Greek philosophy,originated by Empedocles and developed by Aristotle,Air classical elementair,Water classical elementwater,and Fire classical elementfire.According to Aristotle,each element had a sphere to which it belonged and to which it would return if left undisturbed.lt;refgt;cite book  authorLindsay,not quantitative,as our modern elements are; quot;.True alchemy never regarded earth,air,water,and fire as corporeal or chemical substances in the presentday sense of the word.The four elements are simply the primary,and most general,Science of the Soul  locationBaltimore  publisherPenguin  year  page  othersTrans.Alchemy coexisted alongside emerging Christianity.Lactantius believed Hermes Trismegistus had prophesied its birth.Augustine of HippoStamp;nbsp;Augustine later affirmed this in the th amp; th centuries,but also condemned Trismegistus for idolatry.lt;refgt;Fanning,Philip Ashley.Isaac Newton and the Transmutation of Alchemy: An Alternative View of the Scientific Revolution.lt;refgt; Examples of Pagan,Christian,and Jewish alchemists can be found during this period.Most of the GrecoRoman alchemists preceding Zosimos are known only by pseudonyms,such as Moses of AlexandriaMoses,Isis,Cleopatra the AlchemistCleopatra,PseudoDemocritusDemocritus,and Ostanes.Others authors such as Komarios,and Chymes,we only know through fragments of text.After scadamp;nbsp;,lt;refgt;F.Sherwood Taylor.Alchemists,Founders of Modern Chemistry.lt;refgt; By the middle of the th century alchemy was almost an entirely mystical discipline.lt;refgt;Allen G.Debus.Alchemy and early modern chemistry: papers from Ambix.lt;refgt;Glen Warren Bowersock,Peter Robert Lamont Brown,Oleg Grabar.Late antiquity: a guide to the postclassical world.The Vedas describe a connection between eternal life and gold.and kingdoms that were culturally influenced by the Greeks like Gandhra,although hard evidence for this is lacking.lt;ref nameebgt;Multhauf,Robert P.amp; Gilbert,Robert Andrew .Alchemy.Encyclopdia Britannica .who visited Gujarat as part of the court of Mahmud of Ghazni,bquotehave a science similar to alchemy which is quite peculiar to them,which in Sanskrit is called Rasayna and in Persian Rasavtam.It means the art of obtainingmanipulating Rasa: nectar,mercury,and juice.This art was restricted to certain operations,metals,drugs,compounds,and medicines,many of which have mercury as their core element.Sanskrit alchemical texts include much material on the manipulation of mercury and sulphur,that are homologized with the semen of the god iva and the menstrual blood of the goddess Dev.Other early writings are found in the Jaina medical treatise Kalyakrakam of Ugrditya,written in South India in the early th century.lt;refgt;cite booklastMeulenbeldfirstG.JantitleHistory of Indian Medical LiteraturedatepublisherEgbert ForstenlocationGroningenpagesIIA,Ngrjuna Siddha was a Buddhist monk.His book,Rasendramangalam,is an example of Indian alchemy and medicine.Nityantha Siddha wrote Rasaratnkara,also a highly influential work.In Sanskrit,rasa translates to quot;mercuryquot;,and Ngrjuna Siddha was said to have developed a method of converting mercury into gold.lt;refgt;See Dominik Wujastyk,quot;An Alchemical Ghost: The Rasaratnkara of Ngarjunaquot; in Ambix .Online at http:univie.academia.lt;refgt;See bibliographical details and links at https:openlibrary.oxfordbibliographies.comviewdocumentoboobo.rskeyskoSqWamp;resultamp;qrasayanafirstMatch Oxford Bibliographies Online.lt;refgt;DOI: .The contents of  Sanskrit alchemical treatises have been analysed in detail in G.Jan Meulenbelds History of Indian Medical Literature.lt;refgt;cite booklastMeulenbeldfirstG.JantitleHistory of Indian Medical LiteraturedatepublisherEgbert ForstenlocationGroningenpagesIIA,lt;refgt;refngroupnTo wit,the nandakanda,yurvedapraka,Gorakasahit,Kkacaevarmatatantra,Kkacavarakalpatantra,Kppakvarasanirmavijna,Pradasahit,Rasabhaiajyakalpanvijna,Rasdhyya,Rasahdayatantra,Rasajalanidhi,Rasakmadhenu,Rasakaumud,Rasamajar,Rasamitra,Rasmta,Rasapaddhati,Rasapradpa,Rasaprakasudhkara,Rasarjalakm,Rasaratnadpik,Rasaratnkara,Rasaratnasamuccaya,Rasrava,Rasravakalpa,Rasasaketakalik,Rasasra,Rasataragi,Rasyanasra,Rasayogasgara,Rasayogaataka,Rasendracintmai,Rasendracmai,Rasendramagala,Rasendrapura,Rasendrasambhava,Rasendrasrasagraha,Rasoddhratantra or Rasasahit,and  Rasopaniad.The discussion of these works in HIML gives a summary of the contents of each work,their special features,and where possible the evidence concerning their dating.Chapter  of HIML,A great deal remains to be discovered about Indian alchemical literature.File:Jabir ibn Hayyan.jpgthumbrightJbir ibn HayynJabir ibn Hayyan Geber,considered the quot;father of chemistryquot;,introduced a Scientific methodscientific and experimental approach to alchemy.After The fall of the roman empirethe fall of the Roman Empire,the focus of alchemical development moved to the Islamic World.Much more is known about Islamic alchemy because it was better documented: indeed,Science of the Soul  locationBaltimore  publisherPenguin  year  page  othersTrans.William Stoddart  isbnlt;refgt; The word alchemy itself was derived from the Arabic word alkmiy .The early Islamic world was a melting pot for alchemy.Platonic and AristotleAristotelian thought,which had already been somewhat appropriated into hermetical science,In the late th century,based on scientific methodology and controlled experimentation in the laboratory,with very little concern for laboratory work.lt;ref nameKraus gt; Jabir is thus quot;considered by many to be the father of chemistryquot;,lt;refgt;Cite journalfirstZygmunt S.lastDerewendayeartitleOn wine,Spmidbibcode  AcCrA.D lt;refgt; albeit others reserve that title for Robert Boyle or Antoine Lavoisier.The science historian,Paul Kraus,One knows in which miserable state this literature reached us.Collected by Byzantine scienceByzantine scientists from the tenth century,the corpus of the Greek alchemists is a cluster of incoherent fragments,going back to all the times since the third century until the end of the Middle Ages.and the later researchers,among them in particular Mrs.HammerJensen,Tannery,Lagercrantz,von Lippmann,Reitzenstein,Ruska,Bidez,Festugiere and others,could make clear only few points of detail .The study of the Greek alchemists is not very encouraging.in the state where we find them today,are unintelligible nonsense which refuses any interpretation.It is different with Jabirs alchemy.The relatively clear description of the processes and the alchemical apparati,the methodical classification of the substances,The theory on which Jabir supports his operations is one of clearness and of an impressive unity.More than with the other Arab authors,one notes with him a balance between theoretical teaching and practical teaching,between the Ilm Arabicilm and the amal.In vain one would seek in the Greek texts a work as systematic as that which is presented,for example,in the Book of Seventy.lt;ref nameKrausgt;Kraus,Paul,Jbir ibn Hayyn,Contribution  lhistoire des ides scientifiques dans lIslam.Le corpus des crits jbiriens.Jbir et la science grecque,Cairo .Repr.By Fuat Sezgin,Natural Sciences in Islam.Frankfurt.historysciencetechnology.comgebergeber.Early Islamic chemists such as Jbir ibn HayynJabir Ibn Hayyan,such as the muriatic hydrochloric acid,sulfuric acidsulfuric and nitric acids,and more.The discovery that aqua regia,a mixture of nitric and hydrochloric acids,could dissolve the noblest metal,gold,was to fuel the imagination of alchemists for the next millennium.Islamic philosophers also made great contributions to alchemical hermeticism.The most influential author in this regard was arguably Jabir.Jabirs ultimate goal was Takwin,the artificial creation of life in the alchemical laboratory,up to,and including,human life.He analyzed each Aristotelian element in terms of four basic qualities of hotness,coldness,dryness,and moistness.lt;ref nameburckhardt gt; According to Jabir,in each metal two of these qualities were interior and two were exterior.For example,lead was externally cold and dry,while gold was hot and moist.Thus,Jabir theorized,by rearranging the qualities of one metal,a different metal would result.Science of the Soul  locationBaltimore  publisherPenguin  year  page  othersTrans.William Stoddart  isbnlt;refgt; By this reasoning,the search for the philosophers stone was introduced to Western alchemy.Jabir developed an elaborate numerology whereby the root letters of a substances name in Arabic,when treated with various transformations,held correspondences to the elements physical properties.The elemental system used in medieval alchemy also originated with Jabir.His original system consisted of seven elements,which included the five classical elements aether classical elementaether,Air classical elementair,Earth classical elementearth,Fire classical elementfire,quot;the stone which burnsquot;,which characterized the principle of combustibility,and Mercury elementmercury,which contained the idealized principle of metallic properties.Shortly thereafter,this evolved into eight elements,mercury giving volatility and stability,and Salt chemistrysalt giving solidity.lt;ref namequot;rquot;gt;Strathern,Paul.Mendeleyevs Dream  the Quest for the Elements,New York: Berkley Bookslt;refgt; The atomic theory of corpuscularianism,where all physical bodies possess an inner and outer layer of minute particles or corpuscles,also has its origins in the work of Jabir.lt;refgt;Cite booktitleDistilling knowledge: alchemy,chemistry,and the scientific revolutionfirstBruce T.From the th to th centuries,alchemical theories faced criticism from a variety of practical Muslim chemists,including AlKindiAlkindus,lt;refgt;Felix KleinFrank ,quot;AlKindiquot;,in Oliver Leaman amp; Hossein Nasr,History of Islamic Philosophy,London: Routledge.lt;refgt; Ab alRayhn alBrn,lt;refgt;cite journal  last  Marmura  first  Michael E.AlBiruni,and Ibn Sina by Seyyed Hossein Nasr  url   journal  Speculum  volume    issue   pages    doi.lt;refgt; Avicennalt;refgt;Robert Briffault .The Making of Humanity,lt;refgt; and Ibn Khaldun.In particular,they wrote refutations against the idea of the Philosophers stonetransmutation of metals.File:Esoteric Taijitu.svgthumb upright.Taoist Alchemists often use this alternate version of the Taijitu.Whereas European alchemy eventually centered on the transmutation of base metals into noble metals,Chinese alchemy had a more obvious connection to medicine.However,in the hermetic view,these two goals were not unconnected,and the philosophers stone was often equated with the universal panacea; therefore,the two traditions may have had more in common than initially appears.Black powder may have been an important invention of Chinese alchemists.As previously stated above,ChinaChinese alchemy was more related to medicine.It is said that the Chinese invented gunpowder while trying to find a potion for eternal life.it was used in cannons by Citation neededdateSeptember .From China,the use of gunpowder spread to Japan,the Mongols,the Muslim world,and Europe.Gunpowder was used by the Mongols against the Hungarians in ,and in Europe by the th century.Chinese alchemy was closely connected to Taoist forms of traditional Chinese medicine,such as Acupuncture and Moxibustion,not Alchemical.In fact,in the early Song dynasty,which,though tolerable in low levels,led many to suicideCitation neededdateSeptember .Thinking that this consequential death would lead to freedom and access to the Taoist heavens,mastering of the qiCitation neededdateSeptember ,etc.File:Joseph Wright of Derby The Alchemist.jpgthumbrightThe Alchemist in Search of the Philosophers Stone,by Joseph Wright,The introduction of alchemy to Latin Europe may be dated to  February ,Although European craftsmen and technicians preexisted,Robert notes in his preface that alchemy was unknown in Latin Europe at the time of his writing.Spain,through contributors like Gerard of Cremona and Adelard of Bath.lt;refgt;HarvnbHolmyardpplt;refgt; Translations of the time included the Turba Philosophorum,and the works of Avicenna and alRazi.Alcohol,carboy,elixir,and athanor are examples.Meanwhile,thereby priming Europe for the influx of alchemical thought.In the early th century,Peter Abelard followed Anselms work,In the early th century,Robert Grosseteste used Abelards methods of analysis and added the use of observation,experimentation,and conclusions when conducting scientific investigations.Grosseteste also did much work to reconcile Platonic and Aristotelian thinking.lt;ref namehollisterfgt;cite book  authorHollister,Warren  titleMedieval Europe: A Short History  locationBlacklick,Through much of the th and th centuries,alchemical knowledge in Europe remained centered on translations,and new Latin contributions were not made.The efforts of the translators were succeeded by that of the encyclopaedists.In the th century,Albertus Magnus and Roger Bacon were the most notable of these,lt;refgt;John Read.From Alchemy to Chemistry.lt;refgt; Albertus Magnus,a Dominican OrderDominican monk,Albertus critically compared these to the writings of Aristotle and Avicenna,where they concerned the transmutation of metals.From the time shortly after his death through to the th century,more than  alchemical tracts were misattributed to him,a common practice giving rise to his reputation as an accomplished alchemist.lt;refgt;James A.Weisheipl.Albertus Magnus and the Sciences: Commemorative Essays.PIMS.lt;refgt; Likewise,alchemical texts have been attributed to Alberts student Thomas Aquinas.Roger Bacon,a Franciscan OrderFranciscan monk who wrote on a wide variety of topics including optics,comparative linguistics,and medicine,Bacons writings integrated morality,salvation,alchemy,and the prolongation of life.His correspondence with Clement highlighted this,noting the importance of alchemy to the papacy.lt;refgt;Edmund Brehm.quot;Roger Bacons Place in the History of Alchemy.quot; Ambix.Vol.Part I,March .lt;refgt; Like the Greeks before him,Bacon acknowledged the division of alchemy into practical and theoretical spheres.He noted that the theoretical lay outside the scope of Aristotle,the natural philosophers,and all Latin writers of his time.The practical,however,confirmed the theoretical thought experiment,and Bacon advocated its uses in natural science and medicine.lt;refgt;HarvnbHolmyardpplt;refgt; In later European legend,however,Bacon became an archmage.In particular,along with Albertus Magnus,he was credited with the forging of a brazen head capable of answering its owners questions.Soon after Bacon,the influential work of PseudoGeber sometimes identified as Paul of Taranto appeared.It was notable for its inclusion of practical chemical operations alongside sulphurmercury theory,and the unusual clarity with which they were described.lt;refgt;HarvnbHolmyardpp.lt;refgt; By the end of the th century,alchemy had developed into a fairly structured system of belief.Adepts believed in the macrocosmmicrocosm theories of Hermes,that is to say,if one could learn the secret of purifying gold,one could use the technique to purify the soulhuman soul.They believed in the four elements and the four qualities as described above,Finally,By purifying the two parts of mans soul,man could be reunited with God.Science of the Soul  locationBaltimore  publisherPenguin  year  page  othersTrans.In the th century,lt;refgt;Tara E.Nummedal.Alchemy and Authority in the Holy Roman Empire.University of Chicago Press,lt;refgt; Dante,Piers Plowman,and Chaucer all painted unflattering pictures of alchemists as thieves and liars.Pope John XXIIs  edict,Spondent quas non exhibent forbade the false promises of transmutation made by pseudoalchemists.lt;refgt;John Hines,Yeager.John Gower,Trilingual Poet: Language,Translation,and Tradition.Boydell amp; Brewer.lt;refgt; In ,and a number were granted by Henry VI and Edward IVlt;refgt;D.Geoghegan,quot;A licence of Henry VI to practise Alchemyquot; Ambix,volume ,pages lt;refgt;.which continued with an increasingly Christian tone.John of Rupescissa,and in works written in the name of Raymond Lull and Arnold of Villanova.lt;refgt;Leah DeVun.From Prophecy,Alchemy,and the End of Time: John of Rupescissa in the late Middle Ages.Columbia University Press,Nicolas Flamel is a wellknown alchemist,but a good example of pseudepigraphy,the practice of giving your works the name of someone else,usually more famous.Though the historical Flamel existed,the writings and legends assigned to him only appeared in .lt;refgt;HarvnbLindenplt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Nicolas Flamel.and his entire interest in the subject revolved around the pursuit of the philosophers stone.His work spends a great deal of time describing the processes and reactions,but never actually gives the formula for carrying out the transmutations.Most of his work was aimed at gathering alchemical knowledge that had existed before him,especially as regarded the philosophers stone.Science of the Soul  locationBaltimore  publisherPenguin  year  pages  othersTrans.William Stoddart  isbnlt;refgt; Through the late Middle Agesth and th centuries,alchemists were much like Flamel: they concentrated on looking for the philosophers stone.Bernard Trevisan and George Ripley alchemistGeorge Ripley made similar contributions.Their cryptic allusions and symbolism led to wide variations in interpretation of the art.File:Raimundus Lullus alchemic page.jpgthumbrightPage from alchemic treatise of Ramon Llull,th century.During the Renaissance,Hermetic and Platonic foundations were restored to European alchemy.The dawn of medical,pharmaceutical,occult,and entrepreneurial branches of alchemy followed.In the late th century,Marsilo Ficino translated the Corpus Hermeticum and the works of Plato into Latin.Esoteric systems developed that blended alchemy into a broader occult Hermeticism,fusing it with magic,astrology,and Christian cabala.lt;refgt;Peter J.Forshaw.quot;Chemistry,Forshaw,who received his Hermetic education in Italy in the schools of the humanists.In his De Occulta Philosophia,he attempted to merge Kabbalah,Hermetism,and alchemy.He was instrumental in spreading this new blend of Hermeticism outside the borders of Italy.lt;refgt;Glenn Alexander Magee.Hegel and the Hermetic Tradition.Cornell University Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Nicholas GoodrickClarke.The Western Esoteric Traditions: A Historical Introduction.Oxford University Press.Philippus Aureolus Paracelsus,Theophrastus Bombastus von Hohenheim,cast alchemy into a new form,rejecting some of Agrippas occultism and moving away from chrysopoeia.Paracelsus pioneered the use of chemicals and minerals in medicine and wrote,quot;Many have said of Alchemy,that it is for the making of gold and silver.For me such is not the aim,but to consider only what virtue and power may lie in medicines.quot;lt;refgt;cite book  authorEdwardes,He took an approach different from those before him,and that certain illnesses of the body had chemical remedies that could cure them.lt;refgt;cite book  authorDebus,Allen G.and Multhauf,Robert P.University of California.year  pages lt;refgt; Paracelsian practical alchemy,based on the Latin alchemic maxim: solve et coagula.lt;refgt;Joseph Needham.Science and Civilisation in China: Volume ,Chemistry and Chemical Technology,Part ,Spagyrical Discovery and Invention: Physiological Alchemy.Cambridge University Press.John Dee  July   December,followed Agrippas occult tradition.Though better known for angel summoning,divination,and his role as astrologer,cryptographer,and consultant to Elizabeth I of EnglandQueen Elizabeth I,Dees alchemical Monas Hieroglyphica,written in  was his most popular and influential work.lt;refgt;William Royall Newman,Anthony Grafton.Secrets of Nature: Astrology and Alchemy in Early Modern Europe.MIT Press,lt;refgt; During the th century,a shortlived quot;supernaturalquot; interpretation of alchemy became popular,including support by fellows of the Royal Society: Robert Boyle and Elias Ashmole.lt;refgt; Journal of the History of Ideas,The Aspiring Adept: Robert Boyle and His Alchemical Quest,by Lawrence M.Principe,Princeton University Press,File:Alchemik Sedziwoj Matejko.JPGthumbleftpxquot;Alchemist Sendivogiusquot;  by Jan Matejko,Entrepreneurial opportunities were not uncommon for the alchemists of Renaissance Europe.Alchemists were contracted by the elite for practical purposes related to mining,medical services,and the production of chemicals,medicines,metals,and gemstones.lt;refgt;Tara E.Nummedal.Alchemy and authority in the Holy Roman Empire.lt;refgt; Rudolf II,Holy Roman Emperor,in the late th century,famously received and sponsored various alchemists at his court in Prague,including Dee and his associate Edward Kelley.James IV of ScotlandKing James IV of Scotland,lt;refgt;Accounts of the Lord High Treasurer of Scotland,vol.iii,lt;refgt; Julius,Duke of BrunswickLneburg,Henry V,Duke of BrunswickLneburg,Augustus,Elector of Saxony,Julius Echter von Mespelbrunn,and Maurice,Landgrave of HesseKassel all contracted alchemists.lt;refgt;Tara E.Nummedal.Alchemy and authority in the Holy Roman Empire.Though most of these appointments were legitimate,the trend of pseudoalchemical fraud continued through the Renaissance.Betrger would use sleight of hand,or claims of secret knowledge to make money or secure patronage.distinguishing themselves from the con artists.lt;refgt;Tara E.Nummedal.Alchemy and authority in the Holy Roman Empire.lt;refgt;  False alchemists were sometimes prosecuted for fraud.The terms quot;chemiaquot; and quot;alchemiaquot; were used as synonyms in the early modern period,and the differences between alchemy,chemistry and smallscale assaying and metallurgy were not as neat as in the present day.There were important overlaps between practitioners,and trying to classify them into alchemists,chemists and craftsmen is anachronistic.For example,Tycho Brahe ,an alchemist better known for his astronomical and astrological investigations,had a laboratory built at his Uraniborg observatoryresearch institute.Micha SdziwjMichael Sendivogius Micha Sdziwj,a PolandPolish alchemist,philosopher,Sendivogious taught his technique to Cornelius Drebbel who,in ,applied this in a submarine.Other early modern alchemists who were eminent in their other studies include Robert Boyle,and Jan Baptist van Helmont.File:The Shannon Portrait of the Hon Robert Boyle.Although the seeds of these events were planted as early as the th century,alchemy still flourished for some two hundred years,and in fact may have reached its apogee in the th century.Early modern European alchemy continued to exhibit a diversity of theories,practices,and purposes: quot;Scholastic and antiAristotelian,Paracelsian and antiParacelsian,Hermetic,Neoplatonic,mechanistic,vitalistic,and moreplus virtually every combination and compromise thereof.quot;lt;ref namequot;Alchemy Restoredquot;gt;Principe,Lawrence M.quot;Alchemy Restored.quot; Isis .Web.Robert Boyle  pioneered the scientific method in chemical investigations.He assumed nothing in his experiments and compiled every piece of relevant data.Boyle would note the place in which the experiment was carried out,the wind characteristics,the position of the Sun and Moon,and the barometer reading,all just in case they proved to be relevant.lt;refgt;cite book  authorPilkington,based on revolutionary discoveries of Antoine LavoisierLavoisier and John Dalton.Beginning around ,quot;alchemyquot; was now restricted to the realm of gold making,leading to the popular belief that alchemists were charlatans,and the tradition itself nothing more than a fraud.academic writers during the scientific Enlightenment attempted,for the sake of survival,to separate and divorce the quot;newquot; chemistry from the quot;oldquot; practices of alchemy.This move was mostly successful,and the consequences of this continued into the th and th centuries,and even to the present day.During the occult revival of the early th century,alchemy received new attention as an occult science.which arose during the th century,and it downplays the role of the alchemy as a practical tradition or protoscience.as opposed to the physical manipulation of apparatus and chemicals,moral or mystical processes.In the thcentury revival of alchemy,the two most seminal figures were Mary Anne Atwood and Ethan A.Hitchcock generalEthan Allen Hitchcock,who independently published similar works regarding spiritual alchemy.Both forwarded a completely esoteric view of alchemy,as Atwood claimed: quot;No modern art or chemistry,notwithstanding all its surreptitious claims,has any thing in common with Alchemy.Arthur Edward Waite,and Rudolf Steiner.Hitchcock,In ,Baron Carl Reichenbach,published his studies on Odic force,a concept with some similarities to alchemy,but his research did not enter the mainstream of scientific discussion.lt;refgt;Daniel Merkur.Gnosis: An Esoteric Tradition of Mystical Visions and Unions.SUNY Press.Several women figure in the earliest history of alchemy.Michael Maier names Mary the Jewess,Cleopatra the Alchemist,Medera,and Taphnutia as the four women who knew how to make the philosophers stone.lt;refgt;Raphael Patai.The Jewish Alchemists: A History and Source Book.The first alchemist is recognized as being Mary the Jewess c.M  authorRaynerCanham,lt;ref namequot;:quot; gt; Her most wellknown advancements are heating and distillation processes.The waterbath,also known as BainMarie is said to have been invented by or at least improved by her.a frequently used chemical today.lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:www.jewishencyclopedia.lt;refgt; Though we have no writing from Maria herself,she is known from the fourth century writings of Zosimos of Panopolis.Due to the proliferation of pseudepigrapha and anonymous works,it is difficult to know which of the alchemists were actually women.After the GrecoRoman period,womens names appear less frequently the alchemical literature.Women vacate the history of alchemy during the medieval and renaissance periods,aside from the fictitious account of Perenelle Flamel.The history of alchemy has become a significant and recognized subject of academic study.lt;ref namequot;Antoine Faivre .viiixvquot;gt;Antoine Faivre,Wouter J.Hanegraaff.Western esotericism and the science of religion.viiixvilt;refgt;   As the language of the alchemists is analyzed,such as the evolution of science and philosophy,the sociology and psychology of the intellectual communities,Kabbalahkabbalism,spiritualism,Rosicrucianism,and other mystic movements.lt;refgt;http:centres.exeter.the University of Exeter Centre for the Study of Esotericism EXESESO,the European Society for the Study of Western Esotericism ESSWE,The author attributed this recipe to an ancient manuscript he located.lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:jewishnews.Journals which publish regularly on the topic of Alchemy include Ambix,published by the Society for the History of alchemy and Chemistry,and Isis journalIsis,published by The History of Science Society.File:Fotothek df tg  Theosophie  Alchemie  Judentum  Kabbala.jpgthumbMandala illustrating common alchemical concepts,symbols,and processes.From Spiegel der Kunst und Natur.Western alchemical theory corresponds to the worldview of late antiquity in which it was born.Concepts were imported from Neoplatonism and earlier Greek cosmology.As such,the Classical elements appear in alchemical writings,as do the seven Classical planets and the corresponding seven metals of antiquity.Similarly,The concepts of prima materia and anima mundi are central to the theory of the philosophers stone.In the eyes of a variety of esoteric and HermeticismHermetic practitioners,alchemy is fundamentally spiritual.Transmutation of lead into gold is presented as an analogy for personal transmutation,purification,and perfection.lt;ref namequot;Antoine Faivre .quot; gt; The writings attributed to Hermes Trismegistus are a primary source of alchemical theory.He is named quot;alchemys founder and chief patron,authority,inspiration and guidequot;.Early alchemists,such as Zosimos of Panopolis c.AD ,highlight the spiritual nature of the alchemical quest,symbolic of a religious regeneration of the human soul.lt;refgt;Allen G.Debus.Alchemy and early modern chemistry.The Society for the History of Alchemy and Chemistry.lt;refgt; This approach continued in the Middle Ages,as metaphysical aspects,substances,physical states,and material processes were used as metaphors for spiritual entities,spiritual states,and,ultimately,transformation.In this sense,the literal meanings of Alchemical Formulas were a blind,hiding their true spiritual philosophy.while Martin Luther applauded alchemy for its consistency with Christian teachings.lt;refgt;Raphael Patai.The Jewish Alchemists: A History and Source Book.Princeton University Press.diseased,corruptible,and ephemeral state toward a perfect,healthy,incorruptible,and everlasting state,so the philosophers stone then represented a mystic key that would make this evolution possible.Applied to the alchemist himself,the twin goal symbolized his evolution from ignorance to enlightenment,and the stone represented a hidden spiritual truth or power that would lead to that goal.In texts that are written according to this view,the cryptic alchemical symbols,diagrams,and textual imagery of late alchemical works typically contain multiple layers of meanings,allegories,In his  Alchemical Catechism,quotelt;poemgt;Q.When the Philosophers speak of gold and silver,from which they extract their matter,are we to suppose that they refer to the vulgar gold and silver?By no means; vulgar silver and gold are dead,while those of the Philosophers are full of life.lt;refgt;Thodore Henri de Tschudi.Waite translation as found in The Hermetic and Alchemical Writings of Paracelsus.The Great Work of Alchemy is often described as a series of four stages represented by colors.nigredo,Albedo alchemyalbedo,citrinitas,rubedo,a reddening,purpling,or iosislt;refgt;Joseph Needham.Science amp; Civilisation in China: Chemistry and chemical technology.Spagyrical discovery and invention: magisteries of gold and immortality.Cambridge.Due to the complexity and obscurity of alchemical literature,lt;refgt;HarvnbPrincipeNewmanplt;refgt; Those focusing on the exoteric,such as historians of science Lawrence M.Principe and William R.Newman,have interpreted the decknamen or code words of alchemy as physical substances.lt;refgt;Richard Conniff.quot;Alchemy May Not Have Been the Pseudoscience We All Thought It Was.quot; http:www.smithsonianmag.comsciencenaturealchemymaynotbeenpseudosciencewethoughtitwasixzzsYcrpZl Smithsonian Magazine.February .At the opposite end of the spectrum,esoteric alchemists interpret these same decknamen as spiritual,religious,or psychological concepts.Today new interpretations of alchemy are still perpetuated,sometimes merging in concepts from New Age or radical environmentalism movements.Since the Victorian revival of alchemy,quot;occultists reinterpreted alchemy as a spiritual practice,quot;,Traditional medicine sometimes involves the transmutation of natural substances,using pharmacological or a combination of pharmacological and spiritual techniques.In Ayurveda,These processes are actively used to the present day.lt;refgt;Junius,Tinctures,Spagyrists of the th century,Frater AlbertusAlbert Richard Riedel and Jean Dubuis,merged Paracelsian alchemy with occultism,teaching laboratory pharmaceutical methods.The schools they founded,Les Philosophes de la Nature and The Paracelsus Research Society,popularized modern spagyrics including the manufacture of herbal tinctures and products.lt;refgt;Joscelyn Godwin.The Golden Thread: The Ageless Wisdom of the Western Mystery Traditions.Quest Books,lt;refgt; The courses,books,organizations,Initially confounded and at odds with alchemy and its images,after being given a copy of the translation of The Secret of the Golden Flower,a Chinese alchemical text,by his friend Richard Wilhelm,He called the creation of the gold or lapis within the process of quot;individuation.quot;lt;ref namequot;Jung,quot;gt;Jung,Psychology and Alchemy nd ed.Collected Works Vol.ISBN .London: Routledge.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Polly YoungEisendrath,Terence Dawson.The Cambridge companion to Jung.Cambridge University Press.quot; gt; Together with his alchemical mystica soror,Jungian Swiss analyst,MarieLouise von Franz,Jung began collecting all the old alchemical texts available and pored over them.spirit and matter are reunited in the hieros gamos  or divine marriage.Terence Dawson.The Cambridge companion to Jung.Cambridge University Press.quot;gt;Polly YoungEisendrath,Terence Dawson.The Cambridge companion to Jung.Cambridge University Press.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;C.Jung Preface to Richard Wilhelm sinologistRichard Wilhelms translation of the I Ching.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;C.Jung Preface to the translation of Secret of the Golden FlowerThe Secret of The Golden Flower.lt;refgt; that influence all of life.Jung wrote volumes on alchemy and his magnum opus is Volume  of his Collected Works,Mysterium Conuinctionis.Alchemy has had a longstanding relationship with art,seen both in alchemical texts and in mainstream entertainment.Literary alchemy appears throughout the history of English literature from Shakespeare to J.Rowling.Here,characters or plot structure follow an alchemical magnum opus.In the th century,Visual artists had a similar relationship with alchemy.While some of them used alchemy as a source of satire,Music was also present in the works of alchemists and continues to influence popular performers.In the last hundred years,alchemists have been portrayed in a magical and spagyric role in fantasy fiction,film,television,novels,comics and video games.cite booklast Calian first George title Alkimia Operativa and Alkimia Speculativa.orgstreamAlkimiaOperativaAndAlkimiaSpeculativa.SomeModernControversiesOnTheFlorinGeorgeCalianAlkimiaOperativaAndAlkimiaSpeculativa.cite booklast Forshaw first Peter J chapter  Chemistry,academia.Vol.: url https:www.academia.google.combooks?cite booklast Linden first Stanton J.google.combooks?cite booklast Linden first Stanton J.cite booklast Newman first William R.last Principe first Lawrence M.authorlink Lawrence M.google.combooks?google.combooks?cite booklast Kripal first Jeffrey John authorlink Jeffrey John Kripal last Shuck first Glenn W.google.combooks?cite book lastPrincipe firstLawrence M.cite booklast Principe first Lawrence M.authorlink Lawrence M.Principe last Newman first William R.authorlink editorlast Newman editorfirst William R.google.combooks?cite booklast Rutkin first H.Darrel editorlast Newman editorfirst William R.editorlast Grafton editorfirst Anthony editorlink Anthony Grafton title Secrets of Nature,google.combooks?Gallina,Furio .Miti e storie di alchimisti tra il medioevo e let contemporanea.Resana: mpedizioni.DO NOT ADD MORE LINKS TO THIS ARTICLE.LINKS.If you think that your link might be useful,do not add it here,to the appropriate category at the Open Directory Project www.dmoz.and link back to that category using the dmoz template.Links that have not been verified WILL BE DELETED.http:www.ambix.http:www.esswe.http:www.aseweb.http:www.alchemywebsite.com The Alchemy Website.Adam McLeans online collections and academic discussion.http:www.innergarden.In Our TimeAlchemypkbnAlchemy Peter Forshaw,http:xtf.virginia.eduxtfview?docIdDicHistuvaBookteiDicHist.xml;chunk.http:beinecke.library.yale.edudigitallibraryalchemy.html Book of Secrets: Alchemy and the European Imagination,A digital exhibition from the http:www.library.yale.commentReverted  edit by Special:Contributions.User talk:.talk: Restored redirect.Extraterrestrial life,Specifically,intelligent extraterrestrial beings.See List of alleged extraterrestrial beings.Alien law,Introduced species,Alien software,AliEn ALICE Environment,Alien Technology,Aliens,Alien franchiseAlien franchise,the film franchise,Alien filmAlien film,Aliens filmAliens film,The Alien filmThe Alien film,Alien band,The Aliens Australian band,The Aliens Scottish band,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,quot;Alienquot;,a song by Tokio Hotel on the album Humanoid albumHumanoid.Also,fans of the band call themselves Aliens.quot;The Aliensquot;,Alien  video gameAlien  video game,Aliens Tappan Wright novelAliens Tappan Wright novel,The Alien AnimorphsThe Alien Animorphs,Aliens Kaypro video gameAliens Kaypro video game,Aliens novel series,The Aliens TV seriesThe Aliens TV series,Alien shipping company,Alien Sun born ,Alien,quot;My Alienquot;,a song by Simple Plan on the album No Pads,No Helmets.Alians,ATLiens,File:JohannesVermeerTheAstronomer.jpgthumbupright.They look at stars,planets,moons,comets and galaxies,as well as many other celestial objects  either in Observational astronomy,in analyzing the data or in theoretical astronomy.Examples of topics or fields astronomers work on include: planetary science,solar astronomy,the origin or evolution of stars,or the formation of galaxies.There are also related but distinct subjects like cosmology which studies the Universe as a whole.Observational astronomers are what are talked about above.They directly study planets,stars and galaxies.Theoretical astronomers look at the changes of systems over time.evolve and die.Inside those categories Astronomers will more specifically look at planetary astronomy,galactic astronomy or cosmology.Image:Galileo.Image:Br Guy in Lab.jpgleftthumbpxGuy Consolmagno Vatican Observatory,analyzing a meteorite,Image:EmilyLakdawallaatFameLabatLPSC.History of astronomyHistorically,astronomy was more concerned with the classification and description of phenomena in the sky,Today,lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:www.noao.edueducationastfaq.archive.orgwebhttp:www.noao.edueducationastfaq.html archivedate  April  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; They spend the majority of their time working on research,although they quite often have other duties such as teaching,building instruments,or aiding in the operation of an observatory.The number of professional astronomers in the United States is actually quite small.The American Astronomical Society,which is the major organization of professional astronomers in North America,has approximately ,members.This number includes scientists from other fields such as physics,geology,and engineering,whose research interests are closely related to astronomy.lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:aas.archive.orgwebhttp:aas.orgarchivedate  August  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; The International Astronomical Union comprises almost ,lt;refgt;Cite weburlhttp:www.it is far more common to use a chargecoupled device CCD camera to record a long,deep exposure,allowing a more sensitive image to be created because the light is added over time.Before CCDs,photographic plates were a common method of observation.Modern astronomers spend relatively little time at telescopes usually just a few weeks per year.Analysis of observed phenomena,along with making predictions as to the causes of what they observe,takes the majority of observational astronomers time.Those who become astronomers usually have a broad background in maths,sciences and computing in high school.Taking courses that teach how to research,write and present papers are also invaluable.In collegeuniversity most astronomers get a Ph.D in astronomy or physics.so grades are very important.S graduate school.While there is a relatively low number of professional astronomers,the field is popular among amateurs.The Astronomical Society of the Pacific is the largest general astronomical society in the world,comprising both professional and amateur astronomers as well as educators from  different nations.lt;refgt;Cite web urlhttp:www.astrosociety.orgabout.archive.orgwebhttp:astrosociety.orgabout.html archivedate  February  lt;!DASHBotgt; deadurl nolt;refgt; Like any hobby,However,amateurs span the range from socalled quot;armchair astronomersquot; to the very ambitious,Launched by NASA in  it currently orbits Earth.the identity of quasars,and the existence of dark energy.With the ability to record microns from .to  near ultraviolet it became a huge asset to the field of astronomy.Cite booklastDallal firstAhmad contributionScience,New Yorkrefharvpostscriptlt;!Cite journallastKennedyfirstE.title  AlKhwrizm,editor  Gillispie,http:www.http:eas.unige.http:www.http:www.astrosociety.http:www.space.http:hubblesite.http:www.skyandtelescope.comment top  Wikify,copy edit,File:USASCII code chart.pngthumbpxASCII chart from a  printer manual b is the least significant bit.ASCII IPAcenaudioEnusASCII.comcgibinaudio.ascii.wavASCII typeaudio accessdatelt;refgt;Dead linkdateMay  respellASSkee,abbreviated from American Standard Code for Information Interchange,ASCII codes represent text in computers,telecommunications equipment,and other devices.Most modern characterencoding schemes are based on ASCII,although they support many additional characters.ASCII was the most common character encoding on the World Wide Web until December ,when UTF encoding surpassed it; UTF is backward compatible with ASCII.lastDubost firstKarl dateMay ,urlhttp:www.orgQAutfwebgrowth.accessdateAugust ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;utfquot;gt;cite web titleMoving to Unicode .authorlastDavis authorfirstMark authorlinkMark Davis Unicode dateMay ,workOfficial Google Blog publisherGoogle urlhttp:googleblog.blogspot.commovingtounicode.workOfficial Google Blog publisherGoogle urlhttp:googleblog.blogspot.comunicodenearingofweb.ASCII was developed from telegraph code.Its first commercial use was as a sevenbit teleprinter code promoted by Bell data services.Work on the ASCII standard began on October ,subcommittee.The first edition of the standard was published in ,lt;ref namequot;Brandelquot;gt;cite news firstMary lastBrandel dateJuly ,urlhttp:edition.comTECHcomputing.ASA X.publisherAmerican Standards Association date urlhttp:worldpowersystems.comarchivescodesX.index.htmllt;!http:worldpowersystems.comJcodesX.gt; accessdate deadurlno archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:worldpowersystems.comarchivescodesX.index.html archivedatelt;refgt; underwent a major revision during ,lt;ref namequot;ASCIIquot;gt;cite journal titleUSA Standard Code for Information Interchange,USASI X.publisherUnited States of America Standards Institute dateJuly ,comJcodesASCII accessdate deadurlno archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:worldpowersystems.comJcodesASCII archivedatelt;refgt; and experienced its most recent update during .ANSI X.publisherAmerican National Standards Institute dateMarch ,lt;refgt; Compared to earlier telegraph codes,the proposed Bell code and ASCII were both ordered for more convenient sorting i.alphabetization of lists,and added features for devices other than teleprinters.Originally based on the English alphabet,lt;ref namequot;rfcquot;gt;cite titleRFC   Internet Security Glossary,Version  dateAugust  authorfirstR.authorlastShirley rfclt;refgt; The characters encoded are numbers  to ,lowercase letters a to z,uppercase letters A to Z,basic punctuation symbols,control codes that originated with Teletype machines,and a space punctuationspace.For example,lowercase j would become binary numberbinary  and decimal .Devices and Applications urlhttps:books.google.idNQSpNAEACAAJamp;pgPA year publisherJohn Wiley and Sons isbn page quoteIn addition,it defines codes for  nonprinting,mostly obsolete control characters that affect how the text is processed.quot;http:kikaku.itscj.ipsj.jpISOIR.pdf The set of control characters for ISO quot;.Internet Assigned Numbers Authority Registry.Alternate U.version: http:kikaku.itscj.ipsj.jpISOIR.Accessed .lt;refgt; and  printable characters,Almost identical wording to ANSI X.except for the intro.lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;cite book titleCoded Character Sets,year edition publisherAddisonWesley Publishing Company,Inc.isbn lccn pages,https:web.archive.orgwebhttps:textfiles.meulie.netbitsavedBooksMackenzieCodedCharSets.pdf size  MB,pages lt;refgt;rp.called the X committee,by its X.later XL subcommittee,and later by that subcommittees X.working group.The X.subcommittee designed ASCII based on the earlier teleprinter encoding systems.Like other character encodings,graphemes and control characters.This allows Digital datadigital devices to communicate with each other and to process,store,and communicate characteroriented information such as written language.Before ASCII was developed,the encodings in use included  English alphabetalphabetic characters,numerical digits,and from  to  special graphic symbols.To include all these,ITA standard of ,regnet.ITA which was introduced by CCITT in .net date urlhttp:www.baudot.netdocssmithteletypecodes.pdf formatPDF accessdatelt;refgt; FIELDATA ,and early EBCDIC ,more than  codes were required for ASCII.ITA were in turn based on the bit telegraph code mile Baudot invented in  and patented in .The committee debated the possibility of a Shift codeshift function like in ITA,which would allow more than  codes to be represented by a sixbit character codesixbit code.In a shifted code,some character codes determine choices between options for the following character codes.It allows compact encoding,but is less reliable for data transmission,The standards committee decided against shifting,and so ASCII required at least a sevenbit code.lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp,The committee considered an eightbit code,However,it would require all data transmission to send eight bits when seven could suffice.The committee voted to use a sevenbit code to minimize costs associated with data transmission.Since perforated tape at the time could record eight bits in one position,it also allowed for a parity bit for error checking if desired.lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp,lt;ref namequot;Sawyerquot;gt;cite book authorfirstStanley A.google.combooks?idbXLDwmIJNkUCamp;pgPA year publisherCRC Press,The code itself was patterned so that most control codes were together,and all graphic codes were together,for ease of identification.The first two columns  positions were reserved for control characters.lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp,amp;thinsp;amp;thinsp;,many special signs commonly used as separators were placed before digits.lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp,amp;thinsp;amp;thinsp; as was done in the DEC SIXBIT code .Lower caseLowercase letters were therefore not interleaved with uppercase.To keep options available for lowercase letters and other graphics,the special and numeric codes were arranged before the letters,making conversion with binarycoded decimal straightforward.not electric typewriters.lt;ref namequot;savardquot;gt;cite web titleComputer Keyboards urlhttp:www.quadibloc.comcompkybint.htm authorfirstJohn J.the first typewriter with a shift key,using O capital letter o and l lowercase letter L instead,but lt;codegt;!lt;codegt; and lt;codegt;lt;codegt; pairs became standard once  and  became common.Thus,in ASCII lt;codegt;!quot;lt;codegt; were placed in second column,rows ,corresponding to the digits  in the adjacent column.The parentheses could not correspond to  and ,however,because the place corresponding to  was taken by the space character.which corresponded to many European typewriters that placed the parentheses with  and .This discrepancy from typewriters led to bitpaired keyboards,notably the Teletype Model ,which used the leftshifted layout corresponding to ASCII,not to traditional mechanical typewriters.Electric typewriters,notably the more recently introduced IBM Selectric ,used a somewhat different layout that has become standard on computersmdashbfollowing the IBM PC ,The lt;codegt;?lt;codegt; pair also dates to the No.and the lt;codegt;,amp;lt; .amp;gt;lt;codegt; pairs were used on some keyboards others,including the No.did not shift lt;codegt;,lt;codegt; comma or lt;codegt;.lt;codegt; full stop so they could be used in uppercase without unshifting.However,ASCII split the lt;codegt;;:lt;codegt; pair dating to No.and rearranged mathematical symbols varied conventions,commonly lt;codegt; lt;codegt; to lt;codegt;: ; lt;codegt;.Some common characters were not included,notably lt;codegt;lt;codegt;,while lt;codegt;lt;codegt; were included as diacritics for international use,and lt;codegt;amp;lt;amp;gt;lt;codegt; for mathematical use,so the  was placed in position lt;subgt;hexadecimalhexlt;subgt;,right before the letter A.The control codes felt essential for data transmission were the start of message SOM,end of address EOA,End of Messageend of message EOM,end of transmission EOT,quot;who are you?quot; WRU,quot;are you?quot; RU,a reserved device control DC,synchronous idle SYNC,and acknowledge ACK.These were positioned to maximize the Hamming distance between their bit patterns.With the other special characters and control codes filled in,ASCII was published as ASA X.Poptronix,Inc.gt; pages urlhttp:www.swtpc.commholleyElectronicsWorldJulEWJul.htm accessdatelt;refgt; leaving  code positions without any assigned meaning,reserved for future standardization,and one unassigned control code.lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp,May ,lt;ref namequot;ISOquot;gt;Report of ISOTCSC   Meeting of October ,lt;refgt; The X.task group voted its approval for the change to ASCII at its May  meeting.lt;refgt;Report on Task Group X.June ,Pentagon Building,Washington,The X committee made other changes,including other new characters the bracketbrace and vertical bar characters,lt;refgt;Report of Meeting No.Task Group X.December  and ,lt;ref namequot;kenzquot;gt;rp ASCII was subsequently updated as USASI X.lt;ref namequot;ASCIIquot;gt; then USASI X.ANSI X.and finally,ANSI X.lt;ref namequot;ASCIIquot;gt; the first two are occasionally retronamed ANSI X.and ANSI X.The X committee also addressed how ASCII should be transmitted least significant bit first,and how it should be recorded on perforated tape.They proposed a track standard for magnetic tape,and attempted to deal with some punched card formats.TWX originally used the earlier fivebit ITA,which was also used by the competing Telex teleprinter system.Bob Bemer introduced features such as the Escape characterescape sequence.lt;refgt;Bob BemerBemer,Bob n.http:www.trailingedge.combobbemerEUROPE.HTM Bemer meets Europe.Trailingedge.Accessed .Employed at IBM at that timelt;refgt; Because of his extensive work on ASCII,Bemer has been called quot;the father of ASCII.quot;lt;ref namequot;thocpquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.thocp.netbiographiesbemerbob.quot;The endorsement of the Federal government,then the largest purchaser of computer equipment,was probably the single most important reason for the subsequent wide adoption of ASCII.quot;  Martha M.Gray.lt;refgt;http:csrc.nist.govfipsfips.pdflt;refgt;  ?On March ,President Lyndon B.publisherThe American Presidency Project date urlhttp:www.presidency.ucsb.eduwsindex.such as the symbol for the United Kingdoms pound sterling .Almost every country needed an adapted version of ASCII,since ASCII suited the needs of only the USA and a few other countries.For example,Canada had its own version that supported French characters.Other adapted encodings include ISCII India,VISCII Vietnam,and YUSCII Yugoslavia.Although these encodings are sometimes referred to as ASCII,true ASCII is defined strictly only by the ANSI standard.ASCII was incorporated into the Unicode  character set as the first  symbols,so the bit ASCII characters have the same numeric codes in both sets.This allows UTF to be Backward compatibilitybackward compatible with bit ASCII,Even more importantly,lt;refgt;cite web titleutf  Linux manual page publisherMan.org date urlhttp:man.orglinuxmanpagesmanutf.but rather to control devices such as computer printerprinters that make use of ASCII,or to provide Metadatametainformation about data streams such as those stored on magnetic tape.For example,and character  represents quot;backspacequot;.RFC  refers to control characters that do not include carriage return,line feed or Whitespace computer sciencewhite space as nonwhitespace control characters.Other schemes,such as markup languages,address page and document layout and formatting.The original ASCII standard used only short descriptive phrases for each control character.The ambiguity this caused was sometimes intentional,and sometimes accidental,for example with the meaning of quot;deletequot;.which was a printing terminal with an available punched tapepaper tape readerpunch option.Paper tape was a very popular medium for longterm program storage until the s,less costly and in some ways less fragile than magnetic tape.In particular,the Teletype Model  machine assignments for codes  ControlQ,also known as XON,ControlS,also known as XOFF,and  Delete keyDelete became de facto standards.The Model  was also notable for taking the description of ControlG BEL,Because the keytop for the O key also showed a leftarrow symbol from ASCII,which had this character instead of underscore,a noncompliant use of code  ControlO,When a Teletype  ASR equipped with the automatic paper tape reader received a ControlS XOFF,an abbreviation for transmit off,it caused the tape reader to stop; receiving ControlQ XON,quot;transmit onquot; caused the tape reader to resume.nadcomm.comasciicode.Code  is officially named quot;deletequot; but the Teletype label was quot;ruboutquot;.Since the original standard did not give detailed interpretation for most control codes,interpretations of this code varied.The original Teletype meaning,and the intent of the standard,was to make it an ignored character,the same as NUL all zeroes.This was useful specifically for paper tape,because punching the allones bit pattern on top of an existing mark would obliterate it.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:lists.orgarchivehtmlhelpgnuemacsmsg.Some software assigned special meanings to ASCII characters sent to the software from the terminal.Operating systems from Digital Equipment Corporation,for example,interpreted DEL as an input character as meaning quot;remove previouslytyped input characterquot;,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:bitsavers.trailingedge.compdfdecpdpDECEXSYSUMIPPREMultiprogrammingSystemManual.orgpdfdecpdpPDPRefPDPRefPart.pdf titlePDP Reference Handbook,Book ,citation neededdateJuly  That latter interpretation is the most common now.Many more of the control codes have been given meanings quite different from their original ones.The quot;escapequot; character ESC,code ,for example,This is the same meaning of quot;escapequot; encountered in URL encodings,C programming languageC language strings,and other systems where certain characters have a reserved meaning.Over time this meaning has been coopted and has eventually been changed.In modern use,more properly,a quot;Control Sequence Introducerquot; from ECMA  and its successors,beginning with ESC followed by a quot;lt;nowikigt;lt;nowikigt;quot; leftbracket character.as in the Text Editor and CorrectorTECO and vi text editors.In graphical user interface GUI and window computingwindowing systems,The inherent ambiguity of many control characters,combined with their historical usage,created problems when transferring quot;plain textquot; files between systems.The best example of this is the newline problem on various operating systems.Digital Equipment CorporationDEC operating systems OS,RSX,RSTSERSTS,TOPS,etc.By the time socalled quot;glass TTYsquot; later called CRTs or terminals came along,Until the introduction of PC DOS in ,and Windows inherited it from MSDOS.Unfortunately,To simplify matters plain text data streams,including files,on Multicslt;refgt;cite conference urlhttp:www.multicians.orgjhsjfoterminals.authorlinkJoe Ossanna lastSaltzer firstJ.authorlinkJerry Saltzer dateNovember ,publisherAFIPS Press booktitleProceedings of the November ,Fall Joint Computer Conference pages locationp.permits the linefeed code to carry the newline meaning.lt;refgt; used line feed LF alone as a line terminator.Unix and Unixlike systems,and Amiga systems,adopted this convention from Multics.The original Macintosh OS,Apple DOS,and ProDOS,on the other hand,used carriage return CR alone as a line terminator; however,since Apple replaced these operating systems with the Unixbased OSamp;nbsp;X operating system,they now use line feed LF as well.machines running operating systems such as Multics using LF line endings,The Telnet protocol defined an ASCII quot;Network Virtual Terminalquot; NVT,Telnet used ASCII along with CRLF line endings,and software using other conventions would translate between the local conventions and the NVT.lt;ref namequot;RFCquot;gt;cite IETF titleTELNET Protocol rfc pages authorfirstT.including use of the Network Virtual Terminal,for use when transmitting commands and transferring data in the default ASCII mode.lt;refgt;cite IETF titleFile Transfer Protocol rfc authorfirstNancy J.and to other network protocols,such as those used for Email and the World Wide Web,on systems not using the NVTs CRLF lineending convention.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:mercurial.selenic.todocssmtplf.html authorfirstDaniel J.authorlastBernstein authorlinkDaniel J.Older operating systems such as TOPS,along with CPM,For this reason,EOF,or endoffile,The endoftext code Endoftext characterETX,also known as ControlC,was inappropriate for a variety of reasons,usually from a keyboard.In C library and Unix conventions,where here Z stands for quot;zeroquot;.Binary !Octal !Decimal !Hexadecimal !Abbreviation !Some browsers may not display these properly.Caret notationEfnCaret notation is often used to represent control characters on a terminal.On most text terminals,Sometimes the shift key is not needed,for instance lt;codegt;lt;codegt; may be typable with just Ctrl and .Please note that the character below,is correct.If you are seeing it as quot;ENQquot;,please upgrade your fonts as the one you have is buggy.Please note that the character below,is correct.If you are seeing it as quot;EOTquot;,please upgrade your fonts as the one you have is buggy.However,it is understood by several compilers,including GCC softwareGCC.DEL  stylequot;fontsize:large;quot;    lt;codegt;?To delete the previous character,one had to back up the paper tape punch,which for mechanical and simplicity reasons was a button on the punch itself and not the keyboard,then type the rubout character.They therefore placed a key producing rubout at the location used on typewriters for backspace.When systems used these terminals and provided commandline editing,they had to use the quot;ruboutquot; code to perform a backspace,Other terminals not designed for paper tape made the key at this location produce Backspace,and systems designed for these used that character to back up.Since the delete code often produced a backspace effect,Other representations might be used by specialist equipment,for example ISO  graphics or hexadecimal numbers.Codes lt;subgt;hexadecimalhexlt;subgt; to Elt;subgt;hexadecimalhexlt;subgt;,known as the printable characters,represent letters,digits,punctuation marks,and a few miscellaneous symbols.There are  printable characters in total.efnPrinted out,the characters are: Prescrolllt;nowikigt; !quot;amp;,:;lt;gt;?Code lt;subgt;hexadecimalhexlt;subgt;,the Space punctuationquot;spacequot; character,denotes the space between words,as produced by the space bar of a keyboard.anchor ASCII printable charactersASCII printable characterslt;!when changing a section title that might be linkreferenced from ELSEWHERE,drop in the anchor template to maintain crosslinking integrity!Binary !Oct !Dec !Hex !Binary !Oct !Dec !Hex !Binary !Oct !Dec !Hex !A June  RFClt;ref namequot;RFCquot;gt;RFC  June .canonical name,isoir,ANSIX.ISO.irv:,ASCII,ISOUS,USASCII preferred MIME name,lt;ref namequot;IANAquot;gt;Internet Assigned Numbers Authority May ,quot;http:www.iana.orgassignmentscharactersets Character Setsquot;.Accessed .lt;refgt; us,IBM,and csASCII.Of these,but the US is needed because of abuse of the ASCII term.in the equivalent quot;metaquot; element of some HTML documents,and in the encoding declaration part of the prologue of some XML documents.As computer technology spread throughout the world,One could class some of these variations as quot;Extended ASCIIASCII extensionsquot;,although some misuse that term to represent all variants,including those that do not preserve ASCIIs charactermap in the bit range.Furthermore,the ASCII extensions have also been mislabelled as ASCII.Many other countries developed variants of ASCII to include nonEnglish letters e.currency symbols e.etc.instead of the more common ASCII,such as found on the ZX Spectrum character setZX Spectrum computer.From early in its development,lt;refgt;quot;Specific Criteria,quot; attachment to memo from R.Reach,quot;X Meeting  September  and ,quot; September ,ultimately published as ISOIEC  ,quot;  However,titleISOTC   Computers and Information Processing: Acceptance of Draft ISO Recommendation No.ISOIEC ,like ASCII,was a bit character set.It did not make any additional codes available,so the same code points encoded different characters in different countries.Escape codes were defined to indicate which national variant applied to a piece of text,but they were rarely used,and in general,textprocessing systems could cope with only one variant anyway.a German,French,or Swedish,etc.programmer using their national variant of ISOIEC ,rather than ASCII,had to write,and thus read,C trigraphs were created to solve this problem for ANSI C,although their late introduction and inconsistent implementation in compilers limited their use.Many programmers kept their computers on USASCII,so plaintext in Swedish,German etc.for example,in email or Usenet contained quot;,quot; and similar variants in the middle of words,something those programmers got used to.For example,a Swedish programmer mailing another programmer asking if they should go for lunch,could get quot;N jag har smrgsar.quot; as the answer,which should be quot;N jag har smrgsar.quot; meaning quot;No Ive got sandwiches.Eventually,as ,bit and bit and later bit computers began to replace bit and bit computers as the norm,it became common to use an bit byte to store each character in memory,providing an opportunity for extended,bit,relatives of ASCII.In most cases these developed as true extensions of ASCII,leaving the original charactermapping intact,but adding additional character definitions after the first  i.bit characters.and often filled in some or all of the control characters from  to  with more graphics.Kaypro CPM computers used the quot;upperquot;  characters for the Greek alphabet.The IBM PC defined code page ,which replaced the control characters with graphic symbols such as Emoticonsmiley faces,and mapped additional graphic characters to the upper  positions.Operating systems such as DOS supported these code pages,and manufacturers of IBM PCs supported them in hardware.The Macintosh defined Mac OS Roman and Postscript also defined a set,more like modern character sets.but with many substitutions.A popular further extension designed by Microsoft,Windows often mislabeled as ISO,added the typographic punctuation marks needed for traditional text printing.ISO,Windows,ISOIEC  introduced  additional control codes defined in the amp;ndash;F hexadecimal range,as part of extending the bit ASCII encoding to become an bit system.lt;ref namequot;Unicode.quot;gt;cite book authorThe Unicode Consortium editorfirstJulie D.editorlastAllen titleThe Unicode standard,Version .date publisherAddisonWesley Professional locationUpper Saddle River,New Jersey,USA isbn chapterurlhttp:unicode.orgbookch.While ASCII is limited to  characters,or bit binary formats,called UTF,UTF and UTF.To allow backward compatibility,Therefore,ASCII can be considered a bit encoding scheme for a very small subset of UnicodeUCS,and ASCII when prefixed with  as the eighth bit is valid UTF.ASCIIcode order is also called ASCIIbetical order.lt;refgt;cite journal urlhttp:www.pcmag.comencyclopediaterm,tASCIIbeticalamp;i,All uppercase come before lowercase letters; for example,Digits and many punctuation marks come before letters; for example,Numbers are sorted navely as strings; for example,Nave number sorting can be averted by Leading zerozerofilling all numbers e.quot;quot; will sort before quot;quot; as expected,although this is an external fix and has nothing to do with the ordering itself.ASCII,Jargon File,cite journal titleA Proposal for Character Code Compatibility authorfirstR.authorlastBemer authorlinkBob Bemer journalCommunications of the ACM volume issue year doi.cite book titleGeneral Purpose Software chapterInside ASCII authorlastBemer authorfirstR.authorlinkBob Bemer date seriesBest of Interface Age volume atChapter  locationPortland,USA publisherDilithium Press isbn postscript,cite journal titleInside ASCII  Part I authorlastBemer authorfirstR.authorlinkBob Bemer journalInterface Age volume issue dateMay  locationPortland,cite journal titleInside ASCII  Part II authorlastBemer authorfirstR.authorlinkBob Bemer journalInterface Age volume issue dateJune  locationPortland,cite journal titleInside ASCII  Part III authorlastBemer authorfirstR.authorlinkBob Bemer journalInterface Age volume issue dateJuly  locationPortland,authorlastBemer authorlinkBob Bemer date urlhttp:www.trailingedge.combobbemerSURVEY.HTM accessdate deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.trailingedge.combobbemerSURVEY.HTM archivedate postscript,cite journal titleSurvey of coded character representation authorfirstR.cite journal titleSurvey of punched card codes authorfirstH.authorlastSmith authorfirstF.authorlastWilliams journalCommunications of the ACM volume issue page dateDecember  doi.cite journal titleHistory and impact of computer standards authorfirstG.authorlastRobinson authorfirstC.authorlastCargill journalComputer magazineComputer volume issue pages year doi.cite web titleOn the Early Development of ASCII  The History of ASCII editorfirstJohn F.typepad.comthesciencebookstoreheresthelink.html accessdate deadurlno archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:longstreet.typepad.comthesciencebookstoreheresthelink.PLEASE BE CAUTIOUS IN ADDING MORE LINKS TO THIS ARTICLE.WIKIPEDIA IS NOT A COLLECTION OF LINKS NOR SHOULD IT BE USED FOR ADVERTISING.This article already contains ASCII code charts,therefore any link to such a chart does not pass WP:ELNO  and WILL BE DELETED.This article is not about socalled quot;extended ASCIIquot;,therefore any link to a page about quot;extended ASCIIquot; is not relevant and WILL BE DELETED.quot;ASCII convertersquot; are a dime a dozen,so choosing any one would be linkspam for that site.All such links WILL BE DELETED.Add them to the Open Directory Project dmoz.org instead.See Wikipedia:External links amp; Wikipedia:Spam for details.cite web titleC Controls and Basic Latin  Range: F workThe Unicode Standard .date origyear publisherUnicode,Inc.urlhttp:www.unicode.orgchartsPDFU.pdf accessdate deadurlno archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.unicode.orgchartsPDFU.cite web titleThe Evolution of Character Codes,authorfirstEric A.authorlastFischer urlhttp:citeseerx.eduviewdocsummary?accessdate https:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.transbay.netenfasciiascii.comment Other uses  Add Austin building.Austin is the capital of Texas in the United States.Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin Island,SaintAustin,hamlet at la NeuvilleChantdOisel,Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin Township,Macon County,Austin,Chicago,Cook County,Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin,Austin County,Austin College,Sherman,University of Texas at Austin,Austin Peay State University,Clarksville,Austin Automobile Company,Austin brand,Austin Motor Company,American Austin Car Company,Austin songquot;Austinquot; song,Austin,a kangaroo Beanie Baby produced by Ty,Inc.USS AustinUSS Austin,Austin Station disambiguation,Austin buildingAustin building,a building designed by artist Ellsworth Kelly under construction in Austin,commentReverting possible vandalism by Special:Contribs.to version by Gladamas.WP:CBFPReport False Positive?Thanks,WP:CBNGClueBot NG.image  Animexampleedit.png  captionThe bouncing ball animation below consists of these six frames.image  Animexample.gif  captionThis animation moves at  frames per second.Animators are artists who specialize in the creation of animation.Animation can be Recordingrecorded with either analogue media,a flip book,motion picture film,video tape,digital media,including formats with animated GIF,Flash animation and digital video.To display animation,a digital camera,computer,or Image projectorprojector are used along with new technologies that are produced.cutout animationpaper cutouts,puppets and Clay animationclay figures.Images are displayed in a rapid succession,usually ,or  film frameframes per second.File:Vase animation.File:Phenakistoscope gu.where animals are often depicted with multiple legs in superimposed positions,clearly attempting to convey the perception of motion.An earthen goblet discovered at the site of the ,yearold Shahre SukhtehBurnt City in southeastern Iran,depicts what could possibly be the worlds oldest example of animation.lt;refgt;cite weblastBhattacgarjeefirstSubhankartitleA short history of Animation,before Disneyurlhttps:medium.comSubhankarBashorthistoryofanimationbeforedisneyddbaa.ffjmuuvpublisherMediumaccessdate March dateDecember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.theheritagetrust.wordpress.comworldsoldestanimationtitleWorlds Oldest Animation?publisherThe Heritage Trustwebsitetheheritagetrust.wordpress.In the th century,the phenakistoscope ,zoetrope  and praxinoscope  were introduced.and is attached to two pieces of strings.sfnBeckermanp The phenakistoscope consists of a disk with a series of images,drawn on radi evenly space around the center of the disk.John Barnes Linnett patented the first flip book in  as the kineograph.The cinmatographe was a projector,printer,Auguste and Louis Lumire,in .by Charlesmile Reynaud,sfnNeupert who was a French science teacher.Reynaud created the Praxinoscope in  and the Thtre Optique in December .sfnBeckermanppsfnSolomonpp On  October ,he projected the first animation in public,Pauvre Pierrot,at the Muse Grvin in Paris.His films were not photographed,they were drawn directly onto the transparent strip.In ,more than ,people had attended these screenings.File:Lanature praxinoscope projection reynaud.pngthumbA projecting praxinoscope,Stuart Blackton,sfnBeckermanppsfnCraftonp who,because of that,is considered the father of American animation.File:Fantasmagorie Cohl.File:Charlie in Turkey Pat Sullivan Keen Cartoon Corporation   FLM.ogvthumbCharlie in Turkey ,an animated film by Pat Sullivan film producerPat Sullivan for Keen Cartoon Corporation.In Europe,the French artist,mile Cohl,a wine bottle that transforms into a flower.which gave the picture a blackboard look.known as Ladislas Starevich.lt;refgt;cite webtitleWadysaw Starewicz  Biographyurlhttp:culture.plenartistwladyslawstarewiczwebsiteculture.More detailed handdrawn animation,were those directed by Winsor McCay,a successful newspaper cartoonist,including the  Little Nemo  filmLittle Nemo,the  Gertie the Dinosaur,sfnBeckermanpp and the  The Sinking of the Lusitania.During the s,the production of animated short films,typically referred to as quot;animated cartooncartoonsquot;,became an industry of its own and cartoon shorts were produced for showing in movie theaters.sfnSolomonp The most successful producer at the time was John Randolph Bray,who,along with animator Earl Hurd,El Apstol Spanish: quot;The Apostlequot; was a  Argentine animated film utilizing cutout animation,and the worlds first animated feature film.sfnFinkielmanpagesfnCraftonp Unfortunately,and it is now considered a lost film.HannaBarbara released Huckleberry Hound,the first half hour television program to feature only in animation.Terrytoons released Tom Terrific that same year.Computer animation has become popular since Toy Story ,the first featurelength animated film completely made using this technique.the animation market was worth US.billion.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.phpdfvaluepropositionsAnimationAnimation.pdf titleAnimation dateNovember accessdate  July work boi.lt;refgt;cite newslastMcDulingfirstJohntitleHollywood Is Giving Up on Comedyurlhttp:www.theatlantic.File:Animhorse.gifthumbrightAn example of traditional animation,The individual frames of a traditionally animated film are photographs of drawings,first drawn on paper.sfnBeckermanp To create the illusion of movement,each drawing differs slightly from the one before it.The animators drawings are traced or photocopied onto transparent acetate sheets called cels,The traditional cel animation process became obsolete by the beginning of the st century.Today,sfnCulhanep The final animated piece is output to one of several delivery media,including traditional amp;nbsp;mm film and newer media with digital video.The quot;lookquot; of traditional cel animation is still preserved,and the character animators work has remained essentially the same over the past  years.Examples of traditionally animated feature films include Pinocchio  filmPinocchio United States,lt;ref namequot;Solomonquot;gt; Animal Farm  filmAnimal Farm United Kingdom,and The Illusionist  filmThe Illusionist BritishFrench,The Prince of Egypt US,Akira  filmAkira Japan,sfnBeckermanp Spirited Away Japan,The Triplets of Belleville France,and The Secret of Kells IrishFrenchBelgian,sfnCulhanep having a smooth animation.sfnCulhanepp Fully animated films can be made in a variety of styles,Beauty and the Beast  filmBeauty and the Beast,Aladdin  Disney filmAladdin,The Lion King to the more cartoon styles of the Warner Bros.CartoonsWarner Bros.animation studio.Many of the Disney animated features are examples of full animation,as are nonDisney works,The Secret of NIMH US,The Iron Giant US,and Nocturna FilmNocturna Spain,sfnBeckermanp Pioneered by the artists at the American studio United Productions of America,sfnBeckermanpp limited animation can be used as a method of stylized artistic expression,as in Gerald McBoingBoing US,Yellow Submarine  filmYellow Submarine UK,and certain anime produced in Japan.sfnLedouxp,Its primary use,however,sfnLawsonPersonsp Filmation,sfnSolomonp and other TV animation studiossfnLawsonPersonspxxi and later the Internet web cartoons.frame by frame.sfnCraftonp The source film can be directly copied from actors outlines into animated drawings,lt;ref namequot;Laybournequot;gt; as in The Lord of the Rings  filmThe Lord of the Rings US,or used in a stylized and expressive manner,as in Waking Life US,and A Scanner Darkly filmA Scanner Darkly US,Some other examples are: Fire and Ice  filmFire and Ice US,Heavy Metal filmHeavy Metal ,and The Flowers of Evil mangaAku no Hana .sfnBeckpp Other examples include Who Framed Roger Rabbit US,Space Jam US,and Osmosis Jones US,sfnSolomonp There are many different types of stopmotion animation,usually named after the medium used to create the animation.in contrast to realworld interaction in model animation.lt;ref namequot;Laybournequot;gt; Examples include The Tale of the Fox France,The Nightmare Before Christmas US,Corpse Bride US,Coraline filmCoraline US,the films of Ji Trnka and the adult animated sketchcomedy television series Robot Chicken US,present.Puppetoon,created using techniques developed by George Pal,rather than simply manipulating one existing puppet.File:Claychick.Clay animation,or Plasticine animation often called claymation,which,however,is a Laika companytrademarked name,uses figures made of clay or a similar malleable material to create stopmotion animation.similar to the related puppet animation below,that can be manipulated to pose the figures.lt;ref namequot;Laybournequot;gt; Alternatively,the figures may be made entirely of clay,in the films of Bruce Bickford animatorBruce Bickford,where clay creatures morph into a variety of different shapes.Examples of clayanimated works include GumbyThe Gumby Show US,Morph animationMorph shorts UK,Wallace and Gromit shorts UK,as of ,Jan vankmajers Dimensions of Dialogue Czechoslovakia,The Trap Door UK,Films include Wallace amp; Gromit: The Curse of the WereRabbit,Chicken Run and The Adventures of Mark Twain  filmThe Adventures of Mark Twain.Stratacut animation,internally packed tight and loaded with varying imagery,is sliced into thin sheets,with the animation camera taking a frame of the end of the loaf for each cut,eventually revealing the movement of the internal images within.; Fantastic Planet FranceCzechoslovakia,; Tale of Tales  filmTale of Tales Russia,and the music video Live for the moment,from Verona Riots band produced by Alberto Serrano and Nvola Uy,Spain .sfnCulhanepp Examples include The Adventures of Prince Achmed Weimar Republic,and Cin siPrinces et princesses France,lt;ref namequot;HarryhausenDaltonquot;gt; Intercutting,matte filmmakingmatte effects,lt;ref namequot;HarryhausenDaltonquot;gt; Examples include the work of Ray Harryhausen,as seen in films,Jason and the Argonauts  filmJason and the Argonauts ,lt;ref namequot;HarryhausenDaltonquot;gt; and the work of Willis H.OBrien on films,King Kong  filmKing Kong .which is not present in traditional stopmotion.lt;ref namequot;Wiredquot;gt;cite weblastWatercutterfirstAngelaurlhttp:www.wired.comphiltippettfeaturetitle Years After Star Wars,Effects Whiz Phil Tippett Is Slowly Crafting a Mad GodpublisherWireddateMay ,Object animation refers to the use of regular inanimate objects in stopmotion animation,as opposed to specially created items.Graphic animation uses nondrawn flat visual graphic material photographs,newspaper clippings,magazines,etc.which are sometimes manipulated framebyframe to create movement.sfnLaybournep At other times,the graphics remain stationary,while the stopmotion camera is moved to create onscreen action.YouTube and the availability of cheap cameras and animation software.lt;refgt;cite weblastHaglundfirstDavidtitleThe Oldest Known LEGO Movieurlhttp:www.slate.comblogsbrowbeatlegomoviebrickfilmsgobacktowatchtheveryfirstvideo.Pixilation involves the use of live humans as stop motion characters.lt;ref namequot;Laybournequot;gt; This allows for a number of surreal effects,including disappearances and reappearances,allowing people to appear to slide across the ground,and other effects.Computer animation encompasses a variety of techniques,the unifying factor being that the animation is created digitally on a computer.lt;ref namequot;Massonquot;gt; D animation can create images that seem real to the viewer.File:Catenary animation.Interpolationinterpolated morphing,onion skinninglt;ref namequot;Priebequot;gt; and interpolated rotoscoping.D animation has many applications,including Scanimateanalog computer animation,Flash animation and PowerPoint animation.Cinemagraphs are still photographs in the form of an animated GIF file of which part is animated.Final line advection animation is a technique used in d animation,lt;ref namequot;Massonquot;gt; Speaking about using this approach in Paperman,John Kahrs said that quot;Our animators can change things,actually erase away the CG underlayer if they want,and change the profile of the arm.quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.cartoonbrew.comcgialittlemoreaboutdisneyspaperman.html titleA Little More About Disneys quot;Papermanquot; lastBeck firstJerry dateJuly ,D animation is digitally modeled and manipulated by an animator.The animator usually starts by creating a D polygon mesh to manipulate.which give the visual appearance of form to a D object or D environment.lt;ref namequot;Massonquot;gt; Sometimes,Other techniques can be applied,mathematical functions e.gravity,particle simulations,simulated fur or hair,and effects,fire and water simulations.sfnMassonp These techniques fall under the category of D dynamics.Celshaded animation is used to mimic traditional animation using computer software.lt;refgt;cite webtitleCel Shading: the Unsung Hero of Animation?urlhttp:www.animatormag.with less blending of colors.Examples include,Skyland ,France,The Iron Giant ,United States,Futurama Fox,Appleseed Ex Machina ,Japan,The Legend of Zelda: The Wind Waker ,Machinima  Films created by screen capturing in video games and virtual worlds.lt;ref namequot;Massonquot;gt; Examples include The Polar Express filmPolar Express ,Beowulf  filmBeowulf ,A Christmas Carol  filmA Christmas Carol ,The Adventures of Tintin film ,US Kochadaiiyaankochadiiyan ,India.using advanced rendering that mimics in detail skin,plants,water,fire,clouds,etc.Examples include Up  filmUp ,How to Train Your Dragon filmHow to Train Your Dragon ,Ice Age  filmIce Age ,Animatronics is the use of mechatronics to create machines which seem animate rather than robotic.AudioAnimatronicsAudioAnimatronics and Autonomatronics is a form of robotics animation,combined with D animation,sfnPillingp They are fixed to whatever supports them.They can sit and stand,and they cannot walk.rather than responding to external stimuli.In ,Disney created an interactive version of the technology called Autonomatronics.lt;refgt;cite weblastOKeefefirstMatturlhttp:www.themeparktourist.The animation illusion is created by putting the viewer in a linear motion,parallel to the installed picture frames.sfnParentpages The concept and the technical solution,were invented in  by Mihai Girlovan in Romania.in which charactersprops are thrown,or chucked from off camera or wiggled around to simulate talking by unseen hands.lt;ref namequot;Kenyonquot;gt;cite weblastKenyonfirstHeathertitleHowd They Do That?: StopMotion Secrets Revealedurlhttp:www.Puppetry is a form of theatre or performance animation that involves the manipulation of puppets.It is very ancient,and is believed to have originated  years BC.Puppetry takes many forms,they all share the process of animating inanimate performing objects.celebrations and carnivals.Most puppetry involves storytelling.File:Toy Story Zoetrope,Disney California Adventure .jpgthumbToy Story zoetrope at Disney California Adventure creates illusion of motion using figures,rather than static pictures.sfnLaybourneppsfnSolomonpp The term zoetrope is from the Greek languageGreek words  zo,meaning quot;alive,activequot;,and  tropos,meaning quot;turnquot;,with quot;zoetropequot; taken to mean quot;active turnquot; or quot;wheel of lifequot;.Other animation styles,File:World of Color overview.Hydrotechnics: a technique that includes lights,water,fire,fog,and lasers,with highdefinition projections on mist screens.for example by Norman McLaren,lt;ref namequot;Faberquot;gt; Len Lye and Stan Brakhage.sfnPillingp for example by Aleksandr Petrov animatorAleksandr Petrov.Erasure animation: a technique using traditional D media,photographed over time as the artist manipulates the image.For example,William Kentridge is famous for his charcoal erasure films,fastcompany.lt;refgt; and Piotr Dumaa for his auteur technique of animating scratches on plaster.sfnNeupert The screen is lit from the side so that the pins cast shadows.This creates an interesting effect when animated because of the light Contrast visioncontrast.Flip book: a flip book sometimes,especially in British English,so that when the pages are turned rapidly,the pictures appear to animate by simulating motion or some other change.lt;ref namequot;Laybournequot;gt;sfnSolomonpp Flip books are often illustrated books for children,they also be geared towards adults and employ a series of photographs rather than drawings.Flip books are not always separate books,they appear as an added feature in ordinary books or magazines,often in the page corners.The creation of nontrivial animation works i.longer than a few seconds has developed as a form of filmmaking,with certain unique aspects.The most important difference is that once a film is in the production phase,the marginal cost of one more shot is higher for animated films than liveaction films.if that scene fails to effectively advance the plot of the film.sfnCulhanep Thus,lt;ref namequot;Solomonquot;gt; While liveaction films are now also storyboarded,they enjoy more latitude to depart from storyboards i.realtime improvisation.even as films have grown longer and teams have grown larger.Animators,like all artists,necessarily have their own individual styles,lt;ref namequot;Massonquot;gt; Since the early s,featurelength animated films have been created by teams of about  to  people,of whom  to  are animators.posed in different positions,and viewed from different angles.sfnWilliamsplt;ref namequot;Culhanequot;gt; On traditionally animated projects,Unlike liveaction films,sfnLaybournepp In the early s,Criticism of animation has become a domineering force in media and cinema since its inception.With its popularity,a large amount of criticism has arisen,especially animated featurelength films.cartoonbrew.comfeaturefilmnyfilmcriticsdidntlikeasingleanimatedfilmthisyear.psychological effects on children have been brought up around the animation industry,Certain underrepresentation of women has been criticized in animation films and the industry.As with any other form of media,animation too has instituted awards for excellence in the field.during the th Academy Awards function.The first winner of the th Academy AwardsAcademy Award was the short Flowers and Trees,lt;refgt;cite webtitleWalt Disneys Oscarsurlhttp:www.waltdisney.and awarded during the th Academy Awards in .It was won by the film Shrek,produced by DreamWorks and Pacific Data Images.BAFTA Award for Best Animated Film since ,Csar Award for Best Animated Film since ,Golden Rooster Award for Best Animation since ,Goya Award for Best Animated Film since ,Japan Academy Prize for Animation of the Year since ,National Film Award for Best Animated Film since .Also since ,Since ,the European Film Awards have awarded the European Film Award for Best Animated Film.The Annie Award is another award presented for excellence in the field of animation.Unlike the Academy Awards,They were reorganized in  to create a new field for Best Animated feature.The s winners were dominated by Walt Disney,however newer studios,led by Pixar amp; DreamWorks,have now begun to consistently vie for this award.filmtv.ucla.eduNewSiteWebPagesHistories.cite weblastBallfirstRyantitleOldest Animation Discovered In Iranurlhttp:www.animationmagazine.netfeaturesoldestanimationdiscoverediniranpublisherAnimation Magazineaccessdate March dateMarch ,cite booklastBeckfirstJerrytitleAnimation Art: From Pencil to Pixel,the History of Cartoon,cite weburlhttp:www.commagissue.articlesbendazzi.cite booklastDrazinfirstCharlestitleThe Faber Book of French CinemadateMarch ,cite booklastLowefirstRichardlastSchnotzfirstWolfgang EdstitleLearning with Animation.cite booklastMassonfirstTerrenceyeartitleCG: A Computer Graphics Industry Referenceurlhttp:www.plus a comprehensive foundation of the industry for all reading levels.locationWilliamstown,cite weblastNagelfirstJantitleGender in Media: Females Dont Ruleurlhttp:www.cite booklastParentfirstRicktitleComputer Animation: Algorithms amp; TechniquesdateNovember ,cite bookfirstKen A.cite journallastSerenkofirstAlexanderyeartitleComputers in Human Behavior urlhttp:www.aserenko.compapersSerenkoAnimationScale.cite booklastShafferfirstJoshua C.titleDiscovering The Magic Kingdom: An Unofficial Disneyland Vacation GuidedateSeptember ,Inc.cite weburlhttp:www.vanityfair.comculturedisneyanimationgirlstitleColoring the KingdomlastZohnfirstPatriciadateFebruary ,publisherVanity Fair magazineVanity Fair accessdateDecember ,cite journal urlhttp:www.eduorgccsmiccsmiclassicworkMythRevisited.Wayback date urlhttp:academic.evergreen.educurriculareathandoutsPicturesCutSandPaintRules.http:www.sparetimelabs.comanimatoanimatocartooncartoon.http:www.cafilmanimandoenglish quot;Animandoquot;,a minute film demonstrating  different animation techniques and teaching how to use them.commentRemoving quot;ChariotclockApollo.jpgquot;,image  File:Apollo of the Belvedere.caption  Apollo Belvedere,godof  God of music,poetry,art,oracles,archery,plague,medicine,sun,symbol  Lyre,Bay Laurellaurel wreath,Python mythologypython,raven,children  Asclepius,Troilus,Aristaeus,Apollo Attic GreekAttic,Ionic GreekIonic,and Homeric Greek: langgrc,Apolln smallGenitiveGEN langgrc; Doric GreekDoric: langgrc,Apelln; Arcadocypriot GreekArcadocypriot: langgrc,Apeiln; Aeolic GreekAeolic: langgrc,The ideal of the kouros a beardless,athletic youth,Apollo has been variously recognized as a god of music,truth and prophecy,healing,the sun and light,plague,poetry,and more.Apollo is the son of Zeus and Leto,and has a twin sister,the chaste huntress Artemis.Apollo is known in Greekinfluenced Etruscan mythology as Apulu.lt;refgt;Krauskopf,quot;The Grave and Beyond.quot; The Religion of the Etruscans.edited by N.de Grummond and E.Simon.Austin: University of Texas Press.vii,As the patron of Delphi Pythian Apollo,Apollo was an oracular godthe prophetic deity of the PythiaDelphic Oracle.Medicine and healing are associated with Apollo,whether through the god himself or mediated through his son Asclepius,yet Apollo was also seen as a god who could bring illhealth and deadly Plague diseaseplague.Amongst the gods custodial charges,Apollo became associated with dominion over Colonies in antiquitycolonists,and as the patron defender of herds and flocks.As the leader of the Muses Apollon Musegetes and director of their choir,Apollo functioned as the patron god of music and poetry.Hermes created the lyre for him,and the instrument became a common ApolloAttributes and symbolsattribute of Apollo.Hymns sung to Apollo were called paeans.In Hellenistic times,especially during the rd century BCE,as Apollo Helios he became identified among Greeks with Helios,Titan mythologyTitan solar deitygod of the sun,and his sister Artemis similarly equated with Selene,Titan lunar deitygoddess of the moon.lt;refgt;For the iconography of the AlexanderHelios type,see H.Hoffmann,quot;Heliosquot;,in Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt ,; cf.Yalouris ,lt;refgt; In Latin texts,on the other hand,not even in the conjurations of Aeneas and Latinus in Aeneid XII .lt;refgt;Joseph Fontenrose,quot;Apollo and Sol in the Latin poets of the first century BCquot;,Transactions of the American Philological Association  ,pp ; quot;Apollo and the SunGod in Ovidquot;,April ,The name of Apollo itselfthough not Paean,lt;refgt;Robert S.BeekesR.Beekes,Etymological Dictionary of Greek,Brill,academia.Symposium,Tagung,Kongress.Band : Kulturkontakte.Apollon in MiletDidyma,Histria,Myus,Naukratis und auf Zypern.Akten des Table Ronde in Mainz vom .noifikkenglishresearchprojectsdamospublisherUniversity of Oslo.Department of Philosophy,Classics,History of Art and IdeaschapterKN  Echapterurlhttps:www.nodamosIndexitemchosenitemid.The etymology of the name is uncertain.The spelling langgrc IPAela.but the DoriansDoric form Apellon langgrc,is more archaic,derived from an earlier langgrcj.It probably is a cognate to the Doric month Apellaios langgrc,google.lt;refgt;quot;The young men became grownup kouroskouroi,ISBN lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Visible Religion.Volume IVV.Approaches to Iconology.Leiden,Brill,https:books.google.combooks?According to some scholars the words are derived from the Doric word apella langgrc,which originally meant quot;wall,quot; quot;fence for animalsquot; and later quot;assembly within the limits of the square.langgrc quot;foldsquot;,langgrc quot;assembliesquot;,langgrc quot;electionsquot;: Nilsson,Vol.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Doric Greek verb: langgrc quot;to assemblequot;,and the festival langgrc apellai,which surely belonged to Apollo.Nilsson,Vol I,lt;refgt; Apella langgrc is the name of the popular assembly in Sparta,lt;ref nameNilssongt; corresponding to the Ecclesia ancient Athensecclesia langgrc.Robert S.BeekesR.lt;refgt;Beekes,and .Several instances of popular etymology are attested from ancient authors.Thus,the Greeks most often associated Apollos name with the Greek verb langgrc apollymi,quot;to destroyquot;.lt;refgt;cite webauthorMike Campbell urlhttp:www.behindthename.comphpview.nameapollo titleMeaning,quot;redemptionquot;,with langgrc apolousis,quot;purificationquot;,and with langgrc haploun,quot;simplequot;,lt;refgt; in particular in reference to the Thessalian form of the name,langgrc,and finally with langgrc aeiballon,quot;evershootingquot;.Hesychius of AlexandriaHesychius connects the name Apollo with the Doric langgrc apella,which means quot;assemblyquot;,so that Apollo would be the god of political life,and he also gives the explanation langgrc sekos,quot;foldquot;,in which case Apollo would be the god of flocks and herds.In the Ancient Macedonian language langgrc pella means quot;stone,quot; and some toponyms may be derived from this word: langgrc Pella,lt;refgt;Robert S.BeekesR.Beekes,Etymological Dictionary of Greek,Brill,A number of nonGreek etymologies have been suggested for the name,lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson,Die Geschichte der Griechische Religion,vol.I C.Beck,It was doubted by Paul KretschmerKretschmer,Glotta XXIV,Martin Nilsson ,Vol I,a god of plague,in turn likely from Akkadian Aplu Enlil meaning simply quot;the son of Enlilquot;,a title that was given to the god Nergal,who was linked to Shamash,Babylonian god of the sun.lt;ref namequot;Grummondquot;gt;de Grummond,Nancy Thomson  Etruscan Myth,Sacred History,and Legend.Philadelphia,Pennsylvania: University of Pennsylvania Museum of Archaeology and Anthropology; Mackenzie,Donald A.the Trojan priest of Apollo,The Hittite languageHittite testimony reflects an early form langgrcLatinApeljn,which may also be surmised from comparison of Cypriot langgrc with Doric langgrc.lt;refgt;cite book lastAngel firstJohn L.perhaps in the sense of quot;Hunterquot;.Apollo,like other Greek deities,had a number of epithets applied to him,reflecting the variety of roles,duties,and aspects ascribed to the god.However,while Apollo has a great number of appellations in Greek myth,only a few occur in Latin literature,chief among them Phoebus IPAcenfibs respellFEEbs; langgrc,Phoibos,literally quot;brightquot;,lt;refgt;Robert S.BeekesR.Beekes,Etymological Dictionary of Greek,Brill,As sungod and god of light,Apollo was also known by the epithets Aegletes IPAcenlitiz respellGLEEteez; ,Aiglts,from langgrc,quot;light of the sunquot;,lt;refgt;Apollonius of Rhodes,; PseudoApollodorus,BibliothekeBiblioteca,lt;refgt; Helius IPAcenhilis respellHEElees; langgrc,Helios,literally quot;sunquot;,lt;ref namequot;simbolismoquot;gt;cite book last  lvaro,Santos first  Allan title  Simbolismo divino url  https:books.google.iduAiConLxyYC publisher  Allan lvaro,Santos lt;refgt; Phanaeus IPAcenfnis respellfNEEs; langgrc,Phanaios,literally quot;giving or bringing lightquot;,and Apollo LyceusLyceus IPAcenlasis respelllySEEs; langgrc,Lykeios,from ProtoGreek languageProtoGreek langgrc,quot;lightquot;.The meaning of the epithet quot;Lyceusquot; later became associated with Apollos mother Leto,who was the patron goddess of Lycia langgrc and who was identified with the wolf langgrc,lt;refgt;Aelian,On the Nature of Animals .Scholfield,lt;refgt; earning him the epithets Lycegenes IPAcenlasdniz respelllySEJneez; langgrc,Lukgens,Lykoktonos,from langgrc,quot;wolfquot;,and langgrc,quot;to killquot;.As god of the sun,Apollo was called Sol mythologySol IPAcensl respellSOL,literally quot;sunquot; in Latin by the Romans.In association with his birthplace,CynthusMount Cynthus on the island of Delos,Apollo was called Cynthius IPAcensnis respellSINthees; langgrc,Kunthios,literally quot;Cynthianquot;,Cynthogenes IPAcensndniz respellsinTHOJineez; langgrc,Kynthogens,literally quot;born of Cynthusquot;,and Delius IPAcendilis respellDEElees; ,Delios,literally quot;Delianquot;.As Artemiss twin,Apollo had the epithet Didymaeus IPAcenddmis respelldidiMEEs; langgrc,Didymaios,from ,quot;twinquot;.File:Bassai Temple Of Apollo Detail.Apollo was worshipped as Actiacus IPAcenkta.ks respellakTYks; langgrc,Aktiakos,literally quot;Actianquot;,Delphinius IPAcendlfnis respelldelFINees; langgrc,Delphinios,literally quot;Delphicquot;,and Pythius IPAcenpis respellPITHees; langgrc,Puthios,from ,Pyth,the area around Delphi,after Actium langgrc and Delphi  respectively,two of his principal places of worship.lt;refgt;Ovid,Metamorphoses xiii.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Strabo,He was worshipped as Acraephius IPAcenkrifis respellKREEfees; langgrc,clarifydateMarch reasonPlease put proper accent onto Greek word.Akraiphios,literally quot;Acraephianquot; or Acraephiaeus IPAcenkrifiis respellKREEfeeEEs; langgrc,Akraiphiaios,literally quot;Acraephianquot; in the Boeotian town of Acraephia langgrc,Smintheus,quot;Sminthianquot;that is,quot;of the town of Sminthos or Sminthequot;lt;ref nameLSJsmintheusgt;LSJsminqeusshortref.lt;refgt; near the Troad town of Hamaxitus.The epithet quot;Smintheusquot; has historically been confused with langgrc,quot;mousequot;,in association with Apollos role as a god of disease.For this he was also known as Parnopius IPAcenprnopis respellparNOHpees; langgrc,Parnopios,from langgrc,quot;of midgesquot;.File:TempleDelos.jpgthumbpxTemple of the Delians at Delos,dedicated to Apollo  BC.thcentury penandwash restoration.File:Chryse.jpgthumbpxTemple of Apollo Smintheus at anakkale,In Apollos role as a healer,his appellations included Acesius IPAcensis respellSEEzhs; langgrc,Akesios,from langgrc,quot;healingquot;,Acestor IPAcensstr respellSEStr; langgrc,Akestr,literally quot;healerquot;,Paean godPaean IPAcenpin respellPEEn; langgrc,Pain,from langgrc,quot;to touchquot;,citation neededdateMarch  and Iatrus IPAcenatrs respelleyeATrs; langgrc,Itros,literally quot;physicianquot;.lt;refgt;Euripides,Andromache playAndromache lt;refgt; Acesius was the epithet of Apollo worshipped in Elis,where he had a temple in the agora.lt;ref namequot;Smithquot;gt;cite bookurlhttp:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.A Roman templetemple was dedicated to Apollo Medicus at Rome,probably next to the temple of Bellona goddessBellona.As a protector and founder,Apollo had the epithets Alexicacus IPAcenlkskeks respellLEKsiKAYks; langgrc,Alexikakos,literally quot;warding off evilquot;,Apotropaeus IPAcenptrpis respellPOTrPEEs; langgrc,Apotropaios,from langgrc,quot;to avertquot;,and Epicurius IPAcenpkjris respellEPiKEWRees; langgrc,Epikourios,from langgrc,quot;to aidquot;,lt;ref namesimbolismogt; and Archegetes IPAcenrkdtiz respellarKEJteez; langgrc,Arkhgets,literally quot;founderquot;,Clarius IPAcenklris respellKLARRees; langgrc,Klrios,from Doric GreekDoric langgrc,quot;allotted lotquot;,and Genetor IPAcendntr respellJENitr; langgrc,Genetr,literally quot;ancestorquot;.lt;ref namesimbolismogt; To the Romans,he was known in this capacity as Averruncus IPAcenvrks respellAVrRUNGks; from Latin verruncare,quot;to avertquot;.He was also called Agyieus IPAcenda.jus respellGWEEews; langgrc,Agueus,from langgrc,Nomios,literally quot;pastoralquot; and Nymphegetes IPAcennmfdtiz respellnimFEJiteez; langgrc,Numphgets,from langgrc,quot;Nymphquot;,and langgrc,quot;leaderquot; for his role as a protector of shepherds and pastoral life.In his role as god of prophecy and truth,Apollo had the epithets Manticus IPAcenmntks respellMANtiks; langgrc,Mantikos,literally quot;propheticquot;,Leschenorius IPAcenlsknris respellLESkiNOHRees; langgrc,Leskhnorios,from langgrc,quot;converserquot;,and Loxias IPAcenlksis respellLOKsees; langgrc,Loxias,from langgrc,quot;to sayquot;.quot;ambiguousquot;.In this respect,the Romans called him Coelispex IPAcenslspks respellSELispeks; from Latin coelum,quot;skyquot;,and specere,quot;to look atquot;.The epithet Iatromantis IPAcenatrmnts respelleyeATrMANtis; langgrc,Itromantis,from langgrc,quot;physicianquot;,and langgrc,quot;prophetquot; refers to both his role as a god of healing and of prophecy.As god of music and arts,Apollo had the epithet Musagetes IPAcenmjusdtiz respellmewSAJiteez; Doric GreekDoric langgrc,Mousgetslt;refgt;LSJmousagetasshortref.lt;refgt; or Musegetes IPAcenmjusdtiz respellmewSEJiteez; langgrc,Mousgets,from langgrc,quot;Musequot;,and langgrc,quot;leaderquot;.As a god of archery,Apollo was known as Aphetor IPAcenfitr respellFEEtr; langgrc,Aphtr,from langgrc,quot;to let loosequot; or Aphetorus IPAcenftrs respellFETrs; langgrc,Aphtoros,of the same origin,Argyrotoxus IPAcenrdrtkss respellARjirTOKss; langgrc,Argyrotoxos,literally quot;with silver bowquot;,Hecargus IPAcenhkirs respellHEKeeURgs; langgrc,Hekaergos,literally quot;farshootingquot;,and Hecebolus IPAcenhsbls respellhiSEBls; langgrc,Hekbolos,literally quot;farshootingquot;.The Romans referred to Apollo as Articenens IPAcenrtsnnz respellarTISSinnz; quot;bowcarryingquot;.Apollo was called Ismenius IPAcenzminis respellizMEEnees; langgrc,Ismnios,literally quot;of Ismenusquot; after Ismenus,the son of Amphion and Niobe,whom he struck with an arrow.Apollo was worshipped throughout the Roman Empire.In the traditionally Celtic nationsCeltic lands he was most often seen as a healing and sun god.He was often equated with List of Celtic godsCeltic gods of similar character.lt;refgt;Miranda J.Green,Dictionary of Celtic Myth and Legend,Thames and Hudson Ltd,Apollo Atepomarus quot;the great horsemanquot; or quot;possessing a great horsequot;.Apollo was worshipped at Mauvires Indre.Horses were,in the Celtic world,closely linked to the sun.lt;refgt;Corpus Inscriptionum Latinarum XIII,; A.Ross,Pagan Celtic Britain,; M.Green,The Gods of the Celts,Apollo Belenus bright or brilliant.This epithet was given to Apollo in parts of Gaul,Northern Italy and Noricum part of modern Austria.Apollo Belenus was a healing and sun god.lt;refgt;J.Zwicker,Fontes Historiae Religionis Celticae,Berlin; Corpus Inscriptionum Latinarum V,XII,XIII; J.Gourcest,quot;Le culte de Belenos en Provence occidentale et en Gaulequot;,Ogam .:; E.Thevonot,quot;Le cheval sacre dans la Gaule de lEstquot;,Revue archeologique de lEst et du CentreEst vol ,quot;Temoignages du culte de lApollon gaulois dans lHelvetie romainequot;,Revue celtique vol ,Apollo Cunomaglus hound lord.A title given to Apollo at a shrine at Nettleton,WiltshireRomanperiod shrineNettleton Shrub,Wiltshire.May have been a god of healing.Cunomaglus himself may originally have been an independent healing god.lt;refgt;W.Wedlake,The Excavation of the Shrine of Apollo at Nettleton,Wiltshire,Society of Antiquaries of London,Apollo Grannus.Grannus was a healing spring god,later equated with Apollo.lt;refgt;M.Szabo,Thevonat,Parislt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;devriesquot;gt;La religion des Celtes,de Vries,Apollo Maponus.A god known from inscriptions in Britain.This may be a local fusion of Apollo and Maponus.Apollo Moritasgus masses of sea water.An epithet for Apollo at Alesia,where he was worshipped as god of healing and,possibly,of physicians.lt;refgt;J.Le Gall,Alesia,archeologie et histoire Paris .Apollo Vindonnus clear light.Apollo Vindonnus had a temple at Essarois,near ChtillonsurSeine in presentday Burgundy.He was a god of healing,especially of the eyes.Apollo Virotutis benefactor of mankind?Apollo Virotutis was worshipped,among other places,at Fins dAnnecy HauteSavoie and at Jublains MaineetLoire.File:Omphalos museum.The cult centers of Apollo in Greece,Delphi and Delos,date from the th century BCE.The Delos sanctuary was primarily dedicated to Artemis,Apollos twin sister.At Delphi,Apollo was venerated as the slayer of Pytho.For the Greeks,In archaic period in Greecearchaic Greece he was the prophet,the oracular god who in older times was connected with quot;healingquot;.In classical period in Greececlassical Greece he was the god of light and of music,but in popular religion he had a strong function to keep away evil.lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson quot;.Die Geschicte der Giechischen Religion.Vol Iquot;.Beck Verlag.Munchen.p lt;refgt; Walter Burkertlt;refgt;Burkert,Walter.Greek Religion,lt;refgt; discerned three components in the prehistory of Apollo worship,which he termed quot;a Doriannorthwest Greek component,a CretanMinoan component,and a SyroHittite component.and of the observation of the omens of the days.The inspiration oracularcult was probably introduced from Anatolia.The ritualism belonged to Apollo from the beginning.The Greeks created the Legalism Western philosophylegalism,the supervision of the orders of the gods,and the demand for moderation and harmony.Apollo became the god of shining youth,the protector of music,spirituallife,moderation and perceptible order.The improvement of the old Anatolian god,and his elevation to an intellectual sphere,may be considered an achievement of the Greek people.lt;ref namequot;Nilssonquot;gt;Martin P.NilssonMartin Nilsson.Die Geschichte der Griechische Religion Vol I,The function of Apollo as a quot;healerquot; is connected with Paean godPaean langgrc,the physician of the Gods in the Iliad,who seems to come from a more primitive religion.lt;refgt;Paieon langgrc puts painrelieving medicines on the wounds of Pluton and Ares  Ilias E.This art is related with Egypt: Odyssey D: M.Nilsson Vol I,lt;refgt;cite booktitleThe Mycenaeansurlhttps:books.google.combooks?deaditerranean.UKpublisherCambridge University Pressyearisbnurlhttps:books.google.combooks?idRMjMtGaNMCamp;lpgPPamp;pgPAvonepageamp;qamp;ffalsepage At Google Books.lt;refgt;  but this is not certain.He did not have a separate cult,Later the Greeks knew the original meaning of the relevant song quot;paeanquot; langgrc.The magicians were also called quot;seerdoctorsquot; langgrc,and they used an ecstatic prophetic art which was used exactly by the god Apollo at the oracles.lt;refgt;langgrc     .Which is sung to stop the plagues and the diseases.Proklos: Chrestom from Photios Bibl.code.: Martin Nilsson.Die Geschicthe der Griechischen religion.Vol I,In the Iliad,Apollo is the healer under the gods,but he is also the bringer of disease and death with his arrows,similar to the function of the terrible Vedic god of disease Rudra.lt;ref namequot;Martin Nilsson  p.In NorthEurope they speak of the quot;Elfshotsquot;.In Sweden where the Lapps were called magicians,they speak of the quot;Lappenshotsquot;.Martin Nilsson .Vol I,lt;refgt; He sends a terrible plague langgrc to the Achaeans HomerAchaeans.The god who sends a disease can also prevent from it; therefore,when it stops,they make a purifying ceremony and offer him a hecatomb to ward off evil.When the oath of his priest appeases,they pray and with a song they call their own god,the beautiful Paean.lt;refgt;Ilias A .Martin Nilsson .Vol I,Some common epithets of Apollo as a healer are quot;paionquot; langgrc,literally quot;healerquot; or quot;helperquot;lt;refgt;http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseus:text:.quot;helpquot;,quot;ouliosquot; langgrc,quot;healed woundquot;,also a quot;scarquot; lt;refgt;http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseus:abo:tlg,:::amp;langoriginal Perseus.tufts.edult;refgt; and quot;loimiosquot; langgrc,quot;plaguequot;.In classical times,his strong function in popular religion was to keep away evil,and was therefore called quot;apotropaiosquot; langgrc,quot;divertquot;,quot;deterquot;,quot;avertquot; and quot;alexikakosquot; from verbv.langgrc  nounn.langgrc,quot;defend from evilquot;.lt;refgt;Pausanias VIII ,IV ,Sittig.Nom P.fAristoph.Vesp.Paus.Martin Nilsson  Vol I,lt;refgt; In later writers,the word,usually spelled quot;Paeanquot;,becomes a mere epithet of Apollo in his capacity as a god of healing.lt;refgt;cite book last  Graf first  Fritz title  Apollo url  https:books.google.Homer illustrated Paeon the god,and the song both of apotropaic thanksgiving or triumph.Such songs were originally addressed to Apollo,and afterwards to other gods: to Dionysus,to Apollo Helios,to Apollos son Asclepius the healer.About the th century BCE,or to offer thanks after such protection had been rendered.It was in this way that Apollo had become recognised as the god of music.when a fleet left the harbour,and also after a victory had been won.File:ApolloWaltersArt.when he slew with his bow and arrows the serpent Python,urlhttp:art.thewalters.accessdate June lt;refgt; Walters Art MuseumThe Walters Art Museum.is reinforced by the month Apellaios in northwest Greek calendars,lt;refgt;Graf,Apollo,; Burkert also notes in this context Archilochus Fr.lt;refgt; but it can explain only the Doric type of the name,stone.Stones played an important part in the cult of the god,especially in the oracular shrine of Delphi Omphalos.lt;refgt;Compare: Baetylus.In Semitic: sacred stonelt;refgt;lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson .Vol I.lt;refgt; The quot;Homeric hymnquot; represents Apollo as a Northern intruder.lt;refgt;Herbert W.Park .The delphic oracle.Vol.The earth deity had power over the ghostly world,and it is believed that she was the deity behind the oracle.lt;refgt;Lewis FarnelThe cult of the city states.Clarendon Press.VIII.lt;refgt; The older tales mentioned two dragons who were perhaps intentionally conflated.A female dragon named Delphyne langgrc,quot;wombquot;,who is obviously connected with Delphi and Apollo Delphinios,and a male serpent Typhon langgrc,quot;to smokequot;,the adversary of Zeus in the Titanomachy,who the narrators confused with Python mythologyPython.Karl Kerenyi .: The gods of the Greeks,Jane.Harisson : Themis.A study of the social origins of the Greek religion.Cambridge University Press.lt;refgt;In Minoan religion the serpent is the protector of the household underground stored corn.Also in Greek religion,quot;snake of the housequot; langgrc  in the temple of Athena at Acropolis,etc.and in Greek folklore.Martin Nilsson,Vol.lt;refgt; but she was represented as a dragon,as often happens in Northern European folklore as well as in the East.lt;refgt;Nordig sagas.HittitesHittite myth of Illuyankas.Also in the Bible: Leviathan.Porzig .Illuyankas and Typhon.Kleinasiatische Forschung,Apollo and his sister Artemis can bring death with their arrows.The conception that diseases and death come from invisible shots sent by supernatural beings,or magicians is common in Germanic mythologyGermanic and Norse mythology.lt;ref namequot;Martin Nilsson  p.quot;gt; In Greek mythology Artemis was the leader langgrc,quot;hegemonquot; of the nymphs,who had similar functions with the Norse mythologyNordic ElfElves.lt;ref namequot;Nilssonquot;gt;.Martin Nilsson ,Vol I,lt;refgt; The quot;elfshotquot; originally indicated disease or death attributed to the elves,and also for healing rituals.lt;refgt;Hall,Alaric.Getting Shot of Elves: Healing,Witchcraft and Fairies in the Scottish Witchcraft Trials,http:eprints.whiterose.amp;nbsp;.The Vedic Rudra has some similar functions with Apollo.The terrible god is called quot;The Archerquot;,and the bow is also an attribute of Shiva.lt;refgt;For IASTarva as a name of Shiva see: Apte,amp;nbsp;.lt;refgt; Rudra could bring diseases with his arrows,but he was able to free people of them,and his alternative Shiba is a healer physician god.lt;refgt;For association between Rudra and disease,with Rigvedic references,see: Bhandarkar,amp;nbsp;.exorcisms,and with the oracular cult.File:AMI  Goldene Doppelaxt.It seems an oracular cult existed in Delphi from the Mycenaean GreeceMycenaean ages.lt;refgt;Odyssey .lt;refgt; In historical times,the priests of Delphi were called labrysLabryaden,quot;the doubleaxe menquot;,which indicates Minoan civilizationMinoan origin.The doubleaxe,labrys,was the holy symbol of the CreteCretan labyrinth.lt;refgt;Huxley .Cretan Paewones.Roman and Byzantine studies,amp;nbsp;lt;refgt;lt;refgt;H.Wunderlich.The secret of Creta Souvenir Press Ltd.London p.where they evidently transferred their religious practices.Apollo Delphinios was a seagod especially worshiped in Crete and in the islands,and his name indicates his connection with Delphilt;ref namequot;Martin Nilsson  p.quot;gt;Martin Nilsson .Volamp;nbsp;I,amp;nbsp;lt;refgt; and the holy serpent Delphyne quot;wombquot;.citation neededdateMarch reasonSources needed on both A.Delphinios connected to Delphyne.Apollos sister Artemis,who was the Greek goddess of hunting,is identified with Britomartis Diktynna,the Minoan civilizationMinoan quot;Mistress of the animalsquot;.In her earliest depictions she is accompanied by the quot;Mister of the animalsquot;,a male god of hunting who had the bow as his attribute.His original name is unknown,but it seems that he was absorbed by the more popular Apollo,who stood by the virgin quot;Mistress of the Animalsquot;,becoming her brother.The old oracles in Delphi seem to be connected with a local tradition of the priesthood,and there is not clear evidence that a kind of inspirationprophecy existed in the temple.according to the local tradition.In that regard,the mythical seeress Sibyl of Anatolian origin,with her ecstatic art,looks unrelated to the oracle itself.lt;refgt;Hugh Bowden .Classical Athens and the Delphic oracle,lt;refgt; However,the Greek tradition is referring to the existence of vapours and chewing of laurelleaves,which seem to be confirmed by recent studies.lt;refgt;cite book author  William J.Plato describes the priestesses of Delphi and Dodona as frenzied women,obsessed by quot;maniaquot; langgrc,quot;frenzyquot;,a Greek word he connected with mantis langgrc,quot;prophetquot;.lt;refgt;LSJmantisshortref.SyriaMari in the second millennium BC.lt;refgt;Walter Burkert .The Greek religion.lt;refgt; Although Crete had contacts with Mari from  BC,lt;refgt;F.Schachermeyer .lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson .Vol I,File:Coin of Apollo Agyieus.A nonGreek origin of Apollo has long been assumed in scholarship.lt;ref namequot;DDDquot;gt; The name of Apollos mother Leto has Lydian origin,and she was worshipped on the coasts of Asia Minor.The inspiration oracular cult was probably introduced into Greece from Anatolia,which is the origin of Sibyl,and where existed some of the oldest oracular shrines.Omens,symbols,purifications,and exorcisms appear in old AssyriaAssyroBabylonian texts,and these rituals were spread into the empire of the Hittites.A similar story is mentioned by Plutarch.lt;refgt;Plutarch,Life of Solon,; Aristotle,Constitution of the AtheniansAristotleAth.Pol.lt;refgt; The story indicates that Epimenides was probably heir to the shamanic religions of Asia,and proves,together with the Homeric hymn,that Crete had a resisting religion up to historical times.It seems that these rituals were dormant in Greece,and they were reinforced when the Greeks migrated to Anatolia.Homer pictures Apollo on the side of the TroyTrojans,fighting against the Achaeans HomerAchaeans,during the Trojan War.He is pictured as a terrible god,less trusted by the Greeks than other gods.The god seems to be related to Appaliunas,a tutelary god of Wilusa Troy in Asia Minor,but the word is not complete.lt;refgt;Paul Kretschmer .Glotta XXIV p.Martin Nilsson .Vol I,lt;refgt; The stones found in front of the gates of Homeric Troy were the symbols of Apollo.and his symbol was a tapered stone or column.lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson,Die Geschichte der Griechische Religion.vol.I C.Beck,lt;refgt; However,while usually Greek festivals were celebrated at the full moon,all the feasts of Apollo were celebrated at the seventh day of the month,and the emphasis given to that day sibutu indicates a Babylonian origin.lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson .Vol I,invoked during plague years.Here we have an apotropeapotropaic situation,where a god originally bringing the plague was invoked to end it.Aplu,meaning the son of,was a title given to the god Nergal,who was linked to the Babylonian god of the sun Shamash.but who can also heal,possessing a magic art that separates him from the other Greek gods.lt;refgt;Martin Nilsson .Vol I.lt;refgt; In Iliad,his priest prays to Apollo Smintheus,lt;refgt;quot;You Apollo Smintheus,let my tears become your arrows against the Danaans,for revengequot;.Iliad .Apollo is the mousegod Strabo .lt;refgt;lt;refgt;quot;Sminthiaquot; in several areas of Greece.Martin Nilsson .lt;refgt; All these functions,including the function of the healergod Paean godPaean,who seems to have Mycenean origin,are fused in the cult of Apollo.File:Columns of the Temple of Apollo at Delphi,Greece.jpegthumbpxColumns of the Temple of Apollo DelphiTemple of Apollo at Delphi,Unusually among the Olympic deities,Apollo had two cult sites that had widespread influence: Delos and Delphi.In cult practice,lt;refgt;Burkert :.lt;refgt; Apollos Cult religioncult was already fully established when written sources commenced,about  BCE.Oracular sanctuaries to Apollo were established in other sites.In the nd and rd century CE,those at Didyma and Clarus pronounced the socalled quot;theological oraclesquot;,in which Apollo confirms that all deities are aspects or servants of an MonismMonism,pantheism,and panentheismallencompassing,highest deity.quot;In the rd century,Apollo fell silent.Julian the Apostate    tried to revive the Delphic oracle,but failed.File:Delos lions.Apollo had a famous oracle in Delphi,and other notable ones in Clarus and Branchidae.His oracular shrine in Abae in Phocis,where he bore the toponymic epithet Abaeus langgrc ,Apollon Abaios,was important enough to be consulted by Croesus.lt;refgt;Herodotus,Abae in Phocis.Bassae in the Peloponnese.At Clarus,on the west coast of Asia Minor; as at Delphi a holy spring which gave off a pneuma,from which the priests drank.In Ancient CorinthCorinth,the Oracle of Corinth came from the town of Tenea,from prisoners supposedly taken in the Trojan War.At Khyrse,in Troad,the temple was built for Apollo Smintheus.In Delos,there was an oracle to the Delian Apollo,during summer.The Hieron Sanctuary of Apollo adjacent to the Sacred Lake,was the place where the god was said to have been born.In Delphi,the Pythia became filled with the pneuma of Apollo,said to come from a spring inside the Adyton.In Didyma,an oracle on the coast of Anatolia,south west of Lydian Luwian Sardis,Was believed to have been founded by Branchus,son or lover of Apollo.In ManbijHierapolis Bambyce,Syria modern Manbij,according to the treatise De Dea Syria,the sanctuary of the AtargatisSyrian Goddess contained a robed and bearded image of Apollo.Divination was based on spontaneous movements of this image.lt;refgt;Lucian attrib.De Dea Syria http:www.sacredtexts.comclaluctsgtsg.htm .At Patara LyciaPatara,in Lycia,there was a seasonal winter oracle of Apollo,said to have been the place where the god went from Delos.As at Delphi the oracle at Patara was a woman.In Segesta in Sicily.Oracles were also given by sons of Apollo.In Oropus,north of Athens,the oracle Amphiaraus,was said to be the son of Apollo; Oropus also had a sacred spring.in Labadea,convertmikm east of Delphi,Trophonius,another son of Apollo,killed his brother and fled to the cave where he was also afterwards consulted as an oracle.A lot of temples dedicated to Apollo were built in Greece and in the Greek colonies,and they show the spread of the cult of Apollo,and the evolution of the Greek architecture,which was mostly based on the rightness of form,and on mathematical relations.Some of the earliest temples,especially in Crete,dont belong to any Greek order.It seems that the first peripteral temples were rectangle wooden structures.The different wooden elements were considered divine,and their forms were preserved in the marble or stone elements of the temples of Doric order.The Greeks used standard types,The temples should be canonic,and the architects were trying to achieve the esthetic perfection.lt;refgt;To know what a thing is,we must know the look of itquot;: Rhys Carpenter: The esthetic basis of Greek art.Indiana University Press.The first buildings were narrow to hold the roof,and when the dimensions changed,some mathematical relations became necessary,in order to keep the original forms.This probably influenced the theory of numbers of Pythagoras,who believed that behind the appearance of things,there was the permanent principle of mathematics.lt;ref namequot;C.Bowra  p.quot;gt;C.Bowra .The Greek experience,The Doric order dominated during the th and the th century B.but there was a mathematical problem regarding the position of the triglyphs,which couldnt be solved without changing the original forms.The order was almost abandoned for the Ionic order,but the Ionic capital also posed an insoluble problem at the corner of a temple.Both orders were abandoned for the Corinthian order gradually during the Hellenistic age,and under Rome.Thebes,Greece: The oldest temple probably dedicated to Apollo Ismenius was  built in the th century B.C It seems that it was a curvilinear building.The Doric orderDoric temple was built in the early th century B.but only some small parts have been found lt;refgt;William Dinsmoor ,The architecture of Ancient Greece,The people held laurel branches  daphnai,and at the head of the procession,walked a youth chosen priest of Apollo,who was called quot;daphnephorosquot;.lt;ref namequot;William Smith .quot;gt;William Smith.A Dictionary of Greek and Roman Antiquities,John Murray,London,Eretria: According to the Homeric hymn to Apollo,the god arrived to the plain,seeking for a location to establish its oracle.The first temple of Apollo Daphnephoros,quot;Apollo,laurelbearerquot;,or quot;carrying off Daphnequot;,is dated to  BC.The temple was curvilinear hecatombedon a hundred feet.Another temple probably peripteral was built in the th century B.with an inner row of wooden columns over its Geometric predecessor.It was rebuilt peripteral around  BC,with the stylobate measuring ,The number of pteron column was  x .lt;refgt;http:odysseus.culture.grheh.objid Hellenic Ministry of culture,Temple of Apollo Daphnephoroslt;refgt;lt;refgt;Rufus B.Richardson,Dreros Crete.The temple of Apollo Delphinios dates from the th century B.or probably from the middle of the th century BC.According to the legend,Apollo appeared as a dolphin,and carried Cretan priests to the port of Delphi.lt;ref namequot;Martin Nilsson  p.quot;gt; The dimensions of the plan are ,and the building was not peripteral.It contains columnbases of the Minoan civilizationMinoan type,which may  be considered as the predecessors of the Doric orderDoric columns.lt;refgt;Robertson pp.Gortyn Crete.A temple of Pythian Apollo,was built in the th century BC.The plan measured ,and it was not peripteral.The walls were solid,made from limestone,and there was single door on the east side.Thermon West Greece: The Doric orderDoric temple of Apollo Thermios,was built in the middle of the th century BC.It was built on an older curvilinear building dating perhaps from the th century B.on which a peristyle was added.The temple was narrow,and the number of pteron columns  probably wooden  was  X .There was a single row of inner columns.It measures .m at the stylobate,which was made from stones.lt;ref namequot;Spivey,quot;gt;Spivey,Some special capitals with floral ornament  have been found,which are called  Aeolic orderAeolic,and it seems  that  they were borrowed from the East.lt;ref nameRobertsongt;D.S Robertson:A handbook of Greek and Roman architecture,Cambridge University Press pp.Cyrene,Libya: The oldest Doric orderDoric temple of Apollo was built in c.BC.The number of pteron columns was   x ,and it measures  .m at the stylobate.There was a double row of sixteen inner columns on stylobates.The capitals were made from stone.Naukratis: An Ionic orderIonic temple was a  built in the early th century BC.Only some fragments have been found,and the earlier made from limestone,are identified among the oldest of the Ionic order.lt;refgt;Robertson,File:Apollotempel.gifthumbleftpx Floor plan of the temple of Apollo,Corinth: A Doric orderDoric temple  was  built in the th century BC.The temples stylobate measures .and the number of pteron columns was  x .There was a double row of inner columns.The style is similar with the Temple of Alcmeonidae at Delphi.lt;refgt;Robertson p.File:SiracusaTempleofApollPlanbjs.pngthumbrightpxFloor plan of the temple of Apollo,Syracuse,Sicily: A Doric orderDoric temple  was built at the beginning of the th century BC.The temples stylobate measures .m and the number of pteron columns was  x .It was the first temple in Greek west built completely out of stone.A second row of columns were added,obtaining  the effect of an inner porch.lt;refgt;Mertens ,Selinus Sicily:The Doric orderDoric  Temple C SelinusTemple C dates from  BC,and it was probably dedicated to Apollo.The temples stylobate measures .X .m  and the number of pteron columns was  x .There was portico with a second row of columns,which is also attested for the temple at Syracuse,SicilySyracuse.Delphi: The first temple dedicated to Apollo,was built in the th century BC.According to the legend,it was wooden made of laurel branches.The quot;Temple of Alcmeonidaequot; was built in c.BC.and it is the oldest Doric temple with significant marble elements.The temples stylobate measures .and the number of pteron columns as  x .lt;refgt;http:www.ancientgreece.orgarchitecturedelphitempleofapollo.html Temple of Apollo at Delphi,AncientGreece.orglt;refgt; A fest similar with Apollos fest at Thebes,Greece was celebrated every nine years.A  boy was sent to the temple,who walked on the sacred road and returned carrying a laurel branch dopnephoros.The maidens participated with joyful songs.lt;ref namequot;William Smith .Chios: An Ionic orderIonic temple of Apollo Phanaios was built at the end of the th century BC.Only some small parts have been found,but the capitals had floral ornament.Abae Phocis ancient regionPhocis.The temple was destroyed by the Persians in the invasion of Xerxes I of PersiaXerxes in  BCE,and later by the Boeotians.It was rebuilt by Hadrian.and shows the continuity of Mycenaean and Classical Greek religion.Delos: A temple probably dedicated to Apollo and not peripteral,was built in the late th century B.with a plan measuring ,The Doric orderDoric Great temple of Apollo,was built in c.BC.The temples stylobate measures .and the number of pteron columns as  x .Marble was extensively used.Ambracia: A Doric orderDoric peripteral temple  dedicated to Apollo Pythios Sotir was built in  B.and It is lying at the centre of the Greek city Arta,GreeceArta.Only some parts have been found,and it seems that the temple was built  on earlier sanctuaries dedicated to Apollo.The temple measures  ,m at the stylobate.The foundation which supported the statue of the god,still exists.lt;refgt;http:odysseus.culture.grheh.objid Ministry of culture.File:Bassai Temple of Apollo Plan.Bassae Peloponnesus:A temple dedicated to Apollo Epikourios quot;Apollo the helperquot;,was built in  B.C  and it was designed by Iktinos.It combined Doric orderDoric and Ionic orderIonic elements,and the earliest use of column with a Corinthian orderCorinthian capital in the middle.lt;refgt;http:odysseus.culture.grheh.objid  Hellenic Ministry of Culture: The Temple of Epicurean Apollo.lt;refgt; The temple is of a relatively modest size,with the stylobate measuring .metreslt;ref namequot;WHOquot;gt;http:www.worldheritagesite.orgsitesapolloepicurius.html Temple of Apollo Epicurius at Bassae,World Heritage Site.lt;refgt; containing a Doric orderDoric peristyle of  x  columns.The roof left a central space open to admit light and air.File:Tempel des Apollo Didymaeos in Milet.pngrightthumbpxTemple of Apollo,Didyma near Miletus: The gigantic Ionic orderIonic  temple of Apollo Didymaios started around  BC.The construction ceased and then it was restarted in  BC.The temple is dipteral,with an outer row of  X  columns,and  it measures .m at the stylobate.lt;refgt;Peter Schneider: Neue Funde vom archaischen Apollontempel in Didyma.In: ErnstLudwig Schwandner ed.: Sule und Geblk.Zu Struktur und Wandlungsproze griechischrmischer Architektur.Bauforschungskolloquium in Berlin vom .Juni .Clarus near ancient Colophon cityColophon: According to the legend,the famous seer  Calchas,on his return from Troy,came to Clarus.He challenged  the seer Mopsus,and  died when he lost.lt;refgt;http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseus:text:.and it was  peripteral with  x  columns.It was reconstructed at the end of the Hellenistic period,lt;refgt;http:www.klaros.orgapollonklariostapinagivesunaklari?Hamaxitus Troad: In Iliad,Chryses the priest of Apollo,addresses the god with the epithet Smintheus Lord of Mice,related with the gods  ancient role as bringer of the disease plague.but the symbol of  the mouse god was used on coinage probably from the th century B.lt;refgt;Bresson  ,citing the excavations reports of zgnel .lt;refgt; The temple measures ,m at the stylobate,and the number of pteron columns  was   X .lt;refgt;Robertson p.Veii Etruria: The temple of Apollo was  built in the late th century B.and indicates the spread of Apollos culture Aplu in Etruria.There was a  prostyle porch,which is called Tuscan orderTuscan ,and a triple cella ,m wide.lt;ref namequot;Robertson pp.quot;gt;Robertson pp.Falerii Veteres Etruria: A temple of Apollo was built probably in the thrd century B.Parts of a teraccotta capital,and a teraccotta base have been found.It seems that the Etruscan columns were  derived from the archaic Doric.lt;ref namequot;Robertson pp.lt;refgt;http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseus:text:.File:Pompeii Regio  Insula  Temple of Apollo plan .Pompeii,Italy: The cult of Apollo,was  widespread in the region of Campania,since the th century B.The temple was built in  B.but  its beginnings lie in the th century BC.It was reconstructed after an earthquake in A.It demonstrates a mixing of styles,which formed the basis  of Roman architecture.The columns in front  of the cella  formed a Tuscan orderTuscan prostyle  porch,and the cella is situated unusually far back.The peripteral colonnade of  Ionic orderIonic columns was placed in such a way,that the emphasis was given to the front side.lt;refgt;Davidson CSA :http:sites.davidson.educsathetempleofapolloatpompeiiamishmashofarchitecture  Temple of Apollo,Rome: The temple of Apollo Sosianus and the temple of Apollo Medicus .The first temple building dates to  BC,and was dedicated to Apollo Medicus the doctor,after a  plague of  BC.lt;refgt;http:www.thelatinlibrary.comlivyliv.shtml Livy .lt;refgt; It was rebuilt by Gaius Sosius,probably in  B.Only three columns with Corinthian orderCorinthian  capitals exist today.It seems that the cult of Apollo had existed in this area since at least to the midth century BC.lt;refgt;http:www.thelatinlibrary.comlivyliv.shtml Livy .It was  dedicated by Augustus on  B.The faade of the original temple was Ionic orderIonic,and it was constructed from solid blocks of marble.Many famous statues by Greek masters were on display in and around the temple,including a marble statue of the god at the entrance,and a statue of Apollo in the cella.lt;refgt;http:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerEGazetteerPlacesEuropeItalyLazioRomaRomeTextsPLATOPAedesApollinisPalatini.Melite ancient cityMelite modern Mdina,Malta: A Temple of Apollo MeliteTemple of Apollo was built in the city in the nd century AD.Its remains were discovered in the th century,Parts of the temples podium were rediscovered in .maltamigration.comnewstimes.shtmlworkTimes of Maltadate March archiveurlhttp:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.maltamigration.comnewstimes.File:Apollo Artemis Brygos Louvre G.jpgthumbpxApollo left and Artemis.Brygos potter signed,tondo of an Attic redfigure cup c.BC,Muse du Louvre.When Zeus wife Hera discovered that Leto was pregnant and that Zeus was the father,she banned Leto from giving birth on quot;terra firmaquot;.In her wanderings,Leto found the newly created floating island of Delos,which was neither mainland nor a real island.She gave birth there and was accepted by the people,offering them her promise that her son would be always favourable toward the city.Afterwards,Zeus secured Delos to the bottom of the ocean.This island later became sacred to Apollo.It is also stated that Hera kidnapped Eileithyia,the goddess of childbirth,to prevent Leto from going into labor.The other gods tricked Hera into letting her go by offering her a necklace,nine yards  m long,of amber.Mythographers agree that Artemis was born first and then assisted with the birth of Apollo,or that Artemis was born one day before Apollo,Apollo was born on the seventh day langgrc,hebdomageneslt;refgt;LSJebdomagenhsshortref.The seventh and twentieth,the days of the new and full moon,were ever afterwards held sacred to him.Four days after his birth,Apollo killed the chthonic dragon Python mythologyPython,which lived in Delphi beside the Castalian Spring.This was the spring which emitted vapors that caused the oracle at Delphi to give her prophecies.Hera sent the serpent to hunt Leto to her death across the world.To protect his mother,Apollo begged Hephaestus for a bow and arrows.After receiving them,Apollo cornered Python in the sacred cave at Delphi.lt;refgt;Children of the Gods by Kenneth McLeish,page .lt;refgt; Apollo killed Python but had to be punished for it,since Python was a child of Gaia mythologyGaia.Hera then sent the giant Tityos to rape Leto.This time Apollo was aided by his sister Artemis in protecting their mother.During the battle Zeus finally relented his aid and hurled Tityos down to Tartarus.There,he was pegged to the rock floor,covering an area of convertacrem,where a pair of vultures feasted daily on his liver.a priest of Apollo whose daughter Chryseis had been captured.He demanded her return,and the Achaeans complied,indirectly causing the anger of Achilles,which is the theme of the Iliad.In the Iliad,when Diomedes injured Aeneas,Apollo rescued him.First,Aphrodite tried to rescue Aeneas but Diomedes injured her as well.Aeneas was then enveloped in a cloud by Apollo,who took him to Pergamos,a sacred spot in Troy.the gods own son by Hecuba,on the very altar of the gods own temple.Apollo in revenge killed the CyclopsCyclopes,who had fashioned the bolt for Zeus.lt;refgt;PseudoApollodorus,Bibliothke iii.lt;refgt; Apollo would have been banished to Tartarus forever for this,but was instead sentenced to one year of Penal labourhard labor,due to the intercession of his mother,Leto.During this time he served as shepherd for AdmetusKing Admetus of Pherae in Thessaly.Admetus treated Apollo well,and,in return,the god conferred great benefits on Admetus.Apollo helped Admetus win Alcestis,if another took his place.But when it came time for Admetus to die,his parents,whom he had assumed would gladly die for him,refused to cooperate.Instead,Alcestis took his place,but Heracles managed to quot;Coercionpersuadequot; Thanatos,the god of death,to return her to the world of the living.File:Niobe JacquesLouisDavid  Dallas Museum of Art.jpgthumbpxArtemis and Apollo Piercing Niobes Children with their Arrows by JacquesLouis David,Niobe,the queen of Thebes GreeceThebes and wife of Amphion,boasted of her superiority to Leto because she had fourteen children Niobids,seven male and seven female,while Leto had only two.Apollo killed her sons,and Artemis her daughters.Apollo and Artemis used poisoned arrows to kill them,though according to some versions of the myth,a number of the Niobids were spared Chloris,usually.Amphion,at the sight of his dead sons,either killed himself or was killed by Apollo after swearing revenge.A devastated Niobe fled to Spil MountMount Sipylos in Asia Minor and turned into stone as she wept.Her tears formed the river Achelous.when the gods themselves entombed them.Love affairs ascribed to Apollo are a late development in Greek mythology.lt;refgt;quot;The lovestories themselves were not told until later.quot; Karl Kerenyi,The Gods of the Greeks :.the result being that they stand out more prominently in the modern imagination.File:Apollo amp; Daphne September a.Daphne was a nymph,daughter of the Sea and river deityriver god Peneus,who had scorned Apollo.The myth explains the connection of Apollo with  daphn,the Bay Laurellaurel whose leaves his priestess employed at Delphi.lt;refgt;The ancient Daphne episode is noted in late narratives,notably in Ovid,Metamorphoses,in Hyginus,Fabulae,and by the fourthcenturyCE teacher of rhetoric and Christian convert,Libanius,in Narrationes.lt;refgt; In Ovids Metamorphoses,Phoebus Apollo chaffs Cupid for toying with a weapon more suited to a man,whereupon Cupid wounds him with a golden dart; simultaneously,however,Cupid shoots a leaden arrow into Daphne,causing her to be repulsed by Apollo.Following a spirited chase by Apollo,Daphne prays to her father,Peneus,for help,and he changes her into the laurel tree,sacred to Apollo.Artemis Daphnaia,who had her temple among the Lacedemonians,at a place called Hypsoilt;refgt;G.Shipley,quot;The Extent of Spartan Territory in the Late Classical and Hellenistic Periodsquot;,The Annual of the British School at Athens,lt;refgt; in Antiquity,on the slopes of Mount Cnacadion near the Spartan frontier,lt;refgt;Pausanias geographerPausanias,http:www.theoi.comTextPausaniasB.html online text; Lilius Gregorius Gyraldus,Historiae Deorum Gentilium,Basel,Syntagma ,is noted in this connection in http:www.textlog.html Benjamin Hederich,Grndliches mythologisches Lexikon,lt;refgt; had her own sacred laurel trees.lt;refgt;Karl Kerenyi,The Gods of the Greeks,:lt;refgt; At Eretria the identity of an excavated th and thcentury temple to Apollo Daphnephoros,quot;Apollo,laurelbearerquot;,or quot;carrying off Daphnequot;,a quot;place where the citizens are to take the oathquot;,is identified in inscriptions.lt;refgt;Rufus B.Richardson,July  September :; Paul Auberson,Eretria.Fouilles et Recherches I,Temple dApollon Daphnphoros,Architecture Bern,See also Plutarch,Pythian Oracle,Leucothea was daughter of Orchamus and sister of Clytia.Clytia,jealous of her sister because she wanted Apollo for herself,told Orchamus the truth,betraying her sisters trust and confidence in her.Enraged,Orchamus ordered Leucothea to be buried alive.Apollo refused to forgive Clytia for betraying his beloved,and a grieving Clytia wilted and slowly died.Apollo changed her into an incense plant,either heliotrope or sunflower,which follows the sun every day.Marpessa was kidnapped by Idas but was loved by Apollo as well.Zeus made her choose between them,and she chose Idas on the grounds that Apollo,being immortal,would tire of her when she grew old.Castalia was a nymph whom Apollo loved.She fled from him and dove into the castalian Springspring at Delphi,at the base of Mt.Parnassos,which was then named after her.In the last oracle is mentioned that the quot;water which could speakquot;,has been lost for ever.By Cyrene mythologyCyrene,Apollo had a son named Aristaeus,who became the patron god of cattle,fruit trees,hunting,husbandry and beekeeping.He was also a culturehero and taught humanity dairy skills,the use of nets and traps in hunting,and how to cultivate olives.Hecuba,was the wife of King Priam of Troy,and Apollo had a son with her named Troilus.He was ambushed and killed by Achilleus.Cassandra,was daughter of Hecuba and Priam,and Troilus halfsister.Apollo fell in love with Cassandra and promised her the gift of prophecy to seduce her,but she rejected him afterwards.Enraged,Apollo indeed gave her the ability to know the future,with a curse that she could only see the future tragedies and that no one would ever believe her.Coronis Greek mythologyCoronis,was daughter of Phlegyas,King of the Lapiths.Pregnant with Asclepius,Coronis fell in love with Ischys,son of Elatus.A crow informed Apollo of the affair.When he found out the truth he sent his sister,Artemis,to kill Coronis in other stories,Apollo himself had killed Coronis.As a result,he also made the crow sacred and gave them the task of announcing important deaths.Apollo rescued the baby and gave it to the centaur Chiron to raise.Phlegyas was irate after the death of his daughter and burned the Temple of Apollo at Delphi.Apollo then killed him for what he did.In Euripides play Ion playIon,Apollo fathered Ion mythologyIon by Creusa,wife of Xuthus.Creusa left Ion to die in the wild,but Apollo asked Hermes to save the child and bring him to the oracle at Delphi,where he was raised by a priestess.Acantha,was the spirit of the Acanthus genusacanthus tree,and Apollo had one of his other liaisons with her.Upon her death,Apollo transformed her into a sunloving herb.According to the Bibliotheca PseudoApollodorusBiblioteca,the quot;libraryquot; of mythology misattributed to Apollodorus,he fathered the Corybantes on the Muse Thalia MuseThalia.lt;refgt;Apollodorus,http:www.theoi.comTextApollodorus.html Bibliotheca,Other ancient sources,however,gave the Corybantes different parents; see James George FrazerSir James Frazers http:www.theoi.comTextApa.html note on the passage in the Bibliotheca.Amphithemis Garamaslt;refgt;Apollonius Rhodius,Argonautica,Naxos,eponym of the island Naxos islandNaxoslt;refgt;Scholia on Apollonius Rhodius,Argonautica,Phylanderlt;refgt;Pausanias geographerPausanias,Description of Greece,Chioslt;refgt;PseudoPlutarch,On Rivers,Alciopelt;refgt;Photius,Lexicon s.Amphissa mythologyAmphissa  Isse,Oaxeslt;refgt;Servius on Virgils Eclogue ,Areia,Astycome,Eumolpus possiblylt;refgt;Photius,Lexicon,Arsinoe,Arabuslt;refgt;Pliny the Elder,Naturalis Historia,p.Calliope,Celaeno,Autuchuslt;refgt;Scholia on Apollonius Rhodius,Argonautica,Danais,The KorybantesCureteslt;refgt;Tzetzes on Lycophron,Dia,Evadne,Scylla possiblylt;refgt;Scholia on Apollonius Rhodius,Argonautica .referring to quot;Hesiodquot;,Megalai Ehoiai fr.Hector possiblylt;refgt;Tzetzes on Lycophron,HypermnestraDaughter of Thestius and EurythemisHypermnestra,Hypsipylelt;refgt;Arnobius,Adversus Nationes,Lycia,Eicadiuslt;refgt;Servius on Aeneid,Pataruslt;refgt;Stephanus of Byzantium s.Ismenuslt;refgt;Pausanias geographerPausanias,Description of Greece,Teneruslt;refgt;Pausanias geographerPausanias,Description of Greece,Parnethia,Cynneslt;refgt;Photius,Lexicon,Prothoelt;refgt;Arnobius,Adversus Nationes,Rhodoessa,Ceos,eponym of the island Ceoslt;refgt;Etymologicum Magnum ,Cicon,eponym of the tribe Ciconeslt;refgt;Etymologicum Magnum ,Thaleia,Muse  Rhetia,Themisto,daughter of Zabius of Hyperborealt;refgt;Stephanus of Byzantium,Telmessus ?Urania,Urea,Ileus Oileus?Acraepheus,eponym of the city Acraephialt;refgt;Stephanus of Byzantium,Chariclo possiblylt;refgt;Scholia on Pindar,Pythian Ode .Marathus,eponym of Marathonlt;refgt;Suda s.Megaruslt;refgt;Stephanus of Byzantium s.Onciuslt;refgt;Pausanias geographerPausanias,Description of Greece,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Stephanus of Byzantium s.Pisus,founder of Pisa in Etrurialt;refgt;Servius on Aeneid,File:Hyacinthus.jpgthumbuprightApollo and Hyacinthus,Hyacinth mythologyHyacinth or Hyacinthus was one of Apollos male lovers.He was a Spartan prince,beautiful and athletic.killing him instantly.Apollo is said to be filled with grief: out of Hyacinthus blood,Apollo created a hyacinth plantflower named after him as a memorial to his death,and his tears stained the flower petals with the interjection langgrc,meaning alas.lt;refgt;LSJaiai,LSJaishortref.lt;refgt; The Festival of Hyacinthus was a celebration of Sparta.Another male lover was Cyparissus,a descendant of Heracles.Cyparissus asked Apollo to let his tears fall forever.Apollo granted the request by turning him into the CupressaceaeCypress named after him,which was said to be a sad tree because the sap forms droplets like tears on the trunk.Admetuslt;refgt;Callimachus,Hymn to Apollo,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;Plutarch,Atymnius,lt;refgt;Nonnus,Dionysiaca,Branchus alternately,Claruslt;refgt;Philostratus,Letters,Hippolytus of Sicyon not the same as Hippolytus mythologyHippolytus,the son of Theseuslt;ref namequot;Plutarch,Numaquot;gt;Plutarch,Life of Numa,Hymenaioslt;refgt;Antoninus Liberalis,Metamorphoses,Leucates,who threw himself off a rock when Apollo attempted to carry him offlt;refgt;Servius on Aeneid,Phorbas probably the son of Triopaslt;refgt;Plutarch,Life of Numa,also Hyginus,Poetical Astronomy,Potnieuslt;refgt;Clement of Rome,Homilia,File:Apollo Kitharoidos Antikensammlung Berlin .jpgthumbuprightApollo with his lyre.Statue from Pergamon Museum,Berlin.Hermes was born on Mount KylliniMount Cyllene in Arcadia.The story is told in the Homeric Hymn to Hermes.lt;refgt;cite webtitleEnglish translation of the Homeric Hymn to Hermesurlhttp:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.AhymnwebsitePerseusaccessdate January lt;refgt; His mother,Maia mythologyMaia,had been secretly impregnated by Zeus.Maia wrapped the infant in blankets but Hermes escaped while she was asleep.Hermes ran to Thessaly,where Apollo was grazing his cattle.The infant Hermes stole a number of his cows and took them to a cave in the woods near Pylos,covering their tracks.In the cave,he found a tortoise and killed it,then removed the insides.He used one of the cows intestines and the tortoise shell and made the first lyre.Apollo complained to Maia that her son had stolen his cattle,but Hermes had already replaced himself in the blankets she had wrapped him in,so Maia refused to believe Apollos claim.Zeus intervened and,claiming to have seen the events,sided with Apollo.Hermes then began to play music on the lyre he had invented.Apollo,a god of music,fell in love with the instrument and offered to allow exchange of the cattle for the lyre.Hence,Apollo then became a master of the lyre.In Aeschylus Oresteia trilogy,Clytemnestra kills her husband,and Cassandra,a prophetess of Apollo.Apollo gives an order through the Oracle at Delphi that Agamemnons son,Orestes,is to kill Clytemnestra and Aegisthus,her lover.Orestes and Pylades carry out the revenge,and consequently Orestes is pursued by the Erinyes Furies,female personifications of revengevengeance.They invade his temple,and he says that the matter should be brought before Athena.Apollo promises to protect Orestes,as Orestes has become Apollos supplicant.Apollo advocates Orestes at the trial,and ultimately Athena rules in favor of Apollo.Apollo killed the Aloadae when they attempted to storm Mount Olympus MountainMt.Olympus.Callimachus sanglt;refgt;Callimachus,Hymn to Apollo.Apollo turned Cephissus mythologyCephissus into a sea monster.Another contender for the birthplace of Apollo is the Cretan islands of Paximadia islandsPaximadia.Once Pan mythologyPan had the audacity to compare his music with that of Apollo,and to challenge Apollo,the god of the kithara,to a trial of skill.Tmolus,the mountaingod,was chosen to umpire.Pan blew on his pipes,and with his rustic melody gave great satisfaction to himself and his faithful follower,Midas,who happened to be present.Then Apollo struck the strings of his lyre.Tmolus at once awarded the victory to Apollo,and all but Midas agreed with the judgment.He dissented and questioned the justice of the award.Apollo would not suffer such a depraved pair of ears any longer,and caused them to become the ears of a donkey.File:IAM T  Statue of Marsyas.jpgthumbuprightMarsyas under Apollos punishment,Apollo has ominous aspects aside from his plaguebringing,deathdealing arrows: Marsyas was a satyr who challenged Apollo to a contest of music.He had found an aulos on the ground,tossed away after being invented by Athena because it made her cheeks puffy.The contest was judged by the Muses.After they each performed,both were deemed equal until Apollo decreed they play and sing at the same time.As Apollo played the lyre,this was easy to do.Marsyas could not do this,as he only knew how to use the flute and could not sing at the same time.Apollo was declared the winner because of this.He then nailed Marsyas shaggy skin to a nearby pinetree.Marsyas blood turned into the river Marsyas riverMarsyas.Another variation is that Apollo played his instrument the lyre upside down.Marsyas could not do this with his instrument the flute,and so Apollo hung him from a tree and flayed him alive.Apollo also had a lyreplaying contest with Cinyras,his son,who committed suicide when he lost.File:Apollo Anzio Musei Capitolini MC.jpgthumbupright.leftHead of Apollo,marble,Roman copy of a Greek original of the th century BCE,The Roman worship of Apollo was adopted from the Greeks.As a quintessentially List of Greek mythological figuresGreek god,Apollo had no direct Roman equivalent,although later Roman poets often referred to him as Phoebus.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.theoi.comHeroineKoronis.lt;refgt;Livy http:www.perseus.tufts.educgibinptext?lookupLiv.On the occasion of a pestilence in the s BCE,Apollos Temple of Apollo Sosianusfirst temple at Rome was established in the Flaminian fields,replacing an older cult site there known as the quot;Apollinarequot;.lt;refgt;Livy http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext.docPerseus:text:.:book:chapter .http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext.docPerseus:text:.:book:chapter .lt;refgt; During the Second Punic War in  BCE,the Ludi Apollinares quot;Apollonian Gamesquot; were instituted in his honor,on the instructions of a prophecy attributed to one Marcius.lt;refgt;Livy http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext.docPerseus:text:.:book:chapter .lt;refgt; In the time of Augustus,who considered himself under the special protection of Apollo and was even said to be his son,his worship developed and he became one of the chief gods of Rome.lt;refgt;cite book authorJ.After the battle of Actium,which was fought near a sanctuary of Apollo,Augustus enlarged Apollos temple,dedicated a portion of the spoils to him,and instituted quinquennial games in his honour.lt;refgt;Suetonius,On the Life of the CaesarsLife of AugustusAugustus http:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerERomanTextsSuetoniusCaesarsAugustus.html.; Cassius Dio http:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerERomanTextsCassiusDio.html .lt;refgt;Cassius Dio http:penelope.uchicago.eduThayerERomanTextsCassiusDio.html.held in  BCE to celebrate the dawn of a new era.lt;refgt;Inscriptiones Latinae Selectae ,The chief Apollonian festivals were the Boedromia,Carneia,Carpiae,Daphnephoria,Delia festivalDelia,Hyacinthia,Metageitnia,Pyanepsia,Pythia and Thargelia.File:AiKhanoumgold stater of Antiochos.Apollos most common attributes were the bow and arrow.Other attributes of his included the kithara an advanced version of the common lyre,the plectrum and the sword.Another common emblem was the sacrificial tripod,representing his prophetic powers.The Pythian Games were held in Apollos honor every four years at Delphi.The palm tree was also sacred to Apollo because he had been born under one in Delos.Animals sacred to Apollo included wolfwolves,dolphins,roe deer,swans,cicadas symbolizing music and song,hawks,ravens,Corvus genuscrows,snakes referencing Apollos function as the god of prophecy,mice and griffins,mythical eaglelion hybrids of Eastern origin.File:Apolocitaredo.jpgthumbpxApollo Citharoedus quot;Apollo with a kitharaquot;,Musei Capitolini,As god of colonization,Apollo gave oracular guidance on colonies,especially during the height of colonization,BCE.According to Greek tradition,he helped CreteCretan or Arcadian colonists found the city of Troy.However,which is now generally regarded as being identical with the Greek TroyIlion by most scholars.In this interpretation,Apollos title of Lykegenes can simply be read as quot;born in Lyciaquot;,which effectively severs the gods supposed link with wolves possibly a folk etymology.In literary contexts,Apollo represents harmony,order,and reasoncharacteristics contrasted with those of Dionysus,god of wine,who represents ecstasy and disorder.However,the Greeks thought of the two qualities as complementary: the two gods are brothers,and when Apollo at winter left for Hyperborea,he would leave the Delphic oracle to Dionysus.This contrast appears to be shown on the two sides of the Borghese Vase.Apollo is often associated with the Golden mean philosophyGolden Mean.This is the Greek Ideal ethicsideal of moderation and a virtue that opposes gluttony.File:Apollo Saurocton Louvre.jpgthumbpxThe Louvre Apollo Sauroctonos,Apollo is a common theme in Greek and Roman art and also in the art of the Renaissance.The earliest Greek word for a statue is quot;delightquot; langgrc,agalma,and the sculptors tried to create forms which would inspire such guiding vision.Greek art puts into Apollo the highest degree of power and beauty that can be imagined.The sculptors derived this from observations on human beings,but they also embodied in concrete form,issues beyond the reach of ordinary thought.The muscular frames and limbs combined with slim waists indicate the Greek desire for health,and the physical capacity which was necessary in the hard Greek environment.The statues of Apollo embody beauty,balance and inspire awe before the beauty of the world.but to the analogies and the interaction of the members in the whole,a method created by Polykleitos.Finally Praxiteles seems to be released from any art and religious conformities,and his masterpieces are a mixture of Realism artsnaturalism with stylization.The evolution of the Greek art seems to go parallel with the Greek philosophical conceptions,Thales searched for a simple materialform directly perceptible by the senses,behind the appearances of things,and his theory is also related to the older animism.This was paralleled in sculpture by the absolute representation of vigorous life,through unnaturally simplified forms.lt;ref namequot;Homannquot;gt;E.HomannWedeking.Transl.Foster .Art of the world.Archaic Greece,Methuen amp; Co Ltd.London,Pythagoras believed that behind the appearance of things,there was the permanent principle of mathematics,and that the forms were based on a transcendental mathematical relation.lt;ref namequot;C.Bowra  p.quot;gt; The forms on earth,are imperfect imitations langgrc,eikones,quot;imagesquot; of the celestial world of numbers.His ideas had a great influence on postArchaic art,and the Greek architects and sculptors were always trying to find the mathematical relation,that would lead to the esthetic perfection.lt;ref namequot;Carpenterquot;gt;R.Carpenter .The esthetic basis of Greek art.Indiana University Press.lt;refgt; Aesthetic canoncanon.In classical Greece,Anaxagoras asserted that a divine reason mind gave order to the seeds of the universe,and Plato extended the Greek belief of ideal forms to his metaphysical theory of forms ideai,quot;ideasquot;.The forms on earth are imperfect duplicates of the intellectual celestial ideas.The Greek words oida langgrc,quot;I knowquot; and eidos langgrc,quot;speciesquot; have the same root as the word idea langgrc,lt;ref name Carpentergt; indicating how the Greek mind moved from the gift of the senses,to the principles beyond the senses.The Greek sculptors considered the senses more important,and the proportions were used to unite the sensible with the intellectual.File:KAMA Kouros Porte Sacre.jpgthumbpxleftSacred Gate Kouros,marble  BC,lt;refgt;V.Leonardos.Archaelogiki Ephimeris,Col ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Lechat .La sculpture Attic avant Phidias,lt;refgt; The first statues are certainly still and formal.The formality of their stance seems to be related with the Egyptian precedent,but it was accepted for a good reason.The sculptors had a clear idea of what a young man is,and embodied the archaic smile of good manners,the firm and springy step,the balance of the body,dignity,and youthful happiness.When they tried to depict the most abiding qualities of men,it was because men had common roots with the unchanging gods.lt;ref namequot;Bowraquot;gt;C.Bowra .The Greek experience,lt;refgt; The adoption of a standard recognizable type for a long time,lt;ref nameCarpentergt; These forms expressed immortality.Apollo was the immortal god of ideal balance and order.His shrine in Delphi,quot;nothing in excessquot;,and langgrc   egga pra dat,quot;make a pledge and mischief is nighquot;.lt;refgt;See LSJathshortref.File:WLA metmuseum Marble statue of a kouros youth .jpgthumbpxrightNew York Kouros,Met.Mus.marble  BC,In the first largescale depictions during the early archaic period  BC,but as being full of life.The Greeks maintained,until late in their civilization,an almost animismanimistic idea that the statues are in some sense alive.This embodies the belief that the image was somehow the god or man himself.lt;refgt;C.Bowra.The Greek experience,The statue is the quot;thing in itselfquot;,and his slender face with the deep eyes express an intellectual eternity.According to the Greek tradition the DipylonDipylon master was named Daedalus,and in his statues the limbs were freed from the body,giving the impression that the statues could move.It is considered that he created also the New York kouros,which is the oldest fully preserved statue of Kouros type,and seems to be the incarnation of the god himself.File:  Piraeus Arch.Museum,Athens  The Piraeus Apollo  Photo by Giovanni DallOrto,Nov  .jpgthumbleftpxPiraeus Apollo,archaicstyle bronze,The animistic idea as the representation of the imaginative reality,is sanctified in the Homeric poems and in Greek myths,This kind of art goes back to the Minoan civilizationMinoan period,when its main theme was the representation of motion in a specific moment.lt;ref namequot;Schachermeyerquot;gt;F.Schachermeyer .Die Minoische Kultur des alten Creta,Kohlhammer Stuttgart,lt;refgt; These freestanding statues were usually marble,but also the form rendered in limestone,bronze,ivory and terracotta.The earliest examples of lifesized statues of Apollo,may be two figures from the IoniansIonic sanctuary on the island of Delos.Such statues were found across the Greek speaking world,Boeotia alone.lt;refgt;J.Ducat .Les Kouroi des Ptoion.lt;refgt; The last stage in the development of the Kouros type is the late archaic period  BC,Ranking from the very few bronzes survived to us is the masterpiece bronze Piraeus Apollo.It was found in Piraeus,the harbour of Athens.The statue originally held the bow in its left hand,and a cup of pouring libation in its right hand.It probably comes from northeastern Peloponnesus.The emphasis is given in anatomy,and it is one of the first attempts to represent a kind of motion,and beauty relative to proportions,which appear mostly in postArchaic art.The statue throws some light on an artistic centre which,with an independently developed harder,simpler,and heavier style,restricts Ionian influence in Athens.Finally,this is the germ from which the art of Polykleitos was to grow two or three generations later.lt;ref namequot;Homannquot;gt;HomannWedeking .Art of the World.Archaic Greece,File:Apollon de Mantoue Louvre MA.jpgthumbleftpxApollo of the quot;Mantoua typequot;,marble Roman copy after a thcentury BCE Greek original attributed to Polykleitos,In the next century which is the beginning of the Classical GreeceClassical period,it was considered that beauty in visible things as in everything else,consisted of symmetry and proportions.The artists tried also to represent motion in a specific moment Myron,which may be considered as the reappearance of the dormant Minoan civilizationMinoan element.lt;ref nameSchachermeyergt; Anatomy and geometry are fused in one,and each does something to the other.The Greek sculptors tried to clarify it by looking for mathematical proportions,just as they sought some reality behind appearances.but of the parts,that is the interrelation of parts with one another and with the whole.It seems that he was influenced by the theories of Pythagoras.lt;refgt;quot;Each part finger,palm,arm,etc.transmitted its individual existence to the next,and then to the wholequot; : Canon of Polykleitos,also Plotinus,Ennead I vi.i: Nigel Spivey .Greek art,Phaidon Press Ltd.London.The famous Apollo of Mantua and its variants are early forms of the Apollo Citharoedus statue type,in which the god holds the cithara in his left arm.The type is represented by neoAttic Imperial Roman copies of the late st or early nd century,modelled upon a supposed Greek bronze original made in the second quarter of the th century BCE,in a style similar to works of Polykleitos but more archaic.The Apollo held the cythara against his extended left arm,of which in the Louvre example,a fragment of one twisting scrolling horn upright remains against his biceps.Though the proportions were always important in Greek art,the appeal of the Greek sculptures eludes any explanation by proportion alone.The statues of Apollo were thought to incarnate his living presence,Just as the Greeks saw the mountains,forests,sea and rivers as inhabited by concrete beings,so nature in all of its manifestations possesses clear form,and the form of a work of art.Spiritual life is incorporated in matter,when it is given artistic form.Just as in the arts the Greeks sought some reality behind appearances,Artists and sculptors tried to find this ideal order in relation with mathematics,as to the whole sentient self.lt;ref nameHomanngt; Things as we see them,and as they really are,are one,that each stresses the nature of the other in a single unity.File:Apollo west pediment Olympia copy MFA Munich.jpgthumbuprightApollo,West Pediment Olympia.Munich,copy from original,BCE at the Temple of Zeus,Olympia,Greece.In the archaic pediments and friezes of the temples,and to complete the descending scale of height with other figures sitting or kneeling.Their two figures hold the centre.In the pediment of the temple of Zeus in Olympia,GreeceOlympia,the single figure of Apollo is dominating the scene.File:Part of the Bassae Frieze at the British Museum.jpgthumbleftPart of the Bassae Frieze at the British Museum.Apollo and Artemis in the northeast corner.These representations rely on presenting scenes directly to the eye for their own visible sake.They care for the schematic arrangements of bodies in space,but only as parts in a larger whole.In these archaic pediments the sculptors use empty intervals,to suggest a passage to and fro a busy battlefield.The artists seem to have been dominated by geometrical pattern and order,and this was improved when classical art brought a greater freedom and economy.Apollo as a handsome beardless young man,is often depicted with a kithara as Apollo Citharoedus or bow in his hand,or reclining on a tree the Apollo Lykeios and Apollo Sauroctonos types.from the Renaissance through the th century.made between  and  BCE.In the late nd century CE floor mosaic from El Djem,Roman Thysdrus,he is identifiable as HeliosApollo Helios by his effulgent Halo religious iconographyhalo,though now even a gods divine nuditynakedness is concealed by his cloak,a mark of increasing conventions of modesty in the later Roman EmpireEmpire.Another haloed Apollo in mosaic,from Hadrumentum,is in the museum at Sousse.lt;refgt;cite weburlhttp:www.tunisiaonline.commosaicsmosaicb.html titleMosaics in Tunisia: Apollo and the Muses publisherWeb.archive.org date July  accessdate July  deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.tunisiaonline.commosaicsmosaicb.html archivedate July  lt;refgt; The conventions of this representation,head tilted,lips slightly parted,largeeyed,curling Hairstylehair cut in locks grazing the neck,were developed in the rd century BCE to depict Alexander the Great.lt;refgt;Bieber ,Yalouris .lt;refgt; Some time after this mosaic was executed,the earliest depictions of Christ would also be beardless and haloed.File:Onthemorningthomas.jpgthumbThe Overthrow of Apollo and the Pagan Gods,Apollo has often featured in postclassical art and literature.Percy Bysshe Shelley composed a quot;Hymn of Apolloquot; ,and the gods instruction of the Muses formed the subject of Igor Stravinskys Apollon musagte .In ,In discussion of the arts,Friedrich Nietzsche argued that a fusion of the two was most desirable.In spaceflight,the NASA program for landing astronauts on the Moon was named Apollo programApollo.chart topApollos family treeamp;nbsp;lt;refgt;This chart is based upon Hesiods Theogony,unless otherwise noted.chart     ,chart !vvvv.chart !chart !chart !APO  ART : !AAA !APOAPOLLOARTArtemisAAA amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;a lt;refgt;According to Homer,Iliad http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.amp;ndash;,http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.Odyssey http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.Hephaestus was apparently the son of Hera and Zeus,see Gantz,chartborder !: !BBB BBBamp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;b lt;refgt;According to Hesiod,Theogony http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docHes.amp;ndash;,Hephaestus was produced by Hera alone,with no father,see Gantz,chart !: !chart !chart !chart !:  ATH ATHAthena lt;refgt;According to Hesiods Theogony http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docHes.amp;ndash;,of Zeus children by his seven wives,Athena was the first to be conceived,but the last to be born; Zeus impregnated Metis then swallowed her,later Zeus himself gave birth to Athena quot;from his headquot;,see Gantz,amp;ndash;,amp;ndash;.chart !chart !chart !chart !chart !chartborderAAA            BBBAAAamp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;a lt;refgt;According to Hesiod,Theogony http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docHes.amp;ndash;,Aphrodite was born from Uranus severed genitals,see Gantz,amp;ndash;.lt;refgt;BBBamp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;amp;nbsp;b lt;refgt;According to Homer,Aphrodite was the daughter of Zeus Iliad http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.; Odyssey http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.and Dione Iliad http:data.perseus.orgcitationsurn:cts:greekLit:tlg.perseuseng:.amp;ndash;,see Gantz,amp;ndash;.chart .File:Belvedere Apollo PioClementino Inv n.Hesiod,Theogony,in The Homeric Hymns and Homerica with an English Translation by Hugh G.EvelynWhite,Cambridge,Harvard University Press; London,William Heinemann Ltd.http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.AcardD Online version at the Perseus Digital Library.Homer,The Iliad with an English Translation by A.Murray,in two volumes.Cambridge,Harvard University Press; London,William Heinemann,Ltd.http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.AbookDAcardD Online version at the Perseus Digital Library.Homer; The Odyssey with an English Translation by A.Murray,in two volumes.Cambridge,Harvard University Press; London,William Heinemann,Ltd.http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseusAtextA.AbookDAcardD Online version at the Perseus Digital Library.Sophocles,Palaephatus,On Unbelievable Tales .PseudoApollodorus,Bibliotheca PseudoApollodorusBibliotheca .Ovid,Metamorphoses .Pausanias geographerPausanias,Description of Greece .Philostratus the Elder,Images i.Philostratus the Younger,Images .Lucian,First Vatican Mythographer,Bieber,Alexander the Great in Greek and Roman Art.Chicago.Hugh Bowden,Classical Athens and the Delphic Oracle: Divination and Democracy.Cambridge University Press.Walter Burkert,Greek Religion Harvard University Press III.Gantz,Timothy,Early Greek Myth: A Guide to Literary and Artistic Sources,Johns Hopkins University Press,Two volumes: ISBN  Vol.ISBN  Vol.Robert Graves,The Greek Myths,revised edition.Penguin.Miranda J.Green,Dictionary of Celtic Myth and Legend,Thames and Hudson.Karl Kerenyi,Apollon: Studien ber Antiken Religion und Humanitt revised edition.Karl Kerenyi,Mertens,Dieter; Schutzenberger,Margareta.Citt e monumenti dei Greci dOccidente: dalla colonizzazione alla crisi di fine V secolo a.Roma LErma di Bretschneider,ISBN .Martin Nilsson,Die Geschichte der Griechische Religion,vol.Beck.PaulyWissowa,Realencyclopdie der klassischen Altertumswissenschaft: II,quot;Apollonquot;.The best repertory of cult sites Burkert.Pfeiff,Apollon: Wandlung seines Bildes in der griechischen Kunst.Traces the changing iconography of Apollo.William Smith lexicographerSmith,William; Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology,London .http:www.perseus.tufts.eduhoppertext?docPerseus:text:.Spivey Nigel  Greek art Phaedon Press Ltd.http:www.maicar.comGMLApollo.html Apollo at the Greek Mythology Link,http:warburg.ukvpcVPCsearchsubcats.commentRescuing  sources.image                        Andre Agassi Indian Wells .residence                    Las Vegas ValleyLas Vegas,birthplace                  Las Vegas,retired                      September ,nytimes.comsportstennisagassihasstreisandbutlosesbollettieri.html titleTENNIS; Agassi Has Streisand But Loses Bollettieri dateJuly ,publisherThe New York Times firstRobin lastFinn accessdateJuly ,careerprizemoney             United States DollarUS ,singlesrecord                 lt;smallgt;.on the Grand Prix tour,ATP Tour,highestsinglesranking        No.April ,AustralianOpenresult         W  Australian Open  Mens Singles,Australian Open  Mens Singles,Australian Open  Mens Singles,USOpenresult                 W  US Open  Mens Singles,doublesrecord                lt;smallgt; on the Grand Prix tour,ATP Tour,highestdoublesranking        No.August ,DavisCupresult               W ,Andre Kirk Agassi IPAcenndresi; born April ,who was one of the games most dominant players from the early s to the mids.lt;ref namequot;bioquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.thebiographychannel.ukbiographiesandreagassi.html titleBio:Andre Agassi publisherBiography Channel accessdateJanuary ,commultimediaphotogallerytop.tenniscontent.html accessdateJuly ,deadurlunfit archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:sportsillustrated.commultimediaphotogallerytop.tenniscontent.html archivedateSeptember ,casportscolumnsnewsmakersandreagassi.html titleTenniss love affair with Agassi comes to an end publisherCBC Sports accessdateMay ,deadurlyes archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orghttp:www.ca:sportscolumnsnewsmakersandreagassi.html archivedateJuly ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.telegraph.uksporttenniswimbledonGrandslammed.html titleGrandslammed workThe Daily Telegraph locationLondon accessdateMay ,firstJohn lastParsons dateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.telegraph.uksporttenniswimbledonGrandslammed.html archivedateMay ,deadurlnolt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;starsquot;gt;http:news.uksporthitennis.stm quot;Stars pay tribute to Agassiquot;.BBC.Retrieved May ,lt;refgt; Agassi had been called the greatest service returner in the history of the game.lt;ref namequot;cbaquot; gt;lt;refgt;http:uk.eurosport.yahoo.comtennissimonreedarticle quot;Reeds shotmakers: Mens return of servequot;.Yahoo!Sports.Retrieved May ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.nytimes.comsportstennistv.html quot;Adjectives Tangled in the Netquot;.The New York Times.Retrieved May ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:articles.latimes.comsportsspandreagassi?pg quot;Sampras,Agassi Have Just Begun to Fightquot; Los Angeles Times.Retrieved,lt;ref namequot;starsquot; gt; Agassi compiled performances that,along with his unorthodox apparel and attitude,saw him cited as one of the most charismatic players in the history of the game.As a result,he is credited for helping to revive the popularity of tennis during the s.lt;ref namequot;cbaquot; gt;lt;ref namequot;starsquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.independent.uksporttennisdontwalkawayandrecharismaticgiftsofagassishouldnotbeallowedtoslipthroughnet.html titleDont Walk Away,Andre workThe Independent locationUK dateJuly ,accessdateJune ,firstRonald lastAtkin archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.independent.uksporttennisdontwalkawayandrecharismaticgiftsofagassishouldnotbeallowedtoslipthroughnet.html archivedateJune ,In singles tennis,as well as finishing runnerup in seven other Grand Slam tournaments.During the History of tennisOpen EraOpen Era,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:latimesblogs.latimes.comolympicsblogfederergetshi.html titleRoger Federer gets his gold medal publisherLatimesblogs.latimes.com dateAugust ,accessdateJune ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.atpworldtour.comNewsTennisUSOpenWeekUSOpenMondayFinalNadalCompletesCareerSlam.clay and grass,and the last American male to win the French Open,in lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.frrolandgarrosdefaulten.ID titleSingles winners from  to  publisherFrench OpenRoland Garros accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; and the Australian Open .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.australianopen.comenAUeventguidehistoryplayers.html titleAustralian Open  Past Mens Singles Champions publisherAustralian Open accessdateJanuary ,Davis Cup and  Davis Cup.lt;ref namequot;tennisquot; gt; Agassi reached the World No.in ,prompting many to believe that his career was over.lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; Agassi returned to World No.in  and enjoyed the most successful run of his career over the next four years.During his plus year tour career,Agassi was known by the nickname quot;The Punisherquot;.lt;refgt;Jhabvala,Nick.http:sportsillustrated.comextramustardchadochocincoandreagassitaleindex.html quot;Tale of the Tapequot;.Sports Illustrated.November ,Retrieved July ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Mehrotra,Abhishek.http:www.espnstar.espnstar.comESPN Star.Retrieved July ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:sports.comgallerynickometerpopularnicknamesintheworldofsport?page quot;Nickometer: Popular nicknames in the world of sportquot;.MSN Sport.May ,Retrieved July ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;Calvert,Sean.http:betting.betfair.comtennisaustralianopenbettingaustralianopenbettingthebestfinalsever.html quot;Australian Open Betting: The best finals everquot;.Betfair.January ,Retrieved July ,After suffering from sciatica caused by two bulging discs in his back,Agassi retired from professional tennis on September ,after losing in the third round of the US Open tennisUS Open to Benjamin Becker.He is the founder of the Andre Agassi Charitable Foundation,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.agassifoundation.org titleAndre Agassi Foundation For Education accessdateJanuary ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.agassifoundation.org archivedateDecember ,deadurlnolt;refgt; which has raised over amp;nbsp;million for atrisk children in Southern Nevada.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.atptennis.comenplayerstributeagassiagassicharity.asp publisherATP Tour,Inc.titleTribute to a legend: Andre Agassi Charitable Foundation accessdateFebruary ,lt;refgt; In ,the Foundation opened the Andre Agassi College Preparatory Academy in Las Vegas,a K public charter school for atrisk children.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.agassiprep.org publisherAndre Agassi Preparatory Academy titleHomepage of accessdateFebruary ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.agassiprep.org archivedateFebruary ,deadurlnolt;refgt; He has been married to fellow tennis player Steffi Graf since .Andre Agassi was born in Las Vegas,lt;ref namequot;bioquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.netglimse.comcelebsbioandreagassi.shtml titleAndre Agassi Biography publisherNetglimpse.com accessdateAugust ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.netglimse.comcelebsbioandreagassi.shtml archivedateSeptember ,deadurlnolt;refgt; His father,a former Olympic boxer for Iran,stated he is from a mixed,mostly ArmeniansArmenian,heritage.He later elaborated that his grandfather was Assyrian peopleAssyrian.lt;ref namequot;persianbioquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.persianmirror.comculturefamousbiosandreagassi.cfm titleBio:Andre Agassi publisherPersian Mirror accessdateJanuary ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orggzbWaTky archivedateMay ,deadurlyeslt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;zindamagazine.comquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.zindamagazine.comhtmlarchiveszn.accessdateJune ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;peoplebioquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.peopleandprofiles.comProfilesDetAndreAgassi.html?profileid titleAndre Agassi Profile publisherPeopleandprofiles.com accessdateJune ,archiveurlhttps:web.archive.orgwebhttp:www.peopleandprofiles.comProfilesDetAndreAgassi.html?profileid archivedateJuly ,deadurlyeslt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite book urlhttps:books.google.combooks?idRynvcWccCamp;pgPAamp;lpgPAamp;dqandreaghassiArmenianwikipedia.org titleAramaic AssyrianSyriac dictionary accessdateJune ,lt;refgt;lt;ref namequot;The man behind Andrequot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.agassi.frindex.optioncomcontentamp;dopdfamp;id titleThe man behind Andre accessdateJune ,lt;refgt; However,in an October  Inside Tennis interview,he stated quot;My great great great great grandfather was Syrianquot;.He married an Armenian woman.Their son married an Armenian.Their son married an Armenian.Their son married an Armenian.My father married an Armenian.quot;lt;ref namequot;The man behind Andrequot; gt; Andre Agassis mother,Betty,is a breast cancer survivor.He has three older siblings  Rita last wife to Pancho Gonzales,Philip and Tami.lt;refgt;cite web titleAndre Agassi urlhttp:www.persianmirror.comculturefamousbiosandreagassi.cfm archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orggzbWaTky workPersianMirror publisherPersianMirror year archivedateMay ,accessdateMay ,dead linkdateMay lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.dcourier.commain.Chris dateJanuary ,accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; One of his ancestors changed his surname from Agassian to Agassi to avoid persecution.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.armenianweekly.comonlyinamericaaninterviewwithmikeagassi titleOnly in America?In a passage from the book Open,Agassi details how his father made him play a match for money with football legend Jim Brown,in ,when Agassi was  years old.Brown was at a Vegas tennis club complaining to the owner about a money match that was canceled.Brown countered with a ,bet,Brown agreed with Mike Agassi that they would set the amount after he and Andre played two sets.Brown lost those sets,declined the K wager,and offered to play the third set for .He lost .At age ,Andre was sent to Nick Bollettieris Tennis Academy in Florida.After thirty minutes of watching Agassi play,Bollettieri called Mike and said: quot;Take your check back.Hes here for free,quot; claiming that Agassi had more natural talent than anyone else he had seen.lt;ref namequot;lxbpdnquot;gt;cite news urlhttp:sportsillustrated.commagazineagassiindex.html publisherGary Smith for Sports Illustrated titleComing into Focus accessdateFebruary ,archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgmrGHwNg archivedateJanuary ,deadurlnolt;refgt; Agassi dropped out of school in the ninth grade.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.nytimes.combooksagassi.html workThe New York Times titleA Team,but Watch How You Put It firstCharles lastMcGrath dateNovember ,accessdateMay ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.nytimes.combooksagassi.html?archivedateApril ,He turned professional at the age of  and competed in his first tournament at La Quinta,California.He won his first match against John Austin tennisJohn Austin,but then lost his second match to Mats Wilander.By the end of the year,Agassi was ranked world no.lt;ref namequot;Tennisquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.tennis.comrankingshistoryagassi.html titleTennisBio:Andre Agassi accessdateJune ,lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; He won six additional tournaments in  Memphis,Mens Clay Court ChampionshipsU.Mens Clay Court Championships,World Championship TennisWCT Forest Hills WCT,Stuttgart Outdoor,Volvo InternationalVolvo International and  Livingston OpenLivingston Open,lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; and,by December of that year,lt;refgt;http:www.imdb.comnamenmbio Andre Agassi  Biographylt;refgt; During the year,he set the openera record for most consecutive victories by a male teenager,a record that stood for  years until Rafael Nadal broke it in .lt;refgt;cite news titleTeen Nadal gives Spain reign over French Open dateJune ,urlhttp:www.usatoday.comsportstennisfrenchdayx.htm agencyAssociated Press USA Today accessdateApril ,lt;refgt; His yearend ranking was world no.behind secondranked Ivan Lendl and topranked Mats Wilander.Agassi chose not to play at The Championships,While still a teenager,He began the s with a series of nearmisses.He reached his first Grand Slam final in  at the French Open,where he was favored before losing in four sets to Andrs Gmez,which he attributes to worrying about his wig falling off.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.dailymail.uktvshowbizarticleAndreAgassiadmitsIworewiglostFrenchOpen.html titleAndre Agassi admits: I wore a wig.and it lost me the French Open author Allan Hall accessdateNovember ,defeating defending champion Boris Becker in the semifinals.His opponent in the final was Pete Sampras; a year earlier,Agassi had crushed Sampras,Agassi lost the US Open final to Sampras in three sets.Also in ,beating reigning Wimbledon champion Stefan Edberg in the final.Agassi reached his second consecutive French Open final,where he faced fellow Bollettieri Academy alumnus Jim Courier.Courier emerged the victor in a fiveset final.Agassi decided to play at Wimbledon in ,leading to weeks of speculation in the media about the clothes he would wear.He eventually emerged for the first round in a completely white outfit.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:articles.baltimoresun.publisherBaltimore The Sunlt;refgt; He reached the quarterfinals on that occasion,losing in five sets to David Wheaton.Agassis Grand Slam tournament breakthrough came at Wimbledon,not at the French Open or the US Open,where he had previously enjoyed success.In ,he defeated Goran Ivanievi in a fiveset final.lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.nytimes.comsportstennisonthegrassatwimbledonagassifinallyhitspaydirt.html titleOn the Grass at Wimbledon,Agassi Finally Hits Pay Dirt dateJuly ,publisherNY Timeslt;refgt; Along the way,Agassi overcame two former Wimbledon champions: Boris Becker and John McEnroe.No other baseliner would triumph at Wimbledon until Lleyton Hewitt ten years later.Agassi once again played on the United States Davis Cup winning team in .It was their second Davis cup title in three years.saw Agassi win the only doubles title of his career,at the Cincinnati Masters,partnered with Petr Korda.Agassi missed much of the early part of that year with injuries.Although he made the quarterfinals in his Wimbledon title defense,he lost to eventual champion and world no.Pete Sampras in five sets.: Rise to the top,With new coach Brad Gilbert on board,Agassi began to employ more of a tactical,consistent approach,which fueled his resurgence.He started slowly in ,losing in the first week at the French Open and Wimbledon.Nevertheless,he emerged during the hardcourt season,winning the Canada MastersCanadian Open.He then became the first man to capture the US Open as an Seed tennisunseeded player,beating Michael Stich in the final.lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; Along the way,he beat  seeded players.Agassi shaved his balding head,breaking with his old quot;image is everythingquot; style.He competed in the  Australian Open his first appearance at the event and won,beating Sampras in a fourset final.lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; Agassi and Sampras met in five tournament finals in ,all on hardcourt,with Agassi winning three.Agassi won three Masters Series events in  Cincinnati MastersCincinnati,Miami MastersKey Biscayne,and the Canadian Open and seven titles total.The streak ended the next day when Agassi lost the final to Sampras.Agassi reached the List of ATP number  ranked playersworld no.ranking for the first time in April .He held that ranking until November,for a total of  weeks.at the yearending ranking.In terms of winloss record,was Agassis best year.was a less successful year for Agassi,as he failed to reach any Grand Slam final.respectively,and lost to Chang in straight sets in the Australian and US Open semifinals.At the time,Agassi blamed the Australian Open loss on the windy conditions,but later said in his biography that he had lost the match on purpose,as he did not want to play Boris Becker,whom he would have faced in that final.beating Sergi Bruguera of Spain in the final.was the low point of Agassis career.His wrist injury resurfaced,and he played only  matches during the year.He later confessed that he started using methamphetaminecrystal methamphetamine at that time,allegedly on the urging of a friend.lt;ref namequot;sports.espn.comquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:sports.espn.comsportstennisnewsstory?id titleAndre Agassi book says he used crystal meth publisherESPN accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; He failed an ATP drug test,but wrote a letter claiming the same friend had spiked a drink.The ATP dropped the failed drug test as a warning.In his autobiography,Agassi admitted that the letter was a lie.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:news.uksporthitennis.stm publisherBBC News titleAgassi admits use of crystal meth dateOctober ,accessdateMarch ,lt;refgt; He quit the drug soon after.lt;refgt;Andre Agassi interview.The Ellen DeGeneres Show.November ,lt;refgt; He won no toplevel titles,and his ranking sank to world no.on November ,File:AgassiAuopen.a circuit for pro players ranked outside the worlds top .After returning to top physical and mental shape,Agassi won five titles and leapt from world no.to no.the highest jump into the top  made by any player during a calendar year.lt;ref namequot;atpbioquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.atptennis.comenplayersplayerprofileshighlights.playernumberA titleAndre Agassi player profile publisherAtptennis.com accessdateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.atptennis.comenplayersplayerprofileshighlights.playernumberA archivedateJune ,deadurlnolt;refgt; At Wimbledon,he had an early loss in the second round to Tommy Haas.losing to Marcelo Ros,who became world no.as a result.becoming,at the time,only the fifth male player joining Rod Laver,Fred Perry,Roy Emerson and Don Budgethese have since been joined by a sixth,Roger Federer and a seventh,Rafael Nadal to win all four Grand Slam singles titles during his career.Only Laver,Agassi,Federer and Nadal have achieved this feat during the History of tennisOpen Eraopen era.This win also made him the first of only three,grass and hard courts,a tribute to his adaptability,as the other four men won their Grand Slam titles on clay and grass courts.Agassi also became the only male player to win the Career Super Slam,Agassi followed his  French Open victory by reaching the Wimbledon final,where he lost to Sampras in straight sets.beating Todd Martin in five sets rallying from a two sets to one deficit in the final.where he beat Marat Safin.Agassi ended  as the world no.ending Samprass record of six consecutive yearending top rankings .lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; This was the only time Agassi ended the year at no.He began the next year by capturing his second Australian Open title,beating Sampras in a fiveset semifinal and Yevgeny Kafelnikov in a fourset final.tag:refRoger Federer has since surpassed this feat,reaching ten consecutive Grand Slam finals from .grouploweralpha  At the time,missing only the Wimbledon title.tag:refPete Sampras held the  Wimbledon,US Open tennis US Open and  Australian Open titles simultaneously.Jimmy Connors ,Roger Federer ,and  and Novak Djokovic  won those three Majors in the same year,although Connors Grand Slam titles were all played on Tennis courtGrass courtsgrass courts.Mats Wilander won all but Wimbledon in  during his similar rise to the yearend world no.Rafael Nadal won the French Open and Wimbledon quot;Channel Slamquot;  and  Australian Open,before replicating the Channel Slam alongside winning the US Open in .grouploweralpha.also saw Agassi reach the semifinals at Wimbledon,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:news.uksporthitenniswimbledonhistory.stm titleClassic Matches: Rafter v Agassi dateMay ,accessdateOctober ,publisherBBC Sport archiveurlhttp:www.webcitation.orgmrGUooH archivedateJanuary ,deadurlnolt;refgt; At the inaugural  Tennis Masters CupTennis Masters Cup in Lisbon,in the history of tennis.Agassi then lost to Gustavo Kuerten in the final,allowing Kuerten to be crowned yearend world no.lt;ref namequot;greatathquot; gt; En route,At Wimbledon,they met again in the semifinals,where Agassi lost another close match to Rafter,in the fifth set.In the quarterfinals at the US Open,Agassi lost a hour,amp;nbsp;minute epic matchlt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:sportsillustrated.comtennisusopennewssamprasagassi titleBelieve the hype workSports Illustrated dateSeptember ,accessdateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:sportsillustrated.comtennisusopennewssamprasagassi archivedateJune ,deadurlnolt;refgt; with Sampras,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:sportsillustrated.comtennisusopennewsagassisidebarap titleUnbreakable dateSeptember ,workSports Illustrated accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; with no breaks of serve during the game match.Despite the setback,Agassi finished  ranked world no.sportsline.lt;refgt; s,in .opened with disappointment for Agassi,as injury forced him to skip the Australian Open,where he was a twotime defending champion.The last duel between Agassi and Sampras came in the final of the US Open,which Sampras won in four sets and left Sampras with a  edge in their  career meetings.The match was the last of Samprass career.Agassis US Open finish,along with his Masters Series victories in Key Biscayne,Rome MastersRome and Madrid Open tennisMadrid,helped him finish  as the oldest yearend world no.at  years and  months.Agassi won the eighth and final Grand Slam title of his career at the Australian Open,where he beat Rainer Schttler in straight sets in the final.In March,he won his sixth career and third consecutive Key Biscayne title,in the process surpassing his wife,Steffi Graf,who was a fivetime winner of the event.The final was his th straight win in that tournament,which broke the previous record of  set by Sampras from .With the victory,Agassi became the youngest  years old and oldest  winner of the Key Biscayne tournament.On April ,he recaptured the world no.He had held the world no.ranking for two weeks,when Lleyton Hewitt took it back on May ,Agassi then recaptured the world no.ranking once again on June ,which he held for  weeks until September ,During his career,Agassi held the world no.ranking for a total of  weeks.Agassis ranking slipped when injuries forced him to withdraw from many events.He did manage to reach the US Open semifinals,where he lost to Juan Carlos Ferrero and surrendered his world no.ranking to Ferrero.At the yearend Tennis Masters Cup,Agassi lost in the final to Federer and finished the year ranked world no.At age ,he was the oldest player to rank in the top  since Connors,at age ,was world no.in .a record that still stands.At ,surpassed only by Ken Rosewall,who won the title in  at age .He finished the year ranked world no.the oldest player to finish in the top  since the yearold Connors was world no.in .Agassis  began with a quarterfinal loss to Federer at the Australian Open.Agassi had several other deep runs at tournaments,but had to withdraw from several events due to injury.He lost to Jarkko Nieminen in the first round of the French Open.He won his fourth title in Los Angeles and reached the final of the Canada MastersRogers Cup,before falling to world no.Rafael Nadal.Agassis  was defined by an improbable run to the US Open final.After beating Rzvan Sabu and Ivo Karlovi in straight sets and Tom Berdych in four sets,Agassi won three consecutive fiveset matches to advance to the final.The most notable of these matches was his quarterfinal victory over James Blake tennisJames Blake,where he rallied from two sets down to win  in the fifth set.In the final,Agassi faced Federer,who was seeking his second consecutive US Open title and his sixth Grand Slam title in two years.Federer defeated Agassi in four sets.Agassi finished  ranked world no.his th time in the yearend top rankings,which tied Connors for the most times ranked in the top  at years end.Agassi had a poor start to .Agassi withdrew from the Australian Open because of the ankle injury,and his back injury and other pains forced him to withdraw from several other events,eventually skipping the entire claycourt season,including the French Open.This caused his ranking to drop out of the top  for the last time.Agassi returned for the grasscourt season,playing a tuneup,and then  Wimbledon Championships  Mens SinglesWimbledon.He was defeated in the third round by world no.and eventual runnerup Rafael Nadal.Against conventions,Agassi,the losing player,was interviewed on court after the match.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.msnbc.comid titleUpsetting day: Agassi,then Roddick ousted dateJune ,accessdateOctober ,agencyAssociated Press publisherNBC Sports archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.msnbc.comid archivedateNovember ,deadurlnolt;refgt; At Wimbledon,Agassi announced his plans to retire following the US Open.Agassi played only two events during the summer hardcourt season,As a result,he was unseeded at the US Open.Agassi had a short,but dramatic,run in his final US Open.Because of extreme back pain,Agassi was forced to receive antiinflammatory injections after every match.After a tough fourset win against Andrei Pavel,Agassi faced eighthseeded Marcos Baghdatis in the second round,who had earlier advanced to the  Australian Open final and Wimbledon semifinals.In his last match,Agassi fell to thranked bigserving Benjamin Becker of Germany in four sets.Agassi earned more than amp;nbsp;million in prizemoney during his career,sixth only to Federer,Djokovic,Nadal,Sampras and Murray to date October ,He also earned more than amp;nbsp;million a year through endorsements during his career,fourth in all sports at the time.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.forbes.comlistsYUQ.html titleForbes:Andre Agassi workForbes accessdateJanuary ,Since retiring after the  US Open tennis US Open,On September ,He played an exhibition match at Wimbledon,teaming with his wife,Steffi Graf,to play with Tim Henman and Kim Clijsters.He played World Team Tennis for the Philadelphia Freedoms in the summer of .lt;refgt;http:sportsillustrated.comtennisagassi.apindex.html Andre Agassi Will Play WTT SI.March ,waybackurlhttp:sportsillustrated.comtennisagassi.apindex.html date lt;refgt; At the  French Open,Agassi was on hand to present Roger Federer,with the trophy.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.guardian.accessdateSeptember ,Also in  Agassi played at the Outback Champions Series event for the first time.Arizona,where he reached the final before bowing to eventual champion Todd Martin.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.championsseriestennis.comeventseventresults titleChampions Series Tennis  Arizona  year accessdateApril ,lt;refgt; He also announced that he will not be playing the tour on a fulltime basis,and played the tournament as a favor to longtime friend Jim Courier.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.cbssports.powersharesseries.lt;refgt; and later defeated Sampras at the CTCA Championships at his hometown Las Vegas.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.In  Agassi took part in five tournaments,winning three of those.In November,at first he won BILT Champions Showdown in San Jose,CaliforniaSan Jose,beating John McEnroe in the final.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.lt;refgt; The following day,he defended his title of the CTCA Championships,while defeating Courier in the decisive match.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.lt;refgt; In the series season finale,he beat Michael Chang for the Acura Champions Cup.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.lt;refgt; The series and Agassi came back to action in .Agassi won both tournaments he participated in.At the Camden Wealth Advisors Cups final in Houston,Agassi beat James Blake tennisJames Blake for a rematch of their  US Open quarterfinal.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.cominrepriseofusopenepicandreagassibeatsjamesblaketowin titleIn Reprise of  U.Open Epic,Andre Agassi Beats James Blake to Win publisherPowerShares Series accessdateMay ,lt;refgt; He defeated Blake again in Portland,OregonPortland to win the title of the Cancer Treatment Centers of America Championships.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.lt;refgt; In  Agassi took part in just one event of the PowerShares Series,losing to Mark Philippoussis in the final of the Champions Shootout.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.powersharesseries.In  in Macau Agassi and Sampras met for the first time on court since the  US Open final.Sampras won the exhibition in three sets.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:sports.ndtv.Partnered with Roger Federer and Rafael Nadal,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.theguardian.accessdateMay ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.nytimes.comsportstennistennis.html?r titleAgassi and Sampras Meet a Year After FlareUp publisherNew York Times dateMarch ,accessdateMay ,lt;refgt; On March ,Agassi and Sampras squared off for an exhibition in London for the annual World Tennis Day.This time it was Agassi who came out on top in two straight sets.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.stevegtennis.London and New York publisherSteveG Tennis dateMarch  accessdateMay ,Early in his career,Agassi would look to end points quickly by playing firststrike tennis,typically by inducing a weak return with a deep,hard shot,and then playing a winner at an extreme angle.His groundstrokes,return of serve,baseline game,anticipation,phenomenal eyehand coordination were always among the best in the game.On the rare occasion that he charged the net,Agassi liked to take the ball in the air and hit a swinging volley for the winner.His favored groundstroke was his flat,accurate twohanded backhand,hit well crosscourt but in particular down the line.His forehand was nearly as strong,in particular his insideout forehand to the ad court.lt;refgt;cite web author Nick Bollettieri urlhttp:www.tennisplayer.netpublictourstrokesnickbollettierinickbolletagassibackhandimagesnickbolletagassibackhand.html?formatprint titleBuilding the Agassi Backhand websitetennisplayer.net accessdateJune ,Agassis strength was in dictating play from the back of the court.While he was growing up,his father and Nick Bollettieri trained him in this way.and to make his opponent run more.This change to more methodical,less aggressive baseline play was largely initiated by his longtime coach,Brad Gilbert,in their first year together in .Gilbert encouraged Agassi to wear out opponents with his deep,flat groundstrokes and to use his fitness to win attrition wars,and noted Agassis twohanded backhand down the line as his very best shot.Agassis serve was never the strength of his game,but it improved steadily over the course of his career to being above average.He often used his hard slice serve to the deuce service box to send his opponent off the court,followed by a shot to the opposite corner.Agassis service speed when hitting a flat first serve would range between convertandmphkmhabbron.His second serve usually was a heavy quot;kickquot; serve in the mids range.Agassi was raised on hardcourts,but found much of his early majortournament success on the red clay of Roland Garros,reaching two consecutive finals there early in his career.His first major win was at the slick grass of Wimbledon in ,a tournament that he professed to hating at the time.lt;ref namequot;ReferenceAquot; gt; His strongest surface over the course of his career,was indeed hardcourt,where he won six of his eight majors.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Agassi,along with five athlete partners including Wayne Gretzky,Joe Montana,Shaquille ONeal,Ken Griffey,and Monica Seles opened a chain of sportsthemed restaurant named Official All Star Caf in April .The restaurant closed down in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegassun.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.bloomberg.comappsnews?pidnewsarchiveamp;sidaOozdLtdRM titleAgassi,Graf Stake Tennis Winnings on  Million Idaho Resort publisherBloomberg dateJuly ,firstAnthony lastEffinger accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,he joined the Tennis Channel to promote the channel to consumers and cable and satellite industry,and made an equity investment in the network.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:pwww.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesForTheRecordCompleteForTheRecord.aspx titleComplete For the Record publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateSeptember ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; After meeting chef Michael Mina at one of his restaurants in San Francisco,Agassi partnered with him in  to start Mina Group Inc.and opened  concept restaurants in San Francisco,San Jose,CaliforniaSan Jose,Dana Point,Atlantic City and Las Vegas.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.starchefs.comcookchefsbiomichaelmina titleChef Michael Mina of Michael Mina  Biography publisherStarchefs.com dateNovember  accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.andreagassi.commichaelmina titleCOMMON TASTES publisherAndre Agassi Ventures accessdateSeptember ,lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegassun.firstLiz lastBenston accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; One year later,the group sold the hotelcasino to Landrys,Inc.for  million in cash and  million in assumed debt.lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegassun.firstLiz lastBenston accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,he sat on the board of Meadows Bank,an independent bank in Nevada.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; He has invested in startup companies backed by Allen amp; Company.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesSBJInDepthTheDealmaker.aspx titleThe dealmaker publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateMarch ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,Agassi and Graf formed a company called Agassi Graf Holdings.They invested in PURE,a nightclub at Caesars Palace,which opened in ,lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot; gt; and sold it to Angel Management Group in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegassun.comnewsmaragassigraflawsuitover titleAndre Agassi,Steffi Graf allege default in sale of Pure nightclub stake publisherLas Vegas Sun dateMarch ,firstSteve lastGreen accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In August ,Agassi and Graf developed a joint venture with highend furniture maker Kreiss Enterprises.lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot; gt; They launched a furniture line called Agassi Graf Collection.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.apartmenttherapy.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:query.nytimes.comgstfullpage.html?resEDEEFABCACB titleCURRENTS: FURNITURE; A Swan Song for Agassi,but a Duet With Graf publisherThe New York Times dateAugust ,firstElaine lastLouie accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In September,Agassi and Graf,through their company Agassi Graf Development LLC,along with Bayview Financial LP,finalized an agreement to develop a condominium hotel,Fairmont Tamarack,at Tamarack Resort in Donnelly,Idaho.lt;ref namequot;bloombergquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:tamarackidaho.comaboutmediaroomnewsreleases.pressid titleNews Releases publisherTamarack Resort dateSeptember ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Due to difficult market conditions and delays,they withdrew from the project in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.usta.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.cnbc.comid titleAndre Agassi: Las Vegas is back in business publisherCNBC dateJune ,firstKiran lastMoodley accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; The group still owns three small chunks of land.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.idahostatesman.comtamarackswaitinggame.html?rh titleOvercoming downhill run,Tamarack plays the waiting game publisherIdaho Statesman dateDecember ,firstZach lastKyle accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In September,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.prnewswire.comnewsreleasesandreagassipartnerswithexclusiveresorts.html titleAndre Agassi Partners with Exclusive Resorts publisherPR Newswire dateSeptember ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:blogs.firstTy lastMcMahan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:techcrunch.firstMike lastButcher accessdateSeptember ,In October ,Village Roadshow has a  stake in the park while Agassi,Graf,and other private investors hold the remaining .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:blogs.comdealjournalaustraliaagassigrafscoreaussieinvestorforvegaswaterpark titleAgassi,Graf Score Aussie Investor for Vegas Water Park publisherThe Wall Street Journal dateOctober ,firstRoss lastKelly accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegassun.firstRichard N.lastVelotta accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; The park opened in May .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.lasvegasweekly.comasweseeitmaywetnwildreturnssortfilllasvegaswaterpark titleWET N WILD RETURNS,SORT OF,TO FILL THE LAS VEGAS WATER PARK VOID publisherLas Vegas Weekly dateMay ,firstBrock lastRadke accessdateSeptember ,IMG companyIMG managed Agassi from the time he turned pro in  through January ,before switching to SFX Sports Group.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.nytimes.comsportsplustennisatptouragassijumpsfromimgtosfx.html titlePLUS: TENNIS  ATP TOUR; Agassi Jumps From I.to SFX publisherThe New York Times dateJanuary ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesNoTopicNameShuffledExecStaysAtSFXForAgassiAccount.aspx titleShuffled exec stays at SFX for Agassi account publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateApril ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; His business manager,lawyer,and agent was childhood friend Perry Rogers,but they have been estranged since .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:sports.espn.comsportstenniscolumnsstory?id titleAndre Agassis triumphs are his own publisherESPN dateJuly ,firstJoel lastDrucker accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comDailyIssuesIssueSportsIndustrialistsAndreAgassiEndsBusinessRelationshipWithPerryRogers.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,he and Graf signed with Creative Artists AgencyCAA.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesThisWeeksNewsCAAContinuesSportsPushSignsAgassiGraf.aspx titleCAA continues sports push,signs Agassi,Graf publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateApril ,firstLiz lastMullen firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,Agassi used Prince SportsPrince Prince original graphiteGraphite racket early in his career.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.tennis.comprogameprinceofaracquet.VAdyPldUrU titlePrince of a Racquet publisherTennis.com dateMay ,firstSteve lastTignor accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingandSponsorshipPrince.aspx titleRacket brand regroups and looks to rebound publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateJune ,firstJohn lastGeorge accessdateSeptember ,lt;ref namequot;LATimesquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:articles.latimes.firstBruce lastHorovitz accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; He later switched to Head companyHead Ti Radical racketlt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesNoTopicNameWHATTHEYREWEARINGANDHITTINGWITHATTHEUSOPEN.aspx titleWHAT THEYRE WEARING AND HITTING WITH AT THE U.OPEN publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateAugust ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Heads LiquidMetal Radical racket,having signed a multimilliondollar endorsement deal with Head in .lt;ref namequot;headquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingsponsorshipHeadpennSignsAgassiBeyondPlayingDays.aspx titleHeadPenn signs Agassi beyond playing days publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateNovember ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttps:www.head.comcorporatehistory.php titleOUR HISTORY publisherHEAD accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; He renewed his contract in  and in November ,he signed a lifetime agreement with Head.lt;ref namequot;headquot; gt;lt;ref namequot;forbesquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.forbes.comforbes.html titleKing of the Court publisherForbes dateJuly ,firstKurt lastBadenhausen accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; He also endorses Penn tennis balls.On July ,Agassi left Nike,Inc.Nike after  years and signed an endorsement deal with Adidas.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:sports.espn.comsportstennisnewsstory?id titleAgassi signs Adidas deal after longterm deal with Nike author Darren Rovell dateJuly ,publisherESPN accessdateJanuary ,and Adidas was more than happy to do so.On May ,Agassi rejoined Nike.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:tennis.accessdateMay ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.nicekicks.accessdateMay ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttps:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comDailyIssuesMarketingandSponsorshipAgassi.accessdateMay ,Agassi was sponsored by DuPont,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttps:twitter.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesNoTopicNameSponsorDealsToGaugeTennisAppeal.aspx titleSponsor deals to gauge tennis appeal publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateAugust ,firstMike lastReynolds accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Ebel,lt;ref namequot;LATimesquot; gt; Mountain Dew in ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesSpecialReportSoftDrinkRecastsImageToMirrorTeenSpirit.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Mazda in ,lt;ref namequot;kiamotorsquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesThisWeeksIssueKiaAfterGoodAgassiMileage.aspx titleKia after good Agassi mileage publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateSeptember ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Kia Motors in ,sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingsponsorshipMastercardMountsChallengeAsVisasNFLDealEntersFinalYear.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Deutsche Bank in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.theage.auarticles.html titleSporting Life publisherThe Age dateMarch ,firstGeoff lastMcClure accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,he appeared in a television commercial for Canon Inc.promoting the Canon EOS Rebel camera.lt;ref namequot;canonquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingsponsorshipAgassiStillInCanonsPicture.aspx titleAgassi still in Canons picture publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateAugust ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Between  and ,he signed a multimilliondollar,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesNoTopicNameIMGSFXBothClaimDealsTheirs.aspx titleIMG,SFX both claim deals theirs publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateApril ,firstLiz lastMullen accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingsponsorshipMarketingsponsorship.aspx titleMarketingSponsorship publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateMarch ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In mid,he was named the spokesman of Aramis Life,a fragrance by Este Lauder CompaniesAramis and signed a fiveyear deal with the company.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.highbeam.comdocG.html titleTHE AGASSI AND THE FRAGRANCY.Andre Agassi to market Aramis LifeBrief Article publisherDaily News Record dateJuly ,lastPalmieri firstJean E.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesThisWeeksIssueAgassiSniffsOutYearEndorsement.aspx titleAgassi sniffs out year endorsement publisherSportsBusiness Daily dateFebruary ,firstLiz lastMullen accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In March ,he signed a tenyear agreement worth .million a year with  Hour Fitness,which will open five Andre Agassi fitness centers by yearend.lt;ref namequot;forbesquot; gt; Prior to the  Australian Open,quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:jacobscreek.comaustralianewsaustralianopensuccess!titleAustralian Open Success!publisherJacobs Creek dateMarch ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,watchmaker Longines named Agassi as their brand ambassador.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.longines.comambassadorsandreagassi titleAMBASSADORS  Andre Agassi publisherLongines accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:vegasmagazine.Agassi and his mother appeared in a Got Milk?advertisement in .Agassi has appeared in many advertisements and television commercials with Graf.They both endorsed Deutsche Telekom in ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesThisWeeksIssueNewlywedsWillPitchCellularOnlineProducts.aspx titleNewlyweds will pitch cellular,online products publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateApril ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; Genworth Financiallt;ref namequot;genworthquot;gt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesMarketingsponsorshipAgassiGrafUnitedInGenworthAdCampaign.aspx titleAgassi,Graf united in Genworth ad campaign publisherSports dateJune ,firstDaniel lastKaplan accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Canon Inc.lt;ref namequot;canonquot; gt; in ,LVMH in ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.nytimes.combusinessmediaadco.html?pagewantedprint titleMr.Gorbachev,Show Off This Bag publisherThe New York Times firstEric lastPfanner dateAugust ,accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Nintendo Wiilt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.comtennisbeyondbaselinedailybagelandreagassisteffigrafcommercial titleDaily Bagel: Andre Agassi,Steffi Graf star in videogame commercial publisherSports Illustrated dateNovember ,firstCourtney lastNguyen accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Wii Fit Ult;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.videogamer.comwiiuwiifitunewsandreagassiandsteffigrafpromotewiifitu.html titleAndre Agassi and Steffi Graf promote Wii Fit U websiteVideoGamer.com dateNovember ,firstJames lastOrry accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; and Longines in .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.tennis.comphotosvideovideoagassiandgrafnewlongineswatchad.VBvVmvldUrU titleVideo: Agassi and Graf in new Longines watch ad publisherTennis.com dateMay ,firstJonathan lastScott accessdateSeptember ,In the early s Agassi dated American entertainer Barbra Streisand.Writing about the relationship in his  autobiography,he said,quot;We agree that were good for each other,and so what if shes twentyeight years older?Were simpatico,and the public outcry only adds spice to our connection.It makes our friendship feel forbidden,taboo  another piece of my overall rebellion.Dating Barbra Streisand is like wearing Hot Lava.Agassi was married to Brooke Shields from  to .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.people.compeoplearchivearticle,html titleDouble Fault publisherPeople.com dateApril ,firstTom lastGliatto accessdateSeptember ,He married Steffi Graf on October ,at their Las Vegas home,Graf being advanced in her pregnancy.They have two children: son Jaden Gil born  and daughter Jaz Elle born .lt;refgt;cite web lastKnolle firstSharon urlhttp:abcnews.comEntertainmentstory?idamp;page titleAndre Agassi and Steffi Graf Wed publisherAbcnews.com accessdateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:abcnews.comEntertainmentstory?idamp;page archivedateMay ,lt;refgt;http:www.nzherald.nzsportnewsarticle.cidamp;objectid quot;Tennis: Agassi taking different tact with fatherhood,quot; The New Zealand Herald,January ,lt;refgt; The GrafAgassi family resides in Summerlin,NevadaSummerlin,a community in the Las Vegas Valley.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:sportsillustrated.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:safinhantuchova.blogspot.compapagil.html titlePeter Bodo Blog: Papa Gil accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; In ,Agassi and Reyes introduced their own line of fitness equipment,BILT By Agassi and Reyes.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.thepostgame.com accessdateSeptember ,In December ,Agassis childhood friend and former business manager,Perry Rogers,sued Graf for ,in management fees he claimed that she owed him.lt;refgt;http:media.lasvegassun.commediapdfsblogsdocumentsComplaintandSummons.pdf Alliance Sports Management v.Stephanie Graf Las Vegas Sun.Retrieved October ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;http:www.lvrj.comnews.html quot;Exmanager for Agassi sues Grafquot; Las Vegas ReviewJournal December ,Retrieved October ,Agassis autobiography,Open written with assistance from J.Moehringerlt;refgt;http:www.nytimes.combooksbook.html?r quot;Agassi Basks in His Own Spotlightquot; by Janet Malin New York Times November ,Retrieved December ,lt;refgt;,was published in November .In it,Agassi admitted that he used and tested positive for methamphetamine in .lt;ref namequot;sports.espn.comquot; gt;lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.nydailynews.comsportsmoresportsagassi.lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.nbcwashington.comnewssportsNATLAndreAgassiAdmitstoUsingCrystalMeth.html titleAndre Agassi Admits to Using Crystal Meth dateOctober ,accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; In response to this revelation,Roger Federer declared himself shocked and disappointed,while Marat Safin argued that Agassi should return his prize money and be stripped of his titles.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:sport.repubblica.itnewssporttennisfedererdelusoescioccatodaagassi.html titleTENNIS,guardian.lt;refgt; In an exclusive interview with CBS,Agassi justified himself and asked for understanding,saying that  quot;It was a period in my life where I needed help.quot;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportmediaset.mediaset.italtrisportarticoliarticolo.shtml titleAgassi: quot;Ora chiedo comprensionequot;.Droga,ex tennista si giustifica in tv languageit publisherSportMediaset accessdateNovember ,lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:www.guardian.uksportoctandreagassihatetennis titleWhy did Andre Agassi hate tennis?firstStuart lastJeffries workThe Guardian locationLondon dateOctober ,accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; The book reached No.nytimes.combooksbestsellerbesthardnonfiction.html?refbestseller workThe New York Times titleHardcover Nonfiction dateNovember ,accessdateMarch ,firstJennifer lastSchuesslerlt;refgt; and received favorable reviews.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:latimesblogs.latimes.comjacketcopybookreviewsagassimaylemourlevatpalin.html workThe Los Angeles Times titleJacket Copy dateNovember ,lt;refgt; It won the Autobiography category of the  British Sports Book Awards.lt;refgt;cite news urlhttp:blogs.telegraph.Pity about the gloopy speech workThe Daily Telegraph author Simon Briggs dateMarch ,accessdateNovember ,Agassi has donated more than ,to Democratic candidates.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.newsmeat.comsportspoliticaldonationsAndreAgassi.php titleAndre Agassis Federal Campaign Contribution Report publisherNewsMeat accessdateJanuary ,lt;refgt; On September ,when he appeared on daily WNYC public radio program quot;The Brian Lehrer Show,quot; he stated that he is a registered Independent.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:beta.wnyc.Agassi founded the Andre Agassi Charitable Association in ,which assists Las Vegas young people.He is regularly cited as the most charitable and socially involved player in professional tennis.It has also been claimed that he may be the most charitable athlete of his generation.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.blackvoices.Agassis charities help in assisting children reach their athletic potential.His Boys amp; Girls Club sees ,children throughout the year and boasts a worldclass junior tennis team.Agassi opened the Andre Agassi College Preparatory Academylt;ref namePrepgt;cite web urlhttp:www.agassiprep.org titleAndre Agassi College Preparatory Academy accessdateJanuary ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:agassiprep.org archivedateFebruary ,deadurlnolt;refgt; in Las Vegas,a tuitionfree charter school for atrisk children in the area.He personally donated  million to the school.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.sportsbusinessdaily.comJournalIssuesOpinionSternNBAMakeDoingWellByDoingGoodContagious.aspx titleStern,NBA make doing well by doing good contagious publisherSportsBusiness Journal dateMarch ,firstMarc lastPollick accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; In ,the graduating class had  percent graduation rate and expected a  percent college acceptance rate.lt;refgt;cite web lastSmith firstKaren urlhttp:www.edupage.accessdateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.edupage.subjaboutamp;pagepresidentblogamp;id archivedateJuly ,Child Haven.In ,His foundation also provided ,to assist in the building of the Andre Agassi Cottage for Medically Fragile Children.This bed facility opened in December ,lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.athlete.comprofile.id titleAndre Agassi publisherAthlete.com accessdateJune ,archiveurlweb.archive.orgwebhttp:www.athlete.comprofile.id archivedateJuly ,along with several other athletes,Agassi founded the charity Athletes for Hope,lt;refgt;cite web titleHistory urlhttp:www.athletesforhope.orghistory.The Fund is an investment initiative for social change,In September ,the Andre Agassi Foundation for Education formed a partnership with V Foods to launch Box Budd!a line of kids healthy snacks.All proceeds go to the Foundation.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.es raises educations funds with healthful snacks publisherLas Vegas ReviewJournal dateOctober ,firstLaura lastCarroll accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt;lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.foodnavigatorusa.comManufacturersAndreAgassiteamsupwithVFoodstolaunchBoxBudd!essnacksforkids titleAndre Agassi teams up with V Foods to launch Box Budd!es snacks for kids publisherFoodnavigatorusa.com dateSeptember ,firstElaine lastWatson accessdateSeptember ,In February ,Doral Academy opened in August .lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.firstJennifer lastRobinson accessdateSeptember ,lt;refgt; The Fund purchased a .acre plot in Henderson,Nevada to house the Somerset Academy of Las Vegas,which will relocate from its campus inside a church.lt;refgt;cite web urlhttp:www.reviewjournal.combusinesscanyonagassigroupbuysacreplotacademy titleCanyonAgassi group buys .acre plot for academy publisherLas Vegas ReviewJournal dateFebruary ,accessdateSeptember ,width  Tournament !Tooltip SR  Strike Rate !colspan  Tooltip ,By winning the  French Open,Agassi completed a mens singles Career Grand Slam.He is the th of  male players in history after Don BudgeBudge,Fred PerryPerry,Rod LaverLaver,Roy EmersonEmerson and before Roger Federer and Rafael Nadal to achieve this.lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,lt;supgt;lt;supgt;,